It refers to the innate roots of good: 
for one who cuts off the roots of good has already fallen from the acquired roots of good. 
What is the objectof the false view which cuts off the roots of good? 
The false view which negates cause and result. 
Negation of cause is to think, There is neither good nor bad action. 
Negation of result is to think,There is no retribution, no result of good or bad action. 
According to another opinion, these two false views,that which negates cause, and that which negates result,contribute to the cutting off of the roots of good in the same way as ānantaryamārga and vimukiimārga contribute to the cutting off of the defilements. 
Some say that the negation which cuats off the roots of good has for its object sāsrava, the impure, or the first two Truths, aṇd not anāṣrava, the pure, or the last two Truths; tather it has for its object the sphere where one is to be found, and not Rūpadhātu and Ārūpyadhātu. 
In fact, the negation which bears on the pure or the higher spheres is weak, because it is in relation with these objects only by association. 
The roots of good are cut off completely by false view, whether this tefers to cause or result, pure or impure, Kāmadhātu or the higher spheres. 
kskḵ Some say that the nine categories of the roots of good, weakweak roots of good, weakmedium, weakstrong, mediumweak, etc., are cut off all at once through one moment of false view, in the same way that the defileaments which are abandoned by Seeing into one Truth are, in all their categories,abandoned through the Seeing of this Ttuth. 
The roots of good are cut off in the manner in which the defilements to be abandoned through Meditation on the Truths are abandoned: this means that the strongstrong root of good is cut off by a weakweak false view, and thus following to the weakweak root of good which is cut off by a strongstrong false view. 
This theory is not in agreement with the text, What are the small and concomitant roots of good. 
They are those which are abandoned lastly to the cutting off of the roots of good; those through the absence of which a person is termed onewhohastherootsof. goodcutoff. Objection: 
If the cutting off is gradual, how should one understand the text, What are the strongstrong roots of evil? 
The roots of evil through which one cats off the roots of good? 
This text refers to the achievement of the cutting off of the roots of good, for it is through the strongstrong roots of evil that the roots of good totally disapear. 
As long as the last category of the roots of good, the weakweak, is not cut off, it can determine the reappearance of the others. 
According to certain masters, the cutting off of the riine categories takes place at one time, without interruption, like the abandoning of the defilements through the Path of Seeing into the Truths. 
According to certain masters, the abandoning of discipline preceeds the cutting off of the roots. 
But the Vaibhāṣikas say that the discipline is lost when one loses the mind of which this discipline is the result. 
kkk What beings are capable of cutting off the roots of good? 
Only humans cut them off; not the creatures in the painful realms of rebirth; for their discernment , whether defiled or not, is not firm; not the gods, for the reṣult of action is manifest to them. 
And only humans of the three continents cut them off, bot those of Uttarakuru, for they do not possess bad āśayas. 
According to another opinion, only humaṉs in Jambudvīpa cut off the roots of good. 
But this is in contradiction with the text, The inhabitants of Jambudvīpa possess a minimum of eight organs; the same for the inhabitants of Pūrvavidena and of Avaragodānīya. 
Men and women cut off the roots. 
According to another opinion, women do not cut off the roots because their will and their application are weak. 
But this is in contradiction with the text, Whoever possesses the female organ necessatily possesses eight organs. 
What is the nature of the cutting off of the roots of good? 
A person with a false view, who has cut off the roots of good, is punished in Avīci Hell; a person guilty of an ānantarya transgression is punished in Avīci, or elsewhere.? 
With regard to the painful realms of rebirth, volition can coexist at most with eight courses. 
Volition caṇ coexist with one course of action, as when either greed, anger, or a false view manifests itself, without any material course of action having taken place; or rather the person who has prepared one of the material courses of action finds himself to have a nondefiled, that is,a good or neutralmind, at the moment when, on his instigation, this course of action is perpetuated. 
Volition can coexist with two courses of action, as when a person with an angry mind kills; or when a person who is prey to greed steals, or commits adultery, or speaks in an inconsiderate manner. 
We have shown under what conditions volition coexists with the good courses of action included in the disciplines. 
this good mental consciousness includes the three mental actions to which is added two renouncings, two material actions; and 3. 
Inconsiderate words exist in hell, forbeings in helllament; injurious words, for beings in hell mutually reproach one another; and anger, because they hate one another for the duration of their lives. 
Greed and false views, as potentiality. Beings in hell possess greed and false views, but these do not actually exist in hell: because of the absence of any object to which one could become attached, and because the result of action is manifested. 
In hellkilling isabsent, for beings in helldie through the exhaustion of their actions ; stealing and adultṛy are absent, for beings in helldo not have property or objects of property, or women,; lying isabsent, for it is useless; and malicious words are useless, for beings in hell are at a distance and are always separate from one another. 
But, in fact, greed is absent there, for no one has anything of his own; in the saṃme way anger is absent, because they are soft, and because there is no cause for displeasure; so too false views are absent, because there is no bad āfaya. 
Inconsiderate words exist there in fact; for, sometimes, the inhabitants of Uttarakuru sing with a defiled mind. 
Because bad āśzya is absent there; because the duration of ones life is determined there ; and because no one possesses any property or object of property, or women, and also through its lack of usefulness, killing and the other courses of action are absent in Uttarakuru. 
If the men of Uttarakuru do not have wives, how can they have uṅchaste behavior? 
They take the women with whom they desire to enjoy pleasure by the hand and go to a tree. If sex with this woman is allowable, the tree covers up the couple with its branches; in the contrary case, the tree does not cover up the couple. 
The ten bad courses of action exist in fact in Kāmadhātu with the exception of hell and Uttarakuru. 
Concerning animals, Pretas and gods, the bad courses of action are not necessarily connected with undiscipline ; with regard to humans, the bad courses of action are either necessarily connected, or not necessatily connected to undiscipline.. 
Does killing exist among the gods? The gods do not, amongst themselves, kill one another, but they kill beings belonging to other realms of rebirth, Pretas, etc. 
According to another opinion, the gods also kill bycutting the head or the body. 
Three good courses of action exist everywhere, as potentiality and in fact. Everywhere, in the three spheres of existence and in the five realms of rebirth, nongreed, nonanger and Right Views exist both as potentiality and in fact. 
In the Ārūpyas, among the Unconscious Ones, seven courses of action exist as potentiality. 
Amonghe beings of Ārūpyadhātu aṇd the Asāmjñisattvas , the seven good material courses of action, bodily and vocal, exist solely as potentaility. 
In fact, Āryans who are born in Ārūpyadhātu possess the past and future discipline of pure morality, and the Unconscious Oṇes possess the discipline of hyāna under the same conditiops. 
The past pure discipline that the Āryan who is in Ārūpyadhātu possesses, has for its base of support the stage or stages which he has produced and destroyed; the future pure discipline that he will possess, has on the contrary the five stages for its base of support. 
Beings in hell and the Uttarakurus do not undertake any morality. Elsewhere the seven good material courses of action exist in fact. One must make a distinction. 
Among the animals and Pretas, the good courses of action are never necessarily connected with discipline; in Rūpadhātu, they are always necessarily connected with discipline; elsewhere they can be of one or the other category. 
All the other courses of action have retributive results, outflowing result, and predominating results. 
Good or bad, the ten courses of action have a threefold result. 
Such is the retributive result. 
2.If a transgressor is rteborn in a human existence, through murder he will be of brief lifespan; through stealing he will be poor; through llicit sexuality,he will have an unfaithful spouse; through lying, he will be slandered; through malicious speech, his friends will become enemies; through injurious speech, he will only undertand disagreeable speech; through inconsiderate speech, his words will not come to be believed; through greed, he will have great desires , through anger, he will have great hate; and through false views, he will have great ignorance, for ignorance is great in false views. 
Such is the outflowing result. 
But, one would say, a human existence, even if it is short, is the retṛibution of a good action. How can one regard it as an outflowing result of murder? 
We do not say that this existence is the result of murder; we say rather, that a murderer will have a short life by reason of the murder; murder is the cause which rends a human existence short, an existence otherwise caused by a good action. 
By reason of the intense practice of killing, external things plants, the sun, etc.,are of little vitality; by reason of stealing, they are crushed by rains of stones, dust and acid; by reason of illicit sexuality, they are covered by dust or acid; by reason of lying, they are of bad odor; by reason of malicious speech, they are in a hole or on a hill; by reason of injurious speech, the land and the sun are impregnated with saltand are sterile, and the plants are detestable and pernicious; by reason of inconsiderate speech, the seasons are reveṛsed; by reason of greed, fruits are small; by reason of anger, fruits are sour; and by reason of false views, ftnits are very few, or are totally absent. 
Such is the pre dominating result. 
kksk Is it by reason of killing that a murderer is reborn in hell and then only enjoys a short human life? 
According to others, existence in hell comes from the preparatory action of killing; the fact of having a short life comes from the action itself. 
It is true that the Sūtra speaks of killing as the cause of existence in hell, but itunderstands by killing, not only killing, but killing with all the actions thataccompany it.What is called outflowing result does not here exist separately from the retributive result and the predominating result. 
It is called outflowing by reason of the resemblance between the cause and its effect. 
kksk Why is the result of the courses of action threefold? 
Because one causes suffering, there is a retributive result, that is, suffering in hell; because one makes him die, there is an outflowing result, that is, his life is short; and because one destroys his vigor, there is a predominating result, that is,external things are of little vigor. 
The same for the other courses of action. 
through having practiced, cultivated, and developed the renouncing of killing, one is reborn among the gods; if one is reborn down here in human condition, one will have a long life. 
kskt The Blessed One distinguishes wrong speech , wrong action , and wrong manner of livelihood. 
Is this to say that wrong livelihood is separate from wrong speech and wrong action? 
Bodily and vocal actions whicharise from attachmentare wrong manner of livelihood; itconstitutes a separate category, because it is difficult to purify. 
Bodily action and vocal action arising from hate and ignorance are, respectively, wrong actrion and wrong speech. 
Arisen from attachment, both constitute wrong manner of livelihood, distinguished in this way because the manner of livelihood is difficult to purify. 
Āttachment is by its nature,a bandit: one watches withdifficulty the mind of the actions which provokeattachment. 
Consequently, since the mananer of livelihood is, as long as one lives, difficult to purify, the Blessed One, with an end that one should apply himself to purifyiDg it, made a separatecategory of wrong livelihood. 
There is a stanza,! The layman purifies his views with difficulty, for he is always in the prey of multiple views; the monk purifies his manner of livelihood with difficulty, for his subsistance depends on others. 
If one says that it is solely action issued from attachment to the resources necessary for life,no; for this is incontradiction with the Sūtra. 
And why? 
How many results are included in the different types of action? 
Impure, in the path of abandoning, action embraces the five results. 
The path of abandoning is so called because it has abandoning for its goal, or because the defilements are abandoned due to it. 
This is the ānantarya path which will be defined later and which is of two types, pure and impure. 
Action which forms part of the impure path of abandoning, includes the five results: 
retributive result: an agreeable retribution which belongs to the same stage as the action; 2. 
an outflowing result: dharmas arisen from the absorption, similar to theaction,and lateṛ than it; 3. a discoṇnective result: 
disconnection from the defilements, the abandoning of thedefilements; 4.a reṣult of virile activity: 
thedharmas that this action gives rise to, namely the path of deliverance , the coexisting dharmas, the future dharmas of which this action causes one to obtain possession, and the abandoning itself; and 5. 
a predominating result: all the conditioned dharmas with the exception of the action in question, and with the exception of the dharmas already arisen. 
Pure, it includes four results. 
The preceding ones, with the exception of the retributive result. 
The rest of pure action and neutral action, three results. 
kkk What is the naturegood, bad, or neutral,of the results of different actions? 
The good,bad, neutral dharmnas, constitute four, two, and three results of good action. 
Outflowing results, discoṇnnective results, virile activity, and pre dominating results of good action are good dharmas.Retributive results are neutral by nature. 
Virile activity and predominating results of good action are bad dharmas. 
Good, bad, neutral dharmas, constitute, respectively two, three, and four results of bad action. 
Two results,.virile activity and predominating results of bad action,aṟe good dharmas. 
Three resultsby ornitting retributive results and disconnective resultsare bad dharmas. 
Four resultsby omitting disconnective resultsare neutral dharmas. 
How is this? 
namely of the universal defilements which one abandons through the Seeing of Sufferingand Arising, and of the defilements of the rāga class, etc., which one abandons through the Seeing of Suffering. 
Two results.virile activity and predominating results,are good dharmas. 
Three resultsby omitting retributive results and disconnective resultsare bad dharnas. 
In fact some bad dharmas of the five categories , to be abandoned through Seeing the Truth of Suffering, etc.,arean outflowing resultof two neutral dharmas, namely of satkāyadrṛṣṭi and antagrāhadrṭi. 
Three resultsthe same as aboveare neutral. 
iḥṣk With regard to the time period, and the stage, etc., Some dharmas of all types constitute four results of past action. 
All the āharmas or some dharmas of all types, that is, past, present and future, cen constitute four of the results of past action. 
Median action, that is, present action, has four resultoby excluding disconnectionwhich are future dharmas. 
There are two which are median dharmas. Some presentdharmas are predominating results and virile activity of median action. 
For action not yet arisen, there are three results made up of future dharmas. 
That is, retributive results, predominating results, and virileactivity. Future action does not have outflowing results. 
Some dharmas of the same stage constitute four results, whereas some dharmas of another stage constitute three or two results. 
An action of a certain stage produces four resultsby exclding disconnectonwhich are dharmas of its own stage. 
virile activity, predominating result and also outflowing tesult, after the rule gīven in ii53. 
Some impure dharmas belong to a stage different from that of the action which constitutes virile activity and the predominatiṇg result of this action. 
Some Śaikṣa harmas, etc. 
constitute three results of Śaikṣa actioṉ. 
Some dharmas characteristic of the Saint who is not an Arhat constitute outflowing results, virile activity,and predominating results of Śaikṣa action. 
NeitherŚaikṣanorAśaikṣa dharmas coṉstitate virile activity, pre dominating results and disconnective resuits of Śaikṣa action. 
914 Śaikṣa dharmas, etc., constitute one result, three results, and two results of Aśaikṣa action, etc. 
Aśaikṣa dharmas aṟe a predominating result, an outflowing result, and virile activity of this action. 
NeitherŚaikṣanorAśaikṣa dharmas are predominating results and virile activity of this action. 
Some Śaikṣa dharmas, etc., constitte two results, two tesults, and five results of actrion diffeting from the two preceeding. 
Some Śaikṣa dharmas and some Aśaikṣa dharmas are virile activity and predominating results of this action. 
Dharmas susceptible of being abandoned through Seeing the Truths , susceptible of being abandoned through Meditation ,and not susceptible of being abandoned , constitute three results, two results, one result of action susceptible of being abandoned through Seeing the Truths. 
Some bhāvanāheya dharmas are four results of this action: excluding disconnection. 
Some apraheya harmas are predominating results of this action. 
Darśanaheya dharmas are virile activity and predominating results of bhāvanāheya action. 
Bhāvanāheya dharmas are four results of this action: excluding disconṉection. 
Apraheya dharmas are virile activity, predominating results, and disconnection of this action. 
Darśanaheyadharmas are predominating results of apruheyaaction. 
Some bhāvanābeya dharmas are predominating results and virile activity reṣults of this action. 
Some apraheyadharmas are four results of this action: omitng the retrṛibutive result. The text has yathākramam, respetctively, the same as the above passage has anukramaṉ in the sense of yathākraman.It repeats here respectively: 
Such is,in effect,the process of abbreviation. 
kksk In the teaching of the doctrine of action the following question is again posed: the Treatise speaks of proper action , improper action , and neitherpropernor improper action. What is the meaning of these three actions? 
Improper action is defiled action; according to some, irregular action also. 
Some say that improper action is defiled action, because this proceeds from a wrong judgment. 
when a person walks, stands still, eats, or dresses himself in a manner other than that which he should, this actionwhich is undefiledneutralis improper, for this person acts contrary to received usage. 
There is the same divergence of view with regard to proper action: 
this is either good action, ot good and regular action. 
kkk Does one action project one birth or many births? 
Do many actions project one birth or many births? 
According to the system of the School One action projects one arising. 
This thesis is in contradiction with what the Sthavira Aniruddha says, Through the retribution of this single alm , after baving been born up to seven times among the Thirtythree Gods, I am finally born in the family of the rich Śākyaṇs. Answer: Aniruddha, through this alm, obtained a great prosperity; he obtaineda memory of his past lives; and he accomplished many new meritorious works. By expressing himself as he did, he intends to indicate his point of departure. 
It is thus that a person who had acquired a sum of one thousand by means of a single penny, could say, It is through one penny that I have acquired this fortune. 
for if this were the case, the projection of existence would take place in parts. 
But admitting that one existence is projected by a single action, Many actions complete an existence. 
The same way that a painter with one stroke delineates the outline of an image, and then fills in this image: 
so too, even though their quality of being a human is the same, certain humans have perfect organs, major and minor members; certain humans are beautiful through the excellence of their hue, figure, shape and power, whereas, in certain humans this or that is lacking. 
However Neither the two absorptions of unconsciousness nor the prāptis project. 
Even though they are retribution, the two absorptions of un consciousness do not project an existence, because they do not coexist with action. 
The prāptis do not project an existence, because they do not have the same result as does the action with which they coexist. 
ḵkk The Blessed One said that there are three āvaraṇas oṛ obstacles: the obstacle of action , the obstacle of the defilements , and the obstacie of retribution. 
What are the three obstacles? 
dnantarya actions; chronic defilements; and bad realms of rebirth, and Asajñisattvas and Kurus, are the threefold obstacle. 
The obstacdle which consists of action are the five mortal transgressions: 
The obstacle which consists of the defilements is chronic defilement. 
Defilement is of two types, chronic and violent: 
chronic defilemet is continual defilement, and violent defilement is strong defilement. 
Chronic defilement constitutes an obstacle, as is the case, for example, among eunuchs. 
Defilements which surge up from time to time, even if their impulse is strong, can be overcome, but not continual defilement, even though it is at rest. 
The person inwhom this is found does not find the time to make an effort to overcome it. 
From being small, they become mediurm sized; and from medium sized, they become strong: thus they form an obstacle. 
The obstacle which consists of retribution is the three painful realms of rebirthexistence in hell, animal existence, and Preta existenceand one part of the good realms of rebirthhuman existence in Uttarakuru, and heavenly existence amoṅg the Un conscious Ones. 
What does obstacle mean? 
That which causes an obstacle to the Way and to the roots of good preparatory to the Way, wṣmagatas, etc. 
Actions which necessrily produce painful realms of rebirth, etc., which produce birth in eggs, birth in sweat, birth as a woman, or an eighth birth, form obstacles. 
Only actions easily discernible by others and by the agent himself:and that from five points of vieware mentioned here. 
from five points of view, action which is mortal transgression is easy to discern. 
Among the obstacles, the gravest is the obstacle of defilement, followed by the obstacle of action. For these two obstacles rend one incapable of health, not only in the present existence, but also in the next existence. 
According to the Vaibhāṣikas , the obstacle of defilement is the gravest because it produces the obstacle of action; the obstacle of action is heavier than the obstacle of retribution because it produces this obstacle. 
Or rather a person guilty of a mortal transgression is reborn, after this life, immediately in hell; the gailty person is thus entara, one without intermediate ; thus the dharma the possession of which makes the guilty one an nantara is called ānantarya, like one terms śrāmaṇya the dḍharma which makes someone a Śrāmaṇa. 
Mortal transgressions exist in the three continents. 
The inhabitants of Uttarakuru and living beings which are not humans are not capable of mortal transgressions. 
And, among humans, only men and women can commit mortal trans gressions: 
It is not admitted that eunuchs, etc., are capable of this traṇsgression, because of the mediocrity of their kindness and respect. 
For the same reasons that rend eunuchs, etc., incapable of indiscipline ; and, further, because their parents, having given to the eunuch only an incomplete body and having only a mediocre affection for their son, are mediocre benefactors; because, on the other hand, the eunuch does not experience a strong respect for his parents the destruction of which would render him guilty of a mortal transgression. 
For the same reasons then, Pretas and animals, if they were to kill their parents, are not guilty of mortal transgressions. 
Nevertheless, the Bhadaṇta said that animals in whom intelligence is lively, for example, the gāneya horse, are capable of mortal transgressions. 
For the same reasons, a human born of demon parents does not commit a mortal transgression in killing them. 
The other two obstacles exist in the five realms of rebirth. 
Birth in Uttarakuru is an obstacle of retribution for humans; birth among the Asajñisattvas is such for the gods. 
kksṭ What are, by their natures, the different actions of mortal transgression? 
Four are bodily action; one is vocal action; three are killing; one is lying; and oṉe is the preparation for murder, for the Tathāgatas cannot be killed by the attack of another. 
sksḥ We say that schism is lying, and that this lying is the fourth mortal transgression. 
If we make schism a mortal transgression, this is because we give the name of schism to lying which is the cause of schism; or rather the word schism should be explained s that which the divides Saṅgha. 
In fact, Schism is, by its nature, disharmony; this is an undefiled neutral dharma disassociated from the mind. 
4 Schism, that is, disharmony, is a saṇhskāra not associated with the mind , and is undefiledneutral: 
As much as it is a person who divides the Saṅgha, the schismatic is not in possession of the schism. On the the contrary It is the Saṅgha which possesses the schismn. 
It is that which is divided, and not the schismatic, which possesses the saskāra called division of the Saṅgha. 
The transgression of schism is lying; it belongs to the schismatic. 
The schismatic possesses the transgression of schism, which is This lyingarises at the same time as the schism itself;, it consists of vocal vjñapti and avijñapti. 
Yet all mortal transgressions are retributed in the next existence: what would happen if a person is guilty of many mortal transgressions? 
Suffering growsby reason of supplementary transgression. A person guilty of many moral transgressions possesses in Avīci a large body and very tender flesh by which he feels twofold, threefold, fourfold, or fivefold, and his torments are extrememly numerous and insupportable. 
A Bhikṣu who is an intellectual, who is virtuous, divides. 
It is a Bhikṣa who divides, not a layman, not a nun, etc. 
This Bhikṣu should be an intellectual, not a sensualist; he should be viṛrtuous, not immoral: 
for the words of an immoral Bhikṣu lack authority. kksk Where does schism take place? Elsewhere. Not where the Tathāgata is found. 
Schism is impossible where the Master is to be found, for the Tathāgata cannot be conquered and his word is full of authority. kṣks Who does the schismatic divide?, Fools. 
Only fools and not Āryans, for Āryans see the Dharma with direct insight. 
According to another opinion, the schismatic can no longer divide possessors of kṣāati. 
kōkḵ What does the Saṅgha do that it is divided? When it admits another Master, or another Path, it is divided. 
A night of the same day. When the Saṅgha is divided, infallibly, the Saṅgha will again be in concord at sunrise. 
The schism that we have just described, and which is a mortal transgression, Is what we understand by breaking the WheeL The Wheel of the Law of the Blessed One is then broken, because the progress of the Path is hindered As a consequence there is, at the same time, both bbreaking of the Wheel and a division of the Saṅgha. 
Where is breaking of the Wheel produced? 
In Jambudvīpa. 
Not in the other continents where the Buddhas do not appear. 
By how many Bhikṣus? 
By nine or more. 
The maximum number is not fixed. 
The Saṅgha susceptible of being divided counts at a minimum eight Bhikṣus; the ninth monk necessatry is the schismatic. 
Ritual schism in three continents. Only there where the Religion exists. 
This schism supposes eight Bhikṣus or more. It is necessary to form two groups of four Bhikṣus; but, here, there is not one schismatic who declares himself a Master. 
kiik At six periods, the schism of the breaking of Wheel cannot take place. The breaking of the Wbeel is impossible at the beginning; at the end; befoṟe the abscess; before a pair; when the Sage is extinguished; or when a parish has not been delimited. 
At the beginning, that is, when a little time has passed since the setting into motion the Wheel of the Law; and at the end, that is,at the period of the Parinirvāṇa of the Blessed One: in these two periods the Saṅgha is penetrated by a single sentiment.Ś In the interval, breaking is impossible before the appearance of an abscess: 
as long as the abscess of precepts and the abscess of views does not appear in the dispensation.It is also impossible before the apparition of a pair: 
Breaking is impossible when the Sage is extinguished, for, once the Master has entered into Parinirvāṇa, a schismatic would have no opponent. 
Finally, when a parish has not been delimited, for oṉe says that the Saṅgha is divided when there two parties in one parish. 
All Buddhas do not have their Wheels broken as does Śākyamuṇi: this depends on their former actions. 
kskk Why are the trensgressions enumerated above, matricide, etc., mortal transgressions to the exclusion of other transgressions? 
Because they destroy or hurt a field of benefaction, or a field of qualities. 
Matricide and patricide are mortal transgressions because they destroy a benefactor. 
How does the murderer destroy them? 
By killing themn. 
The murder of an Arhat and the last two mortal transgressions are mortal transgressions because an Arhat, the Saṅgha and the Buddha are fields of qualities. 
Even if their gender changes, there is morral transgression in killing him who was the mother, and in killing her who was the father. 
It is said in fact , Caṉ a petson be guilty of a mortal transgression killing a man who is not his father, or who is not an Arhat? 
Yes, if he kills his mother whose gender has changed. 
Can a person be guilty of a mortal transgression by killing a woman who is not his mother, or who is not an Arhat? 
Yes, if he kills his father whose gender has changed. 
When the embryo of a woman falls out and when another woman deposits it in her womb, which of these two women is reputed to be the mother whose murder constitutes a mortal transgression? 
The mother is the woman from whose blood one is born. 
she is the one who gives the child liqguid to drink, who nourishes it, and who raises it. 
kskokḵ There is no mortal transgression if, wanting to kill ones mother a person kills someone else; there is no mortal transgression if, wanting to killanother person, a person kills his mother. 
For example, a man who kills his mother stretched out ona bed where hebelieves there isa man asleep, and the child of the laundryman who kills his father wanting to kill a mosquito, do not become guilty of mortal trans gressions. 
If a man kills his mother and another person with the same stroke, there are two avijñaptis, an avijñapti of simple murder, and an evijñapti of a mortal transgression; but the vñapti is solely of the mortal traṉsgression, by reason of the force of the mortal transgression. 
Yet, according to Ghoṣaka , there are two vijñaptis, fot a viñap is made up of atoms. 
The person who kills an Arhat without knowing him to be an Arhat, thinking only to definitely kill such a person, does not have any discrimination with respect to the person to be killed. 
The person who kills his father, when his father is an Arhat, is guilty of only one mortal transgression,namely thekilling of an Arhat: for the father and the Arhat make up only a single person. Objection: 
How do you explain these words? 
No, when he only had the intention of striking the Buddha. 
Ad, according to that which precedes, no mortal transgression. 
Detachment and its results are impossible for one who has made preparation for a mortal transgression. 
A person who enters the Pathafter havingdone the preparation for anṇy other evil deed, will not produce this deed, by reason of the absoḻute contradiction between his new personality and the deed. 
skksḥ What is the gravest of the mortal transgressions? 
Lying with a view to schism is considered the gravest transgression. 
A person who, knowing what is Dharma and nonDharma, lies with a view to dividing the Saṅgha and teaching falsely, by this makes himself quilty of the gravest transgression among all misdeeds. In fact, he wounds the Dharma body of the Tathāgatas, he creates an obstacle to temporal wellbeing and to the deliverance of creatures. 
all actions relative to dhyāna, study and reflection are also aṟrested; the worlds of gods, Nāgas and humans are troubled and saddened, they are not masters of themselves, and misguided. 
This is why the retribution for this crime lasts a cosmic age and takes place in Avīci. Among the other mortal transgressions, the fifth, the third and the first are, in descending order, the heaviest. 
Patricide is the lightest. 
The Blessed One said that mental daṇḍa is the most culpable of the threedaṇdḍus; he saidalso that false view is the gravest among all the transgressions. 
Oṇe must understand that, among the mortal traṇsgressions, schism is the gravest transgression; that mental deṇḍa is the gravest among the three actions; and that false view is the gravest among the bad views. 
Or rather schism is the gravest transgression if one considers the extent of its retribution; vanodaṇḍa, if one considers the number of persons destroyed by it; and false view, if one considers the roots of good which false view alone cuts off. 
This action is the most fruitious of good worldly actions, for its retribution is a perfect tranquility for twentyfour thousand cosmic periods. 
TThis is anderstood from the point of view of its retributive results. 
From the point of view of its disconnective result the most fruitious action is volition associated with Vajropamasamādhi , for this volition has for its tesult the cutting off of all the bonds. 
This is why the Kārikā says, Among the good worldly dhar ksksk Is itonly througha mortal transgression thata person is necessarily rṛeborn in hell? 
Others add: but not immediately s0. 
106 To defile ones mother, to defile an Arhantī; to kill a predestined Bodhisattva; to kill a Saikṣa; and to steal the goods of the Saṅgha are transgressions similar to mortal trans gressions; the fifth is the destruction of a Stūpa. 
These five transgressions, in this order, are similar to mortal transgressions: 
to defile ones mother, to defilean Aṛhantī , to killa predestined Bodhisattva ; to kill a Saint who is not an Arhat ; to rob the Saṅgha of its means of substance ; and to destroy a Stūpa. 
When, upon leaving the stage of mrdhānas, he obtains the stage called patience , the actions which should be retributed in painful reelms of rebirth, being impeded, remain below, because he passes beyond the state of retribution of these actions. 
In the same way the creditors of the man who is about to emigrate from his country rise up. 
When he obtains the quality of Anāgāmin , the actions which should be retributed in Kāmadhātu, being impeded, remain below,with the exception of those which should be retributed in the present existence. 
The same for the actions which should be retributed in Rūpadhātu and Ārūpyadhātu when he obtains the quality of Arhat. 
Since when is one a Bodhisattva? From what momenton does one receive the name of Bodhisattva? 
How is this? 
From this moment onward, he always Has good realns of rebirth; he is born into noble families; he possesses all the organs ; he is a male; he remembers his past lives; and he does not desist. 
One says that he is srgati , because his rebirth realms. are excellent, for he is born among gods and humans. 
He is born in the wealthy families of Kṣatriyas, Brāhmaṇas, and Grhapatis, not in humble familes. 
ktksk He cultivates actions which have the marks for their retribution. 
In Jambudvīpa, being a male; in the presence of the Buddhas, thinking of the Buddhas; having their origin in reflection; in the course of one hundred supplementary cosmic ages. 
The Bodhisattva cultivates actions which ripen in the marks solely in Jambudvīpa, not elsewhere, for the inhabitants of Jambudvīpa are of lively intelligence; he is a male and not a female, for he has already gone beyond the state of female; and he is only in the presence of Masters, for his volition has the Buddhas for its object. 
These actions have their origin in reflection, not in hearing or in the absorptions. 
The Bodhisattva accomplishes these actions in the course of one hundred supplementary cosmic ages, and not during a longer time. 
Nevertheless the Blessed Śākyamuni, through the purification of his energy, leaped over nine of these cosmic ages and caṟried out the actions ripening in marks in the coutse of ninetynine cosmic ages so that, in this way,one hundred werecompleted. 
This is why, speaking to Aśibandhaka, he said, Oh village chief, remembering ninetyone cosmic ages from now, I do not see any family that has been impoverished or inconvenienced by the giving of cooked foods. 
The Blessed One expressed himself in this way because his natural memory bore on this number of cosmic periods. 
Former masters say It is when he finished the first cosmic age that the Bodhisattva abandoned the four defects and obtained the two qualities. Of the marks Each arises from one hundred merits. 
What is the measure of each of these one hundred merits? 
According to some, it is equal to the merit which has for its result the pleasure of allbeings, with the exception of the Bodhisattva close to Bodhithat is to say, accomplishing actions which ripen in marks. 
According to others, it is equal to the collective action of all beings, which, through its predominating result , produces the creation of the world. 
According to others, only the Buddhas know the measure of this ṛnerit. 
k How many Buddhas did the Blessed One venerate when he was a Bodhisattva? 
In the course of the first asamkhyeya kalpa, he venerated seventy five thousaṇd Buddhas; seventysix thousand in the course of the second; and seventyseven thousand in the course of the third. 
Who were the Buddhas at the end of each sakhyeya kalpa? 
In the reverse order of their enumeration, At the end of the three asarkhyeyas, Paśyin, Dīpa, and Ratṇaśikhin. 
In the period of the perfect and complete Buddha Ratnaśikhin, he completed the first asekhyeya kalpa; in the period of the Blessed Dīpakara he completed the second; and in the period of the Tathāgatha Vipaśyin he completed the third. kikk Of all the Buddhas that he venerated The first was Śākyarnuṇi. 
It was an ancient Śākyamuni , a peṛfect Buddha, under whom the Blessed One, the then Bodhisattva,formulated for the first time the vow of Bodhi by saying, Mey I too become a Buddha in all ways similar to yon! 
This Śākyamuni, as ours, appeared during a bad age of the world; also his Law lasted only one thousand yeats. 
kkk How did the Bodhisattva complete each Pāramitā ? 
When he gave everything to everyone, even to his eyes and the marrow of his bones, out of compassion, without desiring any happiness for himself, he completed the virtue of Giving. 
When, even though he was not detached, he was not at all irritated when his limbs were broken,he then completed the virtues of Morality and Patience. Energy, by praising Puṣya. The Blessed One, when he was a Bodhisattva, saw the Tathāgata Puṣya who had become incandescent in the interior of a cave in a mountain. 
Then, according to this School, he was found to have fulfilled the virture of Energy and nine cosmic ages were passed over. 
How are Giving, Morality,and Meditation items of meritorious work? 
Three are merit, action, occasions of the exercise of action, as in the case of deeds. 
These three,;Giving, Morality, and Meditation,:each according to its nature, are merit, action, or occasion of exercise, either in combination, or in isolation; the same way that the deeds are either at one and the same time actions and deeds, or only deeds. 
merit, because its retribution is agreeable; action, because it is action by nature; and an occasion for the exercise or an object of the volition of giving which provokes it; 2. 
The item of meritorious wotk which consists of Morality is exclusively bodily and vocal action; it is necessarily merit, action and occasion of exeṟcise of actior. For the iterm of meritorious work which consists of Meditation, let us consider the Meditation of Compassion : this mediation is merit; it is also an occasion for the exercise of a meritorious action, namely that of a volition associated with compassion; 2. the volition in question is merit and action. The same also for the Morality which consitutes dhyānasavara, the discipline of dhyāna, which a person who practices the Meditation of Compassion possesses; 3. the other dharmas concomittant to this Meditation are solely merit. 
Or rather the expression puṇyakrśyā signifies puṇyakāraṇa, oṟ puṇyaprayoga.Giving,Morality andMediation are vastus of puṇyakriya, because, with a view to realizing them, one undertakes the preparation of merit. 
According to another opinion, puṇyaukriyā is, to speak precisely, good volition; Giving,Morality andMeditation are its vasx, an occasion for the exercise of this volition. 
xṅ What is Giving, dāna? 
Without doubt, dāna in general is what is given , but here Giving is what gives. 
But one gives through fear, or with the hope of reciprocity, or through attachment, etc.: now this does not refer to this type of giving. Consequently, in order to specify, the author says, Giving is what gives. 
Through the desire to render homage or service. 
What is it that gives? 
It is bodily and vocal action and that which produces this actio. 
this collection and this action give. 
As the stanza says,When a person, with a goodmind gives what belongs to him, then one says that the good skandhas give. 
The puṇyakriyāvastu which consists of Giving has great joys as its result. 
The suffix aya, which we translate which consists of, should be understood as having as its nature, the same way that one says, a house made of grass , or a vase made of leaves. 
Giving is beneficial to oneself, to others, to both or neither. 
A gift made to a Caitya is not useful to another; but it is useful to him who gives when he is an Āryan not detached from desire, or a Prthagjana detached or not detached. 
The gift that a detached Āryan makes to anotherwith the exception of the case when this gift ripens in the present existenceis pot useful to this Āryan, for the Āryan who is detached has definitively passed beyond the sphere where the retribution of the gift could have taken place in a later existence. This gift is only useful to another. 
The gift thata nondetached Āryan makes to another, to a detached or nondetached Pṛthagjana, is useful both to himself and to another. 
The gift that a detached Āryan makes to a Caityawith the exception of the case when this gift willripen in the present existence is not useful either to himself, or to another. This gift has for its effect only the expression of homage and recognition. 
kkrk We have said, ina general manner, that giving produces great joys: 
The giver is excellent through his faith, etc. 
The giver is excellentwhen he isendowed with faith, with morality, with learning, with generosity, with wisdon, with few desires, etc. 
When the giver is excellent, the gift is excellent; when the gift is excellent, its result is excellent. 
Such a giver gives with respect, by his hand, at the right timne, without doing evil to anyone , to ones master, or to other benefactors. 
Example: the Jtakas of the bear, of the antelope, etc. 
A field is excellent through its qualities. The BlessedOṉe said, A retribution one hundred thousand times greater than a gift made to a person who upholds the necessities. and so on. 
kks Among all the gifts,The best is the gift from a delivered person to a delivered person. 
The Blessed One said that a gift given by a detached person to aṉother detached person is the best of material gifts. 
Or rather, the gift that a Bodhisattva gives for the welfare of all beings; this gift, although given by a nondetached person to other nondetached persons, is the best gift. 
The eighth among the eight gifts that the Blessed One taught. 
What are the eight gifts? 
a gift made in order to adorn ones mind ; in order to fillthe mind ; in order to equip it with a view to yoga; and in order to acquire the supreme goal. 
What is an āsadya gift? Some ancient masters explDain this as an immediate gift to those who are near, who approach one. 
A gift through fear is a gift that a person makes who sees that the object is going to perish: Better it should be given, he thinks. 
kkk The Sūtra says, An incalculable retribution proceeds from a gift made to a srotaāpannaphalaprats pannaka; an even more incalculable retribution proceeds from a gift made to a ṛrotaāpanna.But there are also five persons who, even though Prthagjanas, confer an incalculable retribution on the offering that is made to them: 
Even though they are not Āryams, offerings made to ones father and mother, to a sick person, to a preacher, to the Bodhisattva in his last birth are without measure. 
A Bodhisattva in his last birth means a Bodhisattva in his last existence. 
and bad ; he erects the pure body of the Law; in a word, he accomplishes all the work of aBuddha: hence he is a great spiritual friend. 
kksk In order to appreciate the lightness and the gravity of actions, one should, in short, take into consideration six causes: 
Accordingly as these causesconsecutive, field, adhisṭhāṇa, preparation, volition, or intentionare small or large, action also is small or large. 
Consecutive: after having done the action, that is, consequential action. 
the person to whom one does good or evil. 
the deed itself. 
bodily or vocal action with a view to the preceding. 
Volition: that through which the deed is achieved. 
to project the thought, I shall do this or that to them; then I shall do this or that.t It happens that an action can be grave only by reason of its consecutive action, for example, when this confers on the retribution the character of necessity. 
It happens that an action can be grave by reason that, if the field is the same, a certain adhiṣṭhāna rendets an action grave while another adhiṣṭhāna makes it light: 
for example, tokill ones father and mother is a grave action but to steal from ones father and mother, to lie to them, etc., is not grave by comparison. 
One can explein in this same way the gravity resulting from the preparation, etc. 
Action is termed accumulated by reason of its intentional character, by its completion, by the absence of regret and opposition, by its accompaniments, and by its retribution. 
By reason of its intentional character:Action done volḻuntarily or intentionally is accumulated action; action done involuntarily or unconsciously, and action not done in haste, even if it is voluntary, is action that is done. 
Some go to painful realms of rebirth thtrough misdeeds; some by two; some by three ,; some through one deed, through two, through three..through ten. 
Since it s a rule that a person goes to a painful realm of rebirth through a certain quantity of actions, if this measure is not completed, the action is done, but not accumulated; but when this measure is completed, it is accumulated, By reason of theabsence of regretand opposition When remorse is absent,or when opposition,confession, etc,is absent, action is then termed accumulated. 
By reason of itsaccompaniments: When an action isbadand has a bad escort: it is By reason of its retributin: 
Action is accamulated which necessarily gives forth retribution. 
Action which does not present these characteristiss is done, but is not accumulated. 
kkk We have seen that a gift made to a Caitya by a person not detached from desireis a gift of benefit for him who made it. 
But no one emjoys the thing given: how can this gift be meritoriaṇs? 
The merits of the gift are of two types: 
merit produced by abandoning, that is, the merit which results from the sole fact of abandoning; 2. 
merit produced by its enjoyment, the merit which results in joy in the object given, by the person who receives. 
The merit of a gift to a Caitya is merit produced by abandoning. 
How can the gift produce merit when no one receives it? 
We would answer this objection by asking why would the gift produce merit whensomeone receives i,and why itwould not produce merit when no one receives it? 
If the satisfaction of a person who receives is a condition for merit, you then deny that the Immeasurable Mediations and the Meditation of Right View are meritorious. 
The gift to a Caitya thus produces merit, Even though no one receives it, as is the case with compassion, etc. 
In the case of the Meditation on Compassion, no one receives, n0 one is satisfied, and yet merit arises for the compassionate person, through the very force of his thoughts of compassion.In the same way, even though the Excellent Being has passed away, a gift to a Caitya made with devotion to him is meritorious by reason of the thought of the believer himself. 
No, for the devotion which produces these actions very much outweighs the devotion of a person who worships and who gives in mind only. 
When a person who has the intention of killing his enemy, contintes his bodily and vocal actions on the dead body of his enemy which this intention provokes, thinking,This is my enemy, that is to say, he thinks, This enemy is not yet dead, he obtains dermerit very much greater than he would have through merely the intention; in the same way, even though the Master has passed away, the person who does actions of giving and worship inspired through devotion obtains a much greater merit than he would have only through devotion. 
kskk If a seed given to a good field bears an agreeable result, should we think that it bears a disagreeable result if given to a bad field? Even seeded into a bad field, the gift bears agreeable results, for there is never opposition between the result and the seed.i From the seed of the vine, there arises solely the sweet fruit of the vine; from the seed of the vmba there arises only the sour fruit of the vwba: even seeded into a bad field, the seed bears the result which is appropriate to it.In the same way, this seed which is the gift of a person who has the intention of being useful to another, even if placed into a bad field, can only produce an agreeable result. 
Bat, through the evil of the field, the result will be small or almost nil. 
kkōk We must now explain meritorious work which consists of the Precepts. 
Morality is the renouncing of immorality. 
Bad rūpa is calledimmorality. The renouncing of immorality, which is morality, is f two types. 
Morality is not solely the renouncing of immorality.It is,farther, the renouncing of that which is prohibited by the Buddha. 
This renouncing is also vijñapti and aviñapti.He who has undertaken to observe the rules and who then violates them, commits immorality. 
The morality that we have just described, in short, is Pure, when it is endowed with the four qualities. 
Morality endowed with the four qualities is pure; itis impurein the contrary case. 
Not troubled by immorality, by the causes of im morality; it takes as its support the opposite of immorality and Not troubled by immorality we have described; not troubled by the causes of immorality, that is,by the eśar and upaklefas ,it takes as itssupport the opposites ofimmorality, becausejt relies oa the four smrṛtyupasthānas ; and it relies on peace, not on rebirth in celestial realms, because it is directed to Nirvāṇa. 
its supervision through mindfulness ; aṉd 5. 
its application to Nirvāṇa. 
According to another opinion, morality is of four types: the morality of fear, which one observes from the fear of the loss of the resouEces necessary to life, from fear of a bad reputation, froṃ fear of chastisement, from fear of bad realms of rebirth; 2. 
mercenaty morality, which one observes from attachment to agreeable realms of existence, to pleasures, to honots; 3. 
a morality suitable to the parts of Bodhi, which persons who possess Right View possess, with a view to their deliverance; and 4. 
pure morality, which, being free from stains, is free from vices. 
We have explained morality. 
kkk Good absoṟption or good in absorption, is bhāvanā, meditation, soaking in, or impregnation. 
What do we understand by samāhita, absorbed? 
That which is absorption by its nature, and that which coexists with what is absorption by nature. 
Why does good absorption receive the name of bhāvanā? 
Because it perfumes, impregnates the mind. Good absorption impregnates the mind to an extreme degree, because it grasps the qualities of this good, in the same way as sesame seeds are impregnated by fliowers in their grasping the odor of these flowers. 
kkk We have said that the result of giving consists of joys. 
What result does one obtain from the precepts and from meditation? 
Essentially, the precepts have heaven for their result; meditation has disconnection for its reṣult, Giving also has heaven for its result, but the precepts are the principle, normative cause of it. 
Disconnection, or Nirvāṇa, has meditation for its cause, which, in the path of abandoning immediately produces disconnection from the defilements; but the precepts contribute to it, since stilling and insight presuppose the precepts. 
kīfik The Sūtra says that four persons produce Brahmin merit, brāhmapnṇya. 
What is this merit? 
Four possess Brahmin merit, because they are happy in the heavens for a kalpa. 
The merit of sucha measure thatone is happy inheaven for a apa is the Brahmin merit, for the lifespan of theBrahmapurohitas is a alpa. 
And in another Canon, one reads, He engenders Brahmin merit, he is happy in the heavens for a alpa. 
kkrḥ We have studied material giving. 
The gift of the Dharmas is the correct teaching, not defiled, of the Sūtras etc. 
The gift of the Dharma is to teach, correctly and with a mind not defiled, the Śūtra and the other parts of Scripture. 
Consequently, those who teach the Dharma either falsely, or with a defiled mind, through a desire or gain, for respect,and for reputation, destroy the great merit which would otherwise fall to them. 
cṅtk We have explained the three types of good according to the distinction of the three items of meritorious work. 
Furthermore, Good is threefold, merit, Nirvāṇa and penetratiorn Good merit, or good favorable to merit is the good which leads to an agreeable retribution. 
The good which is deliverance is the good which, when it arises, becomes a dharma of Parinirvāṇa. 
It is recognized that whoever, understanding the sermons concerning the defects of Sasāra, the nonself, and the qunalities of Nirvāṇa, has his hairs stand on end and who pours forth tears, possesses the mokṣgabhāgīya rtoot of good; in this same way, one knows that there was a seed in the khalabila, when, in the rain, one sees a plant put forth shoots. 
The good of penetration is fourfold, urmagatas, etc.; it will be explained later. 
An industrious action, of the body, of the voice or of the mind, with that which gives rise to it, are such things as writing, caṟving, eloquence, poetry, and calculation. 
Iṇḍustrious, that is, due to a certain technique. 
Threefold action is bodily, vocal, and mental action. 
Writing and carving are bodily actions, industrious, together with what gives rise to this action, namely the collection of the mind and its mental states. 
Eloquence and poetry are vocal actioṉs, Consequently, writing, carving, eloquence, and poetry, are by their nature, the five sēanṇdbas. 
kīk Now let us explain some synonyms: 
Good and pure dharmas are praṇīta. 
Praṇīta, excellent, s a synonym for śubha, that s, kuśala, good,and of amala, immaculate oOr anāsrava. 
The dharmas which are neither ignoble nor excellent, are thus median. 
Good conditioned dharmas are sevya. Sevya, to be cultivated is synonymous with good and con ditioned. It then follows that other dharmas, some unconditioned, others conditioned but defiled or nondefiledneutral, are not to be cultivated. In fact,uncoṇditioneddharmas are not susceptible of being produced, or cultivated, since the unconditioned has no result: 
now, it is with a view to a result that one cultivates. 
Deliverance is the highest. These is nothing which outweighs Nirvāṇa. Nirvāṇa, being eternal and good, outweighs all. The Latent Defilements O.. Homage to the Buddha. 
We said that the world, in all its variety, arises from action.Now it is by reason of the gṉusfayas, or latent defilements, that actions accamulate: in the absence of the anuśayas, actioṉs are not capable of producing a new existence. 
What are they? 
attachment, and then anger, pride, ignorance, false views, and doubt. 
The words and then serve to show that it is by reason of attachment that the others take up their abode in the object. 
We shall explain this point later. 
1d These six make sevenṉ through the division of attachment. 
There is the anuśaya of attachment to pleasure or sensual desire ; the anuśaya of anger; the anuśaya of attachment to existence; the aṉaśaya of pride; the anṉuśaya of ignorance; the aṉnuśaya of erroneous views; and the enṉuśaya of doubt. 
rxtō What does the expression kāmarāgānuśaya signify? 
Is there an anuśaya called kāmarāga? 
Or is there an anuśfaya of kāmarāga distinct from kāmarāga? 
If one says that kāmarāga is an anuśaya, one then contradicts the Sūtra which says, The person who does not long dwell with his mind in the prey of attachment to pleasure; who, when the wrapping of attachment is about to be produced, knows well how to depart from it, for this person the wrapping which is attachment, perfectly destroyed of its life force, is abandoned along with its anzśaya. 
If one explains kāmarāgānuśya as the anuśfaya of kāmarāga, one must make the genuśya a thing not associated with the mind . 
But such a theory is in contradiction to the Abhidharma which teaches that kāmarāgānuśaya is associated with three sensations, that of pleasure, satisfaction, and indifference. 
According to the Vaibhāṣikas, kāmarāgānusaya is an anuśaya called āmarāga; it is the attachment itself which is ṉśaya; and the same for the other defilements: 
But the Sūtra which we have just quoted says that one abandons marāga along with its anuśaya. 
But the Abhidharma, which always expresses itself literally and not figuratively, says that the anezśaya is the kJefa or defilement itself. 
Because they defile the mind, because they hinder, because they are in contradiction with good, and yet because good appears, the anufayas are not disassociated from the mind., This means that because of the aenuśayas, the mind is defiled; good which has not arisen is hindered from arising, and one falls away from good already arisen; consequently the enufayas are not dharmas disassociated from the mind. 
But, one would say, some dharmas disassociated from the mind cat. have a similar effect. No, for if the anufayas were disassociated from the mind, they would always be present; and, consequently, if we suppose that they have a similar effect, then good would never be able to arise. Now it is a fact that it does arise. 
But again, the masters who consider the zvuś4yas as disasso ciated from the mind do not attribute this threefold activity to the aṉxśayas,but to the kleśa itself. 
skṣk The Sautrāntika theory is best. 
What is called aenuśaya is the kleśa itself in a state of sleep, whereas the paryavasthāna is the klefa in an awakened state. 
The sleeping keśa is the nonmanif ested klefa, in the state of being a seed; the awakened kleśz is the manifested kesa, the kleśa in action. 
And by seed one should understand a certain capacity to produce the eśz, a power belonging to the person engendered by the previous kleśa. 
In this same way there exists in a certain person the capacity of producing a consciousness of memory, a capacity engendered by a conscious ness of preception; in this same way the capacity to produce rice, which belongs to the plant, the shoot, the stalk, etc., is engendered by the rice seed. 
The masters for whom the seed of the keśa is a certain dharma distinct from the leśu itself, disassocated from the mind and called an enusśuya, must admit a ḍharma existing in and of itself, disassociated from the mind and the cause of memory. 
How is this? 
thus there are ten anmu ayas. 
By dividing views into five, there are six eṉuśayas, for a total of ten nusfayas; five which are not views by nature, namely desire, anger, ptide, ignorance and doubt; and five which are views, satkāyadrṣṭi, etc. 
kkṣḥ In addition the Abhidharma teaches that these ten anśayas make up thirtysix anuśayas in Kāmadhātu, thirtyone śayas in Rūpadhātu, and thirtyone anusayas in Ārāpyadhātu: 
in all ninetyeight anuśayas. 
With the exception of three or two views, ten, seven, seven, eight anusśayas are abandoned in Kāmadhātu by the Seeing of Suffering and the three other Truths respectively. 
Seven are abandoned through the Seeing of Arising and through the Seeing of Extinction, with the exception of a belief in a self, a belief in the extremes, and the esteeming of morality and aṣcetic pṛactices. 
Eight are abandoned through the Seeing of the Path, with the exception of satkāyadrṣṭi and antagrāhadrṭi This makes thirtytwo anxśayas abandoned through Seeing, because the mere Seeing of the Truths suffices to abandon them. 
Four are abandoned through Meditation. 
The same in Ārūpyadhātu. 
The Ābhidhārmikas say that the six enuṝayas make ninetyeight through the differences of their aspect, their mode of expulsion , and their sphere of existence. 
ksḥiḥ Among the ninetyeight enuśayas, eightyeight are abandoned through Seeing because they are struck, destroyed through the patiences , and ten are abandoned through Meditation because they are struck by the knowledges. 
Is this a strict rule with regard to abandoning through Seeing and Meditation? 
Those in the eight bhāmis are abandoned either through Seeing or through Meditation: 
The anṇfayas which are struck by the knowledges , at whichever stage they belong, are only abandoned through Meditation, whether they belong to an Āryan or to a Pṛthagjana. 
In fact, an Āryan abandons them through aenāsrava jñāna meditation, or pure knowledge, whereas a Prthagjana abandons them through a worṟldly knowledge. 
The Vaibhāṣikas explain this difficulty by saying that those who are detached lose when they produce a view, in the manner that Devadatta lost his rddhi. 
To believe in a self and in things pertaining to self is satkāyadrṣṭi it is termed sat because it perishes, and kāya because it is an accumulation or multiplicity. 
The expression satkāya is put forth in order to discard the idea of permanencethis is why one says snx:and in order to discard the notion of a unitythis is why one says kāya. 
Satkāyadrṣṭi means, then, a view with regard to the satāya. 
But even though they are views of the sa?kāya, they are not views of the self or of things pertaining to self. 
Also it is only the belief in a self or in things pertaining to a self that receives the name of sakāyadrṛṣṭi, for according to a declaration of the Blessed One, Oh monk, any monk or Brahmin who in this world believes in a self, what he considers to be a self is only the five upādānaskandhas. 
To believe in the eternity or in the annihiliation of what one believes to be a self, is antagrāhadṛṣṭi, a view that grasps extremes, for this is to falsely believe in the extreme thesis of eternity or annihilation. 
The view that consists of negating that which really exists, the Truth of Suffering, etc. and which coṉsists of saying nāsti, that is not, is mithyādrṟṣṭi or false view. 
All falsely conceived views are false views, but only mhyādṛṣṭi receives this name because it is the most false of all, as the worst odor is called the bad odor. 
It is a negation, whereas the other views are an affirmation or erroneous attribution. 
4, The view which considers that which is bad, low, abandoned as good, or high, is called dṛjṭiparāmarśa, the esteeming of bad views. 
It refers to everything that is impure, because the Śaints abandon it. 
And the view that consist of esteeming this is called simply consideration. 
It would be best to say dṛṣṭyādiparāmarśa,esteeming that which is low, beginning with erroneous views. 
The view which considers as cause that which is not cause, ot as the path that which is not the Path, is called sīavrataparāmarśa: 
namely, to consider Maheśvara, Prajāpati, or any other entity which is not a cause of the world as a cause of the world; to consider the rituals of suicide,entering into fire or drowningas a cause of a heavenly rebirth when they do not in fact procure heaven; or to consider morality and ascetic practices as the only path to deliverance when they are themselves not the only path to deliverance, nor the knowledges of the Sātṅkhyas and the Yogins which are not a path to deliverance; and so too the rest. 
These are the five erroneous views. 
skḥ You have said that the erroneous view that regards as a cause of the world that which is not a cause of the world is the esteeming of morality and ascetic practices. 
We would answer that those who consider the Lord or Prajāpati as a cause of the world regard the Lord and Prajāpati as eterṇal beings, one, personal, and active. 
, is the cause of the world, this is by reason of false conceptions of permanence and personality. Thus this clinging is to be abandoned through Seeing of Suffering. 
The erroneous view that suicide through fire or drowning produces a heavenly rebirth, and the erroneous view that morality and ascetic practices produce by themselves purity, have nothing to do with the false conceptions of permanence and petsonality. 
The Mūlaśāstra says, There are some nonBuddhists who give rise to this view, who posit this theory: a person who adopts the habits of bulls , the habits of deer, or the habits of dogs, shall obtain purity, deliverance, and escape; he shall obtain the absolute going beyond of the happiness and suffering , and he shall reach the place beyond happiness aṇd suffering. 
One should know that all these types of considering as cause that which is not truly cause is the esteeming of morality and ascetic practices, which is abandoned through Seeing the Truth of Suffering. 
All the defilements which have the impure for their object embrace error with regard to suffering. 
Furthermore, we would ask what is the esteeming of morality and ascetic practices which is abandoned through Seeing the Truth of the Path? 
If the Vaibhāṣikas answer, The esteeming of morality and ascetic practices relative to the ḍharma which is abandoned through Seeing the Path, namely relative to one of the eight anuśfayas the first of which is wrong views, we would then answer that this esteeming of morality and ascetic practices also supposes error relative to suffering. 
Moreover we do not see how the esteeming of morality and ascetic practices could be relative to a dharma to be abandoned through the Truth of the Path: How could a person who entertains wrong views or doubt relative to the Path, thinking There is no Path, or Is there, or is there not, a Path?, imagine to obtain purification through this wrong view or through this doubt? 
If this person, taking up the path of deliverance imagined by the Sākhyas, etc., says, This is the path; the Buddhist Path is not the path, then this nonBuddhist imagines that he obtains purification through the path of the Sākhyas, and not through wrong views relative to the Path. 
Furthermore, when a person imagines that he obtains purification through a wrong view abandoned through the Seeing of Arising or Extinction, why is his esteeming of morality and ascetic practices not abandoned through the Seeing of these same two Truths? 
This point remains to be examined. 
ksk We have spoken of the two erroneous views of permanence and peṛsonality. Are there only two errors? 
There are four erross: to hold that which is impermanent to be permanent, that which is suffering to be happiness, that which is impure to be pure, and that which is not a soul to be a soul or self. 
What is the nature of these four errors? 
One distinguishes four errors within the three views.3 That part of the belief in extremes which is a view of permanence constitutes one error; two parts of the esteeming of bad views constitute the errors of happiness and purity; and that part of the belief in a self and of things pertaining to a self which is a view of self constitutes one error. 
kkk Some other masters maintain that all satkāyadrṣṭi, that is, not simply the idea of self but also the idea of things pertaining to self, counstitutes āmaviparyāsa, eṟṟor with regard to the self. 
How could the idea of things pertaining to a self be part of error with regard to the self? 
and the following: 
He who sees a self prevailing within the five wpādānaskandhas sees mine But we think that the view of self has two parts: 
to say I and to say mine. If the idea of mine were a view different from the idea of I, then the ideas expressed by other grammatical cases, such as ayaā or mahyam would thus consititute so many new views. 
kkḵ Are not the other defilements errors because, in order for there to be error, a combination of three characteristics is indispensable? 
Reflective julgment and affirmation because they allow complete error. 
The view of annihilation and false views are not affirmations or erroneous attributions , since they are directed towards the absence of existence. 
The other defilements do not admit of reflective judgment, and as a consequence are not complete errors. 
cik But the Blessed One said, To consider the impermanent as permanent is an error of idea , an error of thought , and an error of view , and thus following for happiness, purity, and the self.Now neither ideas nor thoughts admit of reflective judgment. 
Thought and idea are termed eṟṟor by reason of view. Only view is error, but by virtue of the esteeming of bad views , ideas and thoughts associated with view and having its same aspect are also termed errors. 
Why does not the same hold for sensation and the other mental states associated with view? 
Because one says in worldly language error of idea, and error of thought, but not error of sensation. 
A Srotaāpaṇṇa abandons all these errors ; for the Seeing of the Truths which brings about the abandonment of views also brings about the abandoning of the ideas and thoughts associated with these views. 
Another School says: The error which consists of holding as permenent that which is impermanent contains three errors: error of idea, of thought and of view; and the rest. 
Among these twelve, eight are abandoned through the Seeing of the Truths. 
Four, namely the errors of idea and thought relative to happiness and purity, are abandoned through the Seeing of the Truths through Meditation. 
In fact the Āryans, who by definition have abandoned all the anuśayas that one abandons through Seeing the Truths, certainly possess ideas of happiness and purity, since, when they are not detached, they produce an attachment to pleasure. 
The Vaibhāṣikas do not consider this reasoning as conclusive. 
From the fact that these Āryans have ideas of happiness and purity, you conclude that they have error relative to happiness and purity. 
You should say that they also have the error relative to self, since they certainly have the idea and thought of a living being: 
attachment to pleasure relative to a woman or relative to themselves evidently presupposses the idea and the thought of a being. 
Moreover one reads in the Sūtras, The Āryan Śrāvaka teaches true seeing and knowing: this is the Truth of Suffering. At this moment the errors of idea, of thought and of view relative to the impermanent taken for the permanent, are abandoned by them, and the rest. 
As a consequence, only the ideas and thoughts provoked by erroneous views, or associated with erroneous views, aṟe eṟrrors, and not the others, which are abandoned through Meditation. 
In fact, it happens that the Āryan, through an illusion which lasts only as long as he first sees an object, produces attachment to pleasure, such as the illusion caused by the circle of a firebrand or by a painted Yakṣa. 
But the Sthavira Ānanda said to the Āryan Vāgīśa, Your mind is burned by the error of your ideas.How do we explain these words if one admits the thesis of the Vaibhāsikas? 
As a consequence the Śaikṣa has not completely abandoned the eight errors of idea and thought. 
The Sūtra that the Vaibhāṣikas quote thus indicates the means of abandoning these said errors; there is no contradiction here with the Sūtra of Vāgīśa. 
It is the same for pride. 
These are māna, adhimāna, mānātmāna, asmimāna, abhimāna, ūnamāna, and miūhyāmna. 
In general, arrogance of the mind is called weāṉa. 
when the mind makes itself lofty or develops pride by thinking, I am superior or I am equalrelative to an inferior or to an equal. Adhimāṇa: to think, I am superior, I am equal, relative to an equal, or to a superior. Mānātimānṇa: to think, I am superior relative to a superior. Armimāṇna: 
to think, I am slightly inferiot relative to that which is greatly superior. 
This is indeed a locus of pride, since one esteems oneself relative to a group of excellent persons which one regards as superior, even though one is really vastly inferior to them. 
keikk Must we believe that, among the Āryans, the anśayas which are abandoned though Meditation and which have not yet been abandoned, are presently active? 
Among the Āryans the various types of pride, etc., and egotism, and bad regret, are impossible. 
Et cetera signifies the enuśayas enumerated above, the paryavasthānas of killing, the desire for nonexistence and part of the desire for existence. 
Because all these anuśayas are nourished by erroneous views: 
Even though bad regret is abandoned through Meditation, it does not become active among the Āryans, because it is nourished by doubt. 
kkk Among the ninetyeight guuśayas, how many are universal? 
the erroneous views and doubts which are abandoned through the Seeing of Suffer ing and Arising, 2. 
the five erroneous views which are abandoned by the Seecing of Suffering; wrong views and the esteeming of views abandoned through Seeing of Arising; and two doubts and two ignorances abandoned through the Seeing of Suffering and the Seeing of Arising. 
n t These eleven anxfayas are called universal, going every where, because they grasp the entire Dhātu as their object. 
We do not say that the universals have the entire Dhātu for their object all at once, but rather they have the Dhātu in its five categories for their object: 
But, if we understand universality in this way, desire and pride would also be univeṟsals. 
and there will be desire relative to this same object. 
In this hypothesis of their univerality, how are thirst and pride abandoned? 
As their object is mixed, they are abandoned through Meditation. 
Or rather, they are abandoned through Seeing, for they exist through the efficacy of the view. 
This is why they are not universal. We have seen that eleven eu7fśayas are universal in their Dhāṭu, in the sphere of existence wherein the person is born in whom they are found: 
Among them, nine, with the exception of the two views, bear on the superior. 
With the exception of a belief in a self and a belief in extremes , the nine other universals are also universals in a different Dhātu; they sometimes bear on a different Dhātu, sometimes on two, for it is said , There are some anuśayas of the realm of Kāmadhātu which bear on the dharmas of the realm of Rūpadbātu, on the dharmas of the realm of Ārūpyadhātu, or on the dharmas of both the realms of Rūpadhātu and Ārūpyadhātu. 
ḵkk When some beings in Kāmadhātu produce the opinion that Brahmā is a being, the opinion that he is permanent, they then entertain a belief in a self and a belief in extremes with regard to a thing belonging to a different, superior Dhātu. 
And a belief in extremes is created by a belief in a self; thus the idea of the permanence of Brahmā is not a belief in extremes. 
What sort of views would a belief in a living being and a belief in permanence be with respect to Brahmā? 
The Ābhidhārmikas say that there are no erroneous views here, but only false knowledge.. 
But why are the other false opinions which have Brahmā for their object considered as erroneous views, and not the two opinions of being and permanence? 
The Siddhānta seṛves as authority. 
kk Are only the anṉuśayas universals? 
With the exception of the prāptis, dharmas coexist ant with the universal anuśfuyas are also universals. 
Future universal aenṉuśayas are not universal causes. 
Past and present universal anufayas are universal causes. 
kckṣk Among the ninetyeight zṉ5ayas, how many have a pure dharma for their object, that is, the Third and Fourth Truth, the Truth of Extinction and the Path? 
Wrong views, doubt, and the ignorance which is bound to them, and independent ignorance, abandoned through the Seeing of Extinction and the Path, make six anuśayas whose object is pure. 
Except for the six,that is, the three 4754yas abandoned through the Seeing of Extinction, namely wrong views, doubt, and the ignorance associated with them or independent of them, and these same three gzṉuśayas abandoned through Seeing the Path,all the other ehuśayas have impure dḍharmas for their object. 
The extinction of their own bhāmi is the object of the anuśayas which have extinction for their sphere; the Path with its six or nine bhūmis, is the object of the aenuśfayas which have the Path for their sphere, for the Paths depend on one another. 
The three anuśayas which are abandoned through the Seeing of Extinction and which have Extinction for their objecr, do not have Extinction for their total object: 
When they are in the realm of Kāmadhātu, the three anuśayas which have the Path for their object bear on the totality of the Path as well as on a portion of the dharmajñāna , with its six bhūmis . 
When they are of the realm of Rūpadhātu or Ārūpyadhātu , these same anuśayas bear on the totality of the Path, and on a part of the enṉvayajñāna , with its nine bhūmis. 
In fact the Paths are mutually dependent. 
Although Zharmajñāna aṇd anvayajñāna are mutually depend ent, because guvayajñāna is not opposed to Kāmadhātu, the three anuśayas of the realm of Kāmadhātu which have the Path for their object do not have the Path which forms part of the envayajñāna for their object. 
But the dharmajñāna which is opposed to Kāmadhātu is also opposed to Rūpadhātu and Ārūpyadhātu : consequently it will also be the object of the three nusuyas of these two Dhātus which have the Path for their object. 
Dharmajñān in its entirety is not opposed to Rūpadhātu and Ārūpyadhātu, for the dharmajñāṇṉa of Śuffering and Arising are not opposed to these two Dhātus. 
And dharṃajñāna is not opposed to Rūpadhātu and Ārūpyad hātu in their entirety , because the first two dharmajñānas are not opposed to these Dhātus, and because the first category of the anuśayas of these two Dhūtus, namely those which one abandons through Seeing, are not opposed by any dharmajñāna. 
tsftk Why do not lust , anger , egotism , the esteeming of bad views , and the esteeming of morality and ascetic practices bear on pure dharmas, on the Extinction of Suffering or on the Path? 
Lust does not bear on pure dharmas, because lust should be rejected. The latent defilement of lust should be aban doned; but if it has pure dharmas for its object, it will not be tejected; in the same manner, the aspiration after good dharmas should not be rejected. 
Anger does not, because pure dharmas do not do evil. Anger arises with regard to a thing which does evil, and pure dharmas, the Extinction of Suffering or the Path, do not do evil. 
One cannot pride oneself on Extinction or the Path, for they are calm. 
The esteeming of morality and ascetic practices is to hold as a cause of purification that which is not such: the pure dharmas are really purification, so one cannot have a false conception of purity , with regard to them. 
The esteeming of bad views is to hold as excellent that which is vile: now the pure dharmas are what are best, so one cannot have a false conception of excellence , with regard to them. 
ksk Among the ninetyeight anṉuśayas, how many become anuśaya from the fact of being an object?! 
From the point of view of the object, the universal anuśayas become anuśayana, that is, become lodged in the five categories of their sphere; the other in one category: 
This general rule calls for more precision. 
The six anuśayas which have the pure dharmasNirvāṇa or the Path for their object, and the nine enuayas which. 
have a higher sphere for their object do not become anuśayana in the object, because one does not do this thing by oneself either through the view of self or through desire. 
Other anuśayas would apply to the thing which one considers as the self, or which one makes ones own through desire, and they become aenruśayana, as dust is applied to a wet piece of cloth. 
But the pure dharmas and the higher bhāmis are not susceptible of being considered as self or as pertaining to self: thus the anuśayas which have them for their object do not become anuśayana in their object, because of the nature of their object. 
We would remark in fact that the desire that seeks either the pute dharmas or a higher sphere is not the enuśaya called desire, but rather an aspiration for good dharmas. 
Fuṛrther, the pure dharmas, Nirvāṇa or the Path, are opposed to the kleśfas which take them as their object; the dharmas of a higher bhūmi are opposed to the kleśas of a lower bhūmi: as a consequence the keśas cannot become anuśayana there, that is, install themselves there; in the same way that the sole of the foot cannot install itself on a rock which is red hot with fire. 
kṣkk We have up to now understood the word enusśfayana, anuśete, as ṭo become anuśayana, in the sense of to install, or to become lodged in. 
in the same way that one says that if a person who has a cold takes a bitter medicine, there is no increase in the cold due to the medicine. 
Any znṉnuśaya which is associated with a certain dharma.becomes anuśayana through association with this dharma. 
kskk Are there any nuśayas which do not have the pure dharmas for their object, which do not have a superior Dhātu for their object yet which become genrśayana solely through association with and not from the fact of the object? 
Yes, universal anuśayas which have a superior bhūmi for their object. 
Among the ninetyeight dḥyānas, how many are bad , and how many are morally neutral, that is, without retribution ? 
All the higher dhyānas are morally neutral. 
All the nuśayas beloṉging to Rūpadhātu and Ārūpyadhātu are neutral. In fact, all defiled dharmas, when they bear retribution; bear painful retribution. Now suffering does exist in these two spheres, for no causes for doing evil to others are present there. 
In Kāmadhātu, a belief in a self, a belief in the extreres, and the ignorance which is associated with them, are neutral. 
In fact, these anuśayas are not in contradiction to giving and other good deeds. One thinks, May I be happy in the future!, and one give gifts and observes the precepts. 
This is why the Bleesed One said, Among the doctrines of the Tīrthikas, the best is that which says, I do not exist, things of mine do not exist; I shall not exist, things pertaining to me shall not exist. 
ĪŪ These two viewsa belief in a self and a belief in the extremesare only aberrations relative to things which constitute the pseudoperson; they do not being about harm to another: 
But these different reasonsbecause they are not in contradic tion to giving, etccould be applied to the desire for heaven and to egotism , which should thus also be neutral; but the School does not admit this. 
But a cogitated belief in a self is bad.. 
Lust, anger and māḍi, in Kāmadhātu, are roots of evil. 
All lust , all anger , and all māḍi belonging to Kāmadhātuwith the exception of the delusion which is a belief in a self and the belief in the extremesare, in this order, the three roots of evil, greed, anger, and ignorance. 
A belief in a self and a belief in the extremes are not roots of evil, for a root of evil is only that which is bad and is only a root of evil. 
The other anuśayas are not roots of evil. 
ktk How many dharmas are neutral roots? 
Three roots, desire, ignorance, and mat aṟe neutral. 
The Vaibhāṣikas of Kāśmīr hold that desire, ignorance, and prajñā which are neutral, of whatever type they are up to and including the prajñā which arises from retribution, are neutral roots, The others are not roots, because their modality is of duality and elevation. 
Doubt caṉṉot be regarded as a root, being twofold and mobile by nature. 
Egotism , being an elevation of the mind, is not a root, since it consists of elevation, the opposite of a root. 
For in this world roots are firm and reach downward. 
desire, views, egotism, and delusion which are neutral; in fact there are three contemplations based on ignorance. 
kiḵsk Are the fourteen undefined points of which Scripture speaks so called because they are neutral in the sense that we have just studied? 
In the Sūtra a neutral question is a question which should be set aside: 
There are four types of questions: a question to which one responds in a categorical manner; 2. a question to which one responds by distinguishing; . a question to which one responds by another question; and 4. 
If oṉe asks, Do all beings die, one should aṉnswer in a categorical manner, They do. 
What is the question to which one should repsond by a question? 
What is the question to be rejected? 
When someone asks if the world is eternal, noneternal, eternal and noneternal, neither eternal nor noneternal; if the number of persons is finite, infinite, finite and infinite, neither finite and infinite; if the Tathāgata exists after death. 
; or if the vital principle is other than the body. 
These questions, Oh Bhikṣus, are to be rejected. 
Within a certain person, aṅ zṉuśaya or latent defilement attaches itself to a certain object; this person is bound to this object by this anuśaya. 
We must examine to what object a person is bound by a past, present, or future grufaya. 
From this point of view the anuśayas ot kleśas are of two types: 
specific kleśar, namely lust, anger, egotism; and general kleŚśas, namely views, doubt, and ignorance. 
One is bound by lust, anger, and egotism, past and present, to the object from whence they have been produced without their having been abandoned. 
For, being specific, they are not necessarily produced within all persons with respect to all things, but rather within a certain person with respect to a ceṛtain thing. 
For the sphere of the māṇas is tritemporal. One is bound to the object of their time period by the same future kleias, since they are not mental states. 
One is bound to future objects through future lust and anger which differ from the preceedingthat is, nonmental states in a relationship with the five sense consciousnesses. The five coṅsciousnesses, in fact, cognize only objects contemporaneous to them. 
Sometimes this rule conceṟrns only future lust and anger of the nutpattidharmin or destined to arise category. 
Everywhere, this is, to all objects, past, present, and future. 
One is bound everywhere by the others, whatever they are. 
kkk Do the kleśas, and past and future objects, really exist? 
If one says that they really exist, one admits that conditioned things always exist and are thus eternal; if they do not exist, how is it possible to say that a person is bound to these objects by the klefas, or that he is liberated from them? 
The Vaibhāṣikas maintain that past and future dharmas really exist; conditioned things nevertheless are not eternal for they are endowed with the characteristics of conditioned things. 
In order to better illustrate their position we present, in summary fashion, their doctrine: 
The dharmas exist in the three time periods. 
Why is this? 
Because the Blessed One has said it. 
The Blessed One taught in his own words the existence of the past and the future, Monks, if past 7pa did not exist, the learned holy Śrāvakas would not take into consideration past r2pa. 
If future rūpa did not exist, the learned holy Śrāvakas would not delight in future rpa. 
It is because future 7pa exists that the learned holy Śrāvakas. 
Because mental consciousness preceeds from two. The Blessed One implicitly teaches the same doctrine when he says, Consciousness is produced by reason of two. 
What are these two? 
The organ of sight and a visible thing. 
the anṇas and the dharmas. 
Now if the past and futute dharmas do not exist, mental coṅsciousness which has them for its object would not arise by reason of these two. Because it has an object. 
A consciousness can arise given an object, but not if an object is not present. 
If past and future things do not exist, there would be consciousness without an object; thus there is no conciousness without an object. 
And because the past bears a result. If the past does not exist, how can good and bad action give forth a result? In fact, at the moment when the result is produced, the retributive cause is past. 
Therefore, because of the proofs from Scripture and reasoning quoted above, the Vaibhāṣikas affirm the existence of both the past and the future. 
kkṣk The masters who call themselves Sarvāstivādins, belivers in the existence of all, maintain that the past and the future exist. 
He who affirms the existence of the dharmas of the three time periods is held to be a Sarvāstivādin. 
Those who affirm the existence of the present and a part of the past, namely the existence of action which has not given forth its result; and the nonexistence of the future and a part of the past, namely the nonexistence of action which has given forth its result, are regarded as Vibhajyavādins; kekk How many systems are there in this School? 
There are four types of Sarvāstivādins accordingly as they teach a difference in existence , a difference in characteristic, a difference in condition, and mutual difference. 
The Bhadanta Ghoṣaka defends Zakṣaṇānyathātva, that is, the time periods differ through the difference in their characteris tics. A dharma goes through the time periods. 
What is opposed But, if it always exists, why doesnt a dharma always exercise its activity? 
One cannot say that its inaction results from the nonpresence of certain causes, since these causes also always exist. 
How can activity be past, etc.? 
Then, being unconditioned , it is eternal , and how can you theṅ say that a dharma is future when it does not exercise its activity, or past when it not longer exercises it? 
These objections would hold, if activity were other than the dharma itself. But it is not other than the dharma. Thus this error does not exist. Therefore The time periods are no longer justified. 
If activity is the same as the dharma, ahd if the dharma always exist, its activity would also always exist. 
Why and how does one say that sometimes it is past, sometimes future? 
How is it not justified? 
In fact a conditioned dharma which has not arisen is called future; that which, having arisen, is not destroyed, is called present; and that which is destroyed is called past. If, in the past and future, a dharma exists with the same nature as when it is present, Existing in the same manner, how can it be nonari sen or destroyed? 
If the unique selfnature of a dharma continues to exist, how can this dharma be nonarisen or destroyed? 
What is it that it is lacking now, through the absence of which it is qualified as nonarisen? 
What is it that it is lacking later, through the absence of which it is qualified as destroyed? 
Consequently, if one does not admit that the dharma exists after having been nonexistent and no longer exists after having existed, the three time periods cannot be established or proved to exist. kksk 1. 
The argument that, possessing the characteristics of conditioned things , conditioned things aṟe not eternal even though they exist both in the past and in the future, is pure verbiage, for, if it always exists, a dharma is not susceptible either of arising or of perishing. 
to speek in this manner is to contradict oneself through ones own words. 
This is what the stanza explains when it says, Self nature always exists, but this does not mean that being is eternal, nor that being is different from its self nature: this is cleaṟly stated by the Loṛḍ.10 : 
With regard to the argument that the Blessed One taught the existence of the past and the future since he said Past action exists, and future results exist, we would also say that the past exists, and that the future exists. 
Past is that which was existent; future is that which, given its cause, will exist;: it is in this sense that we say that the past and the future exists. 
But they do not exist as substantial entities as does the present. 
Who says that they exist like the present? 
If they dont exist like the present, how do they exist? 
They exist with the nature of the past and the future. 
But, if they now.exist, how can one attribute the nature of past and future to them? 
In fact, the Blessed One, in a text quoted by the Sarvāstivādins, had the intention of condemning the view that negates cause and effect. He said the past exists in the sense of the past was; he said the future exists in the sense of the future will be. 
The word is is a nipāka, in the same sense as the expressions, There is previous nonexist ence of the lamp, there is later nonexistence of the lamp, and again, This lamp is extinguished, but it was not extinguished by me. 
It is in this same way that the text says the past exists, and the future exists. 
To understand otherwise, being in the past, the past would not now be the past. 
Now can we suppose that the ascetics would not admit that past action has already passed away? 
And inversely, when there is disconnection, is there abandoning? 
When that which is to be abandoned through the Seeing of Suffering is abandoned, the ascetic remains in connection with it from the fact of the other universal defilements; when the first category is abandoned, he remains in connṉection with it from the fact of the other defilements which have it as their object. 
for he continues to be bound to these first things through the universal defilements whose abandoning depends on the Seeing of Arising and which are relative to these first things. 
In the Path of Meditation wherein one sucessively expells nine categories of defilements, when the first category is abandoned and not the others, these other categories of defilements, which bear upon the first category, continue to bind. 
We would never finish were we to examine this problem in detail. 
The Vaibhāṣikas give a summary exposition of this. 
In general one can say that there are sixteen types of dharmas, objects to which the anuśayas attach themselves: for each sphere there are five categories ; plus the pure dharmas. 
When we know which dharmas are the objects of which consciousness, we are then able to calculate how many znuśayas attach themselves to these dharmas. 
Abandoned through the Seeing of Suffering and Arising, abandoned through Meditation, the dharmas in Kāmadhātu are the sphere of three consciousnesses of this sphere, of one consciousness of Rūpadhātu and the pure consciousness. 
The same three categories of dharmas in Rūpadhātu are the object of three consciousnesses of Rūpadhātu, three of Kāmadhātu, one of Ārūpyadhātu and the pure con sciousness. 
The same categories of dbarmas in Ārūpyadhātu are the objects of three consciousnesses of the three spheres and pure conscousness. 
The dharmas abandoned through the ŚSeeing of Extinction and the Path are all the objects of the same consciousnesses with the addition of the consciousness of their own category. 
The dharmas of Kāmadhātu abandoned through the Seeing of Extinction are objects of the five consciousnesses as above, plus the consciousness abandoned through the Seeing of Extinction: in all six consciousnesses. 
The dharmas of Kāmadhātu abandoned through the Seeing of the Path are objects of the five consciousnesses as above, plus the consciousness abandoned through Seeing the Path: in all six conṅsciousnesses. 
The dharmas of Rūpadhātu and Ārūpyadhātu are abandoned through the Seeing of Extinction and the Path: they are the objects, respectively, of nine and eleven consciousnesses. 
The pure dharmas are the object of the last three consciousnesses of the three spheres and of pure conscious ṉess. They are the objects of ten consciousnesses, the conscious nesses of the three spheres abandoned through the Seeing of Extinction and the Path, through Meditation, and the pure consciousness. 
To the abandoning through Seeing the Extinction of Suffering and the Path, add the mind of their class. 
The pure dharmas are the object of ten consciousnesses. 
Such are the sixteen types of dharmas, objects of sixteen types of consciousness. We shall now examine what anusfaya attaches itself to what dharma. 
A complete analysis would take us too far afield; we will content ouṟselves with studying a typical case. 
Agreeable sensation is of seven types: belonging to Kāmadhātu, to be abandoned through Meditation; belonging to Rūpadhātu, of five categories; and pure. 
When it is pure, the anufayas do not attach themselves to it, as we have shown. 
When they belong to Rūpadhātu, all the universal aṉśayas attach themselves to it. 
How many anufśayas attach themselves to the consciousness which has agreeable sensation for its object? 
belong to Kāmadhātu, for categories of consciousness ; belong to Rūpadhātu, five categories; belong to Ārūpyadhātu, the consciousness abandoned through Seeing the Path and the one abandoned through Meditation; and the pure consciousṉess. 
two categories of anṉuśayas of the sphere of Ārūpyadhātu; and 4. the universal anufayas. How many anuśayas attach themselves to the consciousness which has for its object the consciousness having an agreeable sensation for its object? The consciousness which has an agreeable sensation for its object, and which is of twelve types, is itself the object of a consciousness which can be of fourteen types, namely the twelve aforementioned types with the addition of the conscious nesses of the sphere of Ārūpyadhātu abandoned through the Seeing of Suffering and the Seeing of the Arising of Suffering. 
Attaching themselves to this consciousness are, according to their types, the anṉuśayas described above in the first two spheres, plus four categories in Ārūpyadhātu. 
The other dharmas will be examined on the basis of this example. 
Should we think that, necessarily, the anaśayas nourish themselves, and lodge in the sānuśaya mind? 
Those which lodge in it are the nonabandoned anuśayas, whose object is not abandoned , and which are associated with the mind in question. 
Those which do not lodge in it are the abandoned anusayas which are associated with the mind in question. 
The defiled mind is sṇuśaya in two ways; the nondefiled mind solely from the fact of the gṉ5ayas which lodge therein. 
The defiled mind is sānufaya from the fact of the annśayas which lodge therein: 
k:g In what order are the ten nṉusuyas produced ? 
From moha, there is doubt. 
At first, bound by ignorance , a person is in confusion with respect to the Truths: he does not take pleasure in the Truth of Suffering; he does not admit it. 
From this state of confusion, there arises doubt; he undertands the two thesis; he doubts whether suffering is true, or if noṉsuffering is true. 
From whence false views; From doubt there arises false views: by reason of false teaching and false reflection, he comes to the judgement This is not suffering. 
From whence a belief in a self; From false view there arises the view of personality; for, not recognizing the skandhas as suffering, he considers these skandhas as constituting a self. 
From whence a belief in the extremes; From whence there is the view of the two extremes, for a person, believing in a self, becomes attached to the idea of the eternity or the anṇihilation of the self. 
From whence the esteeming of mṃorality and ascetic practices; From this there is an esteeming of morality and practices considered to be a means of purification. 
33, From whence the esteeming of bad views; From this, there is an esteeming of that which is inferior, the esteeming of what he considers as a means of purification. 
From whence lust and pride relative to ones own views; From this there is attachment to ones own views, and pride and pleasure in these views. 
And hatred with respect to another: From this there is dislike: for, quite full of his own views, he detests the views of others which are contrary to his own. 
According to other masters, there is hatred for ones own opinions when one changes them; for lust and the other anṇuśayar which are abandoned through the Seeing of the Truths are those which have for their object the person himself and his own views. 
Such is the order. 
How many causes give rise to the kleśasṛ? 
Kleśas arise from the nonaban doning of the znazśaya, from the presence of their object, and from erroneous judgment. 
three distinct forces. 
The same holds for the other kleśas With complete causes. 
For, according to the School, a kleśz can arise through the mere force of its object; as in the case of the Arhat who is subject to falling away. 
In the manner in which the cankerous influences are explained, So too for the floods and the yokes. 
The floods and the yokes are explained in the same manner. 
According to the School1, it is by reason of their characteris tic of sharpness that views constitute a separate flood and a separate yoke. They are not a separate cankerous influence, because, without companions, they are not favorable to installation. 
So too the zpādānas , by placing ignorance and by dividing the drṛṣgis into two. 
Clinging to the objects of sensual pleasure is made up of the yoke of the objects of sensual pleasure plus the ignorances of Kāmadhātu, that is, five lusts, five hatreds, five egotisms, five ignorances, four doubts, and ten wrappings: in all thiṟtyfour things. 
They are atomic; they adhere; they nourish themselves in two ways; they continually bind: 
They are atomic, for their mode of existences is subtle, being difficult to know. 
They adhere through the adhesion of their prāptis; they nourish themselves in two ways, both from the object and from the dharmar with which they are associated; and they continually bind, for, unless one makes an effort, and even when one creates an obstacle to them, they will appear and reappear. 
such is the etymology of the words āsravas, etc. 
The anuśayas fix, seat beings in transmigration; they flow from the highest heaven to Avīci ; they flow out by the six organs which are as wounds. They are thus called cankerṟous influences, or āsravas. The anuśayas carry away ; they are thus called oghas or floods. The anuśayas cause beings to be attached ; they are thus called yogas or yokes. The anuśayas seize ; they are thus called uwpādānas or clingings. 
By means of the auśayas, the mental series flows into the objects; the anfayas are thus āsravas or cankerous influences. 
In conformity with the comparison of the Śūtra In the same way that one makes great efforts in order to steer a boat against the current but when these efforts begin to weaken, the boat is carried with the stream;.4 2. 
When they are very violent, the nuśayas are called oghas; in fact they carry away, as in a flood, those who are bound to them, and who necessarily yield to their impulses. 
When they do not enter into activity with an extreme violence, the anufayas are called yogas, because they yoke one to the very many sufferings of transmigration; or rather because they adhere with obstinance. 
The anuxśayas are called upādānas, because, through their action, one clings to things of the senses, etc. 
.18 kk These same anuśayas or latent defilements which make up four categoriescankerous influences, floods, yokes, and clingings, also make up five categories: 
wrappings.1 There are said to be five types by reason of their division into connections, etc. 
Anunayasayojana or the attachment of affection is lust of the three Dhātus. One should understand the other connections in the same way, each according to its type: 
Drṣṭisamyojana or the attachment to views is made up of the first three views ; parāmarśasayojana, the attachment to esteeming, is made up of the last two. 
Does it happen that a person is attached through the connection of affection, and not through the connection of views, to the dharmas associated with views , while dṛṣyanuśaya, the latent defilement of views, is not active with respect to these dharmas? 
Within him arises a connection of affection with respect to the dharmas associated with the views of esteeming views and esteeming of morality and ascetic practices, dharmas which are abandoned through the Truth of Extinction and the Path. This person will be attached to these dharmas through the connection of affection, but not through the connection of views; for he has abandoned the universal connection of views which is abandoned through the Truths of Suffering and the Arising of Suffering, and there does not exist in him any nonuniversal connection of views which bears on these dbarmas or which is associated with them. 
Nevertheless latent defilement of views is active with respect to these dharmas, for the two drṣṭis which are esteeming and which have not yet been abandoned, are active through association. 
kk Why does one makes one connectionthe connection of viewsout of the first three views, and another connection,.the connection of esteemingout of the last two? 
Two views constitute separate coṇnection by treason of their equal number of things, and by reason of their common characteristic of esteeming. 
The first three views mmake up eighteen distinct things: 
The last two views are, by their nature, esteeming, but not the first three. 
kkṣk Why do envy and avarice make up two connections, while the other wrappings are not distinct connec tions ? 
These two characteristics are not encountered in the other wrappings. 
According to another opinion this reason is good for the master who admits only eight wrappings; but for the master who admits ten wrappings , the reason proposed raises no difficulties, for anger and hypocrisy also present the twofold characteristic of being bad and independent: 
they are also classified as connections. 
kkṣk The Blessed One said moreover, that, among the connec tioas, Five are inferior. 
Namely a belief in a self, the esteeming of morality and ascetic practices, doubt, desire for the objects of sensual pleasure and anger. 
Now, among these five coṉnnections: 
This is why these five connections are termed inferior. 
It appears that the Blessed One should term these riews connections favorable to the quality of Prthagjana. 
By indicating the first three as connections, the Blessed One indicates the gate to the other kleśas, the beginning of each category. 
the esteeming of morality and ascetic practices through which, having recourse to another path, one becomes deluded about the Path; and c. 
ikk In the same way that the Blessed One characterized five connections as inferior, in this same way Five are superior, namely two lusts, those which arise from Rūpadhātu and from Ārūpyadhātu, namely dissipation, pride and ignorance. 
They are superiot, which means that one cannot pass beyond the higher spheres when one has not abandoned them. 
This exposition of the connections is finished. 
ek How many bandhanas or bonds are there? 
Three, namely all lust, all batred, and all ignorance. 
Why are only these three called bonds? 
There are three bonds by reason of sensation. There are three bonds by reason of the three sensations. 
Lust creates aṉuśayana, that is, becomes lodged in and grows in agreeable sensation, both by taking it as its object and by associatioṇ; hatred in disagreeable sensation; and ignorance, andbut not in the same mannerlust and hatred, in the sensation of indifference. 
Or rather the preceeding rule refers to the sensation of personality. 
htk The anuśayas have been explained above. 
kkk We must now explain the upakleśas. 
The kleśas are upakleśas because they defile the mind. 
Dbarmas different from the kleśas, defiled mental states, included within the semskāraskandha , are solely xpakleśas. 
There are eight types of wrappings: disrespect, absence of fear, envy, avarice, dissipation, regret, torpor, and languor. 
The system of the Vaibhāṣīkas admits ten, by adding Also anger and hypocrisy. 
Disrespect and absence of fear, ii.32. 
Envy or mental dissatisfaction concerns the prosperity of another. 
Avarice is tenacity of the mind, which is opposed to either spiritual or material giving . 
Regret is good or bad, but only defiled regret is a wrapping. Torpor, ii.26. 
Languor is a compression of the mind which rends it incapable of commanding the body. 
Languor can be good, bad, or neutral, but only defiled languor is a wrapping. 
Anger is icritation of the mind with respect to living beings and to things , an iṟritation distinct from that of regret, anger or hostility. 
Hypocrisy is hiding ones faults. 
ksṭkx What is the origin of the wrappings? 
There is no agreement with regard to hypocrisy. 
From out of doubt there proceeds regret and aṅger; from out of hatred there proceeds envy. 
49 cheating, crookedness, drunkenness of pride, esteeming evil, enmity, and hostility. 
Cheating is the dhbarma that causes one to delude another. 
Enmity is aversion. 
Hostility is what is translated into deeds and words harmful to another. 
50b From out of lust there proceeds cheating and the drunkenness of pride; from anger enmity and hostility; esteeming evil from out of the esteeming of views; and crookedness from out of view. 
Crookedness is an outflowing of view, for it is said in a stanza, What is crookedness? 
Disrespect, absence of fear, torpor, languor, and dissipation are abandoned through Seeing and Meditation. 
Five wrappingsnamely the five the first of which is disrespectbeing associated with two kleśas, are twofold: 
abandoned through Seeing and Meditation. They are abandoned through Seeing the Truth through which the kleśa to which they aṟe associated is abandoned. 
The other wrappings, envy and the rest, are abandoned only by Meditation: 
in fact they are of the socalled autonomous category, being associated with a single ignorance which is abandoned through Meditation. 
The same holds for the kleśfamalas. 
āksk In Kāmadhātu, they are of two types; the others are bad; Torpor, dissipation, and languor are both bad and neutral. 
Above Kāmadhātu, the pakleiasto the extent that they exist thereare neutral. 
Cheating and crookedness exist in Kāmadhātu and in the First Dhyāṇna. 
These two upakleśas exist in two spheres, Kāmadhātu and Ṛūpadhātu. 
Since Brahmā tried to deceive. 
We cannot doubt this, for Mahābrahmā attempted to deceive the Āyuṣman Aśvajit by giving him an inexact definition of himself. 
Toṟpor, dissipation, and pridefulness exist in all three spheres. 
The others in Kāmadhātu. Of the sixteen pakleśas, ten wrappings and six alas, eleven exist only in Kāmadhātu, with the exception of cheating, crookedness, torpor, dissipation, and pridefulness. 
Those that are abandoned through Śeeing the Truths are of the spheres of the manovijñāna, plus pride and languor. 
Kleśas and upakleśas which are abandoned through Seeing are supported by the manovijñāna alone; so too pride and languor which are abandoned through Meditation; for these two, in their totality , are of the sphere of the manas. 
In the same way, the antonomous pakleśas are abandoned through Meditation. 
The others are supported by the six consciousnesses: lust is abandoned through Meditation, as are hatred and ignorance, as well as the pakleśar which are associated with them, disrespect, absence of fear, torpor, and dissipation, and those which are included in the kleśamahābhāmikas . 
With which sense organs are the kleśas and the wpakleśar associated? 
Lust is associated with pleasure and satisfaction. Hatred with the contrary. 
Hatred is associated with displeasure and dissatisfaction, for lust and hatred have respectively happiness and dejection for their aspect, for both of them belong to the six consciousnesses. Moha with all. 
Being associated with all the kJefas, ignorance is associated with the five sensations. 
False view is associated with dissatisfaction amoṇg those persons who have done meritorious actions and who regret that their actions are without result; it is associated with satisfaction among traṅsgresSots. 
Doubt with dissatisfaction. 
If one who aspires to certitude doubts, then he is dissatisfied. 
The others, that is, the views with the exception of false views and egotismare associated with satisfaction, for they have the aspect of happiness. 
All are associated with indifference. All these anuśayas are associated with the indriya of indiffer ence, for, says the School, there is necessarily indifference when the series of the efa is going to be broken. 
In the higher stages, they are associated with their own seṇsations, to be determined according to the stage. 
In the stagethe First Dhyānawhere there are four consciousnesses, seeing, hearing, touch, and mental consciousness, the anufayas which are produced with each of these conscious nesses are associated with the sensations proper to this conscious ness: 
there one finds the sensation of pleasure coṟresponding to the consciousnesses of seeing, hearing, and touch; the sensation of satisfaction corresponding to the mental conscious ness; and the sensation of indifference corresponding to the four consciousnesses.8 In the stagesthe Second Dhyāna, etc.where only the mental consciousness is found, the anuśayas which are produced with this consciousness are associated with the sensations proper to this consciousness in the state in question: 
Regret, envy, anger, hostility, aversion, and the esteeming of evil are associated with dissatisfaction. 
These wpakleśas are associated with the indriya of dissatisfac tion because they have dejection for their mode and they belong to the sphere of the manas. 
Avarice, with the contrary. Avarice is assocated with the śndriya of satisfaction; it has happiness for its mode, for it proceeds greed. 
Crookedness, cheating, hyprcrisy, and languor are associated with one and the other. 
Associated with the ndriya of satisfaction and with the indriya of dissatisfaction: 
it happens that one deceives another with satisfaction, and one deceives with dissatisfaction. 
Pridefulness is associated with the two agreeable sensations. 
In the Third Dhyāna, pridefulness is associated with the indriya of pleasure; below, with the ndriya of satisfaction; above, with the ndriya of indifference. Thus Indifference is everywhere. 
All are associated with indifference. In the way that there is no restriction in the association of the kleśfa and the wpakleśas with ignoranṅce, so too with indifference. 
The four others with five. FPour wrappingsnamely disrespect, absence of fear, torpor, and dissipationare associated with the five sensations, because the first two are azkxśalamahābhūikas, and the last two are kleśamahābhūmikas. 
kk From another point of view, the Sūtra declares that there are five hindrances or obstacles , among the kleśas and upakleśas: 
torporlanguor, 4. 
Does this refer to the torpor, dissipation, and doubt of all the three Dhātus, or only of Kāmadhātu? 
The Sūtra says that the hindrances are exclusively bad; consequentlyThe hindrances exist in Kāmadhātu. 
Why do torporandlanguor and dissipationandregret coṉstitute, as groups, two hindrances? 
Two make up a single hindrance, because they have the same opposites, the same nourishment, and the seme reṣult, Opposite, that is, opposition or counternourishment. 
The Sūtra teaches that torpor and languor have the same nourishment, and the same counternourishment: 
What is the nourishment of torporlanguor? 
Five dharmas, namely andrī , arati, vijṛmbhikā , bhakteṣamatā , and cetaso līnatva. 
What is the counternourish ment? 
Ālokasajñā. 
Toṟpor and languor have the same action or task of rendering the mind languid. 
In this same way dissipation and regret have the same nourishment, the same counternourishment, and the same effect. 
Its counternourishment is calmness. 
Its effect is to agitate the mind. 
Why does the Sūtra distinguish five hindrances? 
Only five, be reason of the destruction of a rkandha, by reason of doubt. 
But, one would say, if this explanation is correct, dissipation regret, which hinders absorption, should be listed, in the list of the hindrances, before torporlanguor. Thus these two hindrances desroy, in the order in which they are named, the two elements of absorption and discrimination: 
the danger to the person who applies himself to absorption is in torporlanguor; the danger to him who applies himself to discrimination of the dharmas is in dissipationregret. 
How do they explain this? 
Then, when the monk has entered into absorp tion, as he does not correctly cultivate calm and insight , there is then produced torporlanguor and dissipationregret which, in this order, hinder his absorption and his discrmination. 
but it is not at the moment when these envayajñānas are produced that the kleśas in question are abandoned, for, also having Kāmadhātu for their sphere, these kleśas have been formerly destroyed by the dharmajñānas of Suffering and the Arising of Suffering the production of which is before that of the anvayajñānas. 
They are abandoned in four ways. 
Destruction by a knowledge of the object, by the destruction of the keśas of which they are the object, and by the abandoning of the object. 
The kJeśfa5 beating on the bhūmi to which they belong, abandoned through the Seeing of Suffering and the Arising of Suffering, or having a pure object, abandoned through the Seeing of the Extinction of Suffering and the Path , are abandoned through a knowledge of their object. 
The universal kleśas in another sphere, abandoned through the Seeing of Suffering and the Arising of Suffering, are aban doned through the destruction of the kef of which they are the object. 
The kleśas having an impure object, abandoned through the Seeing of the Extinction of ŚSuffering and the Path are abandoned through the abandoning of their object. 
When a path is opposed to one category of kleśa, this path, by arising, causes this category of defilement to be abandoned. 
Which path is opposed to which category? 
The weakweak path is opposed to the strongstrong category. 
The strongstrong path is opposed to the weakweak category. 
How many types of oppositions are there? 
abandoning, maintaining, removal, and disgust. 
The Uninterrupted Path is a prahāṇaprasipakṣa, aṉ opposition which results in abandoning. 
The next path, the Path of Deliverance , is an adhārapratipakṣa, opposition through which the abandoning obtained by the proceeding path, is found to be maintained, affirmed. 
According to others, the Path of Deliverance is itself the opposition of removal , for the possession of the klesa is also removed from it. 
The path which consists of considering a sphere of existence as bad and which finds disgust in it is the path of opposition through disgust. 
opposition through abandoning is the whole of the Uninterrupted Path; 3. 
opposition through which the proceeding path is maintained is the Path of Deliverance; and 4. 
opposition by which the possession of the kleśa previously cut off, is removed is the Distinguished Path.20 When one abandons the klesas, through separation from what are they abandoned? 
The klesa is supposed to become abandoned through separation from its object, The klesa, in fact, cannot be separated from its samprayoga, ; but it can be separated from its object in such a manner that it no longer rearises bearing on this object. 
A future klesa can be separated from its object, but how can a past kleśa be? 
Would you say that the exptession ālambanāt prahātavyaḥ, to be abandoned through vyaḥ, to be abandoned through perfect knowledge of the object? 
A personal kleśa is abandoned through the cutting off of prāpti or the possession of this kleśa which exists in the personal series. 
As for the klesa of another, or for rāpa in its totality , or for the undefiled dharmas, these diverse things are abandoned through the abandoning of the personal lefa which takes them as its object How many types of separation are there? 
Separation through difference of nature, through opposition, through separation of place, and through time; as, for example, the primary elements, the precepts, places, and the two time periods. 
although the primary elements arise togethet , they are separated one from the other by the fact of their different ṉatures. 
from what are they separated? 
They are separated from the present. 
How can the past which has just perished and the future which is about to arise be separated from the present? 
It is by reason of the difference of time period that, according to us, the past and the future are separated; not by reason of the fact that they will be distant in the past or in the future. 
For if this were the case, the present would also be separate, for it constitutes a different time period. 
But how can an unconditioned thing, which is always inactive, be considered as near? 
Because, universally, they possess the two extinctions. 
This argument would hold for the past and the future ; but how can space, which one cannot possess , be near? 
We say that the past and the future are separated from one another because they are separated by the present; the present is near because it is neaṛ 
to the past and future; an unconditioned thing is near because it is not separated or hindered by anything. 
But then the past and the future will be at one and the same time far and near, being far from each other and near to the present. Here is the correct explanation. The future is separated from the unique, self characteristics of the dharmas, because it has not attained them; the past is separated from them because it has fallen away from them. 
kākāk It has been said that the keśas are not destroyed through the aṟising of their opposition or opposites. 
We would ask if, through the Distinguished Path , there is a progressive abandoning of the kleśas? 
In how manṉy moments? 
In six moments: 
There is arising of the opposition, the acquisition of results, and the perfection of the faculties. 
Opposition here means the Path of Deliveraṅce. Results means the four results of the religious life, the result of Srotaāpaṇṇna, etc. 
Perfection of the faculties refers to ndriyasaeāra. 
for certain klefas, according to the case, in six moments; but in decreasing number down to two for others. 
eftk Under certain conditions, disconnection receives the name of parijñā, perfect knowledge. 
There are two types of perfect knowledge: 
jñānaparijñā, perfect knowledge consisting of knowledge, which is pure knowledge; and prahāṉaparijñā, perfect knowledge which produces abandoning, which is abandoning itself, for the effect is designated by the name of its cause. 
srī Does all abandoning constitute one perfect knowledge? 
Why is this? 
That is, the destruction of the first two types of klesa of Kāmadhātu, the eśas abandoned through the Seeing of Suffering and the Arising of Suffering. 
The destruction of the two types consists of two. The abandoning of the keśas of Kāmadhātu abandoned through the Seeing of the Extinction of Suffering consitiutes one perfect knowledge; the same for the abandoning of the keśaṛ 
As the abandoning of the keśas of Kāmadhātu abandoned through the Seeing of the Truths constitutes three perfect knowledges, In that same way, above, there are three perfect knowledges. 
The same for the two higher spheres taken together, the abandoning of the kefas abandoned through the Seeing of Suffering and the Arising of Suffering consitutes one perfect knowledge; the abandoning of the kleśas abandoned through the Seeing of the Extinction of Suffering constitutes the second perfect knowledge; and the abandoning of the keśuṛ 
Thus there are six perfect knowledges for the abandoning of the kteśar which belong to the three spheres and which are abandoned by the Seeing of the Truths. 
There are three other perfect knowledges: the destruction of the avarabhāgṝya caṇkerous influences, the cankerous influences of Rūpadhātu, and of all the cankerous influences. 
The abandoning of the avarabhāgīya caṇkerous influences , that is, the cankerous influences of Kāmadhātu, coṉstitute one perfect knowledge. 
The abandoning of the cankerous influences of Rūpadhātu, which is called rparāgakayaparijñā perfect knowledge consist ing of the destruction of attachment to Rūpadhātu constitutes one perfect knowledge. 
The third perfect knowledge is the total abandoning of the cankerous influences of Ārūpyadhātu, which is called sarvasarāy ojanaparyādānaparijñā,perfect knowledge consisting of the annihilatioṉ of all the bonds. 
Rūpadhātu is distinguished from Ārūpyadhātu with respect to the abandoning of the eś2ṛ 
the opposition is the same for these , but not for those. 
Thus three are nine perfect knowledges. 
Six are the result of the patiences. The first six perefect knowledges, which consist of the abandoning of the kleśas abandoned through Seeing the Truths, aṟe the result of the patiences. The others, the results of the knowledges. 
The three perfect knowledges, the first of which is the perfect knowledge which consists of the abandoning of Kāmadhātu, are obtained through the Path of Meditation; thus they are the result of the knowledges. 
How can a perfect knowiedge be the result of a patience ? 
Because the patiences are the associates of the jñānas or knowledges: in the manner in which the associates of a king improperly receive the name of king; or rather, because a patience and a knowledge have the same result. 
kskk All are the result of aṉāgamya; five or eight are the result of the dhyānas. 
According to the Vaibhāṣikas, five are the result of the mauladhyānas or the principal absorptions , namely, those which consist of the abandoning of the kleśas of the sphere of Rūpadhātu and Ārūpyadhātu. 
According to the Bhadanta Ghoṣaka, eight are the result of the principal absorptions. Let us suppose, he says, a person detached from Kāmadhātu by the mundane oṛ impure path enters into the Seeing of the Truths or the Path of Seeing being supported by the Dhyānas: 
his abandoning of the efas of Kāmadhātu abandoned by Seeing, and his taking of possession of disconnection from these kesas, should be consid ered as the result of the path of Seeing, for it is pure. 
The single perfect knowledge which consists of the abandoning of the cankerous influence of Kāmadhātu is solely the result of anāgamya. 
This holds as well for dhyānāntara as for the principle Dhyāṇas. 
The perfect knowledge consisting of the destructin of attach ment to Rūpadhātu is the result of the sāmantaka, ot pteparatory stage of Ākāśānan tyyataṉa. 
The perfect knowledge which consists of the annihilation of all the bonds is the tesult of the three principle Ārūpyas. 
The nine perfect knowledges are obtained through the pure path. 
Three through dharmajñāna, The last three are the result of dharmajñāna inciuded in the Path of Meditation, for this knowledge is opposed to the keśas of the three spheres abandoned through Meditation. 
Five or six, from one and the other groups. 
Śix are the result of the ḍharmajñāna group, namely those which are the result of the dharmakṣāntis and the dharmajñānas;, five are the result of the xvayajñāna group, namely those which are the result of anvayakṣāntis and the anvayajñānas. 
The expression group is to be understood for the kṣāntis and the jñānṉas. 
kkk Why is not all abandoning considered a perfect knowledge ? 
There is perfect knowledge by reason of the pure acquisition of disconnection, the partial abandoning of Bhavāgra, and the destruction of two causes. 
The abandoning which includes these three characteristics receives the name of perfect knowledge. 
The abandoning of a Prthagjana can include the abandoning of two causes ; but a Prṛthagjana can never obtain the pure acquisition of disconnection ; he never mutilates Bhavāgra. 
After his entry into the Path of Seeing until the third moment , the Āryans abandonings include the pure acquisition of disconnection, but not the nutilation of Bhavāgra, nor the destruction of the two universal causes abandoned through the Seeing of Suffering and the Arising of Suffering. 
But in the other dharmajñānas and in the other anvayajñānas , the abandoning includes these three characteristics and receives the name of perfect knowledge. 
That is, because the ascetic detaches himself from a sphere in its totality. 
Other mastērs formulate a fifth cause: the fact of being disjoined from a twofold bond. 
But this reason is included in destruction of two causes and in the passing over a sphere. 
One who is to be found in the Path of Seeing of the Truths is either not endowed with perfect knowledge, or is endowed with from one to five perfect knowledges. 
A Prthagjana has no perfect knowledges. 
As long as one has not obtained detachment from Kāmadhātu, the Āryan, after mārgenvayajñānaor when, having obtained it, one has fallen away from itpossesses six perfect knowledges in the Path of Meditation. 
When one has obtained this detachmenteither before or after the comprehension of the Truths one is endowed with a single perfect knowledge of the abandoning of the cankerous influences of Kāmadhātu. 
The Arhat who obtains the qualtiy of Arhat is endowed with a single perfect knowledge of the annihilation of all the bonds. 
one is thus endowed with a single perfect knowledge of the abandoning of the cankerous influences of Kāmadhāṭu. 
Falling away through one defilement of Kāmadhātu, he finds himself again in the condition of aa Āryan not detached from this sphere: six perfect knowledges. 
Falling away through one defilement of Ārūpyadhātu, he finds himself in the condition of an Āryan who obtains detachemnt from Rūpadhātu: he is endowed with two perfect knowledges: 
the perfect knowledge of the abandoning of the cankerous influences of Kāmadhātu and the perfect knowledge of the destruction of attachment to Rūpadhā ṭu,0 kskk Why is there only a single perfect knowledge attributed to the Anāgāmiṉ and to the Aṛhat? 
One reduces the perfect knowledges to a single unit where there is detachment from one sphere and the acquisition of a result. 
The acquisition of the last two results coincides with the detachmeṇt from a sphere. 
One loses one, two, five, or six perfect knowledges; in this same way one obtains them, but never five. 
The saint who falls away from the quality of Arhat or from the detachment of Kāmadhātu loses one perfect knowledge. 
The Anāgāmin detached from Rūpadhātu who falls away from the detachment of Kāmadhātu loses two perfect knowledges. 
When the saint who has arrived at the sixteenth moment is detached from Kāmadhātu before entering into the Path of Seeing, he loses five perfect knowledges, for at this moment he obtains the perfect knowledge that he has abandoned the cankerous influences of Kāmadhātu. 
When one is not detached from Kāmadhātu before entering into the Path of Seeing, that is, when he is an āṉapārvaka he then obtains the sixth perfect knowledge which he will lose, with the five others, when he acquires detachment from Kāma dhātu. 
One who, in the two paths, obtains one perfect knowledge not previously possessed, obtains one perfect knowledge. 
One who falls away from a single detachment of Ārūpyadhātu, obtains two perfect knowledges. 
One who falls away from the result of Anāgāmin obtaeins six perfect knowledges. 
For an etymology and explanation of the word anviaya, see v.9; on the role of the anufayas and their anuśayanas, v.1ī. 
Seven anuśfayas, Aṅguttara, īv.9, Vibhaṅga, 340,383; Visuddhimagga, 197; Compendinm, 119, note 2; JPTS, 191012, p. 
apacaya gacchanti.lpso facto to accumulate means to gain force and fruitfulness , to necessarily produce a retribution; vipākadnāya niyatābhavanti.See iv:50 and 3. 
It has beenṉ said that the defilements are abandoned through Seeing the Truths and through Meditation. 
We have explained in detail that some of the defilements are to be abandoned through Seeing, and others through Meditation. 
Is the Path of Seeing and the Path of Meditation pure or impure ? 
The Path of Meditation is of two types; the Path of Seeing is pure. 
The Path of Seeing is opposed to the defilements of the Three Dhātus; it eliminates in one single stroke the nine categories of the defilements to be abandoned through Seeing; it is thus exclusively transworldly; now such a power does not belong to a woṟldly path. 
We have said , through Seeing the Truths. 
What are the Truths? 
The Four Truths have been mentioned. 
In the First Chapter. 
By saying The pure dharmas are the Truth of the Path. 
By saying Pratsakhyānirodha is disconnec tion, we have designated the Truth of Extinction. 
By saying Suffering, origin, world. , we have designated the Truths of Suffering and Origin. 
Is that the order of the Truths? 
Rather: 
The word namely indicates that the nature of the Truths is indeed as has been mentioned in the First Chapter. 
Their order is that in which they are understood. 
The Truth that is understood first is mentioned first. Other wise there would be the occurance of first mentioning the cause and then the result. 
Sometimes dharmas are arranged in the order in which they arise; this is the case for the applications of mindfulness, the smrṛtyupasthānas and for the Dhyāṇnas. 
Sometimes they are arranged in an order favorable for teaching; this is the case for the right abandonings, the sayak prahāṇas, existent dharmas and the black āharmas are easier to understand than nonarisen dharmas and the white dharmas,for it is not a fixed rule that one should make an effort to abandon the existent dharmas before making an effort for the nonarising of noṉarisen dḍharmas. 
The Truths are mentioned in the order in which they are comprehended. 
Why are they comprehended in this order? 
Because, in the period preparatory to the Path proper, that is, the period of examination, the ascetic first creates an idea of that to which he is attached, of that by which he is totmented, of that from which he seeks to be delivered, namely, suffering. 
Then he asks what is its cause, and he creates an idea of its origin. 
Then he asks what does extinction consist of, and he creates an idea of extinction. 
Then he asks what is the Path to extinction, and he creates an idea of the path. 
So too, having seen a disease, one searches out its origin, its disappearance, and its remedy. 
This illustration of the Truths is also given in the Sūtra. 
In which Sūtra? 
In the Sūtra which says, Endowed with the four qualities, the doctor. 
In the order in which, in the course of the period of examina tion, he creates an idea of the Truths, in this same order, having reached the period of comprehension, he understands the Truths, because comprehension is projected by the preparatory exercises, the same way that a horse gallops without obstacie over familiar teṟrain. 
kskṣk What is the meaning of the word abhisamaya ? 
The root ; signifies to understand. 
Why is comprehension only pure? 
Because it is a knowledge tuṟned towards Nirvāṇa and the true. Samyak means confoṟming to reality. 
To the extent that they are a result, the five zpādānaskandhas are the Truth of Suffering, that which one should see in truth as being suffering. 
Consequently suffering and arising differ in name, but do not differ in fact, since they are the same upādānaskandhas coṉsidered as result or as cause. But Extinction and the Path differ in fact as well as in name. 
kṣek The Sūtra gives the name of āryasatya, truth of the Āryans, to the Truths. What is the meaning of this expression? 
They are truth for the Āryans, truths of the Āryans: this is why they are called āryasatya. 
Does this mean that they are false for the nonĀryans? 
Not being erroneous , they are true for everyone. 
Therefore, the Truths are called truths of the Āryans and not truths of others, because the seeing of these latter is incorrect. 
In fact, they see what is suffering as being not suffering. 
As the stanza says, What the Āryans call happy others call painful; what others call happy, the Āryans call painful. 
According to other masters, two are Āryan truths, and two are truths of both Āryans and others. 
tk Since only a part of sensation is painful by its nature. 
how can one say that all impure, conditi oned things are suffering? 
Impure dharmas, whether they are agreeable, disagreea ble, or otherwise, are, without exception, suffering, by reason of the three types of suffering, each according to its type. 
There are three types of suffering: suffering which is suffering in and of itself , suffering through the fact of being conditioned , and suffering which is change or transformation. 
By reason of these three, all impure conditioned things, without exception, are suffering: 
agreeable things are suffering because they are subject to transfoṟmation; disagreeable things are suffering in and of themselves; and neitherdisagreeablenora greeable things are suffering because they are conditioned. 
What are the agreeable, disagreeable, and neitherdisagreeablenora greeable dharmas? 
The three sensations, in this order; and, by reason of the three sensations, all the seskāras which reṣult in agreeable sensation, etc., receive the name of agreeable, etc. 
Agreeable sensation is suffering through transformation, as the Sūtra says, Āgreeable sensation is agreeable when it arises, agreeable while it lasts, but suffering in its change. 
Disagreeable sensation is suffering by nature, as the Sūtra says, Suffering sensation is suffering when it arises, and suffering while it lasts. 
Neitherdisagreeablenoragreeable sensation is suffering because it is so decreed by its causes, as the Sūtra says, That which is impermanent is suffering. 
The same holds true for the saūskāras which result in these sensations as for these sensations themselves. 
kkk According to other masters, the expressions dmhkhadubkhaiā, etc., should be analysed: dubkham eva duhkhatā , vipariṇāma eva duḥkhatā , and saskāra eva duḥkhatā. The meaning is the same. esfk Agreeable dharmas do not participate in suffering which is suffering in and of itself, nor do the disagreeable dharmas participate in suffering which is transformation: 
the second state of suffering belongs to the first ones, and the first to the second ones. 
But all conditioned things are suffering from the fact of suffering through the fact of being conditioned, and they are seen under this aspect only by the Āryans. 
Therefore it is said, One does not feel a hair placed on the palm of the hand; but the same hair, in the eye, causes suffering and injury. 
So too the ignorant, resembling the hand, do not feel the hair which is suffering through the fact of being conditioned: 
The Āryans make of existence in the most sublime heaven an idea more painful than do fools make of existence in the most dreadful hell. 
kskk But, one would say, the Path is conditioned; it should thus be suffering from the fact of suffering through the fact of being conditioned. 
The Path is not suffering, because the definition of suffering is to be hateful. 
Now the Path is not hateful to the Āryans because it produces the extinction of all of the sufferings of arising; when they consider Nirvāṇa as peaceful, what they consider as peaceful is the extinction of what they consider as suffering. 
kskk But, since the agreeable or happiness does exist, why is only suffering, and not the agreeable, a truth of the Āryans? 
According to one explanation, it is because of the slightness of happiness. 
In the same way that one calls a pile in which some peas are to be found a pile of beans, so too no one with any intelligence would consider a wound as agreeable because one experiences a very small agreeable sensation when one washes this wound. 
And further, Because it is a cause of suffering, because it is produced by many sufferings, because one desires it when one suffers , the agreeable, they conclude, is suffering. 
But, even if accmpanied by happiness, existence in its totality has the same flavor of suffering through the fact of being conditioned: Āryans thus consider it as suffering. This is why suffering and not heppiness is an Āryan Truth. 
But how can Āryans regard sensations which are agreeable by nature as suffering? 
They are hateful by reason of their impermanence in the same way that they consider the rpas, sajñās, etc., as suffering, even though the rāēpas, sajñās, etc., are not suffering in the same way as is disagreeable sensation. 
With regard to the proposed argument The agreeable is suffering because it is a cause of suffering: 
to be a cause of suffering is its aspect or origin ; to see things as a cause of suffering is not to see them as suffering; how could the Āryans born in Rūpadhātu and in Ārūpyadhātu have an idea of suffering? 
For the rkandhas of these spheres are not a cause of suffering; why would the Sūtra mention suffering through the fact of being conditioned? 
If Āryans see the agreeable as suffering because it is a cause of suffering, then suffering through the fact of being conditioned would be useless. But if Āryans see the agreeable as suffering because it is impermanent, then what is the difference between the aspects of suffering and of impermanence? 
One sees things as inpermanent because their nature is to arise and perish; one sees them as suffering because they are hateful. 
Certain masters deny any agreeable sensation, affirming that all is suffering. 
They prove this thesis by Scripture and by reasoning. 
The Blessed One said, Sufferiṅig is to be found in any and all sensation; Agteeable sensation should be regarded as suffering; and It is an error to regard what is suffering as agreeable., Reasoning: 
Because the causes of pleasure are not always the causes of pleasure. 
The things that one pretends to be causes of pleasure,food, drink, cold, warmth, etc.,when they are grasped or experienced to excess or out of season become causes of suffering. 
Now it is inadmissible that a cause of pleasure, because it has increased, or presents itself at a different moment,even if it remains completely the same,would produce suffering. 
Conse quently these pretended causes of pleasure are, from their origins, the causes of suffering and not the causes of pleasure: for later suffering will grow and become felt. 
Because the idea of pleasure has for its object, not a real pleasure, but sometime a remedy for suffering or a modification of suffering. 
As long as a person is not tormented by sufferings which are caused by hunger, thirst, cold, heat, fatigue, or desire, he will not have any sensation which he will feel to be agreeable. 
Consequently the ignorant have the idea of pleasure, not with regard to true pleasure, but with regard to the relief of suffering. 
Fools also have the idea of pleasure with regard to the modification of suffering: for example to pass a burden from one shoulder to another. Consequently agreeable things do not exist. 
They exist, say the Ābhidhārmikas; and we would say, this is well proved. 
We would ask him who denies the existence of pleasure, What is suffering? 
If he answers, Because it does evil, we would say that that which does good is agreeable. 
If he answers, Because it is not desired, we would say that that which is desired is agreeable. 
But, one would say, this same desire is no longer cherished by the Āryans when they obtain detachment. Thus the quality of desirable is not proved. 
This objection is useless, for if Āryans, once they become detached, no longer cherish it, it is then from another point of view that it is undesirable to them. 
The sensation which, in itself, is desirable, wili never become, in itself, undesirable. 
Consequently, it is not from the poiat of view of its intrinsic nature, but from another point of view that Āryans do not cherish agreeable sensation. 
it is the occasion for the loss of good dharmas, it is acquired only at great effort, it is directed toward suffering, and it is impermanent; If this sensation were undesirable in and of itself, who would ever be able to become attached to it? 
From the fact ṭhat, with a view to detaching themselves from it, Āryans consider it in its defects by placing themselves in a poiat of view distinct from that of its intrinsic nature, it then follows that agreeable sensation does exist in and of itself. 
The meaning of the declaration of the Blessed One, Suffering is to be found in any and all sensation has been fixed by ṭthe Blessed One himself: 
Oh Ānanda, it is with regard to impermanence, it is with regard to the transformation of the saskāras that I said that ŚSuffering is to be found in any and all sensation. 
Consequently it is proved that this declaration was ṉnot made with regard to the suffering which is suffering in and of itself. 
If all sensation were, by its nature, suffering, then the Ārya Ānanda would not have asked, The Blessed One taught that there are three types of sensation, agreeable, suffering, and neithersuf feringnoragreeable. The Blessed One taught that any and all sensation is suffering. 
With what intention, from what point of view did the Blessed One teach that any and all sensation is ṣuffering? 
Ānanda would have asked, From what point of view did the Blessed One teach that there are three types of sensation? 
And the Blessed Oṉe would have responded, It was intentional, with a defiaite motive, that I taught that there are three types of sensation. 
ṛTherefore if the Blessed One said, I have declared, with a definite motive, that any and all sensation is suffering, this is because, by its nature, sensation is of three types. 
As for the declaration Agreeable sensation should be regarded as suffering, agreeable sensation is, on the one hand, agreeable in and of itself, being pleasant; but on the other hand, it is in a certain sense suffering, since it changes and as such is impermanent. 
Persons not free from desire are bound to regasd it as agreeable, because they savor its taste; Āryans are free from regarding it as agreeable, because they are free from desire with regard to it. 
This is why the Buddha enjoined one to regard agreeable sensation in a manṉer which would lead one to obtain deliverance. 
How do we know that agreeable sensation is agreeable in and of itself? 
It is said, The perfect, omniscient Buddha, knowing the impermanence and the transformation of the sanskāras, declares that sensation is suffering.. 
The declaration It is an eṟror to regard what is suffering as agreeable is also made with a certain intention. 
The world attaches the idea of agreeable to agreeable sensation, to delectable objects, to existence. Now agreeable sensation is in a certain sense suffering: to consider it as absolutely agreeable is an error. 
Delectable objects contain much suffering, but little pleasure; to consider them as absolutely agreeable is an eṟror. The same with regard to existence. 
Consequently this text does not demonstrate the nonexistence of agreeable sensation. 
If all sensation is suffering in and of itself, how does one explain that the Buddha taught the existence of three types of sensation? 
Perhaps the Buddha, in this teaching, is conforming to the views of the world. 
The Buddha said, If I said that all sensation is suffering, then this is with a certain intention. 
The Buddha, on the subject of the three types of sensation , uses the expression, conforming to reality. 
In fact, after having said, The organ of pleasure and the organ of satisfaction are agreeable sensation, he then said He who, conforming to reality and through correct discernment sees the five organs , abandons the three bonds. 
Furthermore, how would the world arrive at the conclusion that sensation is of three types if it were exclusively suffering? 
Would you say that one has the idea or impression of agreeable sensation with regard to a weak sensation of suffering, the idea of neutral sensation with regard to a medium sensation of suffering, and the idea of a suffering sensation with regard to a strong sensation of suffering? 
But pleasure also presents three degrees, and it then follows that one would have the idea of great pleasure with regard to a weak sensation of suffering, the idea of medium pleasure with regard to a medium sensation of suffering, and the idea of little pleasure with regard to strong sensation of suffe ring. 
Furthermore, when one experiences pleasure arisen from some excellent smell, taste or tangible thing, what is then the weak suffering through a relationship to which the idea of pleasure is produced? 
then this weak sensation of suffering has not arisen or when it has disappeared, one will all the more have the idea of pleasure, suffering having completely disappeared. 
The same for smells, etc., and the same for the pleasure of desire. 
Furthermore, in your system, a weak sensation of suffering is transmitted by a clear and strong sensation ; a sensation of medium force is transmitted by an indistinct sensation : and this would appear to be inconsistent. 
So too the Sūtra teaches that the first three Dhyānas are accompanied by pleasure: there one will find, according to you, some weak suffering. 
there one will find, according to you, medium suffering. 
Consequently your theory that agreeable sensation, etc., correspond to weak suffering, etc., is not admissible. 
Finally, the Blessed One said, Oh Mahānāman, if physical matter were exclusively suffering, not agreeable nor accompanied by pleasure, there would be no reason why one would become attached to physical matter. 
We are thus assured that agreeable sensation exists at least a little. 
Consequently the alleged scriptural arguments do not hold. 
The first logical reason presented by our adversary, because the causes of pleasure are not always the causes of pleasure is worthless. Our adversary does not take into account what is the cause of pleasure. 
A given object is the cause of pleasure or suffering through the function of the state of the person who experiences it; it is not a cause of pleasure or suffering in an absolute manner. 
If a given object is a cause of pleasure when it is in a relationship with a body found in a certain state, then it will always be a cause of pleasure when it is again in a relationship with this body in the same state. 
A comparison: The same fire will give forth different results of cooking according to the state of the rice which one is cooking: the food will be edible or not. 
Buat when the rice is in a certain state, the fire will always produce the same result. 
Furthermore, how can one dispute that, in the Dhyānas, the causes of pleasure are always causes of pleasure? 
As for the argument that the idea of pleasure has for its object, not a real pleasure, but a remedy of suffering or a modification of suffering, we would say: 
When one experiences the pleasure of a smell, a taste, etc., what is the suffering whose remedy is the object of the idea of pleasure? 
Before this suffering has arisen or when it is destroyed, in the absence of any remedy, one will all the more experience pleasure. The pleasure of the Dhyānas certainly cannot consist of a remedy of suffering, since suffering does not exist in the Dhyānas. 
When one moves a burden to another shoulder, this is truly a pleasure that arises from a new bodily state and which continues to arise as long as this bodily state does not disappear. 
If it were otherwise, then the idea or impression of pleasure would become stronger. 
The same explanation holds for the impression of pleasure brought about by the changing of bodily position which has caused fatigue. 
You ask, If suffering does not begin from its beginning, how could there be, at its end, an impression of suffering? 
By reason of a certain transformation of the body ; so too, in the case of alcohol, etc., sweetness and tartness succeed one another. 
It is thus proved that there is agreeable sensation, and that all impure conditioned things are suffering from the fact of the three types of suffering. This thesis of the Abhidharma that the Truth of Suffering is the Truth of Origin, that is, that the wpādānaskandhas, which are suffering, are at the same time the origin of suffering , comes from the teaching of the Sūtra. 
For, according to the Sūtra, it is only thirst or desire which is the origin of suffering. 
The Sūtra says that desire is the origin by reason of the capital importance of desire. 
In fact, some other dharmas are named in other Sūtras. 
The Blessed One said, Action, desire and ignorance are the cause of future raskāras; he also said, Five types of seeds, that is, the vjñāna associated with wpādāna; the earth element, that is, the four vijñānasthitis. 
Thus the definition of the Sūtra, Desire is the origin of suffering, is conceived fromn a particular point of view , whereas the definition given ia the Abhidharma is in strict conformity to the characteristics of the thing defined. 
Furthermore, when the Buddha said, It is desire which is the origin, he intended to define the cause of reexistence. 
When, in the stanza, he enumerates action, desire, and ignorance, he defined the cause of different births which is action; the cause of reexistence, namely desire; and the cause of births and of reexistence, namely ignorance. 
In fact, the Sūtṛa says, Action is the cause of births, and desire is the cause of reexistence; and it teaches the successive order of causation: The eye has action for its object; action has desire for its cause; desire has ignorance for its cause; and ignorance has incorrect judgment for its cause. 
That consciousness and the other skandhas are the origin of suffering results again from the fact that the Sūtra declares that they are respectively seed and field. 
What is birth ? 
What is reexistence ? 
Upapatti signifies a birth or an existence characterized by a certain sphere , a certain realm of rebirth , a certain mode of birth , a certain gender, etc. 
dbhinirvrti signifies reexistence without qualification. 
The cause of birth is action, and the cause of reexistence is desire: so too a seed is the cause of a shoot characterized as a riceshoot, a wheatshoot, etc.; whereas water is the cause of the simple germination of all the different species of shoots. 
How does one prove that desire is the cause of reexistence? 
From the fact that a person free from desire is not reborn. 
When a person endowed with desire and a person free from desire die, we know that the first is reborn and that the second is not reborn. 
Therefore since there is no rebirth where there is no desire, we know that desire is the cause of reexistence. Again from the fact that the series is bent by desire. 
We state that the series of thoughts is unceasingly bent towards the object to which one has a desire. 
There is no defilement which adheres to the person as much as desire, the same way that lentil paste, once it is dried, adheres to a limb. 
There is no cause which binds one to rebirth as much as the attachment to a self does. This reasoṇing proves that desire is the cause of reexistence. 
kissḵ The Blessed One proclaimed the Four Noble Truths, but he also declared Two Truths, relative truth and absolute truth. 
What aṟe these Two Truths? 
The idea of a jug ends when the jug is broken; the idea of water ends wheṇ, in the mind, one analyzes the water. 
If the idea of a thing disappears when this thing is broken into pieces, then this thing has relative existence ; for example, a jug: 
the idea of a jug disappears when it is reduced to pieces. 
If the idea of a thing disappears when this thing is dissipated, or broken to pieces, by the mind, then this thing should be regarded as having relative existence; for example, water. If we grasp and remember the dharmas, such as color, etc., in the water, then the idea of water will disappear. 
These things,jug, clothes, etc., water, fire, etc.,aṟe giveṉ their different names from the relative point of view or conform ing to conventional usage. 
Thus if one says, from the relative point of view, There is a jug, there is water, one is speaking truly, and one is not speaking falsely. Consequently this is relatively true. 
Firm in his cultivation, endowed with teaching and reflection, he will be capable of giving himself up to meditation. 
Whoever desires to see the Truths should first of all keep the Precepts. 
Then he reads the teaching upon which his Seeing of the Truths depends, or he hears their meaning. 
Having heard, he correctly reflects. Having reflected, he gives himself up to the cultivation of meditation. With the wisdom arisen from the teaching for its support, there arises the wisdom arisen from reflection ; with this for its support, there arises the wisdom arisen from meditation. 
According to the Vaibhāṣikas, wisdom arisen from the teaching has name for its object; wisdom arisen from reflection has the name and the thing for its object: in fact, sometimes it grasps the thing by means of the name, and sometimes it grasps the name by means of the thing. 
Wisdom arisen from meditation has the thing for its objecr; it goes to the things as an abstraction made from its name. 
one who does not know how to swim does not abandon even for one moment his swimming apparatus; one who knows how to swim a little sometimes holds on to it and sometimes lets go of it; and one who knows how to swim crosses the river without any support whatsoever. 
But, we would say, in this inteṟpretation, wisdom arisen from reflection plays no role: 
in fact, when it has name for its object, it is wisdom arisen from the teaching, and when it has a thing for its object, it is the wisdom arisen from meditation. 
the wisdom arisen from the teaching is a certitude which arises from a means of correct knowledge termed the word of a qualified person ; the wisdom arisen from reflection is a certitude born of rational examination; and the wisdom arisen from meditation is a certitude arisen from absorption. In this way the specific characteristics of the three wisdoms are proved in an irreprochable manner. 
As one says, The vital breaths are created by food, cows are created from grass. 
How does one who thus applies himself to meditation succeed in it? 
When the ascetic is withdrawn with regard to his body and his mind by separating himself from promiscuity and bad thoughts, he succeeds. 
For whom are these two separations easy? 
For a contented person of few dsesires. Not for one discontented and with many desires. 
The Ābhidhārmikas say: To desire more of the fine things, clothes, etc., which one possess is discontent. To desire what one does not possess is many desires. But is not the desire to have more also produced with respect to what one does not possess? 
What then is the difference between the two? 
Many desires is the desire for goods, of excellent or in great quantity, that one does not possess. 
Their opposites are their oppositions. 
They belong to the Three Dhātus; they are also pure. But discontent and many desires only belong to Kāmadhātu. 
What is the nature of content and few desires? 
The four lineages of the Āryans, the āryavasas, are so called because the Āryans arise from them. 
The first threeto be content with clothing, to be content with food, to be content with bed and with seatare contentment by natuṟe. The fourth āryavasa is to take delight in Extinction and in the Path. It is not contentment. How is it nondesire? 
Because it turns its back on attachment to pleasure and attachment to existence. 
What did the Blessed One teach by the four āryavasas? 
The Blessed One, the Master of the Law , established a certain regimen and a certain activity for his disciples who, having renounced their old regimen and their old activities, are engaged in searching out deliverance. 
He established the regimen in the first three āryavasas; and he established activity in the fourth: 
If, with this regimen, you do these actions, before long you will obtain deliverance. 
Why did the Blessed One establish such a regimen and such an activity? 
In order to create an obstacle to the arising of desire. The Sūtra establishes that the arising of desire is fourfold: 
Oh monks, desire, arising, arises by reason of clothing, by reason of food, by reason of the bed and the seat; lasting, it lasts by reason. 
Oh monks, desire, arising, arises by reason of such existence or nonexistence. 
It is in order to create an obstacle to it that the four āryavasas are taught. 
In order to momentarily or definitively arrest the desire of the object of the idea of self and of things pertaining to self. 
The object of the idea of self is clothing. The object of the idea of self is the āmabhāva, the sensorial and mental complex. Desire is thirst. 
The first three āryavarsas destroy for a time the desire for the things that one regards as pertaining to self. The fourth āryavasa definitively arrests the twofoid desire. 
Being in this way a suitable receptacle, how would the ascetic enter into meditation? 
He enters therein, through visualization on the loathsome and through mindfuiness of breathing. 
Who enters through visualiza tion on the loathsome? 
Those in whom desire appears lively and appears on many occasions, enter through the loathsome. 
Those who are imaginative enter through mindfulness of breathing. 
Certain masters say: Mindfulness of breathing, having an unvaried object,it bears on wind in which there are no difference of color or shape,has for its reṣult the cutting off of the imaginative process; whereas the loathsome, having a variety of colors and shapes for its object, provokes imagination. 
Some other masters say: Mindfulness of breathing cuts off imagination because it is not turned towards externals, for it bears on breathing. The loathsome is turned outwatds, like visual consciousenss; it is not visual consciousness, but it is a contempla tion of an object of the visual consciousness. 
for its object is opposed to the first craving. 
The ioathsome visualization that has a cadaver wasted and torn to pieces for its object is opposed to the second craving. The loathsome visualization that has a cadaver eaten by worms and a skeleton held together by its tendons for its object is opposed to the third craving. And the loathsome visualization that has an immobile cadaver for its object is opposed to the fourth craving. 
The fourfold object of craving,color, shape, contact, and honors,is lacking in the chain of bones. 
The loathsome visualization does not have the abandoning of the defilements for its result, but only an arresting of the defilements, for it is an act of attention bearing not on reality but on a voḻuntary representation; and bearing not on the totality of things, but only on one part of the visible of Kāmadhātu. 
The ascetic who cultivates the loathsome visualiza tion is either a beginnet or a master or an absolute master of the act of attention. The beginner, by enlarging the visualization of the bones up to the sea, and by reducing it. The ascetic who desires to cultivate a visualization of the loathsome, first of all fixes his mind on a part of his body, either the toe, or the forehead, or on any other part of his choosing; then he purifies the bone, that is, he removes the flesh from it by supposing that the flesh rots and falls off; he then progressively enlarges his visualization and finally sees his entire body reduced to a skeleton. 
In this same way, in oṟder to increase his power of visualization , he creates the same idea of a second individual, of the individuals of the Vihāra, of the Ārāma, of the village, of the country, up to the earth surrounded by the ocean, as full of skeletons. 
Then he reduces his visualization, in order to strengthen his power of visualization, to the point where he only sees his own body as a skeleton. 
In order to strengthen this power of reduced visualization, the ascetic makes an abstraction of the bones of the foot, and considers the others; and so on, always reducing, to the point when, removing one half of the skull, he visualizes nothing more than its other half: 
He again makes an abstraction of the half of the skull and holds his thought between its two eyebrows. 
kkk What is the nature of the loathsome? 
To how many spheres does it beiong? 
What is its object? 
By whom is it produced? 
The loathsome is nondesire; it is in ten spheres; it has the visible of Kāmadhātu for its object; it is generated by humans. 
The ten spheres in which the ascetic can be found in order to produce them are the Four Dhyānas, the four sāmantakas , dhyānāntara and Kāmadhātu. 
Visible signifiescolor and shape. 
This rmeans that it has a thing and not a name for its object. 
Only humans generate it; not beings of the other realms of rebirth, nor much less beings of the higher spheres. 
As its name, the loathsome , indicates, it is a visualization of a repulsive or unclean thing: 
When it is not destined to arise, its object is tritemporal. 
Since it is an act of attention on an imaginary object, it is impure. 
Āccordingly as it has been, or not, cultivated in a previous existence, it is obtained through detachment or through cultivation. 
Such are the characteristics of the loathsome. 
kkc Mindfulness of breathing is prajñā, belonging to the five spheres, having wind for its object, and it is cultivated by beings in Kāmadhāṭu. 
Āna is inbreathing, the entry of wind; gpānṉa is outbreathing, the leaving of the wind. 
The mindfulness that bears on both of these is ānāpānasmṇrṟti. 
This prajñā is called mindfulness, s7ri, the same as the applications of mindfulness , because this knowledge of inbreathing and outbreathing, nāpānaprajñā, is provoked by the force of mindfulness, It can be cultivated in five spheres, namely the first three sāmantakas, hyānāntara, and Kāmadhātu, because it is associated with indifference. 
In fact, says the School, agreeable and painful sensations are favorable to imagining: thus mindfulness of breathing, which is the opposite of imagining, cannot be associated with happiness or with suffering. 
On the other hand, the two agreeable sensations form an obstacle to the application of the mind to any object, and mindfulness of breathing can only be realized by this application. 
But accoṟrding to the masters who believe that the fundamental Dhyānas include the sensation of indifference , mindfulness of breathing can exist in eight spheres, by adding the first three Dhyānas: 
The object of the mindfuiness of breathing is wind. 
It is attention bearing on a real thing. 
In fact, on the one hand, the teaching of mindfulness of breathing is absent among them; and on the other hand, they are incapable of discovering the subtle dharmas by themselves. 
Counting. One fixes the mind on inbreathing and outbrea thing, without effort or contention; one lets the body and mind be as they are; and one counts from oṉe to ten only in the mind. One does not count to less than ten, nor to more than ten, for fear of contention and of mental distraction. 
to omit counting, by taking two for one; b. 
If, in the course of this cultivation the mind becomes distracted, then one should count anew from the beginning until apsorption is attained. Following. 
does the air breathed in occupy all of the body or does it go into only one part of the body? 
The ascetic follows the air breathed in into the throat, the heart, the navel, the kidneys, the thigh, and so on to the two feet; the ascetic follows the air breathed out to a distance of a hand and a cubit. 
According to other masters, he follows the air breathed out to the tircle of air which holds up the universe and to the Vairambha Winds. 
This opinion is not admissible, for mindfulness of breathing is an attention to things as they really are. Fixing. 
Fix the attention on the tip of the nose, or between the eyebrows, or in another area all the way dowa to the toes; fix the mind; see the breath held in the body like the thread of a pearl necklace; state that it is cold or hot, unfavorable or favorable. 
Observe that These breaths are not only air, but the four primary elements, and again physical matter.derived from these four; and the mind with its mental dharmas rests on them: 
The ascetic modifies the mind that had the air as its object and now directs his mind to better and better dharmas up to and including the transworldly ḍharmas. 
Purifying. The ascetic enters the Path of Seeing and the Path of Meditation. 
According to some other masters , modification is progressive elevation from the foundations of mindfulness up to Vajropamasamādhi. Purifying is the Knowledge of Extinction , the Knowledge of NonArising and the Right Views of the Arhat. There is a summarizing stanza: One teaches that the mindfulness of breathing has six aspects: counting, following, fixing, observing, modifying, and purifying. 
Inbreathing and outbreathing are like the body. The two breaths, being part of the body, belong to the same sphere as does the body. 
their existence therefore presupposes a body , a certain body , a mind , and a certain type of mind. 
When the body has cavities in it, and when the mind belongs to a sphere in which there is breathing, then there is inbreathing and outbreathing. 
There is inbreathing at birth and at the moment when one leaves the Fourth Dhyāna. 
Having attained absorption by these two portals, now, with a view to realizing insight , Having realized stilling, he will cultivate the foundations of mindfulness. 
By considering the twofold characteristics of the body, sensation, the mind, and the dharmeas. 
By considering the unique characteristics and the general characteristics of the body, sensation, the mind, and the dharmas. The unique characteristics peans its self nature. 
The general characteristics signifies the fact that All conditioned things are impermanent; all impure dharmas are suffering; and that all the dharmas are empty and notself. 
What is the unique nature of the body? 
Dharmas means the dharmas which are neither the body, nor sensation, nor the mind. 
According to the School, foundation of mindfulness of the body is realized when, being absorbed , one sees the atoms and the succesive moments of the body. 
kkḵk What is the nature of the foundations of mindfulness? 
Foundation of mindfulness is threefold: foundation of mind fulness in and of itself , foundation of mindfulness through connection, and foundation of mindfulness in the quality of being an object. Foundation of mindfulness in and of itself is Prajñā. What is prajñā? Proceeding from hearing, etc. Prajñā proceeds from hearing, from reflection, and from meditation. The foundations of mindfulness are likewise threefold, proceeding from hearing, reflection, and meditation. 
The others, through connection and as object. 
The other dharmas which are not prajñā, are, when they are dharmas coexistent with prajñā, foundations of mindfulness through connection; when they are the object of prajñā and of the dḍharmas coexistent with prarñā , they are a foundation of mindfulness as object. 
kṣkkṭ How do we know that the foundation of mindfulness in and of itself is prajñā? 
Therefore the Sūtra further says, He dwells in attention to the body, the internal body. 
one who possesses anupaśya or darśana is called an anupaśyin; and one who is an anupaśyin with respect to the body is called a kāyānupaśyin. 
sṭtkk What is prajñā? 
The Vaibhāṣikas say: 
By reason of the preponderant role of attention, ; as a wedge contributes to the splitting of wood; it is due to the force of mindfulness that prajñā is active with respect to the object. But the best explanation is the following: 
Mindfulness is applied by it, thus the prujñā is a foundation of mindfulness ; in fact, as the object is seen by the prujñā, so too it is expressed, that is to say, grasped by the attention. 
his attention is set and fixed having the body for its object. And the Blessed One said, He dwells with his attention fixed having his body for its object; his attention is applied, unexhausted. 
Nevertheless the Sūtṛa says, Oh monks, how is the origin, how is the disappearance of the foundations of mindful ness? 
Through the origin of food, there is the origin of the body; through the disappearance of food, there is the disappearance of the body; through the origin of contact, there is the origin of sensation. 
In this Sūtra we are not dealing with a foundation of mindfulness in and of itself, but a foundation of mindfulness in the quality of being an object: 
the attention is applied to it, and therefore it is a foundation of mindfulness. The name differs according to the object. 
kk Each foundation of mindfulness is threefold accordingly as it is considered as oneself, as another, or as oneself and another. The order is that of their production. 
Why are they produced in this order? 
the body is the support of sensual attachment which has its origin in the desire for senṣation ; this desire takes place because the mind is not calmed; and the mind is not calmed because the defilements are not abandoned. 
The foundations of mindfulness are taught in this order as oppositions to the four errors, belief in purity, happiness, permanence, and self. They are therefore four, no more and no less. 
Of the four foundations of mindfulness, three have an unmixed object; the fourth is of two types: 
when it bears only on the dḍharmas, its object is not mixed; when it bears on two, or three, or four things at one and the same time, its object is mixed. 
kkk Having thus cuitivated the foundations of mindfulness having the body, etc., for their objects 16. 
Placed in the foundation of mindfulness having the dharmas as its universal object, he sees that the dharras are impermaṇnent, suffering, empty, and notself. 
Placed in the foundation of mindfulness having the dharmas as its mixed object, placing together the body, sensation, etc., he sees them under the fourfold aspect of inpermanence, suffering, empty, and notself. 
From this there arises the Heat.1 From this cultivation of the foundation of mindfulness having the dharmas as its object, there finally aṟises a root of good called Uṣmagata , because it is similar to heat , being the first indication or the anticipation of the Noble Path, a fire which burns the fuel which are the defilements. 
Since it is prolonged for a certain period of time, Ugmagata, the Heat, has the Four Truths for its object. Which has sixteen aspects. 
The Heat develops, weak, medium, and strong; there finally arises the Summits. 
Like Heat, the Summits have the Four Truths for their object and include the sixteen aspects: they receive another name by reason of their excellence. 
It is through the foundation of mindfulness that has the dharmas for its object that Heat and the Summits imprint. 
What does imprint mean? 
This refers to the first application of the different aspects of the Truths.. They grow through the others also. Heat and the Summits grow by means of the four foundations of mindfulness together. 
The progressing ascetic does not manifest the previously acquired roots of good, because he does not esteem them very much. 
Patience is socalled because in this stage, the Truths please extremely much. 
Weak and medium Patience are like the Heads, in that they impriat first, like the Heads, by the foundation of mindfulness having the dharmas as its object. But they differ from the Heads in respect to their increase. 
Strong Patience, contiguous with the highest dbarmuas, has only the suffering of Kāmadhātu for its object. 
A similar restriction is not formulated concerning the preceding stages; thus they have the suffering, arising, etc., of the three spheres for their objects. 
Strong Patience exists when the ascetic considers, in a single thought, only one aspect applied to the sufferings of Kāmadhātu. 
It is of a moment. It is momentary; it does not form a series. So too, the Supreme Dharmas. These, exactly like strong Patience, bear on the suffering of Kāmadhātu and are mornentary. They are termed Supreme Worldly Dharmas : because they are worldly, being impure; because they are supreme dharmas; and because they are supreme among the worldly harmas. 
They are Supreme Worldly Dharmas because, in the absence of any similar cause , by their own power, they manifest the Path of Seeing the Truths. 
kitsk The four roots of good, Heat, etc., are by their nature foundations of mindfulness; they are thus prajñā. However All include the five sandhas. Considering the root of good, Heat, etc., with their attendants, they include the five sandhas. With the exclusion of the possessioṅs. 
The possessions ,that is to say, the prāptis of Heat, etc.,aṟe not included within Heat, etc., for it is inadmissible for Aryans to manifest Heat, etc., anew, which would be the case if they were to manifest its prāptis. 
When the Heat begins and when it has three Truths for its object, a foundation of mindfulness that has the dharmas for its object is present; the four foundations of mindfulness of the future, aṟe possessed. 
When it has the Truth of Extinction for its object, the same foundation of mindfulness which has the Zharma for its object which is present is also the only one which is possessed in the future. 
The aspects, in all cases, are those of the Truth presently considered. 
In the period of increase, when the Heat has the three Truths for its object, any of the foundations of mindfulness may be present; the four of the future are possessed. 
When it has the Truth of Extinction for its object, the fourth foundation of mindfulness is present; four of the future are possessed. 
In the Surnmits, having for their object the Four Truths at their beginning, and having for their object extinction in the period of growth, the last foundation of mindfulness is present; four of the future are possessed; all the aspects of the future are possessed. 
Having for its object the three other Truths in the period of increase, any of the foundations of mindfulness are present; four of the future are possessed; and so too all of the aspects. 
In Patience, in the beginning and in the period of increase whichever of the Truths is considered, the last foundation of mindfulness is present; four of the future are possessed; and so too all of the aspects. 
In the Supreme Worldly Dharmas, the last foundation of mindfulness is present; four of the future are possessedthose which are not destined to arise; four aspects only, those of the Truth of Sufferingfor the aspects of the other Truths do not belong to the Supreme Worldly Dharmas; for the Supreme Worldly Dharmas are similar to the Path of Seeing, in which one acquires only in the future the four aspects of the Truth that one considers under one aspect. This is the fourfold nirvedhabhāgīya. 124 These fourHeat, Summits, Patience, and the Supreme Worldly Dharmasare the roots of good called nirvedhabhāgīyas. The first two, being nonfixed since one can fall away from them, are weak nirvedhabhāgīyas; the Patiences are medium nirvedhabhāgīyas; and the Supreme Worldly Dharmas are strong nirvedhabhāgīyas. What does nirvedhabhāgīya mean? Nśrvedha signifies ṇiścita vedha , the Noble Path. Through it doubt is abandoned: it is thus ṉścña , and the Truths are distinguished : This is suffering..., this is the Path; 2. 
The dharmas useful to one part of the Path are nirvedhabhāg īṝya because they lead to it. 
The Prthagjana loses the first two through death and through falling away. The Āryan does not fall from out of the first two, and the Prṛthagjana does not fall from out of the last two. 
What do they consist of? 
teesk Even though he may lose it through falling, whoever obtains Heat is destined to attain Nirvāṇa. 
Whoever plants a root of good which should end in Nirvāṇa will obtain Nirvāṇa. 
If there is no obstacle, Heat is quite close to the Seeing of the Truths. 
He who has attained the Summits does not cut off the roots. 
Even though he may lose them by falling, he who has obtained the Summits does not cut off the roots of good ; but he cāanṉ go to the painful realms of rebirth and commit mortal transgres sions. 
He who obtains the Patience does not go to the painful realms of rebirth. 
He who loses the Patience through simple loss, vhāni, does not go to the painful realms of rebirth, because he is removed from the actions and the defilements which lead to them. 
When one obtains Patience, and enters into the conditions not to be produced, there are certain realms of rebirth, wommbs, rebirths, bodily forms, existences and defilements that no longer arise for him: 
the painful realms of rebirth, the womb of an egg, or moisture; rebirth among the Asajñisattvas, the Uttarakurus, or the Mahābrahmas: 
bodies of the two types of eunuchs, and androgynous bodies; the eighth, ninth rebirth, etc.; and those defilements which are abandoned by the Seeing of the Truths. 
through weak Patience, the painful realms of rebirth enter into the condition of not erising;. through strong Patience, all of the bad dharmas mentioned above. 
kkk The nirvedhabhāgīyas are of three types by reason of the distinction of the three goeras or families. 
Oṉe can attain two nrvedhabhāgīyas of the Śrāvaka family, and become a Buddha. 
It is possible for a person who belongs to the Śrāvaka family to attain in this family the Heat and the Summits, and to become a Buddha. But once Patience is acquired, this is no longer possible , because the future painful rebirths are destroyed by the possession of the Patience. 
Now the Bodhisattvas, with the intention of being useful to their fellow creatures, go to the painful realms of rebirth. Such is the explanation of the Vaibhāṣikas. We say however that a person of the Śrāvaka family, once he acquires Patience, cannot become a Buddha, because the Śrāvaka family, once penetrated and confirmed by the Patience, can no longer be modified. 
A person of the Śrāvaka family can attain for a second time from this family the first three nirvedhabhāgīyas and become a Pratyekabuddha. The nirvadhabhāgīyas of the Buddha family and of the Pratyekabuddha family are not susceptible of being attained a second time. 
The Rhinoceros is one who resembles a rhinoceros, that is, the Pratyekabuddha. 
Both abide in the Fourth Dhyāṇna because this Dhyāna is an absorption free from all agitation and sharpness. In one sitting, without rising from it, they go from the nrvedhabhāgīyas to the arising of Bodhi. 
We shall see later that Bodhi is the knowledge of extinction and the knowledge of nonarising. 
According to others , the sitting begins with the visualization of loathsome things. 
For the Ābhidhārmikas who admit the existence of Pratyekabuddhas different from those likened to a rhinoceros, nothing prevents these other Pratyekabuddhas from changing their family. 
kksk Does the preparation for the nirvedhabhāgīyas and the production of the irvedhabhāgāyas take place in the same existence? 
This is not possible. 
Of necessity, one must produce First, the mokṣabhāgīyas. 
Of them all The most rapid obtains deliverance in three existen ces.. The planting of the seed, the growth of the plant, and the production of the fruit: three different stages. In this same way, in Religion, the series gradually enters, matures, and is delivered: 
Froṃ out of the Supreme Worldly Dharmas there proceeds one Patienṇce, a Patience having the dharmas for its object, which is pure. Exactly one Patience having Dharma Knowledge for its aspect immediately follows the Supreme Worldly Dharmas. What is its object? Bearing on the suffering of Kāmadhātu. Its object is the suffering of Kāmadhātu. Therefore it is called Duḥkhe Dharmajñānakṣānti, the Patience that has the Dharma Knowledge of Suffering for its object. In order to indicate that it is pure, it is qualified by its outflowing result which is a Dharma Knowl edge. 
The expression dharmajñānaksāṇti therefore signifies: a ksāṇ or Patience which produces a dharmajñāna , which has for its intention and result a Dharma Knowledge. In the same way that a tree which bears flowers or fruit is called a purpavṛkṣa or a phalavṛkṣa. 
This Patience is the entry into ṉiyāma, for it is the entry into the certitude of the acquisition of absolute good or samyaktva. 
The Sūtra says that it is Niṛvā ṇa. 
Nyama or absolute determination with regard to the samyaktva is called niyāma, and also niyama. 
Entering into this absolute determination of the acquisition of samyaktva is the arriving, the taking possession of. 
Once this possession arises, the ascetic is an Āryan. 
It is in a future state, that is, in its arising state, that this Patience brings about the cessation of the quality of Pṛthagjana; for it is admitted that in a future state it possesses this efficacy, which does not belong to any other dharma; in the same way that a future lamp destroys darkness, and in the same way that a future arising akṣaṇa causes arising. 
According to other masters, the Supreme Worldily Dharmas bring about the cessation of the quality of Pṛthagjana. 
this is as if someone climbed onto the shoulders of his enemy and killed him. 
According to others, the quality of Pṛthagjna ceases both by the Supreme Worldly Dharmas, which take the place of the Irresistible Path , and by the Patience which takes the place of the Path of Deliverance. 
From this, a Dharma Knowledge having the same object. Immediately after the Patience that has the Dharma Knowl edge of Suffering for its object there arises a Dharma Knowledge having for its object the suffering of Kāmadhātu. It is called the Dharma Knowledge of Suffering. The qualification of pure applied to the first Patience holds for all of the following Patiences. 
The knowledge in question is therefore pure. 
kik In this same way there arises one Patience that has the Dharma Knowledge for its object and a Dharma Knowledge relating to the suffering of Kāmadhātu. In the same way, relating to the rest of suffering, one consecutive Patience and a Knowledge. 
Immediately following the Dharma Knowledge of Suffering, there arises one Patience of Consecutive Knowledge, having a composite object, bearing on the Śuffering of Rūpadhātu and Ārūpyadhātu. 
It is called duhkhenvayajñānakṣānti. From this Patience there arises a consecutive Knowledge which receives the name of Consecutive Knowledge of Suffering. 
Dharma Knowledge, or Knowledge of the Dharmas is socalled because it is the first knowledge which the ascetic obtains, since the origin of time, on the nature of the dharmnas, suffering, etc. 
Consecutive Knowledge is socalled because it has the Dharma Knowledge for its cause , and because it knows the Truth in question as does Dharma Knowledge. 
ikk In the same way that, relating to the Truth of Suffering, four āharmas have arisen, two Patiences and two Knowledges, In that same way, relating to the three other Truths. 
When, immediately after the Consecutive Knowledge of Suffering, there has arise a Patience of Dharma Knowledge bearing on origin in Kāmadhātu, from this Patience there arises a Dharma Knowledge of Origin; in the same way, by the immediate succession of arising, there arises a Patience of Consecutive Knowledge, bearing on the rest of origin, and a Consecutive Knowledge of Origin. 
There arises one Patience of Dharma Knowledge, bearing on the extinction of suffering in Kāmadhātu, and the Dharma Knowledge of Extinction. 
There then arises one Patience of Consecutive Knowledge, bearing on the rest of extinction, and the Consecutive Knowledge of Extinction. 
There then arises one Patience of Dharma Knowledge bearing on the path which is opposed to the suffering of Kāmadhātu, and the Dharma Knowledge of the Path. 
There then arises one Patience of Consecutive Knowledge bearing on the rest of the Path, and the Consecutive Knowledge of the Path. 
Insight comprehension is the comprehen sion of the Truths by one pure prajñā. 
Application comprehension is the comprehension of the Truths by this prajñā and also by the dharmas associated with this prajñā. 
Resultant comprehension is the comprehen sion of the Truths by this prajñā, by the dharmas which are associated with it, and also by the dharmas not associated with it but which accompany it, for example, morality, the arising lakṣaṇa , etc. 
It is with reference to insight comprehension that the Sūtra teaches the gradual comprehension of the Truths, Oh householder, compre hension is not unique, but gradual . 
kktk We have seen that comprehension consists of sixteen mental states. 
It is of the same sphere as the Supreme Worldly Dharmas. 
These sixteen mental states are of the same sphere as the Supreme Worldly Dharmas. 
We have seen that these can be of six spheres. 
kkṣk Why are there necessarily Patiences and Knowledges? 
The Patiences and Knowledges are, in this oṛder, the Irresistible Path and the Path of Deliverance. 
The Patiences cannot be hindered in their cutting off of the possession of the defilements; they are therefore, according to Pāṇni, iii.3.1712, the Iṟresistible Path. 
The Knowledges arise among the persons who are thus delivered from the possession of the defilements, at the same time as does possession of disconnection from the defilements : they are therefore the Path of Deliver ance. 
As a consequence there is Patience and Knowledge, in the same way that there are two actions: expelling the thief, and closing the doorṟ. 
If the possession of disconnection takes place only with the second Patience or second Irresistible Path , then the Knowledge,which is free from doubt will not arise having the same object of the first Irresistible Path, namely the suffering of Kāmadhātu. 
But if the defilements are abandoned by means of the Patiences , is there not a contradiction with the text of the Śāstra, There are nine categories of bonds? 
No, for the Patiences are the attendants of the Knowledges; the Śāstra attributes the very same work of the Patiences to the Knowledges, in the way that one says that the king does that which is done by his men. 
From the fact that they all see the Truths, does it follow that the sixteen mental states of comprehension are the Path of Seeing? 
Because they are produced within anyone who sees that which has not been seen, fifteen moments are the Path of Seeing. 
Fifteen moments, from the Patience that has the Dharma Knowledge of Suffering for its object to the Patience of Consecu tive Knowledge that has the Path for its object, constitute the Path of Seeing. 
Because the seeing of what has not been seen continues. In the sixteenth moment there is nothing more to see which has not been seen. This moment meditates on the Truth as it has been seen, and so forms part of the Path of Meditation. But, one would say, the sixteenth moment sees the fifteenth moment, the Patience that has the Consecutive Knowledge of the Path as its object, which has not been seen previously. 
Without doubt; but that to which it refers is the knowledge as to whether the Truth has been seen or not, not whether a moment has been seen or not. 
The fact that a moment has not been seen does not create the fact that the Truth has not been seen, in the same way that a field is not unharvested because one stalk remaias to be cut. 
Furthermore, the sixteenth moment, the Consecutive Knowl edge of the Path forms part of the Path of Meditatioṇ: because it constitutes a result, a rāmaṇyaphala ; b. because it embraces meditation, the possession or acquisition of the eight Knowledges and the sixteen aspects, ; c. because it embraces the abandoning of a Path, the path of a follower; and d. because it belongs to a series.. Objection: The sixteenth moment should be considered as forming part of the Path of Seeing, because it is certainly free from falling away. 
And its nonfalling away results from the fact that it supports or confirms the abandoning of the defilements aban doned through the Path of Seeing. 
How is it that the first seven Knowledges are of the Path of Seeing and not the eighth? In fact, all eight see what has been seen through the Patience which precedes. 
being finished, they are produced in the interval, that is, either in the course of the Path of Seeing, or between two Patiences. 
tkḥ We have explained how the Path of Seeing and the Path of Meditation arise. 
śrad dhayā anusāraḥ śraddhānusāraḥ, pursuit by reason of faith; one in whom there is this pursuit, or in whom the habit is to pursue by reason of faith, is called a Śraddhānusārin, because, first, he has pursued the Truth under the impulse of another, through confidence in another. 
Dharmānusārin is explained in the same way: dharmair anusāraḥ dharmānusāraḥ, puṟsuit by means of the dharmas. It is by himself, by means of the dharmas, that is, by means of the twelvefold Scripture, Sūtra, etc. , that this ascetic has first pursued the Truth. 
The first result, that is, the first of the results, the state of Srotaāpanṇa which is in fact the first resultant state in the order of acquisition. 
But if they have previously abandoned the sixth, seventh, or eighth category, they are candidates for the second state, that is, for the state of Sakrdagamin. 
Candidates for the third, through detachment either with respect to Kāmadhātu, or with respect to higher spheres. 
In the case where they are detached from Kāmadhātu through the abandoning of the ninth category of defilements of Kāmadhātu to be abandoned through Meditation, or they are detached with respect to the higher spheres up to and including Ākiñcaṇyāyatana, they are candidates for the third state, that is, for the state of Anāgāmin. 
In the sixteenth moment, these two ascetics no longer bear the name of Śraddhāṇusārin or Dharmānusārin; they no longer bear the name of candidates. 
The quality of Arhat cannot be acquired directly, that is to say without the state of Anāgāmin first being acquired,for, on the oṉe hand, the defilements abandoned through meditation cannot be abandoned through the Path of Seeing and, on the other hand, there cannot have been detach ment by a worldly path previous to Naivasarjfīānāsajñāyatana. 
At this moment, the ascetics with weak and sharp faculties become respectively Śraddhādhimukta or Drṣṭi prāpta. 
The ascetic with weak faculties, who was a Śraddhānusārin, now takes the name of Śraddhādhimukta. The ascetic with sharp faculties, who was a Dharmānusārin, now takes the name of Drṣṭiprāpta. When faith predominates , the ascetic is informed by his aspiration : he is therefore called a Śraddhāadhi mukta. When prajñā predominates the ascetic is informed by speculative views : he is therefore called a Drṛṣṭipṛāpta. 
By what reason does the ascetic who has abandoned the first categories of the defilements of Kāmadhātu abandoned through meditation, become, in the sixteenth moment, a SŚrotaāpanna and not a candidate for the state of Sakṛdāgāmin? 
At the moment of the acquisition of a reṣult, the ascetic does not acquire the path of a higher result; consequently the abider in a result does not exert himself with a view to a higher progress, and he is not a candidate for a result. 
Upon the acquisiton of a result, one does not acquire a path higher than this state , for example, upon the acquisition of Srotaāpanna, one does not obtain the path of Sakrdāgāmin: 
As a consequence, the abider in a result, as long as he does not exert himself with a view to a higher progress for the acquisition of a new state, that is, as long as he does not cultivate the preparatory exercises which have for their result the abandon ing of the defilements not yet abandoned and which is the cause of the acquisition of a new state, this resident is not a candidate for this new state. 
Nevertheless, the ascetic who, detached from the Third Dhyāṇna , enters into niyāmma or the Path of Seeing in a sphere lower than this Dhyāna , certainly realizes a path higher than the result. 
If it were otherwise, then if he were reborn in a higher sphere , he would not be in possession of the faculty of happiness.. 
ṭkk We have defined the persons who enter into ṉyāma, either by their being bhūyovītarāga, that is, detached from the sixth, seventh, and eighth categories of defilements of Kāmadhātu, or by their being kāmavītarāga, that is, completely detached from Kāmadhātu. 
ksksk As the defilements of Kāmadhātu are divided into nine categories, Each sphere has nine categories of vices. 
Each sphere, up to and including Naivasajñānāsarṅjfīāyatana. 
As each sphere has nine categories of vices, So too there are nine categories of qualities. Each sphere has nine categories of qualities which are as many as the paths, the Irṟesistible Paths and the Paths of Deliverance, opposed to these said vices. How is this? By distinguishing weak, etc., in the categories of weak, medium, and strong. 
Each one of these is divided into weak, medium, and strong; this gives us nine categories: 
weakweak, weakmedium, weakstrong, mediumweak, mediummedium, mediumstrong, strongweak, sttrongmedium, and strongstrong. 
The weakweak path has the power to bring about the abandoning of the strongstrong defilement; and so on to: the strongstrong path has the power to bring about the abandoning of the weakweak defilement. 
For it is impossible for the strong strong path to be produced from the very beginning; and it is impossible that there would be a strongstrong defilement when there is a strongstroṅṇg path. 
In the same way, when one washes a piece of cloth, the greater stains are washed out first and only lastly the subtle stains; so too a great darkneṣs is vanquished by a small light, whereas a great light is required to get rid of a small amount of darkness. 
Such are the types of examples that one can supply. 
An Āryan path, although momentary and weak, is capable of uprooting the defilements which have accrued through a succes sion of their causes in eternal transmigration his path cuts off the possessions of the defilements which are similar to rootsfor the white ḍharmas are powerful, whereas the black dharmas are weak. 
In this same way, the vices of wind, the bile, etc., accumulated over a long period of time, are gotten rid of by one grain of powder of the :rvṛt root ; so too a great darkness is broken up by a small, momentary light. 
ek:x There are therefore nine categories of defilements abandoned through meditation. 
The abider in a result who has not destroyed that which one should abandon through meditation is a Sap takrtṭparamaḥ. 
The abider in a result who has not even abandoned one category of the defilements abandoned through meditation is a Srotaāpanṇa; as he can be reborn seven times but no more, he is an at the most seven times. 
As it is not an absolute rule that he will be reborn seven times, one says, at the most. The expression of the Sūtra, saptakrtvaḥ paramaḥ, signifies there is rebirth for him seven times at the most. The word paramab is understood as prakarṣeṇa. Srotaāpanna: 
Independently of the present existence, the Srotaāpanna again takes up birth among humans, seven existences properly socalled, and seven intermediate existences ; and in this same way, he again takes up biṟth among the gods. 
Or, if one wants to hold to the letter of the Sūtra: 
There is a stanza, The ignorant, if they have committed only a small transgression, go below; the wise, if they have committed a great transgression, avoid painful rebirth. 
What does the end of suffering mean? 
Suffering beyond which there is no more suffering. This means that the saint causes suffering to no more arise. 
Or rather the end of suffering is Nirvāṇa. How can one make Nirvāṇa? By clearing away the obstacles to Nirvāṇa;. 
In the same way that one says, Make some space! Make the house fall down!. 
There are persons other than the Srotaāpaṇṇa who will be reborn seven times at the most: the Prthagjana whose mind is matured. But there is no fixed principle here: 
kk The abider in a state within whom no category of the defilements abandoned through meditation is destroyed is, as we have seen, a Saptakrtvaḥparama. 
Delivered from three or four categories, destined for two or three rebirths, he is a Kulakula.2 The Srotaāpanna becomes a Kularhkula, one who goes from family to family, from the point of view of the abandoning of the defilements, through the abandoning of three or four categories of defilements of Kāmadhātu; from the point of view of the ṉdriyas or moral faculties, through the acquisition of pure faculties opposed to these defilements; or from the point of view of existences, because there remain only two or three more rebirths for him. 
In the Kārikā only two of these causes are mentioned. 
For, from the fact that the Srotaāpanna abandons the defilements after the acquisition of his state, one concludes, without one having to say so, that he acquires the pure faculties opposed to these defilements. 
in fact, after having acquired the state of Srotaāpanna, the saint is capable of obtaining the quality of Sakrdāgāmin, Anāgāmiṉ, or Arhat, and the number of his rebirths will be found, from this fact, to be either more or less. 
Why does the Srotaāpaṇṇa who abandons the fifth category not become a Kulakula? 
Because, when the fifth category is abandoned, the sixth is also certainly abandoned, and the saint therefore becomes a Sakṛdā gāmiṉn. In fact here one category of defilement is not capable of creating an obstacle to the acquisition of a state, as in the case of one who is separated by only one more rebirth from Nirvāa : the reason is that here the saint, by acquiring a new state, does not pass into another sphere of existence or Dhātṭu. 
kk This abider in the state of Sakrdāgāmin, Having destroyed seven or eight categories, and destined for one rebirth, is an Ekavīcika; he is also a candidate for the third state. 
This Sakrdāgāmin becomes an Ekavicika for three reasons, because he abandons seven or eight categories of defilements; because he acquires the faculties opposed to these defilements; and because he has to be reborn only one more time. 
Why does the only category that remains to him, the ninth, create an obstacle to the acquisition of later states? 
Because the acquisition of this state involves passage to another sphere. 
Now this holds here for the defilements as for actions, for they refer to going beyond the sphere where they should be manifested as the results of retributionwith respect to actionsand of outflowingwith respect to the defilements. 
Vici signifies interval, separation. 
he is therefore termed an Ekavīcika. Having abandoned seven or eight categories of defilements, he is a candidate for the third state. 
He whopreviously freed, through the worldly path, from three or four categories of defilements, or from seven or eight categories of defilements , obtains a result , is not a Kulakula and is not an Ekavīcika as long as he does not realize a path superior to the state acquired: 
n c One who obtains Nirvāṇa in the interval signifies one who attains Nirvāṇa in the intermediate existence. 
The other terms are explained in the same way: one who attains Nirvāṇa by being born , and one , and one who does not make any effort. 
The first one, who obtains Nirvāṇa in the intermediate existence, is one who obtains Nirvāṇa in an intermediate existence, by attaining it in Rūpadhātu. 
The second one obtains Nirvāṇa as soon as he is reborn, soon, through sopadhiśeṣa Nirvāṇa, Nirvāṇa with remnant; and because he is energetic and because the path is spontaneous, he realizes it by himself. 
According to other masters, he obtains nrṇpadhiśeṣa Nirvāṇa, Nirvāṇa without remnant, exactly like the first Anāgāmiṇ, that is, having obtained the quality of Arhat, he obtains Nirvāṇa without achieving his portion of life. 
This opinion is false, for this second Anāgāmin does not possess mastery relative to the abandoning of life, and this because this mastery does not belong to one who possesses prāntakoṭica turthadhyāna ; this type of Dhyāna exists only among humans of the three Dvīpas; and this Anāgāmin is born in Rūpadhātu. 
The third one, the Anāgāmin who obtains Nirvāṇa with effort, obtains Nirvāṇa after having been born, without relaxing his exercises, for he is energetic; with effort, for the Path is not spontaneous. 
The fourth one, who obtains Nirvāṇa without effort, obtains Nirvāṇa without effort, for he is not energetic, and the Path is not spontaneous. 
According to another opinion, the difference between the third and the fourth is that the former obtains Nirvāṇa by a path having for its object conditioned things, namely suffering, its origin, and the Path; and the latter, by a path having for its object unconditi oned things, namely Extinction or the Third Noble Truth. 
This opinion is not justified by reason of the consequences that it implies: 
In the Sūtra , the Anāgāmiṉ who obtains Nirvāṇa without effort is listed before the Anāgāmin who obtains it with effort. This order is justified. In fact, for the first, the path is realized without abhisaskāra, being obtained without efforṟt; it is thusspontaneous. But, for the second, the path is realized by gbhisaṅskara, being obtained with effort; therefore it is uṇṅspontaūeous. 
For the Anāgāmin who obtains Nirvāṇa through birth, the path is even more spontaneous, even stronger, and the latent defilements are even weaker. 
Srotas and gati have the same meaning. 
He does not obtain Nirvāṇa where he is reborn upon leaving Kāmadhātu, but he goes higher. 
either he combines his Dhyāna and, as a consequence, he rises up to Akaniṣṭha Heaven and obtains Nirvāṇa there; or he does not combine his Dhyāṇna and, as a consequence, rises up to Naivasajñānāsajñāyatana, Bhavāgra.,The Akaniṣṭhaga is either a Jumper, a HalfJumper, ot One who Dies Everywhere. 
A Jumper is one who has, down here, combined his Dhyāṇas; he has tasted the First Dhyāna and, as a consequence, having fallen from the three higher Dhyānas, is rebotn among the Brahmakāyikas. 
There, by the force of his previous enthusiasm, he combines the Fourth Dhyāna: 
A HalfJumper is the saint who, passing beyond any one place, enters the Akaniṣṭhas after having been reborn among the Śuddhāvāsas. 
one considers Mahābrahmā as the creator there; and because only one leader can be found there: an Āryan would be superior to Mahābrahmā there. 
One who Dies Everywhere transmigrates through all of the other heavens, with the exception of the Mahābrahmas, before he enters into Akaniṣṭha. 
An Anāgāmin never takes up two existences in the same place of rebirth, because he goes in successive order. 
Therefore his quality of Anāgāmin, a nonreturner, is perfect: 
he is never reborn, either in a place lower than where he was once born, or in this same place. 
Tasting the other concentrations , he is reboṟrn in all other places, but he does not enter the Śuddhāvāsas; traversing the Ārūpyas he arrives at Bhavāgra and there he obtains Nirvāṇa. 
We thinkeven though the authors of the Śāstras have not decided this pointthat the two types of Ūṛdhvasrotas can obtain Nirvāṇa in the course of the way, before arriving at Akaniṣṭha or Bhavāgra. 
The quality of Akaniṣṭhaparama and Bhavāgraparama only imply the nonproduction of a new existence after the saint has obtained Akaniṣṭha Heaven or Bhavāgra, not a birth in these same heavens; the same way that the Srotaāpanna, destined to be reborn at the most seven times , can be reborn less than seven times. 
There are five types of Anāgāmins who go to Rūpadhātu and attain Nirvāṇa there: 
Another, who goes to Ārūpyadhātu, is of four types. There is another Anāgāmin, the Ārūpyopaga, one who goes to Ārūpyadhātu and who attains Nirvāṇa there. Being detached from Rūpadhātu, and dying here, he is reborn among beings in Ārūpyadhātu. 
This Anāgāmin is only of four types, Upapadyapari nirvāyin, etc., for the intermediate state does not exist in the births of Ārāpyadhātu. 
Another obtains Nirvāṇa right here, the saint who obtains Nirvāṇa in this existence. This is the seventh Anāgāmiṉ. 
It is said that there are nine saints going to Rūpadhātu, by making a threefold distinction among the three. 
Three Aṇāgāmins, each divided into three categories, make nine Anāgāmins, because they go to Rūpadhātu. 
What are these three? 
How are the three categories distinguished? 
According to the comparisons of the Sūtra, there are three Antarāparinirvāyins who obtain Nirvāṇa, the first, quickly, the second, not quickly, and the third, after a long time; 2. 
all three, obtaining Nirvāṇa after having been reborn, are Upapadyaparinirvāyins; 3. with respect to ṭhe Ūrdhvasrotas, one should distinguish the Jumper, the Halfjumper, and the One who Dies Everywhere. 
Or rathert one can say that these three Anāgāmins are each divided iato three categories accordingly as Nirvāṇa is acquired by them quickly, not quickly, or after a long time. 
The distinction of these three Anāgāmins and of these nine Anāgāmins, is due to the differences of their actions, their moral faculties, and their defilements. 
The three Anāgāmins differ from the point of view of their accumulated actions which should be rewarded either in an intermediate existence or in the existence immediately to come: , or later ; from the point of view of the activity of their defilements, which are, in this order, weak, medium, or strong; and from the point of view of their moral faculties, which are strong, medium, or weak. 
Each of the three Anāgāmiṇns is of three categories: from the point of view of their defilements, as above , from the point of view of their faculties ; and from the point of view of their actions also with respect to the three Ūrdhvasrotas: the actions to be rewarded later differ among the Jumper, the HalfJumper, and the One who Dies Everywhere. There are therefore nine categories of Anāgāmin by reason of the differences of their actions, their defilements and their faculties. 
How does the Sūtra teach that there are seven realms of rebirth for good persons , by not distinguishing the categories of Jumper, HalfJumper, and One who Dies Every where, teaches seven realms of rebirth for good persons, namely three Antarāparinirvāyins, three Upapadyaparinirvāyins,in all six realms of rebirth,and the realm of Ūrdhvasrotas, the seventh. 
Why are only these the realms of rebirth for good persons? 
Those who are in the seven realms of rebirth did only good and did not do evil; having arrived at these realms of rebirth, there is no turning back. 
Only these seven realms of rebirth are the realms of rebirth for good persoṉs. 
It is true that the Sūtra says, What is a good person ? 
One who is endowed with the Right Views of a Śaikṣa. 
they have abandoṇed, in a general manner, their bad defilements, that is, the defilements of Kāmadhātu. 
But here the Stra of the Saptasatpuruṣagati refers to the saints who are absolutely good persons. 
kṟtsk It happens that an Āryan, who became an Āryan in the first birth through the acquisition of the state of Srotaāpanna o:r Sakrdāgāmin, obtains in his following existence the state of Anāgāmin. 
The Āṛyan who obtains the state of Anāgāmin after having been reborn in Kāmadhātu, does not go to another sphere. 
But the Āryan who obtains the state of Anāgāmin after having been reborn in Rūpadhātu, goes sometimes to Ārūpyadhātu as a Bhavāgraparana Ūrdhvasrota. 
Objection: But Śakra expresses himself thus: If at the end I should fall, may I be reborn among the wellknown gods under the name of Akaniṣṭhas! This contradicts your thesis. 
The Vaibhāṣikas answer: Śakra expresses himself in this way because he does not know the Dharma. And, if the Blessed One does not correct him, it is with the intention of encouraging him. 
This Āryan and one who is born in a higher sphere, aṟe incapable of modifying their faculties, and are incapable of falling away.2 The Āryan who has become an Anāgāmin by being reborn in Kāmadhātu and one who is born in a higher sphere are not even capable of modifying their faculties; how could they fall away have acquired an advanced state of maturity; and because the saint has acquired a personality favorable to the Path. 
skk Why is not a Śaikṣa not detached from Kāmadhātu, that is a Srotaāpanna and a Sakrdāgāmin, an Antarāparinirvāyin? 
That is, why does he not obtain Nirvāṇa in the intermediate existence which follows his death? 
Since he has not mastered the Path, this saint cannot manifest it; and because these latent defilements are not extremely weak. Such is our answer. The Vaibhāṣikas answer: Because it is very difficult to leave Kāmadhāru. 
What Dhyāna is first combined? 
This is how one proceeds. 
the Arhat or the Anāgāmin enters the Fourth Dhyāna, pure and prolonged, that is, constituting a series of thoughts.2 He leaves it, and retuṟrns to the same Fourth Dhyāna, but impure and prolongued. 
He continues in this way, diminishing gradually the number of thoughts of each pure, impure, and pure Dhyāna, until, having entered a pure Dhyāna of two thoughts, he leaves it in order to enter an impure Dhyāna of two thoughts, which will be folliowed by a pure Dhyāna of two thoughts. 
The first two moments are similar to the Irresistibie Path , the third to the Path of Deliverance. 
Having thus combined the Fourth Dhyāna, by the force of this combined Dhyāna, the saint also combines the other Dhyānas. 
The combination takes place first in Kāmadhātu; later, in the case of falling away, the saint combines these in Rūpadhātu. 
ksk To what end does the saint combine his Dhyānas? 
With a view to arising, to bliss and also through fear of the defilements. 
the Anāgāmin of sharp faculties, with a view to a rebirth among the Śuddhāvāsas and with a view to happiness in this life; the Anāgāmin of weak faculties, also through fear of the defilements, so that he may avoid falling away by holding the absorption of disgust at a distance ; the Arhat of sharp faculties, with a view to happiness here below; the Arhat of weak faculties, also through fear of the defilements, so that he may avoid falling away. 
tṅs Why are there five types of birth among the Śuddhāvāsas? 
The cultivation of the combination of the Fourth Dhyāna, described above, As it is fivefold, there are five births or types of existence among the Śuddhāvāsas. 
In the weak cultivation, one calls up three thoughts, one pure, one impure, and one pure; in the second cultivation, six thoughts; in the third, the fourth, and the fifth cultivations, nine, twelve, and fifteen thoughts. 
The five births are, in this order, the result of these five cuḻtivations. 
They are produced by the force of the impure moments included in these cultivations. 
According to others, the five births take place by reason of the predominance of the different faculties: Avṛhas, by the predominance of faith. Akaniṣṭhas by the predominance of prajñā. 
The Anāgāmiṉ who has acquired extinction is considered aKāyasākṣin.6 One who is in possession of the absorption of extinction is called one who has acquired extinction. 
We thus have four groups of nine Antarāparinirvāyins. 
From the moment when he is detached from the fitst category of the defilements of the First Dhyāṇna, up to the moment when he abandons the eighth category of the defilements of Bhavāgra , the Anāgāmin is a candidate for the state of Arhat. 
This ninth path, which breaks all of the latent defilements is called the absorption similar to a diamond. In truth, it does not break all of the latent defilements because many are already broken: 
The ascetic can produce it by entering into the different states of absorption in any one of the nine stages, anāgamya, dhyānān tara, the Four Dhyāṇnas, or three Ārūpyas. 
from one who is in the progress of realizing the state of Śrotaāpanna, and Srotaāpanna, up to one who is in the progress of realizing the state of Arhat, and the Arhat. 
Through what type of Path of Meditation does the Śaikṣa detach himself from the different spheres? 
Detachment from Bhavāgra is through the trans worldly path. 
In fact. 
there is no worldly path higher than Bhavāgra ; the worldly path of a certain sphere cannot be opposed to this same sphere, because the defilements of this sphere attach themselves to this path. 
Since it is a given that one defilement attached itself to a path, this defilement cannot be expelled by this same path; and since it is a given also that a path is opposed to a defilement, it is certain that this defilement does not attach itself to this path. 
One detaches oneself from the eight other spheres, with the exception of Bhavāgra, either through the worldly path or through the transworldly path. 
For the Āryan who detaches himself through the worldly path, his acquisitions of the disconnections are of two types. 
The Āryan who detaches himself from the first eight spheres obtains disconnection from the defilements of these spheres through the worldly path; in other words, he acquires the prāpri or possession of the pratisakhyānirodha of these defilements. 
According to other masters, he becomes detached through the transworldly path, in the same way. 
Why is this? 
For, ven when pure disconnection is lost, the Āryan is not filled with the defilements. 
Let us admit an instance, when the Āryan becomes detached through the transworldly or Āryan Path, he then does not have worldly possession of disconnection. 
This Āryanby the fact that he abandons the paths previously acquired, , by the fact that he only possesses the path of the state of Anāgāmin, in relation to his sharp facultieswill no longer be in possession of disconnection from the defilements of Ārūpyadhātu; and, having lost this disconnection, he will be filled with these defilements. 
By the fact that he passes into the Second Dhyāṇna , he loses the acquisition of disconnection from the defilements of Kāmadhātu; nevertheless you admit that he is not filled with these defile ments, iṣkḵk By means of what spheres does one obtain detachment from the different spheres? 
One becomes detached from all the spheres by means of pure aṉāgamya. 
From all the spheres up to Bhavāgra. 
When the ascetic becomes detached from a lower sphere in a sāmauntaka , should one admit that all of the Paths of Deliverance arise from the sāmantaka, as is the case for the Iṟṟesistible Pathṣ? 
Why is this? 
At the detachment from the Three Dhātus, the last Path of Deliverance arises either from the Dhyāṇa, or from a sāmanmtaka. 
Kāmadhātu, the Four Dhyānas and the Four Ārūpyas. 
When one triumphs over the Three Dhātus,that is, when one becomes detached from Kāmadhātu, from the First Dhyāṇna, or from the Second Dhyāṇna,it is with a ninth Path of Deliverance which arises either from a sāmantaka or from the Dhyāṇna itself. 
With respect to the higher spheres, the last Path of Deliver ance always arises from the fundamental absoṟrption , never from the preliminary stage or thteshold of this absorption. 
ascetics with weak faculties are not capable of entering, in the ninth Path of Deliverance, the fundamental absorption, for the transformation of their sensation is difficult.2 Therefore the ninth Path of Deliverance of detachment from the fitst three spheres arises from preliminary absorption. 
kṣkṣx It is established that the transworldly paths, the Irresistible Path as well as the Path of Deliverance, proceed from aspects of the Truths , that is to say, from seeing the dharmas as impermanent, suffering, etc. 
The worldly paths, paths of deliverance and paths of abandoning, have respectively the aspects of calm, etc.; coarse, etc. 
The worldly paths of deliverance have the aspects of calm, etc., that is, seeing their objects as calm, etc. 
The worldly paths of abandoning have the aspect of coarse, etc. 
The paths of deliverance can see the higher spheres as calm, excellent, and as definitive liberation. 
as coarse, because it is not calm, entailing a great effort; as bad, because it is not excellent, because it is odious as well as presenting the greatest incapacity to the body and the mind; and as a thick wall, because, by means of this lower sphere, it is impossible to escape from this sphere, as if it were a wall The aspects of calm, excellent, definitive liberation, are the opposite. 
kkr Having terminated this accessory question, let us return to our subject. 
What arises immediately after the Knowledge of Destruction? 
When he is Immovable, after his Knowledge of Destruction, there is the consciousness of nonarising. 
If the Arhat is of the class of the Immovable Ones , immediately after his Knowledge of Destruction there arises the consciousness of the future nonarising of the vices or āsravas. 
If the Arhat is not of this class, then after his Knowledge of Destruction there arises either the same Knowledge of Destruc tion, or the Right Views of the Aśaikṣas; but not the Knowledge of NonArising;: for, as the ascetic who is not immovable can fall away , he caṉnnot produce the Knowledge of NonArising. 
kxkṅk Is this to say that the Inmmovable Arhat does not possess the Views of the Aśaikṣa? 
In the Immovable Arhat, sometimes the Knowledge of NonArising succeeds Knowiedge of NonArising, sometimes the Right Views of the Aśaikṣa. 
sṭk We have spoken of the four states or results. Of what are they the results? 
They are the results of śrāmaṇya or the religious life. 
What is frāmaṇya? 
Śrāmaṇya is the inmmaculate path. 
Śrāmaṇya is the pure path. By this path, by śrāmaṇya, one becomes a Śramaṇa, that is to say a person who calms or who makes cease the defilements. 
Therefore it is said in the Sūtra , He is called a Śramaṇa because he calms all of the types of dhatrmas of transgression, bad, favorable to transmigration, producing rebirth. old age and death. 
The Prthagjana is not a true Śramaṇa because he does not calm the defilements in an absolute manner. 
The results of frāmaṇya are conditioned and unconditioned dharmas. 
The Sūtra says that these results are four in number. On the other hand, There are eightynine. What are these eightynine? The paths of deliverance with their destructions. 
We have eight Irresistible Paths, followed by eight Paths of Deliverance, for the abandoning of the defilement to be abandoned through seeing. We have eightyone Irresistible Paths for the abandoning of the defilements abandoned through meditation, namely nine paths through which one abandons the nine categories of defilements of each of the nine spheres , and also as maṇny for the Paths of Deliverance. The eightynine Irresistible Paths constitute frāmaṇya. 
The eightynine Paths of Deliverance are the conditioned results of frāmaṇya, being outflowing results and virile results of śrāmaṇya. 
The abandoning or pratisakhyanirodha of the eightynine categories of defilements is the unconditioned resuit of frāmaṇya, being the virile result of frāmaṇya.5 We have therefore eightynine results of frāmaṇya. 
The results are indeed eightynine in number; But four results are established for five reasons which are encountered therein. 
The Blessed One defined as results the stages of the path of abandoning in which some five causes are encountered. 
52c In a result, there is the abandoning of a previous path, the acquisition of another path, the addition of destructions, the acquisition of a group of eight knowledges, and the acquisition of sixteen aspects. 
there is the abandoning of the path of the candidate, and the acquisition of the path of the result; the acquisition of a single possession of abandoning in its entirety ; the acquisition at one and the same time of eight Knowledges, the fourfold Dharma Knowledge, and the fourfold Consecutive Knowledge ; and the acquisition of the sixteen aspects, impermanence, etc. 
These characteristics exist in each of the four results. 
kk But if only the pure path receives the name of frāmaṃya, how. can the two states, those of Śakrdāgāmin and Anāgāmin, when they are obtained by a worldly path, be the results of frāmaṇya? 
obtained by a worldly path is a result, because it is combined, and because it is supported by pure possession. 
in fact, they also include an abandoning result of the Path of Seeing; this second abandoning is not separable from the first abandoning; for there is inherent in the results of Sakrdāgāmin and Anāgāmin the single possession of abandoning in its entirety, on the one hand, of defilements abandoned by Seeing, and on the other hand, of defilements abandoned by the worldly Path of Meditation. 
This is why the Sūtra says, What is the result of Sakrdāgāmin? 
The abandoning of the three bonds which are abandoned through Seeingand the reduction of lust, anger, and delusion. What is the result of Anāgāmin? 
The abandoning of the five bonds here below. 
Furthermore, the abandoning which results from the worldly path is supported, confirmed by the pure possession of disconnection , as it results from the fact that, by virtue of this pure possession, the Sakṛdāgāmin and the Anāgāmin cannot die in a state of falling away: 
kkk Śrāmaṇya or the religious life Is brāhmaṇya; it is brahmacakra. 
The Path of Seeing, being of the nature of a wheel , is called the Wheel of the Dharma. How is the Path of Seeing of the nature of a wheel? Because it goes quickly, etc.; because it has spokes, etc. 
If the Sūtra says that the Wheel was set into motion when Kauṇḍinya realized the Path of Seeing, this is because the prefix pr indicates the beginning of action: 
kkk How can one obtain the results within each sphere? 
Three can ounly be acquired in Kāmadhātu, not elsewhere. 
The last state of srāmaṇya, or the quality of Arhat, can be acquired in the Three Dhātus. 
We can understand why the first two states, which suppose that the ascetic is not detached from Kāmadhātu, cannot be acquired in the higher spheres; but why does the same hold for the third? 
Above Kāmadhātu, the Path of Seeing is absent. In its absence, a person detached from Kāmadhātu and reborn in a higher heaven cannot obtain the state of Anāgāmin. 
Why is the Path of Seeing absent there? 
With respect to Ārūpyadhātu, because hearing is absent there: 
With respect to Rūpadhātu, Disgust is absent there, because the Sūtṛa says, Here one undertakes, and there one achieves. 
all saffering sensation is absent in them; therefore disgust is impossible there, and one cannot enter the Noble Path except through disgust. 
Furthermore the Sūtra says, Five persons, the Antarāparinir vāyin being the first and the Ūrdhvasrotas being the fifth, undertake here and achieve there. 
Undertake, vidhā, means to establish the Path, because it is the means to Nirvāṇa. 
S Śix types of Aṟrhat are known. 
Parihāṇad harmans , Cetanādharmans , Anurakṣaṇādharmans , Sthitākampyas , Prativedhanādharmaṇs , and Akopyadharmans. 
1002, 1007. 
It should be known that the deliverance of mind of these five types of Arhats is occasional and dear, for it should be constantly guarded. 
Consequently these Ārhats are called ramayavimukta. Depending on the occasion , they are delivered : 
We have thus samayavi mukta, delivered by reason of the occasion, like ghṛtaghata, a pot full of butter, a pot for butter. 
possession of a number of material goods, the absence of illness, a ceṟtain place. 
The deliverance of an Immovable One cannot be moved because he cannot fall away from this deliverance; consequently it Annṛnttrcc trr crcccccrart nDTTrṛHr1ḍsmyrrrntnEṛ 
It follows that an Immovable One is not occasionally delivered. 
Or rather samaya signifies time: 
kkk Do these six Arhats belong, from the beginning of their teligious careers, to the family to which, as Arhats, they belong? 
Or rather have they acquired this family later? 
Some Arhats are of theit present families from the very beginning; some become part of their present families through purification or perfectioning. 
A Parihāṇadharmaṉ is an Arhat who is susceptible of falling away and who is not a Cetanādharman. 
A Cetanādharmaṉ is an Arhat who is capable of putting an end to his existence at wil1, without being an Anurakṣaṇādh aṟma, etc. 
An Anurakṣaṇādharman is an Arhat who is capable of preserving himself from falling away. 
A Sthitākampya is an Arhat who when strong causes of falling away are absent, even without preserving himself, is not capable of being budged, that is to say, who dwells in his result; but, not falling away, in the absence of any effort, he is not susceptible of progressing. 
A Prativedhanādharman is an Arhat who is capable of penetrating without effort the Immovable Oṇnes. 
An Akopyadharman or an Immovable One is an Arhat who is not capable of falling away. 
When they were Śaikṣas, the first two lacked continual cultivation and intensive cultivation; the third only cultivated continual practices; the fourth cultivated only intensive practices; the fifth cultivated these two practices, but with weak faculties; and the sixth cultivated these two practices with sharp faculties. 
the Prativedhanādharman does not necessarily penetrate. These persons receive their different names because it can happen that they fall away, etc. Having admitted this principle , one then concludes that the six types of Arhats can exist within the Three Dhātus. 
there are six types of Arhats in Kāmadhātu; 2. 
Four fall from their families, and five fall from their ṣtates, Four, the Cetanādharman, etc., can fall away from their families; the Parihāṇadharman cannot fall away from his family. 
Five, the Parihāṇadharman, etc., can also fall away from their states. 
The Arhat does not fall away from his first family, from the family which he obtained before he became an Arhat, for this family has been made firm by the Path of the Śaikṣa and the Aśaikṣa. 
The Śaikṣa does not fall away from his first family, for this family has been made firm by the worldly path and the transworldly path. 
But one can fall away from the family which one has obtained by the perfecting of his faculties. 
The ascetic does not fall away from the first state which he has obtained, but he can fall away from the others. 
the Parihāṇadhar man either obtains Nirvāṇa by staying in his family, or by pe:fecting his faculties, or by falling away and again becoming a Śaikṣa; four cases are possible with respect to the Cetanādhar man: 
three as above, plus: or by falling away and becoming a Parihāṇadharmanṉ; and so on: five, six, seven cases for the Anurakṣaṇādharmaṉ, the Sthitākampya and the Prativedhanād harman . 
When an Arhat again becomes a Śaikṣa, he dwells in the same family that was his first family. 
Otherwise, in the hypothesis that he would obtain a better family, he would progress, and he would not fall away. 
Why does one not fall away from the first state? 
Because the defilements abandoned through Seeing have no support : 
k Do you pretend that these defilements have for their object a thing that does not exist ? 
They have the Truths for their object, ; therefore they do not have a thing that does not exist for their object, but they are mistaken with respect to this object. 
One indeed sees that the idea of self falsely attributes to real things, physical matter, etc., which are not self the quality of self under the aspect of a being which acts, a being which feels, or of Īśvara. 
And the other views, the view of clinging to extremes exist having as their support this same quality of self ; as a consequence their support is nonexistent, they have no support. 
But the defilements which are abandoned through Meditation, namely desire, hatred, pride, and ignorance, have for their nature attachment, antipathy, satisfaction, and confusion with respect to physical matter, etc.: 
For the agreeable, the painful, etc., is real with respect to what exists, whereas there is not a trace of self, of things pertaining to self, of Īśvara, etc. 
The defilements which are abandoned through Meditation have a determined support, characterized as agreeable, painful, etc. 
But, for the defilements which, are abandoned through Seeing, there is no determined support which is characterized as self or as a thing pertaining to self; consequently they do not have a support. 
Among the Āryans who do not reflect, the defilements which are abandoned by Meditation can arise by reason of the weakness of mindfulness; these defile ments do not arise among the Āryans who reflect. 
In the same way that one thinks a rope is a snake if one does not observe it carefully ; but the error of personalism cannot arise among Āryans who do not reflect, because this error is a product of reflection. 
Consequently, the saint caṉnot fall away from the abandoning of the defilements which have been abandoned through Seeing. kskk The Sautrāntikas say that one can no longer fall away from the quality of Arhat. And their opinion is correct, as one can demonstrate by scripture and by reasoning. Scripturaḻ arguments. 
The Blessed One specifies that one cannot fall away from deliverance of the mind when it is immovable; therefore one can fall away from it when it is occasional. 
A certain Arhat does not fall away from them: 
What do you mean by that? 
Let us pass on to atrgumeats from reason. 
Now this Āryan Śrāvaka is not a Śaikṣa, but an Arhat, for the Sūtra says later, For a long period of time his mind is inclined towards distant separation from the defilements. 
kfṅ The Vaibhāsṣīkas maintain that one can also fall away from the quality of Arhat. 
The Śaikṣas and the nonĀryans are also of six families. 
Śaikṣas and Prthagjanas are also of six families: the families of the Arhats have their antecedents in these families. 
One can perfect his faculties outside of the Path of Seeing the Truths, but not while one traverses this Path, for, in view of its rapidity , one cannot accomplish the preparatory practices required for perfecting. 
Some perfect their faculties as Pṛthagjanas; some, as Śraddhādhimuktas. 
kkk The Sūtra quoted above says, I declare that one caṉ fall away from any one of the four blisses of absorption which one has acquired; but, with respect to the immovable deliverance of mind which is physically actualized, I declere that one absoḻutely caṅnot fall away from it. 
How can it be that an Immovable Arhat can fall away from the blisses? 
There are three types of falling away: from that which is acquired, from that which has not yet been acquired, and from fruition. Whoever falls away from the possession of a spiritual quality, falls away from what has been acquired. 
Whoever does not acquire a spiritual quality that is to be acquired, falls away from that which has not yet been acquired. 
Whoever does not actualize a spiritual quality that he possesses, falls away from his fruition. 
kisk Among these falling aways, The last, with respect to the Master; the second also, with respect to an Immovable One; all three, with respect to others. 
The Immovable Oṉe falls away from both his fruition and from what has not yet been acquired: for he has not necessarily acquired the dbarmas ptoper to very distinguished persons. 
Consequently the fact that an Immovable One falls away from his fruition is not in contradiction with the above Sūtra. 
The masters who deny any falling away say, The pure deliverance of any Arhat is immovable; but an Immovable One is to be defined as we have said; consequently one cannot object: 
how does an Immovable One fall away from the blisses? 
kikk Does the saint who falls away from the state of Arhat take up a new existence? 
He does not die having fallen away from his reṣult. 
He never dies in the state of having fallen away from his result. 
In fact the Sūtra says, Oh Bhikṣus, it happens that the wise Āryan Śrāvaka experiences weakness of mindfulness, that his mindful ness becomes slow. But he quickly rejects, he makes disappear, destroys, annihilates. 
If it were otherwise, if a person, having become an Aṟhat, falls away from the state of Arhat, and could continue to transmigrate, the religious life would not inspire confidence. 
He does not do what should not be done. Even though fallen, he does not do that which is in contradic tion with his state. In the same way a hero can be moved, but he does not fall. 
kkk How many Irresistible Paths and Paths of Deliverance are included in the transformation or perfecting of the faculties? 
The Prativedhanādharman who perfects his faculties and penetrates the family of the Inmmovable Ones, should produce nine Irresistible Paths, nine Paths of Deliverance, exactly like the Śaikṣa, in order to obtain the quality of Arhat. 
Why is this? 
The Prativedhanādharman has intensely cultivated the family of weak faculties; consequently this family cannot be transformed without a great effort; it has, in fact, been made firm both by the Path of the Śaikṣa and by the Path of the Aśaikṣa. 
For the transformation of the faculties by which a Śraddhād himukta becomes a Drṛṣṭiprāpta , there must be an Irresistible Path and a Path of Deliverance. 
In the two cases , there is a preparatory path. 
tṅtk These Irresistible Paths and Paths of Deliverance are Pure paths For the faculties of Āryans cannot be transformed by impure paths. 
Only humans can transform their faculties; there is no transformation elsewhere, for elsewhere falling away is impossi ble. 
Namely in anāgamya, dhyānāntara, the Four Dhyānas and three Ārūpyas,. 
The Śaikṣa, in six. With the exception of the three Ārūpyas. 
Why is this? 
61d Because the Śaikṣa who increases his faculties by abandoning his state and his ptogress, obtains the state. 
He obtains only a state belonging to the family of sharp faculties, a state forming part of the detachment of Kāmadhātu, not the state of Anāgāmin which is of Ārūpyadhātu. 
kḥk The Arhats, by reason of their difference of faculties, are nine in number. 
Two Buddhas and seven Śrāvakas, the Arhats have nine classes of faculties. 
The Śrāvakas are seven in number, the five the first of which is the Parihāṇadharman, plus the Immovable One which is divided into two, depending on whether he was from his beginnings of the immovable family, or whether he has obtained this family through the perfecting of his faculties. 
The two Buddhas,the Pratyekabuddha and the Buddha,are varieties of Immovable Ones. 
These make nine persons whose faculties are respectively weakweak, etc. 
kkḥ In general, the Āryaṇs are seven in number: 
Seven pudgalas, by reason of their cultivation, their faculties, absorption, deliverance, of two. 
The second applied himself in the same way, but by following the dharmas, that is, the twelvefold Scriptures, and by pursuing the dharmas, that is, the parts of Bodhi by himself. 
Their faculties are respec tively weak and sharp by reason of the predominance, among the first, of intention proceeding from faith , and, among the second, of wisdom. 
By reason of absorption , there exists the Kāyasākṣin , because he has realized the Absorption of Extinction. 
By reason of deliverance, there exists the Prajñāvimukta. 
In the Path of Seeing, there exists two padgalas or persons, the Śraddhānusarin and the Dharmānusariṇ; who, in the Path of Meditation, become a Śraddhādhimukta and a Drṛṣṭiprāpta, and, in the Path of the Arhat , a Samayavimukta and an Asamayavimukta. 
The Śraddhāṇusariṇ, from the point of view of his faculties,.is of three types: 
his faculties are weak by definition; but they can be either weakweak, weakmedium, or weakstrong; from the point of view of his family, of five types: 
; from the point of view of the Path, of fifteen types: accordingly as he is in one of the eight Patiences or in one of the seven Knowledges ; from the point of view of detachment, of seventythree types: 
Eight times ninedet achment from Kāmadhātu, from the Four Dhyāṇnas, and from three Ārūpyas,make seventytwo, plus all the bonds of Kāmadhātu, seventythree; from the point of view of the physical person , of nine types: 
boṟn in one of the three Dvīpas. , born in one of the six heavens of Kāmadhātu. 
kskk Who is the saint that is called an Ubhayatobhāgavimukta, ? 
He who possesses extinction is doubly delivered; the other is delivered through prajñā. 
One who has entered the Absorption of Extinction , that is to say, one who is endowed with extinction, is called doubly delivered, because, by the power of prajñā and absorṟption, he is delivered from the hindrance of the defilements and from the hindrance that opposes the arising of the eight liberations. 
The other is one who is delivered through prajñā, because, by the power of prajña, he is delivered from the hindrance of the defilements. 
kks The Blessed One said, One who has abandoned the five defilements here below and who is not subject to falling away is a complete Śaikṣa. How is a Śaikṣa completed? 
The complete Śaikṣa is of three types, complete by his result, his faculties, and his absorption. 
The Anāgāmin of the Śraddhād himukta class who is not a Kāyasākṣin is complete from the point of view of only his result. 
The saint of the Drṛṣṭiprāpta class who is not detached from Kāmadhātu is complete from the point of view of only his faculties. 
The Anāgāmin of the Drṣṭiprāpta class who is not a Kāyasāk ṣin is complete from the point of view of his result and his faculties. 
The Anāgāmin of the Śraddhādhimukta class who is a Kāyasākṣin is complete from the point of view of his result and his absoṟrption. 
A Śaikṣa cannot be complete from the point of view of only his absorption, for the Absorption of Extinction supposes the state of Anāgāmiṇ, and consequently fullness or perfection from the point of view of result. 
The Prajñāvimukta who is an Asamayavimukta is complete from the point of view of his faculties. 
The Ubhayatobhāgavimukta who is a Samayavimukta is complete from the point of view of his absorption. 
The Ubhaya tobhāgavimukta who is an Asamayavimukta is complete from the point of view of his faculties and his absorption. 
kṣkk Numerous types of paths have been named: the worldly path and the transworldly path; the Paths of Seeing, Meditation and of the Aśaikṣa; the Preparatoṟy Path, the Irresistible Path, the Path of Deliverance, and the Path of Excellence. 
In short, how many types of paths are there? 
In short, the path is of four types, Prepararory, Irresistible, Deliverance, and Excellence. 
Prayogamārga, the Path of Application or of Preparatory Cultivation, is the path by which and following upon which there arises the Irresistible Path. 
Ānantaryamārga, the Irresistible Path , is the path by which an obstacle is abandoned. 
Vimuktimārga, the Path of Deliverance, is the first path which arises free from the obstacle abandoned by means of the Irresisti ble Path. 
Viśeṣamārga, the Path of Excellence, is the path differing from the preceding paths.l kksḥ What is the meaning of the word mārga, path?1 The path is the path to Nirvāṇa because it goes from here; or rather, because it is through it that Nirvāṇa is searched out.l But how are the Path of Deliverance and the Path of Excellence paths? 
In fact, it is on the Preparatory Path and the Iṛresistible Path that the acquisition of Nirvāṇa depends. 
And moreover because, by means of these two paths, one obtains higher and higher paths:. 
Or rather because, by these two paths, one enters into mirupadhiśeṣa Nirvāṇa, Nirvāṇa without rermnant, kkk The path is also called pratipad, route, because, by it, one arrives at Nirvāṇa.1 There are four routes: 
it results from this that, in the Dhyānas, the route flows on effortlessly. 
The path in anāgamya, dhyānāntara, and the Ārūpyas, is the difficult route, for these absorptions are not endowed with parts, and calm and insight are not in balance. 
But the opposite holds true in the Ārāpyas. 
kskṣk These two routes, When intelligence is weak, a route for slow intelli gence; in the contrary case, a route for a quick intelligence. 
The route is termed for slow intelligences when intelligence prajñā, and dhandha the equivalent of manda. 
So too, the route is for quick intelligences when zbhijñā is rapid in it, that is to say, when prajñā is sharp in it. 
tkk The Path receives the name of bodhipākṣika, containing the adjutants of Bodhi. 
Because they are favorable to it, thirtyseven dharmas are its adjutants. 
Because they are favorable to Bodhi, thirtyseven dharmas are adjutants of Bodhi.1 Thirtyseven from the point of view of name, but ten substantial entities. 
What are these ten entities? 
How is that? 
684 Foundation of mindfulness is prajñā; eṉnergy receives the name of right exertion; the supernormal powers are samādhis. 
The foundations of mindfulness, the right exertions , and the supernormal powers are, by their nature, ptajñā, eṉergy, and samādhi. 
We have therefore at first five items, faith, energy, mindfulness, seādhi, and prajñā, which, under their own names, make up five faculties and five powers. 
According to the Vaibhāṣikas, there are eleven items; Right Speech and Right Actions together form one item, and Right Livelihood is another item. Therefore morality counts for two items added to the nine preceding items. 
skīk We have said that the foundations of mindfulness, the right exertions, and the supernormal powers are by their nature prajñā, enṉetgy, and samādhi. 
The preceding definitions refer to the principal elements of the foundations of mindfulness, etc.; but all these adjutants of Bodhi are also a collection of qualities, pure or impure, which have arisen from preparatory cultivation , from hearing, reflection, or meditation. 
kṣkṣk Why is energy termed rignt exertion? 
Because the body, speech, and mind are, through energy, corṟectly placed into action. 
Why is semnādhi termed a supernormal power ? 
Because ramādhi is the foundation of rddhi, that is to say, of the success of all spiritual qualities. 
But certain masters, , maintain that super normal power is samādhi, and that the four,desire, mind, energy, and examination,aṟe the feet, pādas, of this supernormal power: 
they should therefore say that the adjutents of Bodhi are thirteen in number by adding desire and mind to their list of eleven. 
Furthermore, to affirm that supernormal power is semādhi is to contradict the Sūtra which defines supernormal power, What is supernormal power? 
The ascetic accomplishes different works of miraculous power; being one, he becomes many, and so oṉ. 
Why are faith, energy, etc., termed faculties and powers? 
How is the order of the faculties explained? 
In order to obtain the result in which one believes , one makes an effort. When one forces onself, there is a setting up of mindfulness. When mindfulness is set up, one fixes the mind in order to avoid distraction. When the mind is fixed, there arises a conscious ness which conforms to the object. 
In which are they the important factors? 
They form seven groups which are distributed, in order, between the beginning stage, the nirvedhabhāgīyas, Meditation, and Seeing. 
In the beginning stage, there are the foundations of mindful ness, because, in this stage, one examines the body, etc. 
In the Heats , there are the right exertions , for, in this stage one incteases his energy, an increase which is the principle of progress. 
In the Summits , there are the supernormal powers, for, due to them, one obtains the condition in which the roots of good cannot be lost. 
The faculties are in the Patiences, for faith, energy, etc., become predominant in this stage from the fact that, in the Patiences, one is no longer capable of falling away. 
The powers are in the Supreme Worldly Dharmas, for, in this stage, faith, energy, etc., can no longer be crushed either by the defilementsfor these are not activatednor by any other worldly dharmas. 
The parts of Bodhi are in the Path of Meditation, for this Path is close to Bodhi, that is to say, to the Knowledge of Destruction and the Knowledge of NonArising in which the Path of Seeing is separated by the Path of Meditation. 
The parts of the Noble Eightfold Path are in the Path of Seeing, for this Path is characterized by progress: 
for one goes quickly.4 The Sūtra lists the parts of Bodhi first, and the perts of the Noble Eightfold Path second, with an end to having an order corresponding to the number of parts, at first seven, and then eight. 
Investigation into the dharmas is at one and the same time Bodhi and a part of Bodhi, and Right Views is both the Path and a part of the Noble Eightfold Path. 
Such is the doctrine of the Vaibhāṣikas. 
ksk Other masters justify the order of the adjutants of Bodhi without disturbing the regular succession, by placing, as it suits them, the Path of Seeing first, and then the Path of Meditation. There is fitst 1. the foundations of mindfulness, which exist with a view to curbing thoughts which disperse themselves naturally, distracted as they are by the variety of objects. The four foundations of mindfulness bind the mind, for it is said in the Sūtra, .. with a view to expelling the idea of desires which have their support in thitst. Energy increases through the power of the founda tions of mindfulness, through the control and the exertion of the mind through the accomplishment of the fourfold tasks: 
these are the four right exertions. 
Then, by reason of the purification of absorption , the supernormal powers arise and are cultivated. 
The same faith, energy, etc., when they triumph over the growth of their opponents, are the powers, balas. 
The parts of Bodhi arise in the Path of Seeing, because, for the first time, the ascetic understands the true nature of the dharmas. 
The parts of Bodhi arise in the Path of Seeing and in the Path of Meditation. 
In fact, it is said, The Noble Eightfold Path goes thus to fulloess through meditation, the four foundations of mindfulness go to their fullness through meditation. the seven parts of Bodhi go to their fullness through meditation. 
It is further said, Oh Bhikṣus, to say words conforming to the truth is an expression that says the Four Truths; Oh Bhikṣus, to say to advance by the Path is an expression that speaks of the Noble Eightfold Path. 
Therefore, since the Noble Eightfold Patn exists both in the Path of Seeing and in the Path of Meditation, the order which places the parts of Bodhi first, and the parts of the Noble Eightfold Path second, is justified. 
eskk Among the adjutants of Bodhi, how many are impure, and how maṉy are pure? 
They are only pure, for they are placed in the Path of Seeing and the Path of Meditation. 
Without doubt, there are worldly right views, etc., but they are not called the parts of the Noble Eightfold Path. 
The others are of two types. 
In all, thirtyseven. 
In anāgamyga, with the exception of joy, Why is joy absent from anāgamya? 
In the Second, with the exception of thoughts. 
In the Second Dhyāna, thoughts are absent, but the other thirtysix adjutants of Bodhi remain. Thought is absent since vcāra is also absent. 
In the Third and the Fourth Dhyānas, there is absent both joy and thought, but the other thirtyfive adjutants of Bodhi remain. Also, in dhyānṉāntara. There one finds thirtyfive adjutants of Bodhi with the exception of these same two. 
In three Ārūpyas, with the exception of the preced ing and the parts of morality. 
In Kāmadhātu and in Bhavāgra, the parts of Bodhi and the parts of the Path are absent. In fact, the Pure Path is absent from these two places. Therefore some twentytwo adjutants of Bodhi remain. 
At the comprehension of the first three Truths , thete is acqnisition of the avetyaprasāda relating to the Dharma, and to the pure precepts, dear to the Āryans. 
What is understood by Dharma in the expression zvetyapra sāda relating to the Dharma? 
What is the meaning of the term avetyaprasāda? 
, plus aśaikṣī samyagviṃukti and afaikṣa samyagjñāna, the perfect deliverance proper to Aṛhats and the knowledge of the acquisition of this deliverance. 
Why does not the Sūtra attribute both perfect deliverance and the knowledge of this perfect deliverance to the Śaikṣa? 
Because he is bound, deliverance is not said to be a part of a Śaikṣa. 
The person who is pertially bound is not called released. Deliveraṅnce is absent from him, and he cannot possess the knowledge of the acquisition of deliverance. An Aśaikṣa, on the contrary, is completely liberated from all the bonds: he is thus characterized, magnified both by his deliverance from the defilements and by the direct knowledge of his deliverance: 
therefore it is of the Aśaikṣa alone that one can say that perfect deliverance and the knowledge of this perfect deliverance are his parts. 
Deliverance is twofold. It is conditioned and unconditioned. 
Victory over the defilements is unconditioned deliverance; adhimokṣa is conditioned deliverance. The abandoning of the defilements is uncon ditioned deliverance. The intention of the Aśaikṣa is coṇditioned deliverance. 
It is conditioned deliverance which is called a part pertaining to an Aśaikṣa; for the other parts, Right Views, etc., are conditioned. 
It is two deliverances. wThis same conditioned deliverance is described, in the Sūtra , as being double, mental deliverance and deliverance through prajñā. 
it therefore constitutes what is called the skandha of deliverance, the vśmuktiskandha. 
The Śūtra says, Oh Vyāghrabodhāyanas! What is the essential factor of the purification of deliveraṅce? 
The mind of a Bhikṣu is detached, delivered from craving; the mind of this Bhikṣu is detached, delivered from hatred and ignorance. 
In this way, either with a view to the fullness of the sandha of deliverance which is not complete, or with a view to maintaining the shandha of deliverance which is complete, all desire, all energy. 
this is the purity of the mind resulting from the abandoning of the defilements, craving, etc. which are expelled by correct knowledge. 
Perfect deliverance has been explained. 
Bodhi, as we have described above, is the Knowledge of Destruction and the Knowledge of NonArising , and these constitutes Right Knowledge, the tenth part of the Aśaikṣa. 
fr Which mindpast, present, or futureis delivered? 
The Aśaikṣa mind, arising, is delivered from its obstacles. 
The Śāstra says, The future Aśaikṣa mind is delivered from its obstacle. 
What is this obstacle? 
The possession of the defilements , which in fact creates an obstacle to the arising of an Aśaikṣa mind. 
At the moment of Vajropamasamādhi , this possession is abandoned, and an Aśaikṣa mind arises and is delivered. 
When this possession has been abandoned, the Aśaikṣa mind has arisen and has been delivered. 
But what would you say of the Aśaikṣa mind which has not aṟisen at the moment of Vajropamasamādhi, or of the worldly mind which is produced within an Aśaikṣa? 
These two minds are also delivered; but it is of the future Aśaikṣa mind in the process of arising that the Śāstra says is delivered. 
From what is the worldly mind of an Aśaikṣa delivered? 
But is not this same worldly mind produced within a Śaikṣa, and have you not said that it is delivered? 
The worldly mind of a Śaikṣa is not similar to that of an Aśaikṣa, for the latter is not accompanied by the possession of the defilements. 
kitx What is the Pathpast, present, oṟ future,by which the obstacle to the arising of the Aśaikṣa mind is abandoned? 
It is while perishing that the Path causes the abandoning of the obstacle. 
Perishing, that is to say, in the present. 
The Śāstra and the present work defined unconditioned deliverance. 
On the other hand, the Sūtra and the Śāstra speak of three hātus , namely prahāṇadhātu , virāgadhātu , and nrodhadhātu. 
What is the relationship between unconditioned deliverance and these three spheres? 
This deliverance is the three dhātus. The destruction of craving is detachment. 
The abandoning of ctraving is virāgadhāsu, the sphere of the absence of craving. 
The destruction of the others is abandoning. The abandoning of the defilements other than craving is prahāṇadhāu, the sphere of abandoning. 
The destruction of the object is called nirodhadhātu, the sphere of extinction.4 The abandoning of the object, impure physical matter, etc., with the exception of the abandoning of the defilements, is the realm of extinction. 
tksk Does one become disgusted by means of the same dharmas through which one obtains detachment? 
What are they? 
It is only by means of the Patiences and the Knowledges of the Truths of Suffering and Origin that one obtains disgust, and not by means of the other Patiences and Knowledges. 
The Patiences and the Knowledges of Suffering, of Origin, of Extinction and of the Path, through which one abandons the defilements, are also the means for acquiring detachment. There are therefore four alternatives. 
If the ascetic does not abandon the defilements through the Patiences and Knowledges of Suffering and Origin, he only acquires disgust: these Patiences and these Knowledges have only the causes of disgust for their sphere. 
If the ascetic abandons his defilements through the Patience and Knowledges of Extinction and the Path, he only acquires detachment; these Patiences and these Knowledges have only the causes of joy for their sphere. 
If the ascetic abandons the defilements through the Patiences and the Knowledges of Suffering and Origin, he acqnires detachment and disgust. 
If the ascetic does not abandon the defilements through the Patiences and the Knowledges of Extinction and the Path, he acquires neither detachment nor disgust. 
We have spoken of the ṣāntis or Patiences and of the jñāmas or Knowledges , of samyagāṛṟṣṭi or Right Views and of remyagjñāna or Right Knowledge. 
Are the Patiences actually Knowledges, and isnt Right Knowledge identical to Right Views? 
The pure Patiences are not a type of Knowledge. 
The eight types of pure Patience which form part of the Path of Seeing are not, by their nature, knowledge; for, at the moment of patience, the defilement of doubt, which each Patience abandons, is not already abandoned. But Knowledge is certain: it is produced when doubt is abandoned. 
In opposition to the pure Patiences which are Seeing and aṟe not Knowledge, Ib. 
The knowledge of destruction and the knowledge of NonArising when they constitute Bodhiare not Seeing, because they do not incude examination, and because the intention of inquiry is not in them. All other pure prarñā is both one and the other. 
Besides the Patiences and the two Knowledges named above, pure prajñā is at one and the same time both seeing and knowledge, for it incdudes examination, and is threfore seeing; it is free from doubt, and is therefore knowledge. 
All other prajñā is knowledge. All other prajñā which is not pure, but worldly or impure. Six are also seeing. Six impure prajñās are at one and the same time knowledge and seeing, namely the mental prajñā associated with the five defilements which are views by nature and, sixth, good prajñā, which is right worldly views. 
ksk How many knowledges are there? 
All the Knowledges are subsumed into two types of knowledge, impure or worldly knowledge, and pure or supermundane knowledge. 
Impure Knowledge is called knowledge conforming to worldly conventioṉs. 
Pure knowledge is of two types, a knowledge of dharmas and inferential knowledge. 
These two knowledges with the preceeding make three knowledges: worldly, convrentional knowledge, a knowledge of dharmas, and inferential knowledge. 
Among these, Conventional knowledge bears on all. 
All the conditioned and unconditioned dharmas are the object of conventional knowledge. 
The knowledge of dharmas has for its object the Suffering, etc., of Kāmadhātu. 
The knowledge of dharmas has Suffering, the Arising of Suffering, the Extinction of Suffering, and the Path leading to the Extinction of Suffering of Kāmadhātu for its object. 
When one takes into consideration the distinction of the Truths, these two knowledges, make up four knowl edges. 
The knowledge of dharmas and inferential knowledge, which are as we have just seen fourfold by reason of their objects, are, among the Arhats, when they are not of the nature of Seeing, called the Knowledge of Destruction and the Knowledge of NoṉnArising. 
The Knowledge of Destruction and the Knowledge of NonAr ising, at the moment when they first arise are, by their nature, inferential knowledge of Suffering and of its Origin in the higher spheres, because they have for their object the skandhas of Bhavāgra under the aspects of Suffering and Origin. 
Does Vajropamasamādhi have the same object as these two knowledges at the moment of their arising? 
When it has Suffering and Origin for its object, yes, when it has Extinction and the Path for its object, no. 
The knowledge of the mind of another follows four knowl edges, a knowledge of the dharmas, inferential knowledge, a knowledge of the Path, and conventional knowledge. 
A mind is superior either from the point of view of its bhmi, from the point of view of its indriyas, ot from the point of view of its personality. 
The knowledge of the mind of another of a lower sphere does not know a mind in a higher sphere. 
The knowledge of the mind of another of a saint with weak faculties, namely a Śraddhādhimukta or a Samayavimukta , does not know the mind of a saint of strong faculties, namely a Dṛṣṭiprāpta or a Asamayavimukta. 
The knowledge of the mind of another of a lower saint does not know the mind of a higher saiat; in order, Anāgāmin, Arhat, Pratyekabuddha, Samyakṣabuddha. 
When the mind of another is either past or future, the knowledge of a mind of another does not know it, for this knowledge has a present mind for its object. Does the mind of another avoid being in the sphere of the knowledge of the mind of another in other cases as well? 
The knowledge of dharmas and inferential knowl edges do not know one another. The knowledge of the mind of another, when it is by its nature a knowledge of dharmas, is not capable of knowing the mind of another which is by nature inferential knowledge; when it is inferential by nature, it is not capable of knowing the mind of another which is by nature a series of dharmas. 
There is no knowledge of the mind of another in the Path of Seeing. That is to say, an ascetic, while he cultivates the Path of Seeing, is not endowed with the knowledge of the mind of another, because the duration of the Path of Seeing is much reduced, and because the Seeing of the Truths is rapid. 
yWhen one desires to know, through the knowledge of the mind of another, the mind of another which is found in the Path of Seeing, one cultivates a preparatory exercise: 
When a Śrāvaka cultivates the knowledge of the mind of another in the desire to see the mind of an ascetic in the Path of Seeing, he obtains some knowing of the first tvo moments, the Patience of the Knowledge of the dharmas of Suffering end the knowledge of dharmas but ṉot the following moments because the knowledge of the inferential part of the Path of Seeing supposes a different preparatory exercise. 
Thus, if this Śrāvaka then begins a new exercise in order to obtain the knowledge of the inferential part, the ascetic whom he examines has already arrived at the fifteenth moment when this new preparatory exercise is finished. 
The whole interval between the twelfth and the sixteenth moment therefore is not in the sphere of the knowledge of the mind of another of the Śrāvaka. 
In the same circumstances, the Pratyekabuddha knows three moments, namely the first two and the eighth; because the required preparatory exercise, after the consciousness of the first two moments, for the knowledge of the inferential part, is, among the Pratyekabuddhas, weak. 
According to other masters, he knows the first two moments and the fifteenth. The Buddha, through simple desire, and without preparatory exercise, knows the mind of another in all the moments of the Path of Seeing. 
What are the characteristics of the Knowledge of Destruction and of the Knowledge of NonArising? 
The knowledge of destruction is, with respect to the Truths, the certitude that they are known, abandoned, etc.; the knowledge of nonarising is the certitude that they are no longer to be known, to be abandoned, etc. 
According to the Mūlaśāstra, What is the knowledge of extinction? 
When one knows within himself that Suffering is completely known by me, its Origin is abandoned by me, its Extinction has been actualized by me, the Path has been cultivated by me, then the knowledge which results from this , the seeing, the knowing, the intuition, the intelligence, the discernment, the clarity, the insight, is what is called the Knowledge of Destruction. 
What is the Knowledge of NonArising? 
When one knows within himself that Suffering is completely known by me and is no longer to be known... the Path is no longer to be cultivated, then this knowledge.. is what is called the Knowledge of NonArising. 
skk But how can one, through a pure knowledge, have such a knowledge? 
The Masters of Kaśmīr explain: Two conventional knowledges are consecutive to two pure knowledges: Suffering is known by me...; Suffering is known by me and is no longer to be known. 
It is by reason of the characteristic of these two conventional knowl edges that the Śāstra defines the two pure knowledges. 
Or rather, by reason of their characteristic of being directly perceived, these two knowledges are qualified as seeing. 
It is by reason of this characteristic of being directly perceived that it says in the Śāstra, Knowledge is seeing. 
tsk There are ten knowledges: 
a knowledge of dharmas, inferential knowledge, worldly, conventional knowledge, the knowledge of the mind of another, the knowledge of Suffering, the knowledge of Origin, the knowledge of Extinction, the knowledge of the Path, the Knowledge of Destruction, and the Knowledge of NonAri sing. 
How are the knowledges, which are twofold distributed into ten knowledges? 
The knowledges are ten in number; the distinction is established by reason of their nature, their opposition, their aspect, their aspect and their object, their preparatory exercises, the achievement of their task, and the extension of their cause. 
By reason of its nature, there is conventional knowledge, because it is not absolute knowledge. 
By reason of their opposition, there is knowledge of the dharmas and inferential knowledge: the first is opposed to Kāmadhātu, and the second is opposed to the higher spheres. 
By reason of their aspect , there is a knowledge of Suffering and a knowledge of Origin: these two knowledges have the same object , but differ in their aspects. 
By reason of their aspect and their object , there is a knowledge of Extinction and a knowledge of the Path which differ in their aspects as well as in their objects. 
Without doubt this knowledge extends also to the mental states of another, but the ptreparatoṟy exercise bears on the mind ; also, even though it may know the caittas, it is termed paracitajñāna by reason of its preparatory exercise. Because that which should have been done has been done, there is the Knowledge of Destruction: 
this knowledge is the first knowledge to arise in a series in which that which should have been done has been done. 
By reason of the extension of its causes, there is the Knowledge of NonArising, for it has for its causes all the pure knowledges, up to and including the Knowledge of Destruction. 
tskk We have said that the knowledge of the dharmas is opposed to all of Kāmadhātu. 
Furthermore The knowledge of dharmas, in the Pathway of Meditation, when it bears on Extinction and the Path, is opposed to the three spheres. 
A knowledge of dharmas with respect to Extinction and the Path, realized in the course of the Path of Meditation is opposed to the three spheresthat is to say, these two knowledges oppose the defilements of the higher spheres which are abandoned through Meditation. 
Inferential knowledge is not opposed to Kāmadhātu. 
What are the aspects of the ten knowledges? 
A knowledge of dharmas and inferential knowledge have sixteen aspects. The sixteen aspects which will be explained later. Conventional knowledge is the same and otherwise. 
Conventional knowledge has the sixteen aspects; it also takes up others, for it grasps unique characteristics, common characteris tics, etc. 
Four, because of the aspect of their Truth. A knowledge of Suffering, Origin, Extinction, and the Path, bearing on the aspects of their Truths, each have four aspects. So too, when it is pure, the knowledge of the mind of another. 
The knowledge of the mind of another, in its impure part , bears on the aspects of its Truth; it therefore has four aspects. This part of the knowledge of the mind of apother is, in fact, made up of the knowledge of the Path. 
When it is impure, it has for its aspects the unique characteristics of its object. When the knowledge of the mind of another is impure, it grasps the unique characteristics of its object , namely the mind and the mental states of another. 
Its aspects are in conformity with these unique characteristics; therefore they are not included in the sixteen. Pure or impure IId. It has for its sphere an individual object. 
When it bears on a mind, it does not bear on a mental state ; when it bears on a certain mental state , it does not bear on any other one. 
If this is the case, why did the Blessed One say, He knows in truth the mind which is sarāga as being sarāga, since the knowledge of the mind of another does not know minds and mental states at one and the same time, in the same way that one does not grasp the cloth and its stain at one and the same time? 
A mind is sarāga because it ismixed with craving, or because it is united to craving. 
The mind associated with craving , that is to say, which is presently in the prey of craving, is serāga for two reasoṇs; it is mixed with craving, and it is united to craving. 
ĀAny other impure mind is solely sarāga to the extent that it is united to craving. 
Certain masters think that the Sūtra, by the expression sarāgacitta solely designates a mind mixed with craving, that is to say, a mind associated with ctaving. 
As for the vgaiarāga mind, a mind without craving, this is, according to these masters, the mind opposed to craving. 
In fact, they say, if the mind not associated with craving were called vigatarāga, the mind associated with the other defilements would be also termed vigararāga, for they are not associated with craving. 
In this hypothesis a nondefiled, indeterminate mind is not serāga, since it is not associated with craving; it is not vigatarāga, since it is not opposed to craving. 
As a consequence we must admit that what the other masters say, that the mind is serāga through the fact of being united to craving, without it ṉecessarily being mixed with craving. In this same way we must explain the other expressions of ṭhe Sūtra up to possessing delusion and not possessing delusion. 
zekk A good mind is called concentrated because it is not tarned away from its object. 
A defiled mind is distracted, because it is associated with distraction. 
The Westerners, or Masters of Gandhāra, say: A mind associated with laziness is concentrated; a distracted mind is any other defiled mind. do not admit this definition. They say: 
In this system, the same mind, namely a defiled mind associated with laziness, will be at one and the same time concentrated and distracted. 
Further, this system contradicts the Mñālaśāstra , which says, He knows in truth the concentrated mind, endowed with the four knowledges, a knowledge of dharmas, inferential knowledge, worldly conventional knowledge, and a knowledge of the Path. 
a defiled mind is of small force, for the roots of good, cut off, are reborn ; a good mind is of great force, for the Patience of the Knowledge of the dharmas concerned with Suffering definitively cuts off ten latent defilements. 
This is why a defiled mind is called small, and a good mind, great. 
The defiled mind is stara, because it is associated with frivolity ; the good mind is anṉuara, because it is opposed to frivolity. 
Calm and not calm minds are explained in the same way. 
:kk A defiled mind is nonabsorbed, because it is associated with distraction; a good mind is absorbed, because it is opposed to distraction. 
A defiled mind is uncultivated, because the two cultivations are absent. 
A good mind is cultivated, for the contrary reason. 
A defiled mind is undelivered, not being delivered in and of itself, nor delivered with regard to the series in which it arises. 
A good mind can be delivered in and of itself and from the point of view of the series in which it arises. Such is the explanation of the Vaibhāṣikas. 
This explanation, does not conform to the Sūtra and it does not take into account the meaning of the terms. 
How does it not conform to the Sūtra? 
The Sūtra says, What is a mind internally concentrated? 
A mind which is accompanied by torpor and laziness, or a mind internally accompanied by calm but not insight. 
What is a mind externally distracted? 
A mind which is dispersed towards the five objects of pleasure, or which is externally accompanied by insight, but not by calm. 
But, we have said that if a mind associated with laziness is concentrated, a defiled mind, when it is associated with laziness, will be at one and the same time concentrated and distracted. 
In fact, we can only affirm that a defiled mind, when it is associated with laziness, is distracted. 
But, your thesis contradicts the Śāstṛa! It may. 
But it is better to contradict a Śāstra than a Sūtra. 
How does this explanation lack the proper meaning of the different terms? 
It is false that we do not indicate the special sense of the different terms. 
In the same way we explain the particular qualities of the different good minds, in which their good qualities are not differentiated. 
We answer that the meaning of the different terms is not correctly established because you fail to eliminate the objection of contradiction with the Sūtra. 
Aṇnd if, , the Sūtra designates, by the sunkendown mind, a small mind, it would not speak separately of a sunkendown mind and a small mind. 
Now it distinguishes them, for it says, When the mind is sunken down, or fears becoming sunken down, this is not a proper time to cultivate the prasrabdhi, samādhi, and upekṣa parts of Bodhi, When the mind is small or fears becoming small, this is not a fitting moment to cultivate the dharmavicaya, vīrya, and prīi paṟts of Bodhi. 
Objection Is the cultivation of the parts of Bodhi partial in the case which concerns us? 
The mind in which indolence dominates and in which frivolity is reduced is called sunken down. 
But, taking into consideration the fact that these two defilements, indolence and frivolity, coexist in a single mental heap, we say that the mind which is sunken down is small. 
1We do not pretend to challenge a text of intentional meaning; but such is not the intention of the Sūtra skk rs The Knowledges 1105 In the thesis presented above that all minds united with craving possess craving , what is the meaning of the expression rāgasaynkta, united with craving? 
If a mind is united with craving, and as a consequence possesses craving, because the possession of craving continues in the series in which this mind is produced, then the mind of an imperfect saint or Śaikṣa, even when it is pure, will be termed possessing craving, since the craving has not been completely expelled from the series of the Śaikṣa. 
If a mind is both united with craving and possesses craving through the fact of being the object of the active craving, then the impure mind of an Arhat will possess craving, sṣince this mind can be the object of the craving of another person. 
If you do not admit that the mind of an Arhat can be grasped as an object through the craving of another person, how can this mind be termed impure? 
Would you say that it is impure, not because it is the object of the craving of another, but because it is the object of a general defilement of another? 
In fact the knowledge of the mind of another does not bear on the possessions which can be found in the series of another. 
The knowledge of the mind of another no longer knows the craving which would be the object of the mind of another. 
Therefore a mind is not termed rarāga through the fact of rāgasayoga, through the fact of being united with rāga in the proposed twofold sense. 
Vigatarāga, without craving is a mind which is not associated with craving, even when this mind will be accompanied by the possession of craving. 
The expression vigatarāga cannot have this meaning; for another Sūtra says that a mind which is without craving , without anger , and without ignorance , does not fall back into threefold existence. 
Have you not refuted your own opinion? 
We said in fact that if one calls a mind without craving vigatarāga, that is, a mind in which craving is not presently active, then one should terrm all minds associated with another defilement vigatarāga. 
But one does not say that a mind associated with hatred is vigaṭarāga, without craving. 
There is nothing wrong with saying that a mind withoūt craving is vgaarāga. 
ktkk When the knowledge of the mind of another attains its object, namely the mind of another person, does it attain this mind of another as this latter knows it? 
When one knows the mind of another, one does not see the object of this mind; one does not see this mind as it itself knows something: 
one knows only that it is defiled, etc.; one does not know the object, colot, etc., by reason of which it is defiled. 
If it were otherwise, the knowledge of the mind of another would bear on rpa, etc.,and would no longer be the knowledge of the mind of another; the knowledge of the mind of another would bear on itself: for the person whose mind I know can at the same moment know my mind. 
The characteristics of the knowledge of the mind of another are set: it knows the individual characteristics of a thing but not its general, conventionally true characteristics ; it knows mind and mental states but not physical matter, the present but not the past or future, of another but not of oneself, of the sphere of Kāmadhātu and Rūpadhātu, but not of Ārūpyadhātu; or rather the pure mind and mental states, of the category to which he himself belongs: 
The knowledge of the mind of another is incompatible with the Path of Seeing and the Uninterrupted Path , with the Samādhi of Emptiness and the Samādhi of NoMarks, and with the Knowl edge of Destruction and the Knowledge of NonArising. 
In fact, these two Knowl edges, even though they are of the absolute level of truth, are also included in the conventional level of truth ; they are therefore foreign to the aspects of emptiness and nonself. 
my births are cut off, the religious life has been fully cultivated, I have done what should have been done, and I do not know of any more existences for me. 
Are there any pure aspects outside of these sixteen aspects? 
There are no pure aspects outside of the sixteen. 
The Masters of Kaśmīr say that there are no pure aspects outside of the sixteen. Some others, according to the Śāstra, affirm that there are. The Foreign Masters maintain the opposite opinion. 
The Mālaśāstra says, Canṉ one distinguish the dharmas belonging to Kāmadhātu through a mind not included among the Dhātus ? 
One can distinguish them as they are, as impermanent, suffering, empty, impersonal, cause, proximate cause, near cause, specificing cause; there is this characteristic , there is this cause. 
One should thus consider the specific aspects through the exptessions asty eaḥ sthānam, asty etad vastū, ās tWO purE aspECtS which are added to the eight aspects of suffering and origin. 
The Foreign Masters answer that this interpretation is not admissible. 
Fot, if the Śāstra employs the terms asty ekat sthānan... without referring to the pure aspects, but only through simple phraseology, it would also employ them in a parallel passage, namely when it explains, Can one distinguish the dharmas belonging to Kāmadhātu by a mind susceptible of being abandoned by Seeing the Truths? 
Yes, one can distinguish them, namely, one becomes attached to, one hates, one prides oneself, one errs, one erroneously distinguishes these dharmas as self, mine , as eternal or perishable , as noncause, nonāc tion, nonexistent , as supreme, excellent, distin guished, superior , as purification, deliverance, salvation , with anxiety, disagreement, or doubt. 
This text should have the expressions asiy etat sthā nam...,if they solely signify asty aya yogaḥ, in the sense that it is fatal that a mind susceptible of being abandoned through the Seeing of the Truths considers the dharmas as self, mine... 
eskk How many things constitute the sixteen aspects? 
The aspects are sixteen things. 
Certain masters said that the aspects, sixteen in name, are only seven in fact. The four aspects of the Truth of Suffering are in fact distinct from one another. The aspects of the other Truths, in their fourfold name, only constitute one thing for each Truth: bex , samudaya , prabhava , and pratyaya are synonyms and are only one aspect; in the same way that Śakra, Indra, and Puradara are different names for one and the same personage. Ascetics contemplate, separately, the four aspects of the Truth of Suffering, and any one of the aspects, material cause, etc., of the three other Truths. But maintain that the sixteen aspects exist in fact,. For the Truth of Suffering: Impermanence, because it arises dependent upon efficient causes. 
Suffering, because it resembles a burden. mpty, because it is empty of puruṣa. Nosoul, because it does not obey the will. 
Cause , because it comes about from that. Arising , because there is emergence:. Appearance , as it is a procession. Condition or foundation, that is, the essential element from the action of generation. 
Extinction, because of the cessation of the former suffering and of the noncontinuation of subsequent suffering. Calm, because it is delivered from the three conditioned characteristics. Excellent, because it is absolutely good. For the Truth of the Path: Path, because it is opposed to the wrong path. 
Since ancient explanations differ, we are permitted to present a third explanation: 
Suffering, because it is repugnant to the mind of Āryans. mpty, because no āman is found in it. No soul, because this is not an ājman. 
the four aspects of the Second Truth, cause , arising , appearaṅṇce , and condition , are explained according to the Stra, Fhe five xpādānaskandhas are chandam laka, chandasamudaya, chandajātīya, chandaprabhava, that is to say they have chanda for their root or hetu, which brings about their arising , for their condition , for their appearance. 
kitsk Whas is the difference between these four types of proces sions? 
Twhe first desire is the initial cause of snfferingas the seed is the initial cause of the fruit; it is called herx. 
The second desire is that which brings about reexistenceas the production of the shoot, ṣtalk, etc., is a casual process or arising which brings about fruit; it is therefore called samudaya, a cause which brings forth. 
The third desire is the cause which determines the quality of suffering,as the field, the water, the fertilizer, etc., determine the virility, the ripening, the appearance of the fruit; it is therefore called prayaya, or condition.9 The fourth desire is the cause from whence the fruit appears as the flower is the cause of the fruit; it is therefore called prabhāva, o appearance. 
The fourth desire is the immediate or direct cause; the other three are the mediate or indirect causes. 
And again, according to the Sūtra, theṟe are two groups of five modes of desire , and two groups of four, which are, respectively, the four desires studied above. 
There is produced a desire for reincarnation, which is fourfold; It is absolutely necessary that I may be, that I may be such, the same, different. 
Extinction, because it cuts off transmigration. 
Calm, because it is cessationof all suffering; thus it is said, AIl the seskāras, Oh Bhīkṣus, are suffering; only Nirvāṇa aḻone is absolute calmn. 3, Excellent, because it is the highest. Definitive salvation, because it is without returning. 
For the Truth of the Path: Path, because it resembles the right path. Truth, because it is true. 
3, Obtaining, because it is determined; that is to say one arrives by this path and not by another, as it is said, This path leads to purity, other systems do not lead to it. 
Furthermore, it is in order to cure persons who nourish views of permanence, bliss, of things pertaining to the self, and a soul ṭhat the aspects of impermanence, suffering, empty, and nosoul are established. The cause aspect is opposed to the view, There is only one cause. 
The extinction aspect is opposed to the view that there is no deliverance. 
The calm aspect is opposed to the view that deliverance is suffering. 
The excellent aspect is opposed to the view that the happiness of the dhyānas and samapāttis is excellent. 
The definitive release aspect is opposed to the view that deliverance is subject to falling, that it is not definitive. 
The Path, truth, cultivation, and definitive release aspects oppose, respectively, the views that there is no path, that a false path is the Path, that there is another path, and that the Path is subject to falling. 
The aspects are by their nature mental prgjñā oṟ discernment. 
But, we would say, if this is so, then prjñā, the knowledge that discerns the dharmas, will not be endowed with the aspects, for prajñā cannot be associated with prajñā.It is therefore correct to say that aspect is a mode of perceiving objects by the mind and mental states. 
the other minds and mental states, which are associated with praj0ā, ate subject and object; and 3, all the other dharmas, conditioned or unconditioned, are only object. 
kṣkk We have explained the aspects of the ten knowledges; we must now explain their natures, the sphere which serves as their support , and the person in whom they arise. 
The first is worldly, conventional knowledge, because this knowledge is named first in the Kārika , and is of three types, good, bad, or neutral. wThe nine other knowledges are only good. 
The knowledge of the mind of another is only obtained in the Four Dhyānas, and nowhere else. 
Beings in Kāmadhātu and Rūpadhātu realize the knowledge of the mind of another. The knowledge of dharmas, a person in Kāmādhātu. The knowledge of dharmas can only be realized by a person in Kāmadhātu, and notby a person in either Rāpadhātu or Ārūpyadhātu. Others, in persons of the three spheres. What are the other knowledges? They are the eight knowledges with the exception of the knowledge of the mind of another and the knowledge of dharmas. 
We have explained the spheres in which one acquires the knowledges, and the sphere to which the persons who can acquire the knowledges belong. 
The knowledge of Extinction is an application of mindfulness. 
The knowledge of Extinction is an application of mindfulness which relates to a dharma. The knowledge of the mind of another is threefold. The knowledge of the mind of another, related to the mind of another, necessarily relates to vedanā, saṅṅjñā, and the saskāras. The others, four. By excluding the knowledge of Extinction and the knowledge of the mind of another, the other eight knowledges have the four applications of mindfulaness for their nature. 
kkk The different knowledges are the object of how maṅny other knowledges? 
Nine knowledges are the object of a knowledge of dharmas. Excluding inferential knowledge. 
Nine are the object of inferential knowledge and knowledge of the Path. Excluding the knowledge of dharmas in inferential knowledge; by excluding worldly conventional knowledge in the knowledge of the Path, because it does not form part of the Path. 
Two are the object of the knowledge of Suffering and Origin. Ḷ Worldly conventional knowledge and the part of the knowl edge of the mind of another which is impure, are the object of a knowledge of Suffering and of Origin. Ten, of four. 
Ten knowledges are the object of worldly conventional knowledge, a knowledge of the mind of another, the Knowledge of Destruction and the Knowledge of NonArising. None are the object of one. 
No knowledge is the object of the knowledge of Extinction whose only object is Extinction obtained through conscious effort. 
How many dharmas constitute in their totality the object of the ten knowledges? 
How many Aharmas constitute the object of each knowledge? 
The totality of their object is ten dharrnas.M What are these ten dharmas? 
The unconditioned dharmas aṟe divided into two classes, good and neutraḹ. 
Woṟldly conventional knowledge is related to ten dharmas; 2. 
a knowledge of ḍharmas is related to five: two dharmas of Kāmadhātu, associated or not with the mind; and a good unconditioned dharma; 3. 
inferential knowledge is related to seven: two of Rāpadhātu, two of Ārūpyadhātu, and two pure, which make six, and a good unconditioned dharma; 45. 
the knowledge of Suffering and of Origin are related to only good unconditioned dharmas; 7. 
a knowledge of the Path is related to the two pure dharmas; 8. 
a knowledge of the mind of another is related to three; the dharmas associated with the mind which are of Kāmadhātu, and of the Rūpadhātu, and pure; 910. 
the Knowledge of Destruction and the Knowledge of NonArising are related to nine dharmas, with the exception of neutral uncondi tioned dharmas. 
kṣkestk Can one, through a single knowledge, know all of the dharmas? 
When a moment of conventional knowledge knows ail the dharmas as not being a self, this is with the exception, in the totality of the dharmas, of 1. 
itself, this same moment of conventional knowledge, for the subject of knowledge cannot be its own object; 2. 
the mental ḍharmas which are assōciated with it, for they have the same object as it does; and 3. the dharīmas disassociated from the mind but which accompany it, for example, its characteristics , for they are too close. 
This conventional knowledge of universal consciousness belongs only to Kāmadhātu, being prajñā of hearing or reflection , not prajñā of absorption , for the conventional knowl edge which is of this third type of prajñā always has a determined sphere for its object. 
kṣksk wThe different categories of humans are endowed with how many knowledges? 
As for the Āryaṇ, Not detached, in the first pure moment, he possesses one knowledge. 
In the second moment, he possesses three knowledges. At the moment of the knowledge of dharmas related to Suffering, he possesses worldly conventional knowledge, a knowledge of Zharmas, and a knowledge of Suffering. 
Beyond, in four moments, each time adding a knowledge. 
Consequently, having attained the knowledge of the dharmas related to the Path, the ascetic possesses seven knowledges. 
For an Āryan who, before entering into the Pure Path , has obtained detachment through a worldly path, we must add the knowledge of the mind of another. 
A samayavi mukta Arhat possesses nine knowledges, by adding the Knowledge of Extinction; an asamayavimukta Āṛhat in addition possesses the Knowledge of NonArising. 
How many knowledges does the ascetic cultivate at one and the same time in different stages, the Path of Seeing the Truths, and in the Path of Meditation, etc.? 
In Seeing, future patiences and knowledges exist to the extent to which they are produced. Those which are produced are acquired or cultivated. For example, when an ascetic produces the Patience of the knowledge of the dharmas related to Suffering, he cultivates future Patience of this same type, and he takes possession of future Patience of this ṣame type. 
Why, in the Path of Seeing, is there only acquisition of the knowledge and the aspects of the type of knowledge and the aspects produced? 
Twhe ascetic takes possession of future conventional knowledge at the moment of the three inferential knowledges of Suffering, Origin, and Extinction : not at the moment of the knowledge of the dharmas, because, in the knowledge of the dharmas, each Truth has not been understood in its totality, but only relating to Kāmadhātu. 
Why does an ascetic not take possession of it at the mornent of inferential knowledge of the Path ? 
Because the Path has not been understood formerly, through a worldly path, under its aspects of Path, Truth, etc. 
Because the Path is not susceptible of being understood in its entirety. Suffering, its Origin, and its Extinction can be respec tively known, abandoned, realized, in their entirety; but the Path caṇnot be practiced in its entirety. Without doubt one cannot say of a person who is in the Path of Seeing, that, at the end of his comprehension of the Truths of Origin and Extinction, he has complete abandoning of Origin, and complete realization of Extinction: 
yet a time will come when this abandoning and this realization will be complete. 
But the same does not hold for the Path, given the diversity of families of the Śrāvakas, Pratyekabuddhas, and Buddha. 
Now the sixteenth moment of this comprehen sion forms part of the Path of Meditation. 
We would say that this argument does not hold, for one should not regard the fact that conventional knowledge does not accompany the Path of Meditation as a proof.! 
This knowledge does not arise when the ascetic is in contem plation, nor when the ascetic has left his contemplation. 
Formerly it was not acquired, but ṉnow it is acqunired. 
How can it be acquired, since it is not produced? 
It is termed acqnired because īt is acquired. 
Ācquired because it is acquired, is an unprecedented manner of speaking. 
According to these Masters, one acquires conventional knowledge through the power of the Āryamārga. 
After one has left the contemplation of the Āryamārga, a conventional knowledge bearing on the Truths is realized, and it is much more distin guished than that which preceeds the obtaining of the Āryamārga itself. When one says that an ascetic acquired this conventional knowledge through the Path of Seeing, one means to speak of the acqnisition of a personality capable of realizing of this conventional knowledge, as the acquisition of a mineral containing gold is called the acquisition of gold itself. 
The Vaibhāṣikas do not accept this manner of seeing things. They hold that the socalled agbhiśsamayāntika conventional knowledge is an unarisen dharma. From the sphere or from a lower sphere. When one realizes the Path of Seeing of a certain sphere , one acquires, in the future, the conventional knowledge of this sphere or of a lower sphere. This means that if one realizes the Path of Seeing in the state of Anāgamya, one acquires, in the future, the Path of Seeing of a single sphere , and oṉe acquires, in the future, the conventional knowledge of two spheres : and so on until: if one realizes the Path of Śeeing in the Fourth Dhyāṇna, one acquires, in the future, the Path of Seeing of six spheres , and one acquires, in the future, the conventional knowledge of seven spheres. 
If one cultivates conventional knowledge at the end of Suffering and Origin, that is to say in the moments of the inferential knowledge of Suffering and the inferential knowledge of Origin, conventional knowledge is by nature the four foundations of mindfulness. If one cultivates at the end of Extinction,that is, in the moment of the inferential knowledge of Extinction,it is only the last foundation of mindfulness, namely the foundation of mindfulness related to dharmas. It has the aspects of its Truth. When one cultivates conventional knowledge at the end of the comprehension of a certain truth, the conventional knowledge takes on the aspects of this Truth and has this Truth for its object. It proceeds from effort. Being acquired through the power of the Path of Seeing, it is exclusively obtained through effort; it does not arise from detachment. 
ḵkk The knowledges are so called because knowledge is the major element in them; if one takes into consideration their followings, they make up four skandhas in Kāmadhātu, and five skandhas in Rūpadhātu. 
kikk 1ow many knowledges does one cultivate in the different states of the Path of Meditation? 
In the sixteenth moment , the ascetic who is not detached from Kāmadhātu cultivates two knowledges in the present; he cultivates six knowledges in ṭhe future: 
Through detachment, seven. With respect to the ascetic already detached from Kāmadhātu, at the moment when he attains inferential knowledge of the Path, one should add the cultivation of the knowledge of the mind of another, the seventh. Above, in the Path of Meditation associated with sensual desire, there is the cultivation of seven. 
Beyond the sixteenth moment, that is, in the rest of the Path of Meditation, as long as one has not obtained detachment, in the preparatory paths, the uninterrupted paths, the paths of deliver ance, and in the excellent paths,there is cultivation of seven knowledges, namely a knowledge of the dbarmas, inferential knowledge, the knowledges of the Four Truths, and worldly, conventional knowledge. 
If one cultivates a worldly path, one also, in the present, cultivates worldly conventional knowledge. 
If one cultivates a transworldly path, one also, in the present, cultivates one of the four knowledges of the dharmas. 
One will cultivate the other six knowledges in the future. 
In the uninterrupted paths of the victory over seven spheres, of the acquisition of the supernormal krowledges, and of the quality of Immovability, of mixed meditation. And also in the eight paths of higher deliverance. Based on the preceding, add there is cultivation of seven knowledges. 
One cultivates seven knowledges, the same as above, in the uṉinterrupted paths which make up: 
victory over seven spheres, that is to say detachment from the Four Dhyānas and the three Ārūpyas: these spheres are vanquished when one is detached from them; 2. the acquisition of five supernormal knowledges, with the exception of the sixth ; 3. entry into Immovability ; 4. the mixed meditation of the Śaikṣa. If the ascetic cultivates these paths through a worldly path, he cultivates, in the present, conventional knowledge; if he follows a transworldly path, he cultivates in the present one of the four inferential knowledges, and one of the two knowledges of ḍharmas. 
.In the acquisition of the quality of Immovability, he does not cultivate conventional knowledge; for this latter is not opposed to Bhavāgra. 
Here the Knowledge of the Destruction is the seventh knowledge. 
Above the detachment from the seven spheres, in the first eight paths of deliverance of Bhavāgra, the ascetic cultivates, in the future, seven knowledges, namely the knowledge of dharmas, inferential knowledge, the knowledges of the Four Truths, and the knowledge of the mind of another; he does not cultivate conventional knowledge, because this knowledge is not opposed to Bhavāgra. 
He cultivates, in the present, one of the four inferential knowledges or one of the two knowledges of dharmas. 
The Śaikṣa, in the path of deliverance of the perfectioning of the faculties, cultivates six or seven knowledges. 
The Śaikṣa in the path of deliverance of the perfectioning of his faculties , cultivates six knowledges when he is not detached. 
When he is detached, he cultivates seven knowledges, the knowledge of the mind of another being the seventh. 
Some other masters say that conventional knowledge is cultivated by one who is not detached as well as by one who is detached. 
In the uninterrupted path, he cultivates six knowl edges. 
Detached or nondetached, he cultivates six knowledges, as above, in the uninteṟrrupted path of the perfection ing of his faculties. 
In the uninterrupted paths of detachment from Bhavāgra, the Śaikṣa cultivates six knowledges. 
The ninth path of deliverance of detachment from Bhavāgra is called the Knowledge of Destruction. 
The ascetic then cultivates nine knowledges, with the exception of the ṚKnowledge of NonArising. 
An Immovable One cultivates ten knowledges. 
wThe saint who is from the beginning an Immovable One cultivates ten knowledges at the moment when he produces the Knowledge of Destruction, for at this moment he obtains the Knowledge of NonArising. 
The ascetic who obtains the state of Immovability through the perfectioning of his faculties also cultivates ten knowledges in the last path of this perfectioning. 
the paths of deliverence from detachment to the seven spheres, to the five sipernormal knowledges, to mixed meditation of the Śaikṣa ; 3, the first eight paths of deliverance of the perfectioning of ṭthe faculties leading to the state of Immovability ; and 4. 
the preparatory path and the excellent path of one who is detached. 
In all these paths, there is cultivation of eight future knowl edges, with the exception of the Knowledge of Destruction and the Knowledge of NonArising. 
kskk The Aśaikṣa, in the preparatory path, the path of deliverance, and the excellent path of the five supernormal knowledges and of mixed meditation, cultivates nine knowledges or ten knowledges, depending on whether the Aśaikṣa is a saemayavimukta or an asamayavimukta. 
In the uninterrupted paths of the same , he cultivates either eight or nine knowledges, with the exception of the knowledge of the mind of another in both cases. 
Nevertheless, in the path of deliverance of the two supernor mal knowledges which are neutral , this path being itself morally neutralthere is no cultivation of any future knowledge. 
As for the Prṛthagjana,in the ninth path of deliverance of detachment from Kāmadhātu and the three Dhyānas; in the preparatory paths; in the paths of deliverance of the three supeṟnormal knowledges; in the realizations of the spiritual qualities, Apramāṇas, Vimokṣas, etc.: 
all these paths being cultivated in the Dhyānas ,he cultivates, in the future, conventional knowledge and the knowl edge of the mind of another; but not in the nirvedhabhāgīāyas because three constitute the following of the Path of Seeing. 
In the other cases, obtaining a path not previously obtained, he cultivates solely, in the future, conventional knowledge. 
kskṣk To which sphere does the knowledge belong which is culti vated in the worldly and transworldly paths? 
A knowledge of the mind of another, a future cultivation, belongs to the sphere which serves as the support of the Path, or rather to the sphere which one obtains through the Path. 
It is not a rule that pure knowledge, cultivated in the future, will belong to the sphere which serves as the support for its arising. 
The knowledge that one cultivates in the future belongs to the sphere from which one is detached, to the sphere acquired, or to a lower sphere. 
When, in order to become detached from one sphere an ascetic cultivates the paths of the two classes, pure or impure, he cultivates pure knowledges which are either of the sphere which he obtains for the first time by these paths, of the sphere which is the support of the path, or of a lower sphere. 
In the knowledge of destruction, the pure is also of all spheres.1 At the moment when a knowledge of the destruction of the cankers arises , there is cultivated the qualities of ail the spheres, including the impure ones, namely the Aprarnāṇas, the Vimokṣas, etc. 
In fact, Vajropamasamādhi cuts off these ties which are the possessions of the defilements; all the qualities will be found in a series freed from the defilements; one can thus say that they breathe , in the manner of a sack when one cuts the ropes that bind it. 
all the good dharmas come towards him, as vassals come to present their homage to a prince who accedes to supreme kingship. 
sxttk Is eveṟything that has been previously obtained also cultivated? 
That which has been obtained previously is not cultivated. 
That which, having been obtained and lost is obtained anewthat is to say, is newly realized or actualizedis not cultivated, that is, the ascetic does not take possession of it for the future. 
Does the term cultivation only designate acquisi tion? 
Cultivation is of four types: 
acquisition, 2. practice, 3. opposition, and 4. expulsion. Cultivation of good conditioned dharmas is acquisition and practice; there is cultivation of opposition and expulsion with respect to impure dharmas. 
There is cultivation of acquisition and practice with respect to the good conditioned dharmas, acquisition with ṛrespect to the future and acquisition and practice with respect to the present. These two cultivations rest on the first two efforts, effort for the arising of what has not yet arisen, and effort for the growth of what has already arisen. 
There is cultivation of opposition and expulsion with respect to impure dharmas; they rest on the last two efforts, effort for the nonarising of what has not arisen, and effort for the destruction of what has already arisen. 
four as above, plus the cultivation of constraint , and the cultivation of inspection. 
ṟhe first is the cultivation of the organs, the eye, etc.; the second is the cultivation of the body, as it says in the Sūtra, These six organs well subdued, well gunarded... 
and, There is in the body the beard, hair, etc. 
The Vaibhāṣikas of Kaśmīr however think that these two cultivations should be included within the cultivation of opposition and expulsion. 
Among these qualities, there are fitst those which are uniquely proper to the Buddha, which the Bodhisattva acquires at the moment of the Knowledge of Destruction in becoming an Ārhat and, at the same time, a Buddha. 
ṟThese qualities are eighteen in number. 
The dharmas unique to the Buddha are eighteen, the powers, etc. 
The ten powers, the four absences of fear, the three founda tions of mindfulness, and great compassion: this group constitutes the eighteen dharmas unique to the Buddha, so called because others do not acquire them by becoming Arhats. 
There are ten knowledges in sthānāsthāna; The power which consists of the knowledge of what is possible and what is impossible is made up of ten knowledges. 
Eight in karmaphala, The power which consists of the knowledge of the retribution of actions is made up of eight knowledges, with the exception of the knowledge of the Path and Extinction. 
Nine in the Dhyāṇas, etc., in the Indriyas, in the Abhimokṣas, in the Dhātus; The power of the knowledge of the Dhyānas, Vimokṣas, Samādhis and Samāpattis; the power of the knowledge of the degree of the moral faculties of beings; the power of the knowledge of the different aspirations of beings; and the power of the knowledge of the different acquired dispositions of beingsthese four powers are made up of nine knowledges, excluding the knowledge of extinction. 
Nine or ten in the paths; The power of the knowledge of the paths which lead to the different realms of rebirth and to Nirvāṇa, is made up of either nine knowledges or ten knowledges. If one understands the Path with its result, this power then includes the knowledge of extinction ; but if one understands the Path without its result, then this power is made up of nine knowledges. 
Two are conventional knowledges; The power of the knowledge of former abodes and the power of the knowledge of the death and rebirth of beings are both conventional knowledges. Destruction is made up of six or ten knowledges. 
The power of the knowledge of the destruction of the cankers is made up of six or ten knowledges. 
the ten knowledges exist in such a series. ratrk As for the spheres which serve as the support for the powers: 
They arise in a male body in Jambudvīpa, that is to say in the Buddha, for Buddhas do not appear outside of Jambudvīpa. 
Because its power does not know any obstacle. The knowledge which knows all the objects of knowledge without any obstacle is called a power. 
This is why the ten powers exist only in the Buddha, because the Buddha, having expelled all the cankers and all the traces of ignorance, knows all objects of his own accord. It is not the same for the knowledges of others, and as a consequence these knowledges are not called powers. 
According to tradition, Śāriputra refused a person who asked for admission to the Order; he was not capable of seeing the number of the previous and subsequent births of a pigeon chased by a hawk.1 The Buddhas knowledge is exercised without obstacle, the power of his mind is infinite and envelopes all objects. 
ksiesk If such is the power of his mind, what is the power of his body? 
the same for Cāṇūra and Mahānagna. 
The power of the body of the Buddha is equal to that of Nārāyaṇa. According to others, in his parts; According to others, each part of his body possesses this power. 
The Bhadanta, , says that his physical power is like his mental power, that is, infinite; for, if it were otherwise, the body of the Blessed One would not be able to support infinite knowledge. 
What is the extent of Nārāyaṇa power? This is a power the seventh term of a series which begins with the elephant and in which each term is worth ten times the preceeding; There is a series: 
ten prākṛtahastins make one gandhahastin and so on. 
According to others, however, it is a rpa derived from the primary elements, but a derived rāpa different from the seven derived tangibles, lakṣṇabva, etc. 
As for the four assurances , Assuraṇce is fourfold The Buddha possesses four assurances which are explained in the Sūtra. 
The first assurance, the assurance that he has attained supreme comprehension with respect to all the dharmas, resem bles the first power ; it consists of ten knowledges, and can exist in all of the spheres. 
The second assurance, the assurance that he has the knowledge of the destruction of all the defilements, resembles the tenth power, the power of the knowledge of the destruction of the defilements: it consists of ten knowledges, and can exist in six spheres. 
The third assurance, the assurance that he can fully explain. the dhaṛmas, resembles the second power, the power of the knowledge of the retribution of actions: it consists of eight knowledges, and can exist in all of the spheres. 
The fourth assurance, the assurance that he can explain the Path leading to definitive deliverance, resembles the seventh power, the power of the knowledge of the paths which lead to the different realms of rebirth and to Nirvāṇa: it consists of ten or nine knowledges, and can exist in all of the spheres. 
How can the knowledges be called assurances ? 
the assurances, being a result of knowledge, are not knowledge by nature. 
ktk What are the three applications of mindfulness of the Buddha? 
Three are mindfulness and awareness. 
The Sūtra explains at length the three applications of mindfulness of the Buddha: 
When his disciples, unanimous, respectfully listen, accept and practice his teaching, he experiences neither joy nor satisfaction, but he remains indifferent, in full mindfulness and awareness. 
When his disciples, unanimous, do not hear, do not accept and do not practice his teaching, he does not experience displeasure nor impatience, but he remains indifferent, in full mindfulness and awareness. 
When some of his disciples hear, accept and practice his teaching, while others, not hearing, do not accept and do not practice his teaching, he does not experience joy and displeasure, but remains indifferent in full mindfulness and awareness. 
These three applications of mindful ness are, by their nature, mindfulness and awareness. 
But a Śrāvaka who is free from the cankers, whose disciples are either respectful or not respectful, or respectful and not respectful, experiences neither joy nor displeasure, nor either joy or displeasure. 
Because the Buddha has abandoned joy and displeasure along with their traces. 
Or rather because the disciples are the disciples of the Buddha: it is admirable that the Buddha does not experience either joy or displeasure from their respect or disrespect; but the disciples are not the disciples of the Śrāvakas from whom they receive the teaching: there is nothing admirable in the fact that these Śrāvakas do not experience joy or displeasure. 
Great compassion is, by its nature, conventional knowledge. 
In the contrary case, it would be, in its natare, absence of hatred as is oṟdinary compassion ; like ordinary compas sioṉ, it would not embrace all beings of the Three Dhātus, it would ṉot envision the three types of suffering. 
Why is the compassion of the Blessed One termed great? 
By reason of its factors ; it is produced in fact by a great provisioning of merit and knowledge. 
it considers things as painful by reason of the threefold suffering, the suffering inherent in suffering itself, the suffering inherent in change, and the suffering inherent in the saskāras , whereas ordinary compassion only envisions the suffering inherent in suffering itself. 
3.By reason of the object, for it has for its object all beings in the Three Dhātus. 
By reason of its equality, for it is equally concerned with the happiness and benefit of all being. 
5.By reason of its excellence, for no other compassion which has arisen surpasses it.1 How does great compassion differ from ordinary compassion? 
It differs from ordinary compassion in eight ways. With respect to its nature: ordinary compassion is absence of hatred, whereas great compassion is absence of ignorance. 
ordinary compassion takes on the form of one suffering, whereas great compassion takes on the form of threefold suffering. 
ordinary compassion is concerned with the beings of one Dhātu, whereas great compassion is concerned with the Three Dhātus. 
ordinary compassion is of the sphere of the Four Dhyāṇnas, whereas great compassion is of the sphere of the Fourth Dhyāṇna. 
ordinary compassion is obtained through detachment from Kāmadhātu, whereas great compassion is obtained through detachment from Bhavāgra. 
ordinary compassion does not protect, whereas great compassion protects. 
ordinary compassion is an unequal compassion, for it sympathizes only with beings who are suffering, whereas great compassion is an equal compassion, turned towards all beings equally. 
kṭk We have explained the qualities which belong only to the Buddhas and which distinguish them from other beings. 
Do the Buddhas resemble one another among themselves? 
In sabhāra, dharmakāya and their service to beings, the Buddhas are identical; not in their duration of life, their caste, their stature, etc. 
The Buddhas are identical in that they have, in their previous existences, eqnally accumulated merit and knowledge, in that they have realized the same dharmakāya; and in that they eqnally carry out seṛvice to others. 
But the Buddhas differ through the difference in the duration of their lives, their caste, their gora, the dimensions of their bodies, etc. 
The word e ceera indicates that the Dharma of the Buddhas lasts a long or short period of time, accordingly as, at the moment of their appearance, the beings to be converted are straight or crooked.? 
The Blessed One, in fact, has proclaimed, If anyone plants a small root of good in the field of merit which are the Buddhas, he will first possess heavenly realms of rebitth and then he will obtain the Deathless. 
We have explained the eighteen qualities unique to the Buddhas. 
teksk There are other qualities which the Buddhas have in common with Śaikṣas The Buddhas possess innumerable qualities which they have in common either with Śṛāvakas And Prthagjanas Orṟ with ordinary persons. Absence of Contention, Knowledge Resulting from ṚResolution, the Unhindered Knowledges, the Supernormal Knowledges, etc. 
The first three are common to both the Buddhas and the Āryans; the Supernormal Knowledges, the Dhyānas, etc., can also belong to ordinary persons. ksk Araṇā. 
The Arhats know that the sufferings of beings are produced through their defilements; they know thar they them selves are the most worthy field of merit ; they fear that others might generate defilements with respect to them ; thus they generate a knowledge of such a nature that no other person will produce, with respect to them, lust, hatred, pride, etc. 
This knowledge puts an end, in beings, to raṇa, or conteation, which is a defilement, a cause of torment: it is thus called rgṇā oṟ absence of contention. 
It is of the sphere of the Fourth Dhyāna; It exists in the Fourth Dhyāna, which is the best of the easy paths. 
for others are not capable of radically cutting off their own defilements and so they cannot arrest the defilements of others. It is produced by humans. 
It is produced by humans, for it is only a being in the human realm of rebirth who can cultivate it in the Three Dvīpas. It relates to the defilements of Kāmadhātu, is future, and has a real object. 
The avasinka defilements of others , which are abandoned through Seeing, are not susceptible of being arrested, for the universal defilements , which exist in the totality of their sphere, also exist in the series of another. 
kkḵ As is the Samādhi Absence of Contention, So too the Knowledge Resulting from Resolution;. 
Ñ Like the Samādhi Absence of Contention, the Knowledge Resulting from Resolution is, by nature, conventional knowledge; like Absence of Contention, it exists in the Fourth Dhyāna, it is produced in the series of an Immovable One, and it is meditated upon by a being in the human realm of rebirth. 
But, unlike the Samādhi Absence of Contention, it bears on all the dharmas. 
the Vaibhāṣikas say that the dharmas of Ārūpyadhātu are not known by a direct seeing through the Knowledge Resulting from Resolutionbeing of the Fourth Dhyāna, this knowledge does not bear on a higher sphere. These dharmas are known through inference. 
In fact, one knows 1. 
There are Four Unhindered Knowledges: the Unhindered Knowledge of ḍharmas, the Unhindered Knowledge of things , the Unhindered Knowledge of etymological explanations , and the Unhindered Knowledge of eloquence. They are like the Saṃādhi Absence of Contention in that they belong solely to the Inmmovable Ones who are humans. 
According to the School, the preparatory exercises of the Four Unhindered Knowledges are, in this order, the study of calculation, the word of the Buddha, the study of sounds , and the study of causes , for a person who has not cultivated these four disciplines is not capable of producing the Four Unhindered Knowledges. 
xkṅ The six qualities described above, Absence of Contention, etc. 
Even though the Unhindered Knowledge of etymological explanation may be obtained through the power of a Prāatakoṭika Dhyāna, it does not arise in the Fourth Dhyāna, for it has Kāmadhātu and the First Dhyāṇna for its sphere; consequently it is not included within the Fourth Prāntakoṭika Dhyāna. 
It is the last dhyāna, in a series with all the spheres and carried to its maximum. 
from a good mind of Kāmadhātu, oṉe enters into the First Dhyāna; from the First Dhyāṇna, into the Second, and so oṅ up to naivasajñānāsajñāya ṣana ; then, one redescends to a good mind of Kāmadhātu; finally, from this mind, one ascends again to the Fourth Dhyāṇna. 
One cultivates the Fourth Dhyāna; after having cultivated in an inferior manner, one cultivates in a medium manṇner; after having cultivated in a medium manner, one cultivates in a superior manner. 
The Dhyāna which possesses these two qualities is called prāntakoṭika,because its end has been traversed to the extreme. 
With the exception of the Buddha, the other Āryans acquire these six qualities, the Samādhi Absence of Contention, etc., only through effort, and not through detachment, since all do not possess them. 
The Buddha alone acquires them through detachment, for the Buddha obtains all his qualities in a single stroke, from the beginning, at the moment of the Knowledge of Destruction, through detachment. Later, he actualizes them at his will, without effort; for the Buddha is the master of all the dharmas that he possesses. 
kckk We have explained the three categories, Absence of Conten tion, Knowledge Resulting from Resolution, the Unhindered Knowledges, which are common to the Āryans. Among the qualities which also belong to ordinary persons we must explain the Supernormal Knowledges. 
Realization of the knowledge of supernormal power, of ear, of the mind, of past existences, of death and rebirth, of the destruction of the cankers; this is the sixfold supernormal knowledge. There are six supernormal knowledges: the supernormal knowledge which consists of the realization of the knowledge of the sphere of rddhi or supernormal power ; 2. the supernormal knowledge which consists of the realization of the knowledge of divine hearing; 3. the supernormal knowledge which consists of the realization of the knowledge or consciousness of the mind of another; 4. the supernormal knowledge which consists of the realization of the knowledge of the memory of past existences; 5. the supernoṟmal knowledge which consists of the realization of the knowledge of divine sight ; and 6. 
Four are conventional knowledge. Four, with the exception of the supernormal knowledge of the minds of others and the supernormal knowledge of the destruction. of the cankers, are conventional knowledges. The knowledge of the mind of another is made up of five knowledges. 
When they have been cultivated in a past life, they are acquired through detachment. 
The supernormal knowledge of the mind of another contains three applications of mindfulness,.vedanā, citta, and dharma because it has the mind and its mental states for its object. 
kk According to the Sūtra, there are three Aśaikṣa Wisdoms. To which supernormal knowledges do these wisdoms coṟṟrespond? 
Three supernormal knowledges are wisdorn, The three wisdoms,the Aśaikṣa wisdom which consists of the realization of the knowledge of past lives, the Aśaikṣa wisdom which consists of the realization of the knowledge of the death and biṟth of all beings, and the Aśaikṣa wisdom which consists of the realization of the knowledge of the destruction of the cankers, are, in the order of the Sūtra, the fifth, the second, and the sixth supernormal knowledges. 
Why are these three supernormal knowledges called wisdoms ? 
It is because the memory of past existences brings about the cessation of error relating to the past, the knowledge of death and birth brings about the cessation of error relating to the future, and the knowledge of the destruction of the cankers brings about the cessation of eṟror relating to the present. 
Which of these three supernormal knowledges really belongs to the Aśaikṣas? 
The Sūtra says that there are three methods of conversion. 
Conversion through the Teaching is the best. 
kxk ṣk What is ṛddhī? 
According to the Vaibhāṣikas, the word rḍdhi designates absoṟption or samādhi. The absoṟrption is so named, for it is due to it that the work succeeds. skḵ.What does rddhi consist of? 
From it, there arises displacement and fictive creation, Displacement is of three types: 
transport displacement, displacement through adhimokṣa , and rapid displace ment like the mind. 
quickly, like the mind; from whence its name of wanojava. 
Only the Buddha possesses it, not other beings. 
The body arrives at a great distance even in the time it takes to think of arriving there. 
This is why the Buddha said that the sphere of the Buddha is incomprehensible. The Master also possesses the other two displacements. 
The others possess displacement of transport and of adhimokṣa. 
Fictive creation in Kāmadhātu is made up of four external āyatanas, Fictive creation is of two types, of the sphere of Kāmadhātu, and of the sphere of Rūpadhātu. 
The second consists of the creationi of physical matter and tangibles only, because odors and tastes do not exist in Rūpadhāṭu. It is of two types. 
Fictive creation in Kāmadhātu is twofold, accordingly as it is connected with the body of the ascetic himself or with another: 
The same holds true of fictive creations in Rāpadhātṭu, A person who is in Kāmadhātu and one who is in Rūpadhātua are each capable of four types of fictive creations, so creation is eightfold. 
But when a person in Rūpadhātu produces a fictive creation in Kāmadhātu, is it not found to possess odor and taste? 
Yet certain masters say that a person in Rūpadhātu can only cṟeate two āyatanas, physical matter and tangibles, for they fear that if this person creates odors, etc., he will be found to possess odors, etc. 
How is this? 
It is created as a result of supeṟnormal knowledge. 
It is through a mind capable of creating fictive beings that one creates. They are fourteen in anumber. A result of supernormal knowledge are minds capable of creating fictive, created objects. These minds are fourteen in nummber. They are the results of the Dhyānas, from the number of two up to five, in this order. 
These minds are fourteen in number, being differentiated by their Dhyāna which serves as their support. 
Two minds are the results of the First Dhyāṇna: the first of the sphere of Kāmadhātu, and the second of the sphere of the First Dhyāṇa. 
Three minds are the results of the Second Dhyāna: two of the two lower spheres and one of the same sphere as the Dhyāna of which it is the result, so therefore of the Second Dhyāna. 
In the same way four and five minds are the results of the Third and Fourth Dhyānas. 
The mind capable of creating fictive objects, the result of a certain Dhyāna, is of the sphere of this Dhyāṇna or of a lower sphere. They do not arise from a lower Dhyāna. The Dhyāna mind of a lower sphere does not produce a mind capable of creating fictive beings of a higher sphere, because its power is too small. 
A fictive being,that is to say, a magical beingof a lower sphere, but which is the result of the Secoṇd Dhyāna, prevails over, from the standpoint of its going and coming, a being of a higher sphere, which is a result of the First Dhyāna. 
One obtains them like a Dhyāṇa One obtains a mind capable of creating fictive beings, a result of a mñladhyāna, as oṉe obtains the Dhyāna, that is to say, through detachment, for the result is obtained at the same time as its support. 
A first mind capable of creating fictive beings arises from a pure Dhyāna. Then successive minds capable of creating fictive beings arise from a mind of their same type, that is to say, of the first, of the second... mind capable of creating fictive beings: the former mind of this series thus produces a subsequent mind capable of creating fictive beings. The last mind is followed by a pure Dhyāna. 
Therefore the mind capable of.creating fictive beings comes from two minds and produces these same two. 
This is to suppose that the person who has a mind which is capable of creating fictive beingsthe result of an absorption, and morally neutraldoes not again enter a Dhyāna, that he would not depart ftom this Dhyāṇa, in the same way that one enters through a door and leaves through this same door. One creation takes place through one mind of its sphere. All the fictive, created things are created by a mind of their sphere, for a mind capable of creating fictive beings of a certain sphere does not produce a being belonging to another sphere. But speech also takes place through a mind of a lower sphere. Speech uttered by fictive being also depends, in certain cases, on a mind of a lower sphere. 
Speech uttered by a fictive being in Kāmadhātu or of the First Dhyāna takes place by virtue of a mind of the sphere of this created beiṅg. 
But a fictive being of a higher sphere, of the Second Dhyāṇna, etc., speaḵs by virtue of a mind of the First Dhyāna: 
When the ṇirmātar, the person who produces fictive beings , produces a number of fictive beings, all speak when their creator speaks, because their vāgvijñāpti or vocal action, is common to all. 
This is why the stanza says, When one speaks, namely the creator, all his creatures speak; when one remains silent, all remain silent. 
at his will, fictive beings speak one after the other; they question the Buddha and the Buddha answers; the Buddha questions them and they respond. 
kkk But, one would say, when the mind which produces the voice arises, the mind capable of creating fictive beings no longer exists: therefore at this moment the fictive being does not exist; thus how does a fictive being speak? 
The fictive being speaks, because its creator sets speech into motion through another mind, after having empo wered the fictive being. Through the power of a mind previous to its entry into contemplation and creation, the creator empowers the fictive being, May it last! By means of another mind, he causes it to speak. Therefore, even though the fictive being speaks, the two minds,that which creates it and that which causes it to speak,;are not simultaneous, and yet the vocal action takes place with the fictive being for its support. Empowerment continues after death. 
It is not only for the duration of his own life that the creator is capable of empowering a thing in such a manner that it endures; his empowerment can also make the thing last after his own death. It is thus, through his own empowerment that Kāśyapa the Great made his bones last until the advent of Maitreya. But not with respect to that which is not hard. 
It is only a hard thing which is susceptible of being empowered for a long period of time. This is why Kāśyapa the Great did not empower his flesh. 
Some other masters say no. The body protected by the power of empowerment is not capable of lasting beyond death. 
If the bones of Kāśyapa last, it is through the protection of the gods. 
A beginner, by means of numerous minds capable of creating fictive beings, produces a single fictive being; later, wheṉ his practice is complete, the ascetic produces at his own will, by means of a single such mind, many or few creatures. 
But when it is innate, it can be good, bad, or neutral: 
Also capable of being created, among the ten material āyabaṇṉas, ate nine āyatanas, with the exclusion of sound, namely, the eye, visible things, the ear, the organ of smell, etc. 
Yet one can say without being incorrect that creation consists of nine āyatanas, for creationwhether it refers to the transformation of the body of the creator or to the creation of a distinct bodyconsists of four āyataṉas, physical matter odors, tastes, and tangible things, and does not exist independently of the five organs. 
kxkṣk Are divine sight and the divine hearing called divine in the proper sense of the word, because they are of the nature of the organs of the gods, or rather figuratively so, because they are as if they were divine? 
When they are divine in the proper sense of the word Divine sight and divine hearing are of pure rpa of the sphere of the Dhyānas. 
By reason of a preparatory exercise consisting of meditation on light and soundthe ascetic is in the Dhyānas, and in the eyes and ears of the asceticeyes and ears which are in Kāmadhātuthere is found to be attracted a pure rpa, a matter derived from the primary elements of the sphere of the Dhyāna in which it exists, subtle and excellent. 
This rāzpa constitutes his eyes and ears; it sees and understands; it constitutes what is called divine sight and divine hearing. 
Arising by reason of physical matter of the sphere of the Dhyāṇnas, the organs are therefore divine in the proper sense of the word. 
Divine sight and divine hearing of this category, obtained through meditation, aṟe never atsabhāga , but are always accompanied by visual or auditory consciousness. 
They are never deficient; for they come in pairs, and are in a good state , as are the organs of beings born in Rāpadhātu. 
On this point, there is a stanza, The eye of flesh does not see rpa which is distant, obscured, or subtle; it does not see in all directions. 
Among humans, the five powers, rddhi, etc., described above, are not innṇate. 
How is this? 
Let us now study the natures of the Dhyāṇas, etc. 
We shall speak first of their supports , that is, the mental states in which these qualities are produced. 
The Dhyānas are four in number. 
The Dhyānas as existence have been defined in the Third Three are threefold and the Fourth is eightfold. 
Concentration is the application of a pure mind on a single object; In general, Dhyāṇna as absorption is defined as an application of a pure mind on a single object, for the Dhyānas have samādhi or concentration for their nature. 
If one consideres ramādhi with its following, Dhyāna as absorption has the five skandhas for its nature. 
ksk What is application on a single object? 
For it is said in the Sūtra that the Four Dhyānas are adhicitta fikṣa, the higher mental learning; another says that the Four Dhyānas are the primary element in the purification of the mind. 
ṅtkk We have described the Dhyānas. 
What are the Ārūpyas? 
The Ārūpyas, that is, the absorptions of, and the rebirths in Ārūpyadhātu are like the Dhyāṇnas in their number and nature. 
There are four Ārūpyas and each Ārūpya is twofold, existence and concentration. 
The concentrations of Ārūpya, in their nature and in general, are applications of pure minds on a single object. 
By reason of this double similarity, the stanza says So too, the Ārūpyas. 
All the Ārūpyas are concentration; but there are four Ārūpyas because the concentration that constitutes each Ārūpya proceeds from separation from a lower sphere. 
Ākāśānantyayatana is the absorption that proceeds from separation from the Fourth Dhyāṇna; and so on to Naivasajñānāsajñāyatana which proceeds from separation from Ākicanyāyatana. 
What is separation? 
The paths by which the ascetic is delivered from the lower spheres, because these paths have turned him away from them. 
They are called vibhūtarūpasajñā together with three sāmantakas. The first ṝāmantaka, the threshold of Ākāśānantyāyatana is not called a rāmantaka because it has the Fourth Dhyāna for its object, and so the idea of physical matter is not completely transcended in it. 
The Ārūpyas are so called because there is no pa or physical matter in them: 
This should be proved, say some Schools, for we maintain that there is some physical matter, rpa, in the Ārūpyas. 
But then why are the rāpyas called ārāpyas, absences of physical matter? 
They are called this because their rpa is reduced, in the same way that a little red is called reddish . So be it; but what type of physical matter is in Ārūpyadhātu? 
If you say that this physical matter is neither the body nor the voice, but merely the physical matter that constitutes bodily and vocal discipline , then how can this discipline exist in the absence of body and voice? 
And how can a rāpa derived from the primary elements , namely discipline, exist in the absence of these same primary elements ? 
If you answer that bodily and vocal discipline exists in Ārūpyadhātu without the cooperation of primary physical matter, in the same way that pure discipline exists without primary elements of their same, i.e., pure, nature, then this answer does not hold, for pure discipline has impure primary elements for its support, elements in the sphere in which the Āryan is born. 
If you attribute material organs to the beings in Ārūpyadhātu, how can you say that the physical matter of Ārūpyadhātu is subtle? 
Because their dimensions are very small; the beings are therefore of reduced rāpa , so the beings are then without physical matter. But if you reason in this way, then the tiny and invisible aquatic animals would also be without rūpa. 
Would you say that the physical matter of Ārūpyadhātṭu is transpaṟrent ? But intermediate beings and the beings in Rūpadhātu also possess transparent physical matter. Would you say that the physical matter of Ārūpyadhātu is more transparent and so merits being called absence of physical matter? 
But then you should only call the highest stage of Ārūpyadhātu absence of physical matter, for bodies will be all the more transparent the more distinguished is the absorption of the stage to which they belong. 
Furthermore, the physical matter of Rūpadhātu cannot be perceived by an eye in a lower sphere, since it is too transparent. 
How does this differ from the physical matter that you attribute to Ārūpyadhātu? 
Finally it is a gratutitous affirmation to maintain that the name of the first two Dhātus correspond to their objects , but that this is not so in the case of Ārāpyadhātu. It is maintained that physical matter exists in Ārūpyadhātu. There are four arguments in favor of this position: It is said that life and warmth are interconnected. It is said that nmāman and physical matter support one another, iike two bunches of roses. It is said that māmarūpa are caused by the consciousenss. It is said that consciousness does not come or go independ ently of physical matter, sensation, ideas, or the sarṅskāras. These texts are not decisive, for there is reason to interpret them: The Sūtra says that life is associated with warmth, which is physical matter. 
But does this refer to all types of life or only to life in Kāmadhātu? 
But does this refer to all of the Dhātus or only to Kāmadhātu and Rūpadhātu? 
But does this text teach that all consciousness either a consciousness caused by the saskāras of Kāmadhātu or Rāūpadhātu, or a consciousness caused by the saskāras of Ārūpyadhātu, is a cause of the material and nonmaterial sandhas? 
Rather, it teaches that all material and nonmaterial rkandhas have consciousness for their cause. 
We would say that the Sūtra expresses itself in a general manner: we do not have to interpret it, and we do not have the right to think that it refers to Kāmadhātu, etc. The answer does not hold, for to hold to the letter of the Sūtra, one would come to absurd conclusions: 
Life would necessarily accompany all warmth, even if it be external warmth. 
External physical matter would be supported by the noamaterial rkandhas. xternal physical matter would be caused by consciousness. 
There would be material food in Rāpadhātu and Ārūpyadhātu, for the Sūtra says, in a general way, that there are four types of food , in the same way that it says in a general way that there are four abodes of consciousness: from whence you conclude that the abode of physical matter exists in Ārūpyadhātu. No, for the Sūtra, while expressing itself in a general way concerning the four types of food, formulates exceptions to the rule: 
it speaks of a being who surpasses the gods who nourish themselves with material food; and it speaks of beings who nouṟish themselves with joy. Very well, but does not the Sūtra also say, and categorically so, that there is no physical matter in Ārūpyadhātu? 
It says, 1 One departs from the rūpas through the Ārūpyas; 2 These states of calm deliverance, beyond the rpas, namely the Ārūpyas.; 3 There are existences without physical matter, absolutely passing beyond the ideas of physical matter: 
now, if physical matter were to exist in the existences or the absorptions of Ārūpyadhātu, beings who are in Ārūpyadhātu would have ideas of their own physical matter. And the Sūtra would not say that an ascetic obtains these existences and absorptions by passing beyond all ideas of physical matter. 
We answer that, in this hypothesis, 1. one should understand in the same sense the text relative to material food, which would exist, albeit subtly, in Rāpadhātu and Ārūpyadhātu; 2. 
one should say that an ascetic leaves the rāpas through the Dhyāṇnas, and that the Dhyāṇnas belong to Ārūpyadhātu, for the Dhyānas are beyond the coarse rāpas of a lower sphere, namely Kāmadhātu; 3. 
one should say that, through the Ārūpyas, the ascetic leaves sensation , etc., for the Ārūpyas are beyond.the sensations of lower spheres, and one should call them without sensation, etc. 
We then assume that the Ārūpyas are beyond any and all physical matter. 
How can the Ārūpyas be the leaving of the rupas? 
The Blessed One expresses himself in this manner with reason, for one cannot leave a certain existence by means of this same existence, and one can neither leave all of the existences nor definitively leave any existence by means of any existence whatsoever. 
Finally the Blessed One says that there is rāpa, vedanā, sarjñā, the saskāras, and vijñāna in the Dhyānas, and that there is vedaṇā. and vijñāna in the Ārūpyas. 
If there were truly pa in the Ārūpyas, why did not the Blessed One say that there is rēpa in them, as he did for the Dhyānas? 
When this being is finally reborn in a lower sphere, where does his physical matter come from? 
Physical matter arises from the mind. 
A cause was formerly produceda certain action, etc.,.which should ripen in physical matter; a trace of this cause remains in the mind: its efficacy now matures; the physical matteṛ that now arises arises from the mind. 
But how can a mind in Ārūpyadhātu exist without being supported by physical matter, rāpa? 
Why could it not exist without physical matter? 
Because it never happens here below that a mind exists without a body. 
But, by virtue of this same reasoning, you should deny that beings in Rūpadhātu live on material food. 
kskṣk Do the Ārūpyas receive their different names,Ākāśānan tyāyatana, etc.,.from the fact that they have space etc., for their objects? 
The first three, Ākāśānantya, Vijñānānantya, and Ākicanya are named after their preparatory exercises. The three lower Ārūpyas receive their names from the fact that, in their preparatory exercises, one considers space, etc.! Because of its weakness, the absorption is called NeitherIdeasNorAbsence of Ideas. 
The Fourth Ārūpya receives its name from the fact that sajñā, deas, is very weak in it. Ideas are not active in it, but neither is it completely without ideas. Without doubt, one prepares himself for this Ārūpya by considering, Ideas are a sickness! Ideas are an ulcer! Ideas are an arrow! The absence of ideas is stupidity ! This is calmness, this is excellent, the Faculty of NeitherIdeasNorAbsence of Ideas! But it is not by ṛeason of this preparatory exercise that the Fourth Ārūpya receives its name. 
And why is the Fourth Ārūpya conceived of, by the ascetic who finds himself in the preparatory absorptions, as NeitherIdeasNor Absence of Ideas? 
It is because of the slightness of the ideas in it. This is the explanation of its name. 
The first seven of these eight are threefold. 
The absorption of enjoyment is associated with thirst; For enjoyment is itself thirst. 
A pure absoṟption is of a worldly order of good; Worldly good is also termed good, because it arises in conjunction with the pure dharmas, such as nondesire, etc. It is the object of enjoyment. 
Pure absorption is the object enjoyed by the absorption of enjoyment. 
As soon as the pure absorption disappears, the absorption of enjoyment that enjoys it arises. 
The absorption free from the defilements is trans worldly. 
eckk The Dhyānas are filled with parts or items, but not the Ārūpyas. 
How many parts are there in each Dhyāna? 
There are five parts or items in the First Dhyāna. Vitarka, vicāra, joy, happiness, and samādhi. 
Four in the Second: faith and joy, etc. 
Five in the Third: equanimity, mindfulness, awareness, happiness, and stability. The Third Dhyāna possesses five parts: 
sthiti or stability is a synonym for saādhi, as the Sūtra says, What is right samādhi? 
It is stability of the mind. 
mindfulness, equanimity, the sensation of neither suffering nor happiness, and samādhi. 
The Fourth Dhyāna possesses four parts: 1 the sensation of indifference , 2 pure equanimity , 3 pure mindful ness, aṇd 4 samādhi. 
the First and the Third Dhyānas have five parts each, and the Second and the Fourth Dhyānas have four parts each. 
In respect to their names, there are eighteen parts. Regarded as things, there are eleven parts. 
Regarded as things or substances , there are eleven parts. 
There are five in the First Dhyāṇna, plus 1 internal purity or faith in the Second Dhyāna; 35 equanimity, mindfulness, awareness and happiness in the Third Dhyāna; and 6 the sensation of neither suffering nor happiness in the Fourth Dhyāna. 
There are then some parts of the First Dhyāna that are not parts of the Second Dhyāna. 
There are four alternatives: 
The correspondance of the parts of the other Dhyāṇnas is established according to the same principles. 
ṭt4 Why do you say that the happiness of the Third Dhyāna conṉstitutes a sepaṟate thing? 
In the First and Second Dhyāna, prasrabdhi is called happiness: 
In fact, in the first two Dhyānas, there can be no faculty of happiness. The reason for this is: 
1 the happiness attributed to these Dhyānas cannot be bodily happiness, in light of the fact that the five sense consciousnesses are absent in a person who has entered into contemplatioṇ; 2. 
the happiness attributed to these Dhyānas caṇnot be mental happiness because these Dhyānas possess joy. 
Now joy is satisfaction and it is inadmissible for joy and happiness, even happiness of sensation, to coexist; they cannot even succeed one another, for the First Dhyūna possesses five pa:ts, and the Second, only four. 
In the first three Dhyānas, there is no mental sensation of happiness, but only a bodily sensation of happiṉess, which constitutes the part called happiness of these Dhyāṇas. 
In this hypothesis you should explain how the Sūtra could say, What is the faculty of happiness ? 
The bodily and mental sensation of happiness produced by reason of an agreeable contact is what is called the faculty of happiness. 
In all the sects the text merely reads bodily happiness. 
Further, they continte, regarding the part of the Third Dhyāna called happiness, the Sūtra says in its own words that, in this Dhyāna the ascetic experiences happiness through his body.S Would one maintain that the word through the body signifies through the body of the mind , and that one should translate, the ascetic experiences happiness through this complex which is the anas? 
that the happiness part of the fitst two Dhyānas is wellbeing is untenable, for the wellbeing of the Fourth Dhyāṇna is certainly greater than the wellbeing of the first two Dhyānas, and the Sūtra does not attribute a happiness part to the Fourth Dhyāna. 
The wellbeing of the first two Dhyānas is called happiness because it is favorable to the sensation of happiness, whereas the wellbeing of the Fourth Dhyāna does not have this character, The wellbeing of the Third Dhyāna, like that of the first two, is favorable to the sensation of happiness; why do the Vaibhāṣikas not attṛibute prasrabdhisukha, happiness which consists of wellbeing, to the Third Dhyāna, but rather a happiness consisting of an agreeable mental sensation ? In the Third Dhyāna, wellbeing whose character is karmaṇyatā or aptitude is opposed by equanimity, whose character is akarmaṇyatā, for them wellbeing is accumulated through equanimity, since it results from the fact that the wellbeing of the Third Dhyāṇna is greater than the welibeing of the first two Dhyāṇnas. 
Finally, the Śūtra says,When the Noble Śrāvaka, having realized the joy born of separation, abides in absorption, then five dharmas have been abandoned by him, and he has achieved the cultivation of five dharmas, namely joy, wellbeing, happiness, prajñā, and samādhi. 
In this Sūtra, wellbeing is listed separately from happiness; it should be distinct from happiness in order for the list of the five dbarmas to be complete. Thus, in the first two Dhyānas, happiness is not wellbeing. 
In the state of absoṟrption, the body is penetrated by a wind born of excellent mental concentration ; this wind is a tangible which is agreeably felt and is called wellbeing. 
No, for agreeable or happy bodily sensation which arises from ṛramādhi, being internal, is favorable to samādhi. 
Inmediately after the appearance of this consciousness, the famādhi is taken up again. 
How can the body , which is in Kāmadhātu, give rise to a touch consciousness , which is, according to you, a type of wind in Rūpadhātu ? 
This criticism does not hold, for this consciousness of touch is produced by reason of wellbeing. 
the tangible and the consciousness of touch which he has will be undefiled, for some of the parts of defiled Dhyāna cannot be undefiled, while the others are defiled. 
There is no contradiction here. 
In fact physical wellbeing is defined as a part of Bodhi. 
If the Vaibhāṣikas answer, Even though it is not a part of Bodhi, it is so defined because it is favorable to the part of Bodhi called wellbeing and which is mental wellbeing, we would say that, for the same reason, one can consider bodily wellbeing as undefiled. 
Bodily wellbeing cannot be undefiled, for the Sūtra declares that all tangible things are defiled, we would say that this Sūtra is of intentional meaning and refers to all tangible things with the exception of physical wellbeing, to the consciousnesses of touch with the exception of the consciousness of touch which cognizes wellbeing. 
Do you admit that certain parts of undefiled ḍhyāna are undefiled, and that certain parts are not undefiled? 
Then the First Dhyāna will not have five parts, and the Second Dhyāna will not have four parts. 
If Scripture attributes the parts of happpiness and joy to the fitst two Dhyānas, this is because these Dhyānas are susceptible, successively, to happiness and joy; in the same way Scripture attributes varka and vicārawhich can only exist successivelyto the First Dhyāna. 
We affirm that vitarka and vicāra coexist; but the example that you cite to prove the noncoexistence of the parts is not proved. 
This example is proved; for vitarka, which is a coarse mental state, and vcāra, which is a subtle mental state, are contradictory and cannot coexist. 
And you did not say what harm there is in their not coexisting. 
one determines the specific features of the Second Dhyāna and of those following by eliminating two, three, or four parts: it is for this reason that the First Dhyāna is said to contain five parts, because the other Dhyānas are defined by the elimination, successively and in order, of the first four of these parts. This is why ideas and the other dharmas of the First Dhyāna are not considered as parts, for they are not cut off in the following Dhyānas. 
If you do not accept this explanation, then why does the First Dhyāna have only five parts? 
But, the five parts are only called parts because they are useful to the Dhyāna. 
No, this cannot be the case, since mindfulness and prajñā are more useful to the Dhyāna than are vtarka and vicāra. 
kkk A certain school maintains the system that has been presented, but the ancient masters are not in agreement on this. Consequently the point should be further examined. 
kk What is the dharma called internal purity ? 
When the agitation of vitarka and vicāra has come to an end, the series flows calmly and cleatrly: this is what is called internal purity. 
As a river agitated by waves, so too the series, by reason of the agitation of vitarka and vicāra, is not calm or clear. But if we admit this explanation, then internal purity is not a thing in and of itself. 
Thus there will not be eleven things in the Dhyānas. 
Then one must say Purity is faith. 
When the ascetic acquires the Second Dhyāna, he produces a profound faith: he admits that the spheres of absorption themselves can be abandoned. This faith is called internal purity. 
Faith, having purity for its characteristic, is called purity. 
Having abandoned externals, it flows equally and so prsāda is internal and equal; hence it is termed internal purity or adhyātmasaprasāda. 
According to other masters , vitarka, vicāra, samādhi, and internal purity are not separate things. 
If these are not separate things, how can one say that they are mental dharmas? Some special states of mind receive the name of mental states because they arise in the mind. But the system of the Abhidharma does not admit this theory. 
ktsk You have said that joy is satisfaction , a happy or agreeable mental sensation. 
If ioy is not satisfaction, then what is the dbarma that is called joy We follow another school. 
According to this school, there exists a dharma distict from satisfaction, a mental state called joy. The hapiness of the three Dhyānas is satisfaction; hence joy, which is distinguished from happiness, is distinct from satisfaction. Īt is not admissible that happiness, in the Dhyāṇnas, is satisfaction. Joy is satisfaction. This is proved by two texts. 
The Blessed One says in the Viparñasūtra, In the Third Dhyāna the faculty of satisfaction which has previously arisen is destroyed without remnant; in the Fourth Dhyāna, the faculty of happiness is destroyed without remnant. 
He says in another Sūtra, By reason of the abandoning of the faculty of happiness and the faculty of suffering, and by reason of the previous disappearance of the faculty of dissatisfaction and the faculty of satisfaction. 
These two texts prove that there is no faculty of satisfaction in the Third Dhyāna. Hence joy is satisfaction, and not happiness. 
Does defiled dhyāna possess the parts that we have just studied? 
In the defiled Dhyānas there is no joy, happiness, faith, sampradhīḥ , mindfulness, pure equanimity nor pure mindfulness. 
When it is defiled, the First Dhyāṇa does not contain joy and happiness arisen from separation, because it is not separated from the defilements of Kāmadhātu. 
The Second Dhyāna does not contain internal purity , because it is troubled by the defilements; the defilements cause it to be unclear. 
The Third Dhyāna does not contain mindfulness and aware ness, because it is confused by a defiled happiness. 
The Fourth Dhyāna does not contain the purity of equanimity or the purity of mindfulness, because it is soiled by the defilements. That is what some say. According to some, wellbeing and equanimity. 
According to others, there is no 1 wellbeing in the first two Dhyānas, and 2 no equanimity in the last two, because wellbeing and equanimity are dbarmas that are only found in a pure mind. 
The Blessed One teaches that three Dhyānas are disturbed because of faults. 
As it is free from the eight faults, the Fourth is undisturbed. 
What are the eight faults? 
None of these eight is found in the Fourth Dhyāna: this is why it alone is termed uṇdisturbed. 
It is trne that the Sūtra says that the Fourth Dhyāna is undisturbed because it is not agitated by vitarka and vicāra, by joy and happiness. 
ĀAccording to others, the Fourth Dhyāna is undisturbed because it is like a lamp which, in a sealed place, is not agitated by the wind. 
kksḥ Do the arisings of dhyāna existences or existences in Rāpadhātu, possess the same sensations as do the absorption of the Dhyāṇas? 
No, they do not. 
Why is this? 
In the dhyāna existences, there is satisfaction, happi ness, and equanimity; equanimity and smanaskatā ; happiness and equanimity; and equanimity. 
In the First Dhyāṇna existence, there are three sensations: 
1 the sensation of happiness associated with three consciousnesses ; 2 the sensation of satisfaction of the sphere of the mind consciousness ; and 3 the sensatioṉ of equanimity associated with four consciousnesses. 
In the Second Dhyāna existence, there are two sensations, namely satisfaction and equanimity, both of the sphere of the manas. There is no happiness here, because the five sense consciousnesses are absent. 
In the Third Dhyāna existence, there are two sensations, namely happiness and equanimity, both of the sphere of the manas. 
In the Fourth Dhyāna existence, there is a single sensation, the sensation of equanimity. 
Such is, with respect to the sensations, the differences between the Dhyāna existences and the absorptions of dhyāna. 
If, from the Second Dhyāna on, three consciousnesses are absent, as well as vśtarka and vicāra, how can beings born in the three higher Dhyānas see, hear, and touch? How can they produce the bodily or vocal act of informing ? 
We do not say that beings who are born in these Dhyānas lack visual consciousness, etc. 
In the Second Dhyāna and above, the body, eye, and ear consciousnesses, and the consciousness that sets the act of informing into motion belong to the sphere of the First Dhyāṇa. 
The eye consciousness, etc., and the consciousness that sets into motion the act of informing do not exist in the Second Dhyāna and above.9 But the beings of these Dhyānas manifest these con sciousnesses, in the same way as they manifest a fictive mind of creation of a lower sphere, and, by means of these consciousnesses, they see, hear, touch, and produce the action of informing. 
Hence they are not defiled, because these beings are detached from the lower spheres; but they are not good, because the good of a lower sphere is less good. 
kekk How does the acquisition of the absorptions of Rūpadhātu and Ārūpyadhātu take place accordingly as they are pure, undefiled, or defiled? 
One who does not possess them acquires them, pure, through detachment or through birth. 
One who does not possess these absorptions obtains them by detaching oneself from a lower sphere or by taking up birth in a lower sphere , with the exception of the fourth absorption of Ārūpyadhātu, or Bhavāgra, which one acquires solely by detaching oneself from the third absorption. 
In fact a person who possesses these pure absorptions of the falling class, etc. 
can, through cultivatioṉ, obtain pure absorptions of a higher class ; one who possesses pure absorp tions of the duration class can, through falling, obtain pure absorptions of the falling class. 
Can one abandon a pure ḍhyāna through detachment? 
Can one abandon a pure dhyāna through falling? 
Yes, in the case of the First Dhyāna of the falling class. 
In fact, 1 one obtains this dhyāna through detachment from Kāmadhātu; 2 one loses it through detachment from Brahmaloka ; 3 one obtains it by falling from detachment in Brahmaloka; 4 one loses it by falling from detachment in Kāmadhātu; 5 one obtains it by tebirth from here up to Brahmaloka; and 6 one loses it by rebirth into Kāmadhātu. 
One acquires them, undefiled, through detachment. 
That is, one who does not possess them. 
The Āryan who detaches himself from a lower sphere acquires the undefiled absorption of a higher sphere. 
This rule only refers to the ascetic who has completely abandoned the absorption in question. 
But cannot one say that the ascetic, through entry into the certitude of the acquisition of absolute good , acquires undefiled absorption for the first time? 
No, for the ascetic who, before pursuing the acquisition of the result of the state of Sakrṛdāgāmin, has obtained the result of the state of Śrotaāpanna can enter into this certitude in the state of Anāgamya ; he does not necessarily acquire the basic absorption. 
One acquires them, defiled, through falling and through birth. 
One who falls from the detachment of a sphere acquires the defiled absorption of this sphere. Oae who, dying in a higher sphere and reborn in a lower sphere, acquires the defiled absoṟrption of this second sphere. kḵcs How many types of absorptions arises after how many types of absorptions? 
12 puṟe and undefiled absoṟrption of the same sphere; and 36 pure and undefiled absoṟption of the Second and Third Dhyānas. 
Seven absorptions can arise after undefiled Ākircanyāya tana: 12 pure and undefiled absorption of the same sphere; 36 pure and undefiled absorption of Vijñānānantyāyatana and Ākāśānantyāyatana; and 7 pure absoṟption of Naivasarjñānā sajñyatana, because this āyatana does not contain any undefiled absorption. 
Eight absorptions can arise after the Second undefiled Dhyāṇa: 12 pure and undefiled absorption of the same sphere; and 38 pure and undefiled absorption of the Third, Fourth, and First Dhyāṇna. 
Nine absorptions can aṟise after undefiled Vijñānānantyāya tana: 
12 two of the same sphere; 36 four, namely two of Ākāśānantyāyatana and two of the Fourth Dhyāṇna; and 79 three, two of Ākihcanyāyatana and one of Naivasajñānāsathjñāyatana. 
After inferential knowledge , one can enter into the absorptions of Ārūpyadhātu, but not after the knowledge of the dharmas , because this has a lower sphere for its object. 
The same after the pure, by adding the defiled of its sphere. A defiled absorption of the same sphere can arise after any pure absorption. 
After the defiled, the pure and the defiled of its sphere. 
A pure or a defiled absorption of the same sphere can arise after a defiled absorption. 
Wearied of the defilements of the sphere in which one finds oneself,defilements belonging to the defiled absorption of a higher sphere,the ascetic produces an esteem for the pure absorption of a lower sphere. Therefore, after the defiled absorption of a higher sphere , a pure absorption of a lower sphere can arise. 
If an ascetic were in a position to distinctly know a defiled absorption and a pure absorption, he would be able to pass from the higher defiled absorption to the lower pure absoṟrption. 
But, being defiled, he is not capable of this distinct knowledge; how then can he, after a defiled absorption, produce a pure absorption? 
By the force of a previous resolution. 
He made the resoḻution, May I be able to obtain a lower pure absorption! What have I to do with a higher defiled absorption? 
The series develops of itself by reason of this resolution, and, as a conse quence, the lower absorption arises after the higher defiled absorption, in the same way as a person forms the resolution to sleep until a certain time, falls asleep, and then wakes up at that fixed time. 
kḥk The undefiled absoṟrptions, of whichever sphere, never arise after a defiled absorption. 
We have said that the defiled absorption that succeeds the pure or defiled absorption is always of the sphere of the absorption which it follows. 
This rule should be understood of life in the couṟse of the absorption; but At death, after the pure, the defiled of any type can aṛiṣe. 
At death, a defiled mind of any sphere can arise following a pure absorption obtained through birth. 
We have seen that the undefiled absorption can follow the pure absorptions; but it cannot follow all types of pure absorptions. 
The pure absorption is of four types: of falling , of duration , of progress , and of penetration. 
Nevertheless, the pure absorption of Naivasarṅjñānāsajñāyatana is only of three types, excluding the category of the pure absotption of progress, because it has no higher sphere. 
What are these four types? 
cskak What is the reciprocal generation of these four categories of absoṟptioṉ? 
the absorption of falling, etc., two, three, three, one. 
After the absorption of progress, three can arise, with the exception of the absorption of falling. 
After the absorption of penetration, only an absorption of penetration can arise. 
We have seen that immediately after a pure absorption or an undefiled absorption of a certain sphere, there can arise a pure absorption of an undefiled absorption of the third sphere above or below. 
How is this absorption actualized? 
18c Going and coming in two ways over the eight spheres, in immediate succession, by passing over one sphere, going to the third sphere of a different type, is called transitional absoṟption.1 Going and coming: 
In two ways refers to undefiled absorption and defiled absoṟrption. 
In immediate succession signifies by degrees. 
By passing over one sphere means by skipping a sphere. 
1 cultivatioṉ of the eight defiled absorptions in ascending and descending order; 2 when this cultivation is assured, there is cultivation of the seven undefiled absorptions in ascending and descending order; 3 when this cultivation is assured, then the ascetic, in order to gain mastery in absorption, passes from the first defiled dhyāna into the third dhyāna of this same quality; from this he passes into Ākāśānantyāyatana, from this into Ākicanyāyatana; and he then descends in the same way, since aḻl of the absorptions are defiled; 4 when this cultivation is assured, there is cultivation in the same way, and in the two ways, of the undefiled absorptions. 
It is impossible to skip over two spheres and enter into a fourth, because a fourth sphere is too distant. 
The transitional absorption is cultivated only by humans of the Three Dvīpas; by Arhats who are noncircumstantially delivered, that is, those who realize absorption of theit own accord, those who are delivered independently of circumstances because they possess mastery in absorption. The Dṛṣṭiprāptas , that is, the ascetics in whom prajñā dominates, , are of keen faculties and possess mastery in absorption; but they lack the first condition. 
Arhats whose liberation is occasional and circumstantial have destroyed the defilements, but the second condition is absent. 
The dḍhyāna and ārāpya absoṟptions have for their support beings of their own spheres or of a lower sphere. 
In the same way the absorptions of the other spheres can be actualized by beings who are in the sphere of these absorptions or in lower spheres. 
An absoption of a lower sphere does not have even the smallest amount of usefulness for a being born in a higher sphere, because this absorption is, by comparison, mediocre. 
kckk What is the object of the Dhyāna and Ārūpya absorptions? 
It does not have a lower sphere for its object, for the ascetic that cultivates the absorption of enjoyment of a certain sphere is detached from the lower sphere. 
He does not have a higher sphere for his object, for the spheres are delimited by desire. 
He does not have an undefiled absorption for his object, which would imply that it is pure. 
Pure absoṟption has all that exists for its object. The pure or undefiled absorption takes as its object all of the dharmas that exist, conditioned and unconditioned. Nevertheless The pure Ārūpya absorptions of the principal spheres do not have lower defiled absorptions for their object. 
The pure absorptions cultivated in the principal spheres of Ārūpyadhātuin opposition to the Dhyāna absorptions and to the absorptions cultivated in the sāmantakas of Ārūpyadhātu do not have for their object the defiled dharmas of lower spheres, but the dharmas of their own sphere or of a higher sphere. 
The undefiled dharmas grasp all inferential knowledge for their object, the sarvānvayajñānapakṣa; they do not concern themselves with the knowledge of the dharmas ; they no longer concern themselves with the extinction of a lower sphere, which would be possible only if they were concerned with this sphere. 
The absorptions cultivated in the srārnantakas of Ārūpyadhātu have for their object the lower sphere, for they include an irresistable Path whose sole object is the lower spheṟe. 
Among the three types of dhyāna and ārūpya absoṟptions, undefiled and supermundane , pure , and defiled ,which one destroys the defilements ? 
The defilements are abandoned through the unde filed absoṟptions. 
Any undefiled absorption is capable of cutting off the defilements; not the pure absorptions, nor even less, the defiled absorptions. 
If the sāmantakas of the dhyānas and the ārāpyas are pure, they cut off the defilements, because they ate opposed to a lower sphere. 
Are the sāmantakas of three types,undefiled, pure, or defiled,like the basic absorptions? 
Therefore they only contain the sensation of equanimity and they are not associated with enjoyment. 
The sāmantaka mind through which one enters an existence is defiled; but the srāmantaka mind through which one enters absorption cannot be defiled, for this thesis has been refuted. 
Other masters say that the Anāgamya sāmantaka is also associated with enjoyment. 
It differs from it. 
In fact rārnantaka is the door to detachment from a lower sphere, but this is not the case for dhyānāntara. 
Furthermore Dhyānāntara īis without vitarka. 
The First basic dhyāna and the first sāmantaka are associated with vitarka and vicāra. In the seven higher absorptions , there is neither vitarka nor vicāra. Only dhyānāntara is filled with vicāra without being filled with vitarka; consequently it is superior to the Firsṭ Dhyāna but inferior to the Second. This is why it is called dhḥyānṉāntara, or intermediate dhyāna. 
Consequently in the higher spheres there is no dhyānāntara, for the other spheres do not have, like the First, a higher and a lower.M rtk To how many categories does dhyānāntara belong? 
To three; It can be associated with enjoyment, a puṟe absorption, and an undefiled absorption. 
One progresses through it through effort and therefore it cannot be associated with satisfaction. 
Hence it is considered to be a difficult path. What is the result of dhyānāntara? 
It has Mahābrahmā for its result, Whoever cultivates this absorption to the highest degree is reborn as Mahābrahmā. 
k The Sūtra says that there are three types of samādhi: 1 samādhi with vitarka and vicāra, 2 samādhi without vitarka but with vcāra, and 3 samādhi without vitarka and vicāra. 
Dhyānān tara is samādhi without vitarka but with vicāra. 
As for dhyānāntara, Up to it, samādhi exists with vitarka and vicāra;. 
All samādhi that is below dhyānāntara contains vitarka and vicāra. 
Above dhyānāntara, all samādhi is without vṝtarka and vicāra, from the sārmantaka of the Second Dhyāna to the Fourth Ārūpya absorption. 
The Sūtra teaches that there are three absorptions, the absorption of emptiness , the absorption of the absence of characteristics, , and the absorption of the absence of intention. 
The ebsorption associated with the aspect of the Truth of Extinction ,that is, the absorption in which the ascetic considers extinction,is called the absorption of the absence of chaṟacteristics. This absorption has four aspects. 
Because Nirvāṇa or extinction, being free from ten characteris tics is called animita. The absorption that has Nirvāṇa for its object is thus ānmita. 
The ten characteristics or marks are: 
15 the five āyatanas, exterṉal sources of the sense consciousnesses, physical matter , sound, etc.; 67 male and female; and 810 the three characteristics of conditioned things , arising, durationandchange, and death. 
The absorption of the absence of intention isthe absorption that grasps the other ten aspects. On the one hand, there are aspects of impermanence and suffering and the four aspects of the Truth of Origin, which provoke dread , and on the other hand, the four aspects of the Path, for the Path is like a raft and should necessarily be abandoned. 
The absorption that grasps these ten aspects is turned toward the passing beyond of things that are impermanent, suffering, arising, and the Path; it is then called apraṇihita, free from praṇidhāna, the will or desire for something. 
On the contrary however, Nirvāṇa, under these four aspects and as the object of the absorption of the absence of intention, should not be abandoned; and the last two aspects of the Truth of Suffering, namely emptiness and nonself, the object of the absorption of emptiness, do not provoke dread, for these two aspects belong to Nirvāṇa as well as to conditioned things. 
ksksk These three absorptions are of two types Pure or immaculate. They are pure or inmaculate, that is undefiled , acordingly as they are worldly or transworldly. 
Worldly, they exist in eleven spheres; transworldly, they exist in the sphere of the Path. 
Immaculate, they are the three gates to deliverance. When they are undefiled, they are also called the gates to deliverance, because they are effectively the gates leading to Niṛrvāṇa or deliverance. 
There are also three other absorptions called emptiness of emptiness, etc.! 
They are also called the absorption of the emptiness of emptiness , the absorption of the absence of intention in the absence of intention , and the absorption of the absence of characteristics in the absence of characteristics , because they have respectively, and in a manner that we shall explain, the absorptions of emptiness, the absence of intention, and the absence of characteristics for their objects. 
The absorption of the emptiness of emptiness considers the absorption of emptiness, which considers the dharmas as empty and nonself, as empty but not as nonself, because a view of nonself does not provoke the same dread as does a view of emptiness. 
It does not consider them as suffering, nor as cause , origin , condition , or appearance , for the absorption of the absence of intention, being undefiled, is not suffering or cause; and although the absorption of the absence of intention is the Path, the absorption of the absence of intention in the absence of intention no longer considers it as a Path, the truth , the route, , nor as pertaining to the truth , because the goal pursued by the ascetic is that of becoming disgusted with the absorption of the absence of intention. 
In fact, the characteristic of extinction belongs to the extinction not attained through conscious effort, as well as to the extinction brought about by impermanence; the extinction not attained through conscious effort is not excellent, for it is morally neutral ; it is not leaving, for it is not disconnection from the defilements. 
kkḵk The three absorptions are exclusively Defiled. Because they hate the Path Now such absorptions are not pure, or undefiled dharmas. 
They are cultivated only by humans of the Three Dvīpas, and not by the gods. 
With the exception of the seven sāmantakas. These absorptions arise eleven spheres, namely Kāmadhātu, Anāgamya, the eight basic absorp tions and dhyānāntara. 
There is a cultivation of the absorption that cultivates, practices, repeatedly cultivates, which has for its result the possession of happiness in this world, and the rest. 
The First good Dhyāna is the cultivation of the absorption that has for its result happiness; eye has sight for its result; the cultivation of good arisen from exercise has comprehension for its result; the absorption likened to a Vajra of the Fourth Dhyāṇna has the extinction of the defilements for its result. 
The First good Dhyāna is the first pure or uṇdefiled dhyāna. Through this dhyāna, the ascetic obtains happiness in this world. 
This absorption does not necessarily have for its result happiness beyond this world, for the ascetic who possesses it can fall from it, he can be reborn higher, or he can obtain Nirvāṇa: 
This is the supernoṟrmal knowledge of the divine eye. 
This is the samādhiḥhāvanā of the superior qualities which arise from cultivation, that is, the qualities of the three spheres and pure, undefiled qualities. 
4.In the Fourth Dhyāṇna there is produced an absoṟption that is called the cultivation like a Vajra. 
ḵskṣk According to the School, the Blessed One, in setting forth this fourfold cultivation of the absorptions, teaches his own caltivation. 
kṣkk We have explained the absorptions. 
Let us explain the qualities that the ascetic realizes by being in the absorptions. 
The Immeasurables are four in number. They are goodwill or friendship , compassion , joy , and equanimityz. 
They are called the Immeasurables because they apply to an immeasura ble number of beings, drawing after them an immeasurable merit, and producing immeasurable results. 
Because they oppose illwill, etc.,1 In oṟder the four Immeasurables oppose illwill , harm , diīssatisfaction , and sensual craving and hostility. 
Goodwill causes persons who aṟe given over to illwill to abandon illwill, and so on. 
What is the difference between the meditation on loathsome things and equanimity in their opposition to sensual craving? 
Accoṟding to the Vibhāṣā , there is reason to distinguish, with respect to sensual craving, craving for the visible things of Kāmadhātu, and sexual craving. 
Now meditation on loathsome things opposes the first of these two craving, whereas equanimity is opposed to the second. 
rmnrnHammsncnRnmrn 11 0ṇI1R1IIIIHI I Ṛ IIJJIIIIIHRHs HIRRIIHJI kkk Goodwill is the absence of hatred. The nature of goodwill is the absence of malice. So too compassion. This is also the case for compassion. Joy is satisfaction. The nature of joy is satisfaction. Equanimity is the absence of desire. 
how can it oppose illwill? 
Because illwill is provoked by desire. 
The ascetic produces with regard to them a mind having the following aspect, Beings are happy! 
and by this, he enters the meditation of goodwill. 
Suffering beings are the object of meditation. 
aad, by this, he enters the meditation of compassion. 
May they be delivered from suffering! May they enter into joy. 
In this way one exercises himself in compassion and joy. 
One who cultivates equanimity takes as his point of departure the category of persons to whom he is indifferent, for the aspect of equanimity is, as we have seen, merely Beings! 
The petson who has produced the Third Dhyāna or the Fourth Dhyāṇa cannot possess joy, since satisfaction is absent in these Dhyānas. 
kk k What is the object of the Deliverances? 
It is because of their excellence and because they are found to exist in the final sphere of the two Dhātus. 
esṭḵ The Dominant Āyatanas are eight in number.1 1. There is the idea of internal physical matter, and there is the seeing of a small amount of external attractive and unattractive physical matter: in knowing all of the rēpas, ḹ have succeeded in seeing all of the rēpas. This is the First Dominant Āyatana. There is the idea of internal physical matter, and there is the seeing of an unlimited amount of external physical matter. There is an absence of any idea of internal physical matter, but there is the seeing of a small amount of external physical matter. There is an absence of any idea of internal physical matter, but there is the seeing of a large amount of external physical matter. These are the first four Dominant Āyatanas. There is an absence of any idea of physical matter, but there is the seeing of external blue, yellow, red, and white. 
Two are like the First Deliverance. Twhe first two Dominant Āyatanas are similar to the First Deliverance. The following two are like the Second. The Third and the Fourth Dominant Āyatanas are like the Second Deliverance. And the last four are like the Third Deliverance. And the last four are like the Third Deliverance. 
What is the difference between the Deliverances and the Dominant Āyatanas? 
Through the Deliverances, one is only delivered, bat through ṭhe Dominant Āyatanas, one attains domination of their object. 
kskk There are ten AllEncompassing Āyatanas.29 They are called allencompassing because they embrace their object in its totality and exclusively. 
They are ten in number: this is the totality of eaṟth, water, fire, and wind; blue, yellow, red, and white; plus the uninteṟrupted āyataṉas of space and consciousness. 
Eight are the absence of desire. The first eight are, by nature, the root of good which is absence of desire:. They belong to the last Dhyāna. 
They are realized by an ascetic in the Fourth Dhyāṇna. 
However some think that the Fourth, the AllEncompassing Āyatana of Wind has for its object the taṉgible thing that is called the wind element. 
All these qualities can have the mental series of a Pṛthagjaṇa or the mental series of an Āryan for their support, with the exception of the Deliverance of Extinction which can only be produced by Āryans. 
All of the types of the Deliverance of Extinction have been previously mentioned. 
The others are obtained either through detachment or through cultivation. The qualities other than the Deliverance of Extinction are obtained either through detachment or through cultivation accordingly as they have been, or have not been, habitually cultivated. 
wThe Deliverances and the Allacompassing Āyatanas of Ārūpyadhātu are cultivated by beings born in any of the Three Dhātus. 
But only humaṉs can cultivate the other absorptions,the ṭhree Deliverances, the Eight Dominant Āyatanas, and eight AllEncompassing Āyatanas,because these absorptions arise through the power of the Teaching. 
If this is the case, how can beings born in the spheres of Rūpadhātu and Ārūpyadhātu realize the dhyāna and ārāpya absoṟptions higher than the spheres in which they are born? 
In two spheres, it is through the power of cause and of action that one produces the absorptions of Ārūpyadhātu.2 In Rūpadhātu and in the lower spheres of Ārūpyadhātu, the higher absorptions of Ārūpyadhātu arise through the power of cause, when they have been, in the course of a previous existence, closely and intensively cultivated. 
They also arise through the power of action , that is to say, by reason of the imminent retribution of a previous action of the category to be retributed later, including a sphere of retribution higher than that in which one is born. 
This is because someone who is not detached from a lower sphere cannot be reborn in a higher sphere. 
In Rūpadhātu, it is through these two powers, and aḻso by reason of the nature of things, that one produces the dhyānas. 
Beiṇgs born in a lower stage of Rūpadhātu produce dhyānas higher than the stages in which they have been born because of the two powers described above. 
In this period, all the beings of lower spheres produce higher dhyāṇnas, for the efficacy of good dharmas becomes fully develo ped.i k k How long will the Good Law of the Blessed One last, during which time these different types of dharmas caṉ be cleaṟly known and seen? 
The nature of the Good Law of the Master is twofold, āgama and adhigaa. Āgama is the teaching, the Sūtra, the Vinaya and the Abhidharma. 
Adḍhigama are the dharmas aiding Bodhi Such is the Good Law, twofold in its nature. 
Those who preach it and who cultivate it support it.17 Those who preach the Good Law, the Sūtras, etc., support the Good Law which is āg27ma. 
Those who cultivate or who realize the Good Law, the dharmas aiding Bodhi, etc., support the Good Law which is adhigama. As long as such persons exist in the world, the Good Law wiil last. 
It is said that the Good Law will last one thousand years after the Parinirvāṇa. This number refers to the adhigamea, but accoṟding to others, the āgama will last longer. 
kṣkḵ This present treatise is based on the treatises of the Abhid harma. according to which interpretation is the Abhidharma explained in this treatise? 
That some ideas, poorly grasped, are reproduced here is our fault, for only the Munis are authoritative in the interpretation of the Good Law. 
For the most part, this Abhidharma, which has been spoken by me, is the Abhidharma as established by the Vaibhāṣikas of Kaśmīir. That which, herein, has been poorly grasped, is my fault: 
for the Buddhas and the sons of the Buddhas alone are the authority for the interpretation of the Good Law. 
The Master, the eye of the world, is closed; the witnesses, for the most part, have perished; the Law is put into confusion by persons who have not seen the Truth; and by bad sophists, independent, from whom nothing is gained. 
For he who knows for himself has departed on the Supreme Path, as well as the supports of the Law of the one who knows for himself: the world no longer has a Protec tor. The defilements, which destroy spiritual qualities, now have full liiberty. 
Seeing that the Law of the Muni is in its last breath, and that it is the hour of the forces of defilements, those who desire liberation should be diligent. 
Īs there any liberation outside of Buddhism? 
No, there is not. 
What is the reason for this? 
There is no liberation outside of this teaching, because other doctrines are corrupted by a false conception of a soul. 
By the power of their belief in this soul as a substantial entity, there arises ciinging to the soul, the defilements are generated, and liberation is impossible. 
How do we know that the word soul is only a designation for a series of skandhas, and that no soul exists in and of itself? 
We know this because no proof establishes the existence of a soul apart from the sandhas, no proof by direct perception, nor any proof from inference. 
If the soul were a real entity, separate like other entities, it would be attained either by direct perception as are the objects of the five sense consciousnesses and the object of mental consciousness, or by inference, as are the five driyas. 
In fact, the five organs are known through inference. In the world, despite the presence of general causes, a result is not produced if certain specific causes are absent: for a sprout to be generated, one needs not only water, earth, and human effort, but also a seed. 
In the same way, even though general causes the presence of an external object, attention, etc.,are present, the blind and the deaf do not see and hear to the extent that the nonblind and the nondeaf see and hear. 
The first are lacking, whereas the second have the specific causes for visual and auditory consciousness: these are the organs, material organs that are made of an invisible and intangible matter, and which is known only through inference. 
There is neither direct perception nor inference of a soul independent of the skandhas. We know then that a real soul does ṉot exist. 
The Bimbiṣārasñra says, A stupid, ignorant Pṛthagjana becomes attached to words, and he imagines that there is a self; but there is no self nor things pertaining to self, but only past, present and future painful dharmas. 
As the name chariot is given to a group of parts, the world uses the.word being: one should know that this is a group of skandhas. 
In the Kṣṇdrakāgama, the Buddha said to the Brāhmin Daridra, Daridra, those who understand the Truths can deliver themselves from all fetters: through the mind defile ment, and also purification through the mind. 
The self, in fact, does not have the nature of a soul; it is through error that one thinks that a soul exists; there is no being , no soul, but only dharmas produced through causes: 
skandhas, soutcesofconṉs ciousness , dhātus , that constitute the twelve limbs of existence; examined in depth, there is found to be no pndgala there. Seeing that the interior is empty, see that externals are empty; and there is no ascetic who meditates oa emptiness. 
one creates a theory of the soul, of a being, of a vital principal; one is not distinguished from heterodox teachers; one takes a road which is not the Way; his mind does not enter into emptiness, his faith does not satisfy him, he is not established in it to his satisfaction, there is no propeasity ; the Ātyan qualities are not purified in him. 
kx These texts are not authoritative, because they are not read in our tradition. 
What then is the authority in your system, your tradition or the words of the Buddha? 
If it is your tradition, then the Buddha is not your teacher, and you are not a child of the Śākyan. 
If it is the word of the Buddha, why do you not recognize the authority of all the words of the Buddha? 
The texts you have quoted are not the authentic word of the Buddha, since our tradition does not read them. 
That is not a good reason. 
Why is this? 
Because all the other traditions read these texts, and because these texts do not contradict any other Sūtras, nor philosophic truths. Also, when you embolden yourself to brutally reject them by saying, They are not authentic because we do not read them, this is only pure impudence contrary to all good sense. 
keie The position of the Vātsīputrīyas is moṟreover more inadmissa ble since their sect reads a Sūtra which says, The dharmas are not soul and do not contain a soul. 
But the pndgala is neither the dharmas which serve as its support, nor is it different from these dharmas; that is why it says that no dharma is a soul. 
Very well; but it is taught that the pudgala cannot be discerned by the mental consciousness, since the Sūtra establishes clearly that the mental consciousness is produced by reason of two condi tions, the mental organ and the dharmas. 
Besides how would you explain the Sūtra which says, To recognize a soul in what is not soul is a mistake of ideas, of mind, and of view? 
This Sūtra says that it is a mistake to recognize a soul in that which is not a soul; it does not say that it is a mistake to recognize a soul in what is a soul. 
What is understood by that which is not a soul? 
Would you say that it concerns the skandhas, āyatanas and dhāṭus? 
This contradicts your theory that the pudgala is not identical to physical matter, etc. 
Furṟther, a Sūtra says, Oh Bhikṣus, know that all the Brāhmins and monks that contemplate a soul, contemplate only the five skandhasofattachment. 
Then this is not a soul, because the self that one recognizes as a soul is solely the dharmas that are not a soul but which one falsely imagines to be a soul. 
Another Sūtra says, All those that have remembered, do remember, or shall remember their various past existences their remembrance is solely with regard to the five rkandhasof attachment. Then there is no pugala in any of this. 
But the same Sūtra says, In the past, I was handsome. 
This declaration is for the purpose of indicating that the saint capable of recollecting his past lives remembers the variety of characteristics of his series of these existences. 
But the Buddha does not mean that he sees a real pudgala possessing, in a past life, such physical matter, etc.: 
We conclude that the Sūtra, insofar as it attṛibutes the possession of physical matter, etc., to a soul, has in view a self of designation, as one speaks of a pile which, being only an accumulation, has no unity; or of a current of water which being only an accumulation, has no unity; or of a cuṟṟent of water which, being only a succession , has no permanence. 
ēkkk The Blessed One would then not be omṇiscient, since the mind and mental states are not capable of knowing all the dharmas, seeing that mind and mental states change, arising and perishing from moment to moment. Omnis cience can belong only to a soul, a pudgala. 
We would reply that the pudgaa would be eternal if it does not perish when the mind perishes: 
One moment of thought is ṉnot capable of knowing everything. On this point, there is a verse: As fire, by the capacity of its series, burns all, so too does the Omniscient Onebut not by a universal, simultaneous knowl edge. How do you prove that ? 
It is spoken of in the Scriptures, on the subject of the Buddhas of the past, present and future. 
For example the verse: Buddhas of the past, Buddhas of the future, and Buddhas of the present destroy the sorrows of many. 
But, in your system, the rkaṉdhas of existence belong to the three periods of time, but not the pzdgala. 
kk If the term pugala only designates the five ṛkandhasofattachment, how can the Blessed One say, Oh Bhikṣus, I shall explain to you the burden, the taking up of the burden, the laying down of the burden, and the bearer of the burden. 
Why may it not be explained in these terms? 
Because, if the pudgala is only a name given to the rkandhas, it cannot be the bearer of a burden. 
Why not? 
Simply because it is unheard of. 
No one has ever ascertained the existence of an ineffable thing. 
And moreover you will have to account for the other statements of the Sūtra that thiṟst is the taking up of the burdeṉ: 
as thirst is a skandha, the burden , and it is unheard of that a burden takes itself up. The taking up of the burden is included within the rkandhas, and so too the bearer of the burden. 
These are the skandhas that the Blessed One designated by the name of pzxdgala, the bearer of the burden, as one sees in the explanation given a little farther on in the same Sūtra. 
After having said that the burden is the five rkandhasofat tachment, that the taking up of the burden is thirst, and that the laying down of the burden is the abandoning of thirst, it is said that the bearer of the burden is the pxdgala; but fearing that one understands the pudgala inexactly, as an eteṟrnal, ineffable, real entity, he explains, This venerable one, of such a name, of such a gotra, and the rest , in order that one might well know that the pudgala is effable, impermanent, and without a unique pnature. 
The five skandhasofattachmeṇt are painful in their nature: 
they receive then the name of burden; each of the former moments of the series attract each of the latter moments: it receives then the name of bearer of the burden. The pudgala is then not an entity. 
kkk The pudgala exists as the Sūtra says, To say that apparitional beings do not exist is a false view. 
Who denies the existence of apparitional beings? 
For him, apparitional beings designates a series of skandhas , susceptible of going to another world without the inteṟrvention of a womb, an egg, or of moisture forms of birth. 
To negate the existence of an apparitional being so defined, is a false view, because this type of series of skandhas truly exists. 
If you maintain that the negation of the pudgala is false, you wil have to say how this false view is given up. 
It cannot be given up by Seeing, nor by Meditation, for on the one hand, the pxdgala is not included within the Truths, and, on the other hand, false views are not given up by Meditation but by Seeing. 
ṭk But a Sūtra says, A pudgala arises in this world... Now this does not refer to the five skandhas, but to an entity. Such is not the meaning of the Sūtra that only metaphorically designates as a unit that which exists only as a complex; as the world speaks of a grain of hemp, or a grain of rice, or of a heap, or a word. 
Further, since the Sūtra attributes an aṟising to the pudgala, it is therefore conditioned. 
For the skandhas, to arise means to exist after having been nonexistent. 
One says that the pudgala arises because, at that moment, it takes on different sbkandhas. 
As oṉe says in the world, when a certain person acquires a certain knowledge, that a sacrificer, or a grammarian is born; when a layman takes on certain characteristics, one says that a bhiks, a monk of a certain sect is born: 
And again in the same way, through the acquisition of a certain trait, one says: an old man is born, a sick person comes into being. 
In the Paramār thafūnyatasūtra, the Blessed One said, There is action; there is result; but, besides the causal production of the dharmas , one does not maintain the existence of an agent which abandons these skandhas and which takes up other skandhas. 
Taking into consideration the injury that heresy does and, also, the falling off of good deeds, the Buddhas teach the Law in the manner in which a tigress carries its young. 
Those who believe in the reality of the soul are torn by the teeth of heresy; those who do not recognize the conventional self let their good actions fall away, and perish. 
And again: Since a real jṝva does not exist, the Buddha does not say that the jva is identical or nonidentical; he does not say any more than that the jñva does not really exist, fearing that one would only negate the conventioṇal jṝva. 
Series of skandhas, actions, and the results of actions are what are termed jṝva: 
And if the Buddha does not say that the socalled jñva is in the skandhas it is because he sees that the questioner is not capable of tolerating the teaching of emptiness. 
It is then because of the state of mind of Vatsa that the Buddha, asked if there was a soul, yes or no, did not answer. But if the soul were to exist, why wouldnt he have answered that it exists? 
again this is because he took into considration the intention of the questioner. 
If such a person understands Joka to be a soul , the four alternatives are incoṟṟect, since the soul does not absolutely exist. 
If he understands oka to be transmigration or sasāra, the four alternatives are incorrect; if transmigration is eternal, no one could obtain Nirvāṇa; if it is not eternal, all would obtain Nirvana by spontaneous annihilation, and not through effort: 
if it is both eternal and noneternal, some would never obtain Nirvāṇa, whereas others would obtain it spontaneously; finally, to say that Joka, in the sense of sarsra, is neither eternal nor noneternal, is to say that beings both would and would not obtain Nirvāṇa: 
a contradiction in terms. 
In fact, Nirvāṇa is possible through the Way; then no categorical response is acceptable. 
How do we know that the infinity of the world should be understood in this sense? 
Such a person understood the Tathāgata to be a soul ḷiberated from the defilements. 
Rather one should believe that if the Blessed One abstains from all declarations, it is because the soul that the questioner alluded to in speaking of the Tathāgata does not absolutely exist. 
tt The pudgala really exists, as it is said, that To say that I really, truly do not have an āman is an incoṟrect opiṉion. 
This is not a proof, for it is also said that it is an incorrect opinion to affirm the existence of an āmegn. 
This doctrine is certain, as it is formulated in the Vatsagotrāsātra, Ānanda, those who affirm a soul fall into the extreme of the belief in permanence; those who deny a soul fall into the extreme of the belief in annihilation... 
If the pudgala does not exist, what is it that wanders in rasāra? 
In fact, one can only allow that sasāra itself waṅders. 
Would you say that this wandering consists in abandoning old randhas and in taking up new skandhas? 
But we have shown that this explanation is inadmissable. 
But what is the thing that the Blessed One calls soul? 
For us, when the Blessed One said, I was the teacher Sunetra, he teaches us that the skaṉdhas that constitute his present soul formed part of the same series as the skandhas that constituted Sunetra. 
kṣfek You affirm the existence of a real soul: 
when one recognizes a soul in what is not the soul, as do the nonBuddhists, one feels affection for this pretended soul; but, when one sees the soul in that which is truly the soul, namely the ineffable pvdgala, as do the Buddhas, no affection is produced with regard to the soul. 
kṣk If the soul does not absoḻutely exist, how can a mindwhich perishes as soon as it is generatedbe capable of remembering an object perceived a long time before? 
What do you understand by to rememmber? 
We have explained what is the agent of this action: 
In the absence of a soul, whose is the memory? 
To what then is the memory directed and employed by a master, for whom you search with great pains. 
It is dīrected and employed on the object that one wants to remember. 
To what purpose? 
Do you want to say that one causes it to be produced? 
What you call master is then simply the cause, and what you call subject is simply the result. 
To whom do we attribute consciousness? 
kkk Certain scholars say that the soul exists, as existence depends on an existing being , as the walking of Devadatta depends on Devadatta. 
We would ask what it is that they understand by Devadatta. 
If they regard Devadatta as a real individual, we have discussed and refuted this theory. 
Devadatta is an imaginary individual and. 
Nevertheless, a Sūtra says that the consciousness knows the object. 
In the same way that fruit, although it does nothing, is said to correspond to the seed, to reproduce the seed, because it is produced resembling the seed; the vijñāna also, although it accomplishes no action with regard to the object, is said to know the object because it is produced resembling the object. 
Why do not consciousnesses succeed themselves in a determined order, as do shoots, stems, leaves, etc? 
in the series which they form, the latter should differ from the former. 
Because, as we have said, transformation is a characteristic of the mental series; this characteristic is eminently propitious for the production of the result of ideas, having medium or small force. 
This master explains the variety of consciousnesses and the absence of a fixed rule to their arising by the diversity that he terms the conjunction of the soul with the anas or mental organ. 
This explanation does not hold. 
No type of conjunction is proved. 
Would you say that this diversity results from the diversity of the bxddhi, intelligence, ? 
if the soul is not diversified, how would bddhi be diversified? 
Would you say that the diversity of the buddhi results from the diversity of conjunction of the soul and the meanas, a vaṟiety which results from the saskāras? 
In this hypothesis, the soul serves no purpose; why not say that the diversity of consciousnesses comes from the consciousness itself which is diversified by the saskāras? 

The tree of enlightenment was tall and outstanding. 
Its trunk was diamond, its main boughs were lapis lazuli, its branches and twigs were of various precious elements. 
The precious blossoms were of various colors, the branching twigs spread out their shadows. Also the fruits were jewels containing a blazing radiance. They were together with the flowers in great arrays. The entire circumference of the tree emanated light; within the light there rained precious stones, and within each gem were enlightening beings, in great hosts like clouds, simultaneously appearing. 
The various adornments emanated lights like clouds; the masses of their reflections from within the palace formed banners. 
Their lion seats were high, wide, and beautiful. The bases were made of jewels, their nets of lotus blossoms, their tableaus of pure, exquisite gemstones. They were adorned with various flowers of all colors. 
The branches and fruits of jewel trees surrounded them, arrayed at intervals. Clouds of radiance of jewels reflected each other: the Buddhas of the ten directions conjured regal pearls, and the exquisite jewels in the topknots of all the enlightening beings all emanated light, which came and illuminated them. 
Furthermore, sustained by the spiritual power of all Buddhas, they expounded the vast perspective of the Enlightened Ones, their subtle tones extending afar, there being no place they did not reach. 
At that time, the Buddha, the World Honored One, in this setting, attained to supreme, correct awareness of all things. 
His knowledge entered into all times with complete equanimity; his body filled all worlds; his voice universally accorded with all lands in the ten directions. Like space, which contains all forms, he made no discrimination among all objects. 
And, as space extends everywhere, he entered all lands with equanimity. 
His body forever sat omnipresent in all sites of enlightenment. Among the host of enlightening beings, his awesome light shone clearly, like the sun emerging, illumining the world. 
The ocean of myriad virtues which he practiced in all times was thoroughly pure, and he constantly demonstrated the production of all the buddha-lands, their boundless forms and spheres of light extending throughout the entire cosmos, equally and impartially. 
Each of his hairtips was able to contain all worlds without interference, in each manifesting immeasurable spiritual powers, teaching and civilizing all sentient beings. 
His body extended throughout the ten directions, yet without coming or going. 
His knowledge entered into all forms and realized the emptiness of things. 
All the miraculous displays of the Buddhas of past, present, and future, were all seen in his light, and all the adornments of inconceivable eons were revealed. 
There were great enlightening beings numerous as the atoms in ten buddha-worlds surrounding him. Their names were: Universally Good , Light of the Supreme Lamp of Universal Virtue, Lion Banner of Universal Light, Subtle Light of Flames of Universal Jewels, Banner of Oceans of Qualities of Universal Sounds, Realm of Enlightenment of Radiance of Universal Knowledge, Banner of Flowers of a Topknot of Universal Jewels, Pleasing Voice of Universal Awareness, Light of Inexhaustible Virtue of Universal Purity, Mark of Universal Light, Great Brilliance of the Light of the Moon Reflected in the Ocean, Undefiled Treasury of Light of Oceans of Cloudlike Sounds, Born of Wisdom and Adorned with Virtue, Great Light of Sovereign Virtue, Brave Lotus Topknot, Sun Banner of Clouds of Universal Knowledge, Greatly Persevering with Indestructible Courage, Light Banner of Fragrant Flames, Deep Beautiful Sound of Great Enlightened Virtue, Born of Wisdom with the Light of Great Virtue. These and others were the leaders—there were as many as there are atoms in ten buddha-worlds. 
They had already fulfilled the various means of transcendence, and their wisdom eye was thoroughly clear. They observed all times with impartiality. They were thoroughly purified in all states of concentration. 
Their eloquence was oceanic, extensive and inexhaustible. They possessed the qualities of buddhahood, were dignified and honorable. 
They knew the faculties of sentient beings, and taught them according to potential and necessity. 
They were able to enter into one stage, according to technical expediency, yet maintain the virtues of all stages, supported by the ocean of all vows, always accompanied by wisdom, throughout the future. They had thoroughly comprehended the rarely-attained, vast secret realm of all Buddhas. They were familiar with the equal teachings of all Buddhas. They were already treading the Buddhas’ ground of universal light. 
They entered the doors of boundless oceans of concentrations. They manifested bodies in all places and participated in worldly activities. Their memory power was enormous, and they assembled the ocean of all the teachings. 
The vast ocean of virtuous qualities of all Buddhas entered entirely into their bodies. They went willingly to all the lands in which there were Buddhas. 
In all places when the Buddhas attained enlightenment, they were always there, approaching them and associating with them, never giving up. Always, by means of the vows of universal goodness and wisdom, they caused the wisdom-body of all sentient beings to be fulfilled. 
They had perfected innumerable such virtues. There were also present thunderbolt-bearing spirits, as numerous as atoms in a buddha-world, known as Demigod of Wonderful Form, Banner of Swiftness of the Sun, Light of the Flowers of the Polar Mountain, Pure Sound of Clouds, Sublime Faculties, Delightful Light, Sound of Thunder in Great Trees, Lion King Light, Auspicious Eye of Intense Flames, Jewel Topknot of Lotus Light; these were the leaders, and there were as many of them as there are atoms in a buddha-world. All of them had constantly invoked great vows over countless past eons, vowing to always draw near to and serve the Buddhas. Their practices in accord with their vows had already reached fulfillment, and they had reached the other shore. 
They had accumulated boundless pure good works. They had clearly arrived at all the realms of meditative absorption, and had attained spiritual powers. They dwelled wherever a Buddha was, and entered into the realm of inconceivable liberation; taking their place in the assembly, their dignified light stood out. They manifested their bodies according to the needs of sentient beings and thereby pacified them. 
Wherever the Buddhas dwelt, they always diligently guarded and protected the place. There were also multiple-body spirits, numerous as atoms in a buddha-world, known as Flower Topknot Adornment, Light Illumining All Directions, Oceanic Sound Conquering, Pure Flower Adorned Topknot, Infinite Dignified Postures, Array of Supreme Light, Fragrant Clouds of Pure Light, Guardian Sustainer, Ubiquitious Shepherd, Immutable Light. These were the leaders; there were as many as there are atoms in a buddha-world. They had all in the past fulfilled great vows and had provided for and served all the Buddhas. 
Also there were footstep-following spirits, numerous as atoms in a buddha-world. Their leaders were known as Precious Symbol, Lotus Light, Topknot of Pure Flowers, Embodying All Beautiful Visions, Exquisite Gem Star Banner, Joyfully Uttering Sublime Sounds, Sandalwood Tree Light, Lotus Luminosity, Subtle Light, Collection of Fine Flowers, and so on. Over innumerable past ages they had all associated with Buddhas, always following them. 
There were also sanctuary spirits, as numerous as atoms in a buddha-world. Their leaders were known as Banner of Pure Adornments, Polar Mountain Jewel Light, Sign of the Thunder Banner, Wonderful Eyes Raining Flowers, Garland Light Topknot, Raining Jewel Arrays, Courageous Fragrant Eye, Diamond-Colored Cloud, Lotus Light, Radiance of Ineffable Light, and so on. All of them had in the past met innumerable Buddhas, perfected their will power, and brought forth extensive offerings. There were also city spirits, as numerous as atoms in a buddha-world. 
Their leaders were known as Jewel Peak Radiance, Beautifully Adorned Palace, Jewel of Pure Joy, Sorrowless Purity, Flower Lamp Flame Eyes, Flame Banner Clearly Showing, Light of Virtue, Pure Light, Fragrant Topknot Adornment, Beautiful Jewel Light, and so on. All of them had, over innumerable, inconceivable eons, adorned the mansions in which the Buddhas stayed. There were also earth spirits, as numerous as atomic particles in a buddha-world. Their leaders were known as Pure Flower of Universal Virtue, Adornment of Stable Blessings, Beautiful Flower Adorned Tree, Universal Distributor of Treasures, Pure Eye Observing the Season, Beautiful Supreme Eye, Fragrant Hair Emitting Light, Pleasing Sound, Curled Topknot of Beautiful Flowers, Diamond-Adorned Body, and so on. 
They had all in the past made profound, grave vows, vowing to always associate with the Buddhas and cultivate the same virtuous acts. There were also innumerable mountain spirits, led by such as Jewel Peak Blooming Flower, Flower Forest Beautiful Topknot, Lofty Banner Shining Everywhere, Undefiled Jewel Topknot, Light Illumining All Directions, Light of Great Power, Awesome Light Conquering All, Light-Orb of Subtle Intensity, Universal Eye Clearly Seeing, Adamantine Eye of Mystery. They had all attained pure eyes in regarding all things. There were also an inconceivable number of forest spirits, led by such spirits as Spreading Flowers Like Clouds, Outstanding Trunk Unfolding Light, Bearing Branches Emitting Radiance, Auspicious Pure Leaves, Draped Flame Treasury, Pure Light, Pleasant Thunder, Light and Fragrance All-Pervading, Subtle Light Shining Far, Flowers and Fruits Savoring of Light, and so on. 
They all had infinite pleasing glows. There were also innumerable herb spirits, led by such as Auspicious, Sandalwood Forest, Pure Light, Universal Renown, Radiant Pores, Universal Purifier, Roarer, Banner of Light Outshining the Sun, Seeing in All Directions, Energy-Augmenting Clear Eyes, and so on. Their natures were all free from defilement, and they helped beings with kindness and compassion. There were also innumerable crop spirits, led by such spirits as Gentle Superb Flavor, Pure Light of Seasonal Flowers, Physical Strength Courage and Health, Increasing Vitality, Everywhere Producing Roots and Fruits, Wonderfully Adorned Circular Topknot, Moistening Pure Flowers, Developing Wonderful Fragrance, Liked by All Who See, Undefiled Pure Light. 
All of them had attained perfection of great joyfulness. There were also innumerable river spirits, led by such spirits as Everywhere Producing Swift Currents, Universally Purifying Springs and Streams, Dustfree Pure Eye, Roaring Everywhere, Rescuing Sentient Beings, Heatless Pure Light, Universally Causing Joy, Supreme Banner of Extensive Virtue, Light Shining on All Worlds, Light of Oceanic Virtues. All of them diligently concentrated on benefiting living beings. There were also innumerable ocean spirits, led by such spirits as Producing Jewel Light, Diamond Banner, Undefiled, Palaces in All Waters, Auspicious Jewel Moon, Beautiful Flower Dragon Topknot, Everywhere Holding the Flavor of Light, Jewel Flame Flower Light, Beautiful Diamond Topknot, Thunder of the Ocean Tide. 
They had all filled their bodies with the great ocean of virtues of the Buddhas. There were also innumerable water spirits, led by such spirits as Ubiquitous Cloud Banner, Cloudlike Sound of the Ocean Tide, Beautiful Round Topknot, Whirlpool of Skills, Store of Undefiled Fragrance, Virtue Bridge Light Sound, Freedom of Contentment, Good Sound of Pure Joy, Everywhere Manifesting Awesome Light, Roaring Sound Filling the Sea. 
They always diligently strived to rescue and protect all beings. There were also countless fire spirits, led by such spirits as Repository of Flames of Universal Light, Banner of Universal Assembly of Light, Great Light Shining Everywhere, Palace of Wonders, Inexhaustible Light Topknot, Eyes of Various Flames, Palaces in All Directions Like Polar Mountains, Sovereign of Awesome Light, Light Destroying the Darkness, Thunder and Lightning. All of them manifested various kinds of light, causing the irritations of sentient beings to vanish. 
There were also innumerable wind spirits, led by such spirits as Unimpeded Light, Everywhere Manifesting Courageous Action, Wind Striking Cloud Banner, Arrays of Light, Power Able to Dry Up Water, Great Voice Howling Everywhere, Tree Branch Hanging Topknot, Unimpeded Wherever It Goes, Various Mansions, Great Light Shining Everywhere. 
They all worked to dispel the mentality of conceit. There were also innumerable space spirits, led by such spirits as Pure Light Shining All Around, Traveling Everywhere Deeply and Extensively, Producing Auspicious Wind, Abiding Securely Beyond Obstruction, Broad Steps and Beautiful Topknot, Unhindered Light Flames, Unobstructed Conquering Power, Spotless Light, Deep and Far-Reaching Sublime Sound, All-Pervading Light. Their minds were all free from defilement, broad, vast, clear, and pure. 
There were also innumerable direction spirits, led by such spirits as Dwelling Everywhere, Ubiquitous Light, Array of Light Beams, Traveling Everywhere Unhindered, Forever Ending Confusion, Roaming Everywhere in Pure Space, Great Sound of Cloud Banners, Topknot and Eyes Undisturbed, Universally Observing the Doings of the Worlds, Traveling Everywhere Watching. They were able, by means of their skills, to emanate light in all directions, always illuminating the ten directions continuously without interruption. 
There were also innumerable night spirits, led by such spirits as Pure Light of Universal Virtue, Observing the World with Joyful Eyes, Everywhere Manifesting Auspicious Omens, Everywhere Causing Tree Flowers to Bloom, All Senses Always Joyful, Producing Pure Bounty. 
They all practiced diligently, taking delight in the truth. There were also innumerable day spirits, led by such as Displaying Palaces, Bringing Forth the Fragrance of Wisdom, Delighting in Superb Adornments, Exquisite Light of Fragrant Flowers, Collecting All Wonderful Herbs, Liking to Make Joyful Eyes, Appearing In All Places, Light of Great Compassion, Radiance of Goodness, Garlands of Beautiful Flowers. They all had certain faith in the sublime truth and always strived diligently in concert to adorn the palace. 
There were also innumerable titan kings, led by such as Rahula, Bhimacitta, Skillful Magical Arts, Great Following, Great Strength, Universal Shining, Wonderful Adornment of Firm Action, Vast Causal Wisdom, Manifesting Superior Qualities, Sublime Voice. They had all worked energetically to conquer pride and other afflictions, There were also an inconceivable number of kinnara kings, led by such as Heaven of Light of Refined Intellect, Exquisite Flower Banner, Various Adornments, Pleasing Sound, Jewel Tree Light, Delight to the Beholder, Adornment of Supreme Light, Delicate Flower Banner, Earth-Shaking Power, Conquering Evil Beings. They all made diligent efforts, contemplating all things, their minds always blissful, roaming freely. 
There were also innumerable garuda kings, led by such as Power of Great Swiftness, Unbreakable Jewel Topknot, Pure Speed, Nonregressing Mind, Sustaining Power in the Ocean, Steady Pure Light, Artistically Decorated Crown Topknot, Immediate Manifestation Everywhere, Surveying the Ocean, Universal Sound and Broad Eyes. They had already perfected the power of great skill in expedient methods of liberation and were able to rescue all beings. 
There were also innumerable mahoraga kings, led by such as Beneficent Wisdom, Pure Dignified Sound, Adornment of Supreme Wisdom, Lord of Sublime Eyes, Lamplike Banner, Refuge of the Masses, Supreme Light Banner, Lion Guts, Sound Adorned by Myriad Subtleties, Stable as a Polar Mountain, Delightful Light. They all diligently cultivated great and extensive skills in method to cause sentient beings to forever tear apart the net of ignorance. 
There were also innumerable yaksha kings, led by such as Vaishravana, Independent Sound, Solemn Weapon Bearer, Great Wisdom, Lord of Flaming Eyes, Adamantine Eye, Arm of Courage and Strength, Bravely Resisting General, Rich in Material Goods, Power to Smash High Mountains. They all strived to guard and protect all living beings. There were also innumerable great naga kings, led by such as Virupaksha, Shakra, Subtle Banner of Cloud Sounds, Flaming Mouth Ocean Light, Ubiquitous High Cloud Banner, Unbounded Steps, Pure Form, Great Sound Traveling Everywhere, No Heat or Torment; they all worked hard making clouds and spreading rain to cause the heat and afflictions of all beings to vanish. 
There were also innumerable kumbanda kings, led by such as Increase, Dragon Lord, Banner of Adornments of Goodness, Universally Beneficial Action, Most Fearsome, Handsome with Beautiful Eyes, High Peak Intellect, Brave and Strong Arms, Boundless Pure Flower Eyes, Enormous Godlike Face with Titan’s Eyes. They all diligently practiced and studied the teachings of freedom from impediment, and emitted great light. 
There were also innumerable gandharva kings, led by such as Sustaining the Nation, Tree Light, Clear Eyes, Flower Crown, Universal Sound, Joyously Moving Beautiful Eyes, Wondrous Sound Lion Banner, Diamond Tree Flower Banner, Joyfully Causing Adornments to Appear Everywhere. 
They all had deep faith and appreciation of the great teaching, rejoiced in it and respected it, and diligently practiced it tirelessly. There were also innumerable moon deities, led by such as Moon Godling, Flower King Topknot Halo, Myriad Sublime Pure Lights, Pacifying the Hearts of the World, Luminosity of Tree King Eyes, Manifesting Pure Light, Immutable Light Traveling Everywhere, Sovereign Monarch of Constellations, Moon of Pure Awareness, Great Majestic Light. 
All strived to bring to light the mind-jewel of living beings. There were also innumerable sun deities, led by such as Sun Godling, Eyes of Flames of Light, Awesome Light, Undefiled Jewel Arrays, Nonregressing Courage, Light of Beautiful Flower Garlands, Supreme Banner Light, Universal Light of a Jewel Topknot, Eyes of Light. All of them diligently learned and practiced to benefit living beings and increase their roots of goodness. 
There were also innumerable kings of the thirty-three heavens, led by such as Shakra-Indra, Everywhere Intoning Fulsome Sound, Kind Eyes Jewel Topknot, Jewel Light Banner Fame, Joy-Producing Topknot, Admirable Right Mindfulness, Supreme Sound of the Polar Mountain, Perfect Mindfulness, Pleasing Flower Light, Eye of the Sun of Knowledge, Independent Light Able to Enlighten. All of them strived to bring forth great works in all worlds. 
There were also innumerable kings of the Suyama heavens, led by such as Timely Portion, Delightful Light, Banner of Inexhaustible Wisdom and Virtue, Skilled in Miraculous Displays, Great Light of Memory Power, Inconceivable Wisdom, Circular Navel, Light Flames, Illumination, Greatly Famed for Universal Observation. All of them diligently cultivated great roots of goodness, and their minds were always joyful and content. 
There were also an inconceivable number of kings of the Tushita heavens, led by such as Contented, Ocean of Bliss Topknot, Supreme Virtue Banner, Still and Silent Light, Pleasing Beautiful Eyes, Clear Moon on a Jewel Peak, Supreme Courage and Strength, Subtle Diamond Light, Constellation Array Banner, Pleasing Adornments. All of them diligently kept in mind the names and epithets of all the Buddhas. 
There were also innumerable kings of the heavens of enjoyment of emanations, led by such as Skillful Transformation and Emanation, Light of Silent Sound, Light of the Power of Transformation and Emanation, Master of Adornment, Light of Mindfulness, Supreme Cloud Sound, Supreme Light of Myriad Subtleties, Exquisite Topknot Light, Perfect Joy and Intellect, Flower Light Topknot, and Seeing in All Directions. All of them worked diligently to tame living beings and enable them to attain liberation. 
There were also countless kings of the heavens of free enjoyment of others’ emanations, led by such as Sovereign Freedom, Sublime Eye Lord, Beautiful Crown Banner, Courageous Intelligence, Wonderful Sound Phrases, Subtle Light Banner, Gate of the Realm of Peace, Array of Splendid Discs Banner, Flower Grove Independent Intellect, and Light of Beautiful Adornments of the Power of Indra. 
All of them diligently practiced and studied the vast and great teaching of independent skill in means of liberation. There were also uncountable kings of the great brahma heavens, led by such as Shikhin, Light of Wisdom, Radiance of Benificent Wisdom, Sound of Ubiquitous Clouds, Independent Observer of the Sounds of Speech of the Worlds, Eyes of Still Light, All-Pervading Light, Sound of Magical Displays, Eyes of Shining Light, and Pleasing Ocean Sound. All of them had great compassion and took pity on living beings; unfolding light that illumined everywhere, they caused them to be joyful and blissful. 
There were also innumerable kings of the heavens in which light is used for sound, led by Pleasing Light, Pure Subtle Light, Sound of Freedom, Supreme Awareness and Knowledge, Delightful Pure Subtle Sound, Sound of Skillful Meditation, Universal Sound Illumining Everywhere, Most Profound Light-Sound, Pure Name Light, and Supreme Pure Light. All of them dwelt in the unhindered state of great peace, tranquility, joy, and bliss. 
There were also innumerable kings of the heavens of universal purity, led by such as Pure Reputation, Supreme Vision, Virtue of Tranquility, Sound of the Polar Mountain, Eye of Pure Mindfulness, Light Flame Sovereign, Enjoyer of Meditation on the Truth and Creating Demonstrations, Banner of Miraculous Displays, and Exquisite Array of Constellation Sounds. They were all already abiding securely in the great teaching, and worked diligently to benefit all worlds. 
There were also innumerable kings of the heavens of vast results, led by such as Banner of the Delightful Light of Truth, Ocean of Pure Adornments, Light of Supreme Wisdom, Independent Wisdom Banner, Delight in Tranquility, Eye of Universal Knowledge, Delight in Use of Intellect, Light of Intellect Sown with Virtue, Undefiled Tranquil Light, and Vast Pure Light. They all dwelt at peace in the palace of tranquility. 
There were also countless kings of the heavens of great freedom, led by such as Sea of Subtle Flames, Light of the Name of Freedom, Eye of Pure Virtues, Enjoyable Great Intelligence, Freedom of Immutable Light, Eyes of Sublime Adornments, Light of Skillful Meditation, Delightful Great Knowledge, Universal Sound Array Banner, and Light of Fame of Extreme Exertion. All of them diligently contemplated the truth of formlessness, and their actions were all equanimous and impartial. At that time the oceanic hosts at the Buddha’s site of enlightenment had assembled: 
the unlimited types and species were all around the Buddha, filling everywhere. 
From wherever they came, they approached the World Honored One, wholeheartedly looking up to him. 
These assembled masses had already gotten rid of all afflictions and mental defilements as well as their residual habits. They had pulverized the mountains of multiple barriers, and perceived the Buddha without obstruction. 
They were like this because Vairocana Buddha in past times, over oceans of eons, cultivating the practices of enlightening beings, had received them and taken care of them with the four saving practices of generosity, kind words, beneficial action, and cooperation, and while planting roots of goodness in the company of each Buddha in those eons, had already taken good care of them and had taught and developed them by various means, establishing them on the path of omniscience, where they sowed innumerable virtues, gained great merits, and had all entered completely into the ocean of skill in liberative means and undertaking of vows. 
The actions they carried out were fully pure, and they had well embarked on the way to emancipation. 
They found the doors of liberation of all Buddhas, and roamed freely in spiritual powers. 
That is to say, Ocean of Subtle Flames, a king of a heaven of great freedom, found the door of liberation through the tranquility and practical power of the realm of space and the cosmos. 
The celestial king Light of the Name of Freedom gained the door of liberation through freely observing all things. 
The celestial king Eye of Pure Virtues found the door of liberation of effortless action knowing that all things are not born, do not perish, and do not come or go. 
The celestial king Enjoyable Great Intelligence found the door of liberation through the ocean of wisdom directly perceiving the real character of all things. 
The celestial king Freedom of Immutable Light found the door of liberation through the great practical concentration of bestowing boundless peace and happiness on living beings. 
The celestial king Eye of Sublime Adornments found the door of liberation through causing observation of the truth of nullity and annihilating all ignorance and fear. 
The celestial king Light of Skillful Meditation found the door of liberation through entering infinite realms without producing any activity of thought about existents. 
The celestial king Delightful Great Knowledge found the door of liberation by going everywhere in the ten directions to preach the truth, yet without moving and without relying on anything. 
The celestial king Universal Sound Array Banner found the gate of liberation by entry into the Buddhas’ realm of tranquility and everywhere manifesting great light. 
The celestial king Light of Fame of Extreme Exertion found the gate of liberation by abiding in his own enlightenment, yet having an infinitely broad perspective. 
At that time the celestial king Ocean of Subtle Flames, imbued with the spiritual power of the Buddha, surveyed the whole host of celestial beings of the heavens of great freedom, and said in verse, The buddha body extends throughout all the great assemblies: It fills the cosmos, without end. Quiescent, without essence, it cannot be grasped; It appears just to save all beings. 
The Buddha, King of the Teaching, appears in the world Able to light the lamp of sublime truth which illumines the world; His state is boundless and inexhaustible: This is what Name of Freedom has realized. 
The Buddha is inconceivable, beyond discrimination, Comprehending forms everywhere as insubstantial. For the sake of the world he opens wide the path of purity: This is what Pure Eyes can see. 
The Buddha’s wisdom is unbounded— No one in the world can measure it. It forever destroys beings’ ignorance and confusion: Great Intelligence has entered this deeply and abides there in peace. 
The Buddha’s virtues are inconceivable; In beings who witness them afflictions die out. They cause all worlds to find peace: Immutable Freedom can see this. 
Sentient beings, in the darkness of ignorance, are always deluded; The Buddha expounds for them the teaching of dispassion and serenity. This is the lamp of wisdom that illumines the world: Sublime Eyes knows this technique. 
The Buddha’s body of pure subtle form Is manifest everywhere and has no compare; This body has no essence and no resting place: It is contemplated by Skillful Meditation. 
The voice of the Buddha has no limit or obstruction; All those capable of accepting the teaching hear it. Yet the Buddha is quiescent and forever unmoving: This is the liberation of Delightful Knowledge. 
Serene, emancipated, master of the celestial and the human, There is nowhere in the ten directions he does not appear. The radiance of his light fills the world: This is seen by Majestic Banner of Unimpeded Truth. 
The Buddha sought enlightenment for the sake of all beings Over boundless oceans of eons; With various spiritual powers he teaches all: 
Light of Fame has realized this truth. Furthermore, the celestial king Banner of the Delightful Light of Truth found the door of liberation in observing the faculties of all beings, expounding the truth for them, and cutting off their doubts. 
The celestial king Ocean of Pure Adornments found the door of liberation causing vision of Buddha whenever brought to mind. The celestial king Light of Supreme Wisdom found the door of liberation realizing the body of adornments that have no basis and are equal in terms of phenomenal nature. 
The celestial king Delight in Tranquility found the door of liberation of manifesting inconceivable buddha-lands in a single pore without hindrance. 
The celestial king Eye of Universal Knowledge found the door of liberation of all-sided observation of the universe. 
The celestial king Delight in Use of Intellect found the door of liberation producing all kinds of displays for the benefit of all beings, always appearing eternally. 
The celestial king Light of Intellect Sown with Virtue found the door of liberation observing all objects in the world and entering into the truth of inconceivability. 
The celestial king Undefiled Tranquil Light found the door of liberation showing all beings the essential ways of emancipation. 
The celestial king Vast Pure Light found the door of liberation of observing all teachable beings and guiding them into the way of enlightenment. 
At that time the celestial king Banner of the Delightful Light of Truth, imbued with the Buddha’s power, surveyed all the hosts of the heavens of minor vastness, infinite vastness, and vast results, and said in verse, The realm of the Buddhas is inconceivable: No sentient being can fathom it. 
The Buddhas cause their minds to develop faith and resolution And great enjoyment without end. 
If any beings can accept the teaching, The Buddha, with spiritual powers, will guide them, Causing them to always see the Buddha before them: 
Ocean of Adornments sees in this way. The nature of all things has no resting place— The Buddhas’ appearance in the world is the same way— They have no resting place in any state of being: 
Supreme Wisdom can contemplate the meaning of this. Whatever be the heart’s desire of sentient beings, The Buddhas’ spiritual powers can manifest. 
Each different, they are inconceivable: This is Wisdom Banner’s ocean of liberation. 
All lands existing in the past They can show in a single pore: This is the great spiritual power of the Buddhas: Delight in Tranquility can expound this. 
The inexhaustible ocean of all teachings Is assembled in the sanctuary of one teaching. 
In all lands in all quarters Expounding the truth in each in every one, The Buddha’s body has no coming or going: 
This is the realm of Delight in Use of Intellect. 
The Buddha sees things of the worlds as like reflections of light; He enters into their most recondite mysteries And explains that the nature of all things is always quiescent: 
Intellect Sown with Virtue can see this. 
The Buddha knows all phenomena And rains the rain of truth according to beings’ faculties In order to open the inconceivable gate of emancipation: 
Tranquil Serenity can understand this. 
The World Honored One always, with great kindness and compassion, Appears in order to benefit sentient beings, Equally showering the rain of truth to the fill of their capacities: 
Pure Light can expound this. Furthermore, the celestial king Repute of Pure Wisdom found the door of liberation comprehending the ways and means of emancipation of all sentient beings. 
The celestial king Supreme Vision found the door of liberation of shadowlike demonstration according to the wishes of all celestial beings. 
The celestial king Delightful Universal Illumination found the door of liberation that flowed forth from the ocean of universal memory and concentration power. 
The celestial king Sovereign Lord of the World found the door of liberation of ability to cause sentient beings to meet the Buddha and produce the treasury of faith. 
The celestial king Light Flame Sovereign found the door of liberation of ability to cause all beings to hear the truth, to believe and rejoice, and become emancipated. 
The celestial king Enjoyer of Meditating on the Truth and Creating Demonstrations found the door of liberation entering into the civilizing activities of all enlightening beings, boundless and inexhaustible as space. 
The celestial king Banner of Miraculous Displays found the door of liberation observing the infinite afflictions of sentient beings with universal compassion and wisdom. 
At that time the celestial king Repute of Pure Wisdom, imbued with the power of the Buddha, surveyed the hosts of celestial beings of the heavens of little purity, boundless purity, and ubiquitous purity, and said in verse, He who realizes that the nature of things is without solidity Appears in all the boundless lands of the ten directions: Expounding the inconceivability of the realm of buddhahood, He causes all to return to the ocean of liberation. The Buddha is in the world without a resting place— Like a shadow or reflection he appears in all lands. The nature of things is ultimately nonorigination: 
Cultivating skill in means over countless ages, Purifying all lands in the ten directions, The suchness of the universe never moves: This is the realization of Virtue of Tranquility. 
Sentient beings are shrouded and veiled by ignorance; Blind, in the dark, they remain always in birth-and-death. The Buddha shows them the path of purity: This is the liberation of Polar Mountain Sound. 
The unexcelled path that the Buddhas traverse Cannot be plumbed by any sentient being. It is shown by various expedient methods: Pure Eye, clearly observing, can comprehend them all. 
The Buddha, by means of concentration formulae Numerous as the atoms in oceans of lands Teaches sentient beings, covering everything: Universal Illumination can enter this. 
The appearance of a Buddha is hard to encounter; It may be met once in countless eons; It is capable of inducing faith in sentient beings: This is the realization of the celestial Sovereign. 
The Buddha explains that the nature of things is natureless; Profound, far-reaching, it is inconceivable. He causes all beings to engender pure faith: Light Flame can comprehend this. 
The Buddhas of all times are replete with virtue; They teach sentient beings inconceivably. Contemplating this produces joy: Enjoyer of Truth can teach in this way. 
Sentient beings are sunk in the ocean of afflictions: Their ignorance and pollution of views are much to be feared. The great teacher pities them and frees them forever: This is the realm of contemplation of Banner of Miracles. 
The Buddha constantly emits great beams of light; In each light beam are innumerable Buddhas. Each makes displays of sentient beings’ affairs; This is the entry way of Wonderful Sound. 
Furthermore, the celestial king Pleasing Light found the door of liberation of always experiencing the bliss of tranquil serenity yet being able to appear in order to eliminate the sufferings of the world. 
The celestial king Pure Subtle Light found the door of liberation of the ocean of great compassion, the mine of joy and happiness of all sentient beings. 
The celestial king Sound of Freedom found the door of liberation manifesting in a single instant the power of virtue pf all sentient beings of boundless eons. 
The celestial king Supreme Awareness and Knowledge found the door of liberation causing all becoming, existing, and disintegrating worlds to be as pure as space. 
The celestial king Delightful Pure Subtle Sound found the door of liberation of joyfully believing and accepting the teachings of all sages. 
The celestial king Sound of Skillful Meditation found the door of liberation of ability to spend an eon expounding the meanings and methods of all stages of enlightenment. 
The celestial king Adornment Explaining Sound found the door of liberation of methods of making great offerings when all enlightening beings descend from the palace of the Tushita heaven to be born in the world. 
The celestial king Profound Light-Sound found the door of liberation of contemplation of the inexhaustible ocean of spiritual power and wisdom. 
The celestial king Great Fame found the door of liberation of techniques for appearing in the world, having fulfilled the ocean of virtues of all Buddhas. 
The celestial king Supreme Pure Light found the door of liberation of the mine of faith and delight produced by the power of the Buddha’s ancient vows. 
Then the celestial king Pleasing Light, imbued with the power of the Buddha, surveyed all the celestial hosts from the heavens of little light, infinite light, and intense light, and said in verse, I remember the past practice of the Buddha, Serving and providing offerings for innumerable Buddhas: His pure deeds, in accord with his original faith, Are now all visible, through the Buddha’s spiritual power. 
The Buddha’s body is formless, free from all defilement; Always abiding in compassion and pity, He removes the distress of all worlds: 
This is the liberation of Subtle Light. The Buddha’s teaching is vast and boundless; It is manifest in all fields, According to their becoming and decay, each different: 
This is the power of liberation of Sound of Freedom. The Buddha’s spiritual power is incomparable; It appears everywhere, in the vast fields of all directions, And makes them all pure, always manifest: This is the technique of liberation of Supreme Mindfulness. 
Respectfully serving all the Buddhas, Numerous as atoms in oceans of lands, Hearing the teaching, getting rid of defilement, not acting in vain, This is Subtle Sound’s application of the teaching. The Buddhas have, for immeasurable eons, Expounded the techniques of the stages, without peer. 
What they have explained is boundless and inexhaustible: Sound of Skillful Meditation knows the meaning of this. 
The infinite scenes of the Buddha’s miraculous displays Appear in all places in a single instant, Great techniques for conquering spirits and attaining enlightenment: This is the liberation of Adorning Sounds. 
Sustained by awesome power, able to explain And to demonstrate the deeds of spiritual powers of the Buddhas, Purifying all according to their faculties: 
This is the liberation door of Light-Sound. The Buddha’s wisdom is boundless— It has no equal in the world, it has no attachment; Compassionately responding to beings, it manifests everywhere: 
The Buddha, in the past, cultivated enlightening practices, Made offerings to all the Buddhas of the ten directions— The vows made in the presence of each Buddha Supreme Light hears and greatly rejoices. 
Furthermore, the brahma king Shikhin found the door of liberation abiding in all sites of enlightenment everywhere and preaching the truth while being pure and free of attachments in all actions. 
Brahma king Light of Wisdom found the door of liberation inducing all sentient beings to enter meditative absorption and stay there. 
Brahma king Radiance of Beneficent Wisdom found the door of liberation entering everywhere into all inconceivable truths. 
Brahma king Sound of Ubiquitous Clouds found the door of liberation entering into the ocean of all utterances of the Buddhas. 
Brahma king Independent Observer of the Sounds and Speech of the Worlds found the door of liberation of ability to remember all the techniques used by enlightening beings in teaching all sentient creatures. 
Brahma king Eyes of Still Light found the door of liberation showing the individual differences in characteristics of results of actions of all beings. 
Brahma king All-Pervading Light found the door of liberation of appearing before all sentient beings to guide them according to their various types. 
Brahma king Sound of Magical Displays found the door of liberation dwelling in the realm of tranquil and serene action of the pure aspect of all things. 
Brahma king Eyes of Shining Light found the door of liberation of always diligently appearing with no attachments, no boundaries, and no dependence in the midst of all existence. 
Brahma king Pleasing Ocean Sound found the door of liberation of constant contemplation and investigation of the inexhaustible truth. 
At that time the great brahma king Shikhin, imbued with the spiritual power of the Buddha, surveyed all the celestial hosts of the heavens of brahma bodies, brahma assistants, brahma masses, and great brahmas, and said in verse, The Buddha-body is pure and always tranquil; The radiance of its light extends throughout the worlds; Signless, patternless, without images, Like clouds in the sky, thus is it seen. 
This realm of concentration of the Buddha-body Cannot be assessed by any sentient being; It shows them inconceivable expedient doors: This is the enlightenment of Wisdom Light. 
The ocean of teachings, numerous as atoms in a buddha-land, Are expounded in a single word—all without remainder. They can be expounded this way for oceans of eons without ever being exhausted: This is the liberation of Light of Beneficent Wisdom. 
The complete sound of the Buddhas is equal to the worlds; Sentient beings each obtain understanding according to their kind, Yet there is no difference in the sound: Such is the understanding of the brahma king Universal Sound. 
The methods for entering enlightenment Of the Buddhas of all times Are all apparent in the Buddha-body: This is the liberation of Sound of Freedom. The activities of all sentient beings are different; According to the causes, the effects are various. In this way do the Buddhas appear in the world: 
Such is the realm of Universal Light. The Buddha-body is like space, inexhaustible— Formless, unhindered, it pervades the ten directions. All of its accommodational manifestations are like conjurations: Sound of Magical Displays understands this way. 
The appearances of the Buddha-body are boundless, And so are the knowledge, wisdom, and voice— Being in the world, manifesting form, yet without attachment: Shining Light has entered this door. 
The King of Truth reposes in the Palace of Sublime Reality— The light of the reality-body illumines everything. The nature of reality is incomparable and has no marks: This is the liberation of king Ocean Sound. 
Furthermore, the celestial king Sovereign Freedom had found the door of liberation of the treasury of freedom manifestly developing and maturing innumerable sentient beings. 
Celestial king Sublime Eye Lord found the door of liberation examining the pleasures of all sentient beings and causing them to enter the pleasure of the realm of sages. 
Celestial king Beautiful Jewel Banner Crown found the door of liberation causing all sentient beings to initiate practices according to their various inclinations and understandings. 
Celestial king Courageous Intelligence found the door of liberation holding together all the doctrines preached for the benefit of sentient beings. 
Celestial king Wonderful Sound Phrases found the door of liberation remembering the compassion of the Buddha and increasing progress in his own practice. 
Celestial king Subtle Light Banner found the door of liberation of manifesting the door of great compassion and smashing down the banner of all pride and conceit. 
Celestial king Realm of Peace found the door of liberation conquering the malicious attitudes of all people. 
Celestial king Array of Splendid Discs Banner found the door of liberation of all the infinite Buddhas of the ten directions coming whenever they are remembered. 
Celestial king Flower Light Wisdom found the door of liberation of everywhere manifesting perfect enlightenment according to the minds and thoughts of sentient beings. 
Celestial king Sublime Light of Indra found the door of liberation of independence of great awesome power to enter all worlds. 
At that time the celestial king Sovereign Freedom, imbued with the majestic power of the Buddha, surveyed all the celestial hosts of the heavens of freedom and said in verse, The Buddha body is all-pervasive, equal to the cosmos. It manifests in response to all sentient beings; With various teachings he is always guiding: Master of Teaching, he is able to enlighten. 
Of the various pleasures of the world, The pleasure of holy tranquility is supreme; Abiding in the vast essence of reality: Sublime Eye sees this. 
The Buddha appears throughout the ten directions Universally responding to all hearts, teaching the truth— All doubting thoughts are cut off: 
This is the door of liberation of Beautiful Banner Crown. The Buddhas speak the wondrous sound throughout the world; The teachings spoken over countless ages Can all be expounded in a single word: This is the liberation of Courageous Intelligence. 
All the great kindness in the world Cannot equal a hairtip of the Buddha’s. The Buddha’s kindness is inexhaustible as space: This is the realization of Wonderful Sound. 
Completely demolishing in all quarters The mountains of pride of all beings, This is the function of the great compassion of the Buddha: This is the path traveled by Subtle Light Banner. 
The light of wisdom, pure, fills the world; Any who see it are relieved of ignorance And caused to leave the evil ways: Realm of Peace realizes this truth. 
The light of a hair pore is able to expound Buddha names as numerous as sentient beings. According to their pleasure, they all can hear it: This is Splendid Disc Banner’s liberation. 
The Buddha’s freedom cannot be measured— It fills the cosmos and all space. All the congregations see it clearly: This liberation door Flower Intellect enters. 
Over oceans of eons, infinite, boundless, Manifesting everywhere and preaching the truth, Never has a Buddha been seen to have any going or coming: This is the enlightenment of Wonderful Light. 
Furthermore, the celestial king Skillful Transformation found the door of liberation of the power of magical displays demonstrating all actions. 
Celestial king Light of Silent Sound found the door of liberation of relinquishing all clinging to objects. 
Celestial king Light of the Power of Transformation and Emanation found the door of liberation annihilating the ignorant muddled minds of all beings and causing their wisdom to become fully complete. 
Celestial king Master of Adornments found the door of liberation manifesting unlimited pleasing sounds. 
Celestial king Light of Mindfulness found the door of liberation knowing the infinite virtuous characteristics of all Buddhas. 
Celestial king Supreme Cloud Sound found the door of liberation knowing the process of becoming and decay of all past ages. 
Celestial king Supreme Light found the door of liberation of knowledge to enlighten all beings. 
Celestial king Exquisite Topknot found the door of liberation shedding light swiftly filling space in all directions. 
Celestial king Joyful Wisdom found the door of liberation of the power of energy whose deeds cannot be ruined by anyone. 
Celestial king Flower Light Topknot found the door of liberation knowing the rewards of actions of all sentient beings. 
At that time the celestial king Skillful Transformation, imbued with the majestic power of the Buddha, surveyed the whole host of celestial beings of the heavens of enjoyment of emanations and said in verse, The essence of the doings of the world is inconceivable— The Buddha teaches all about it for the confused, Skillfully explaining the true principle of causality And the different doings of all sentient beings. 
Looking at the Buddha in various ways, there’s nothing there; Seeking him in all directions, he can’t be found. The manifestations of the reality-body have no true actuality: This truth is seen by Silent Sound. 
The Buddha cultivated many practices over oceans of eons In order to extinguish the ignorance and confusion of the world. Therefore his purity is the most radiant light: This is the realization of the mind of Light Power. 
Of the sublime sounds and voices in the world, None can compare to the Buddha’s sound. The Buddha pervades the ten directions with a single sound: Entering this liberation is the Master of Adornment. 
All the power of wealth in the world Is not equal to a single characteristic of the Buddha— The virtues of the Buddha are like space: This is perceived by Mindful Light. 
The infinite ages of past, present, and future, The various aspects of their becoming and decay, The Buddha can show in a single pore: Supreme Cloud Sound can comprehend this. 
The extent of all space may be known, But the extent of a pore of Buddha cannot be apprehended. Such nonobstruction is inconceivable: Exquisite Topknot has been able to realize this. 
The Buddha, in countless past ages Fully cultivated the far-reaching transcendent means, Working diligently with nonflagging vigor: Joyful Intelligence knows this teaching. 
The causes and conditions of the nature of actions are inconceivable— The Buddha explains them all for the world. The nature of things is fundamentally pure, with no defilements: This is the entry way of Flower Light. 
You should gaze on a pore of the Buddha— All sentient beings are therein, And they neither come nor go: This is the understanding of Universal Sight. 
Furthermore, the celestial king Contented found the door of liberation of all Buddhas bringing forth a complete, fully rounded teaching in the world. 
Celestial king Ocean of Joy and Bliss Topknot found the door of liberation of the body of pure light extending throughout the realm of space. 
Celestial king Banner of Supreme Virtues found the door of liberation of the ocean of pure vows to extinguish the sufferings of the world. Celestial king Still and Silent Light found the door of liberation of physical manifestation everywhere to expound the truth. 
Celestial king Jewel Peak Moon found the door of liberation of the inexhaustible store of eternal manifestation teaching all worlds. 
Celestial king Courage and Strength found the door of liberation showing the realm of true awakening of all Buddhas. 
Celestial king Subtle Diamond Light found the door of liberation fortifying and solidifying all sentient beings’ will for enlightenment, making it unbreakable. 
Celestial king Constellation Banner found the door of liberation of techniques for associating with all Buddhas that appear, meditative investigation, and harmonization of sentient beings. 
Celestial king Pleasing Adornments found the door of liberation of instantaneously knowing the minds of sentient beings and appearing according to their potentials. 
At that time celestial king Contented, imbued with the awesome power of the Buddha, surveyed all the hosts of the heavens of contentment and spoke in verse, The Buddha is vast, extending throughout the cosmos, Equal toward all sentient beings— Universally responding to all hearts, he opens the door of wonder, Causing them to enter the inconceivable pure truth. The Buddha-body manifests everywhere in the ten directions; Free from attachment and obstruction, it cannot be grasped. In various forms it is seen by all worlds: This is the entry of Topknot of Joy. 
The Buddha cultivated various practices in the past, His pure great vows deep as the sea; All enlightening ways he causes to be fulfilled: Supreme Virtue knows these techniques. 
The Buddha’s body is inconceivable; Like reflections it shows separate forms, equal to the cosmos, Everywhere clarifying all things: This is the liberation door of Silent Light. 
Sentient beings are bound and covered by habitual delusion— Conceited, careless, their minds run wild. The Buddha expounds for them the way to calm: Pleasing Eyes, aware of this, rejoices at heart. 
The true guide of all worlds, He appears to rescue, to provide refuge, Showing all beings the abode of peace and happiness: Jewel Peak Moon enters deeply into this. 
The state of the Buddhas is inconceivable— It extends throughout all universes, Entering all things, reaching the other shore: Courageous Intellect, seeing this, rejoices. 
If any sentient beings can accept the teaching, And, hearing the virtues of Buddha, strive for enlightenment, He causes them to dwell in the ocean of bounty, forever pure: Subtle Light is able to observe this. 
Gathering around all the Buddhas, Numerous as the atoms of the lands of the ten directions, Reverently making offerings and hearing the teaching: This is the vision of Constellation Banner. 
This Beautiful Array well comprehends. Furthermore, the celestial king Timely Portion had found the door of liberation of inspiring virtue in all sentient beings and causing them to be forever free from anxiety and torment. 
Celestial king Sublime Light found the door of liberation entering into all realms. 
Celestial king Banner of Inexhaustible Wisdom and Virtue found the door of liberation of the wheel of great compassion destroying all afflictions. 
Celestial king Skilled in Miraculous Displays found the door of liberation comprehending the mentalities of all sentient beings of the past, present, and future. 
Celestial king Great Light of Memory Power found the door of liberation of the light of the gates of concentration formulae holding in memory all teachings without forgetting. 
Celestial king Inconceivable Wisdom found the door of liberation of inconceivable methods of skillfully entering into the nature of all actions. 
Celestial king Circular Navel found the door of liberation of methods of activating the cycles of the teaching and developing sentient beings to maturity. 
Celestial king Light Flame found the door of liberation of the vast eye observing all sentient beings and going to civilize them. 
Celestial king Illumination found the gate of liberation, getting beyond all barriers of habit and not going along with bedeviling doings. 
Celestial king Greatly Famed for Universal Observation found the door of liberation of skillfully guiding all celestial beings and inducing them to undertake actions with a pure heart. 
At that time the celestial king Timely Portion, imbued with the power of the Buddha, surveyed all the hosts of the Suyama heavens of good timely portion and spoke in verse, saying, The Buddha, for innumerable long eons, Has dried up the sea of troubles of the world: Opening wide the road of purity out of defilement, He causes to shine eternally the lamp of beings’ wisdom. 
The Buddha’s body is exceedingly vast— No borders can be found in the ten directions. His expedient means are unlimited: Subtle Light’s knowledge has access to this. 
The pains of birth, aging, sickness, death, and grief Oppress beings without relief. The Great Teacher takes pity and vows to remove them all: Inexhaustible Wisdom Light can comprehend this. 
Unhindered is the Buddha’s knowledge that all is illusory; He clearly comprehends all things in all times, Delving into the mental patterns of all sentient beings: This is the realm of Skillful Teaching. 
The bounds of his total recall are not to be found; The ocean of his eloquence is also unlimited. He is able to turn the wheel of the pure subtle truth: This is the liberation of Great Light. 
This is the level of technique of Circular Navel. The real body of the Buddha is fundamentally nondual; Yet it fills the world according to beings and forms— Sentient beings each see it before them: This is the perspective of Flames of Light. 
Once any sentient beings see the Buddha, It will cause them to clear away habitual obstructions And forever abandon all devilish actions: This is the path traveled by Illumination. 
All the hosts of beings are vast as oceans— Among them the Buddha is most majestically glorious. Everywhere he rains the rain of truth to enrich sentient beings. 
This liberation door Greatly Famed enters. Furthermore, the celestial king Shakra-Indra had found the liberation door of great joy remembering the appearance in the world of the Buddhas of past, present, and future, and clearly seeing the becoming and distintegration of the lands. 
Celestial king Full Sound of Universal Fame found the door of liberation of ability to cause the form body of the Buddha to be most pure and vast, without compare in the world. 
Celestial king Kind Eyes Jewel Topknot found the door of liberation of clouds of compassion covering all. 
Celestial king Jewel Light Banner Fame found the door of liberation of always seeing the Buddha manifesting various forms of majestic bodies to all the leaders of the worlds. 
Celestial king Joy-Producing Topknot found the door of liberation knowing from what virtuous actions the cities and buildings of all sentient beings came to be. 
Celestial king Admirable Mindfulness found the door of liberation showing the deeds of the Buddhas developing sentient beings. 
Celestial king Lofty Supreme Sound found the door of liberation of knowledge of the becoming and decay of all worlds and the signs of change of the ages. 
Celestial king Perfect Mindfulness found the door of liberation of calling to mind the acts of future enlightening beings in civilizing people. 
Celestial king Pure Flower Light found the door of liberation of knowledge of the cause of happiness in all heavens. 
Celestial king Sun of Wisdom Eye found the gate of liberation showing the acceptance and production of roots of goodness of all celestial beings, removing ignorance and illusion. 
At that time celestial king Shakra-Indra, imbued with the power of the Buddha, surveyed all the hosts of celestial beings of the thirty-three heavens, and spoke in verse, saying, I am conscious of the spheres of all Buddhas In all times being all equal As their lands form and disintegrate: They see all by enlightened spiritual powers. The Buddha body is vast and all-pervasive; Its ineffable form, incomparable, aids all beings, The radiance of its light reaching everywhere: This path Universal Fame can observe. 
This is the attainment of Light. Furthermore, Sun Godling had found the door of liberation of pure light shining on the sentient beings of the ten directions, always benefiting them forever and ever. 
The deity Light Flame Eyes found the door of liberation enlightening sentient beings through the agency of all corresponding bodies, causing them to enter the ocean of wisdom. 
The deity Polar Mountain Light Joy Banner found the door of liberation of being the leader of all sentient beings and having them diligently cultivate boundless pure qualities. 
The deity Pure Jewel Moon found the door of liberation of the joy of profound determination cultivating all ascetic practices. 
The deity Nonregressing Courage found the door of liberation of unhindered light shining everywhere causing all beings to increase in purity and clarity. 
The deity Light of Beautiful Flower Garlands found the door of liberation of pure light illumining the bodies of all sentient beings and causing them to produce oceans of joy and faith. 
Supreme Banner Light found the door of liberation of light illumining all worlds, causing them to perfect various wonderful qualities. 
The deity Universal Light of a Jewel Topknot found the door of liberation of the ocean of great compassion manifesting jewels of various forms and colors of boundless realms. 
The deity Eyes of Light found the door of liberation purifying the eyes of all sentient beings, causing them to see the matrix of the cosmos. The deity Virtue Bearing found the door of liberation developing pure continuous attention, never letting it be lost or broken. 
The deity Universal Light found the door of liberation carrying the palace of the sun all over, shining on all sentient beings of the ten directions, allowing them to accomplish their work. 
At that time Sun Godling, imbued with the Buddha’s power, surveyed all the sun deities and said in verse, The Buddha’s great light of knowledge Illumines all lands in the ten directions: All sentient beings can see the Buddha’s Various disciplines and manifold techniques. The forms of the Buddha are boundless, Appearing to all according to their inclinations, Opening up the ocean of knowledge for all worlds: Flame Eyes beholds the Buddha in this way. 
The Buddha-body is peerless, it has no compare; Its light shines throughout the ten directions, Transcending all, supremely unexcelled: Such a teaching has Joyful attained. 
Practicing austerities to benefit the world, Traversing all realms of existence for countless ages, His light is everywhere as pure as space: Jewel Moon knows these techniques. 
The Buddha speaks the wondrous sound without obstacle— It pervades all lands in the ten directions, Benefiting the living with the flavor of truth: Courageous knows this technique. 
Emanating inconceivable nets of light, Everywhere purifying all conscious beings, He causes them to engender profound faith: 
This is the way Flower Garland has entered. All the lights in the world Cannot match the light of a single pore of the Buddha— This is how inconceivable the Buddha’s light is: This is the liberation of Supreme Banner Light. 
The way of all Buddhas is thus: They all sit under the tree of enlightenment And bring the errant to the right path: Jewel Topknot Light sees in this way. 
Sentient beings are blind, ignorant, and suffering— The Buddha wants to make them produce a pure eye, And so lights the lamp of wisdom for them: Good Eye looks deeply into this. 
Honored master of liberating techniques— If any see him and make an offering, He causes them to cultivate practice and reach the result: This is Virtue’s power of means. 
In one teaching there are many aspects— For countless ages he teaches this way. The far-reaching meanings of the teachings expounded Are comprehended by Universal Light. 
Furthermore, Moon Godling found the door of liberation of pure light illuminating the universe, edifying all sentient beings. 
The deity Flower King Topknot Halo found the door of liberation observing the worlds of all sentient beings and causing them to enter the boundless truth. 
The deity Myriad Subtle Pure Lights found the door of liberation knowing the various operations of clinging to objects in the ocean of the minds of all sentient beings. 
The deity Pacifying the Hearts of the World found the door of liberation bestowing inconceivable happiness on all sentient beings, causing them to dance with joy. 
The deity Luminosity of Tree King Eyes found the door of liberation protecting agricultural work, the seeds, sprouts, stalks, etc., according to the season, causing it to be successfully accomplished. 
The deity Manifesting Pure Light found the door of liberation compassionately saving and protecting all sentient beings, causing them to witness the facts of experiencing pain and pleasure. 
The deity Immutable Light Traveling Everywhere found the door of liberation able to hold the pure clear moon and show it throughout the ten directions. 
The deity Sovereign Monarch of Constellations found the door of liberation showing all things to be illusory and like empty space, formless and without inherent nature. 
The deity Moon of Pure Awareness found the door of liberation performing great works for the benefit of all beings. 
The deity Great Majestic Light found the door of liberation universally cutting off all doubt and confusion. 
At that time Moon Godling, imbued with the spiritual power of the Buddha, surveyed all the celestial hosts in all the moon palaces, and said in verse, The Buddha radiates light pervading the world, Illumining the lands in the ten directions, Expounding the inconceivable, far-reaching teaching To destroy forever the darkness of ignorance and delusion. 
His sphere is infinite and inexhaustible— He teaches eternally through countless eons, Edifying beings through various powers: Flower Topknot looks upon Buddha this way. 
The ocean of sentient beings’ minds varies from moment to moment; The Buddha’s knowledge is so broad it comprehends all this, Expounding the truth for them all, making them glad: 
This is the liberation of Subtle Light. Sentient beings have no holy tranquility; Sunk in evil ways, they suffer many pains— The Buddha shows them the nature of things: Peaceful Meditation sees in this way. 
This is known to Eye Light. The Buddha opens up the light of truth, Analyzing the natures of the acts of all worlds, Their good and their evil, without a mistake: Pure Light, seeing this, gives rise to joy. 
The Buddha is the basis of all blessings, Like the earth supporting all buildings; He skillfully shows the peaceful way out of distress: Immutable knows this technique. 
The bright glow of his fire of knowledge pervades the universe— He manifests countless forms, equal to all beings, Exposing true reality for the benefit of all: 
The Buddha is like space, with no inherent nature; Appearing in the world to benefit the living, His features and refinements are like reflections: Pure Awareness sees in this way. The pores of the Buddha’s body emit sounds everywhere: 
Such is the realization of Liberation Light. Furthermore, the gandharva king Sustaining the Nation found the door of liberation of independent techniques for saving all sentient beings. 
The gandharva king Tree Light found the door of liberation seeing the array of all virtues. 
The gandharva king Clear Eyes found the door of liberation cutting off forever the grief and suffering of all sentient beings, producing a treasury of joy. 
The gandharva king Flower Crown found the door of liberation forever cutting off the confusion of all sentient beings’ erroneous views. 
The gandharva king Universal Sound of Joyful Steps found the door of liberation like clouds overspreading, shading and refreshing all sentient beings. 
The gandharva king Joyously Moving Beautiful Eyes found the door of liberation manifesting an enormous beautiful body, causing all to obtain peace and bliss. 
The gandharva king Wondrous Sound Lion Banner found the door of liberation scattering all famous jewels in all directions. 
The gandharva king Universal Emanation of Jewel Light found the door of liberation manifesting the pure body of all great joyous lights. 
The gandharva king Diamond Tree Flower Banner found the door of liberation causing all trees to richly flourish, causing all who see them to be delighted. 
The gandharva king Universal Manifestation of Adornments found the door of liberation skillfully entering into the sphere of all Buddhas and bestowing peace and happiness on all living beings. 
At that time the gandharva king Sustaining the Nation, imbued with the power of the Buddha, looked over all the hosts of gandharvas and said in verse, The innumerable doors to the realm of the Buddhas Cannot be entered by any sentient beings. The Buddha is like the nature of space, pure; He opens the right path for all worlds. 
In each one of the Buddha’s pores Is an ocean of virtues, all replete— All words are benefited and pleased by them: This is what Tree Light can see. 
The vast ocean of sorrow and suffering of the world The Buddha can evaporate entirely. The Buddha, compassionate, has many techniques: Clear Eyes has deep understanding of this. 
The ocean of lands in the ten directions is boundless— The Buddha illumines them all with the light of knowledge, Causing them to wash away all wrong views: This is where Tree Flower enters. 
The Buddha, over countless eons in the past Cultivated great compassion and skill in means, To pacify all the worlds: This path Universal Sound can enter. The Buddha body is pure—all like to see it. 
It can produce endless enjoyment in the world As the causes and effects of liberation are successively fulfilled: Good Eyes skillfully demonstrates this. 
Sentient beings are confused, always going in circles— Their barriers of ignorance are most firm and dense. The Buddha expounds the great teaching for them: This Lion Banner is able to expound. 
The Buddha manifests everywhere a body of wondrous form, With innumerable differentiations, equal to sentient beings, By various means enlightening the world: 
Wondrous Sound looks upon the Buddha this way. The infinite doors of knowledge and means The Buddha opens all for sentient beings, To enter the true practice of supreme enlightenment: This Diamond Banner well observes. 
Within an instant, millions of eons— The Buddha’s power can show this, with no effort, Bestowing peace and comfort equally on all living beings: 
This is the liberation of Pleasant Adornment. Furthermore, the kumbanda king Increase found the door of liberation of the power to eliminate all maliciousness. 
The kumbanda king Dragon King found the door of liberation cultivating a boundless ocean of practices. 
The kumbanda king Adornment found the door of liberation knowing what is pleasing to the minds of all sentient beings. 
The kumbanda king Beneficial Action found the door of liberation of work perfecting pure radiance. 
The kumbanda king Fearsome found the door of liberation showing all sentient beings the safe path free from fear. 
The kumbanda king Sublime Adornment found the door of liberation evaporating the ocean of cravings of all sentient beings. 
The kumbanda king High Peak Intellect found the door of liberation manifesting clouds of light in all realms of being. 
The kumbanda king Brave Strong Arms found the door of liberation shedding light everywhere, destroying mountain-like barriers. 
The kumbanda king Boundless Pure Flower Eyes found the door of liberation revealing the treasury of nonregressing great compassion. 
The kumbanda king Enormous Face found the door of liberation everywhere manifesting bodies transmigrating in the various states of being. 
At that time the kumbanda king Increase, imbued with the power of the Buddha, looked over all the assembled kumbandas and said in verse, Perfecting the power of patience, the Guide of the World Cultivated practice for the sake of beings for countless eons, Forever leaving the confusion of worldly pride— Therefore his body is most majestically pure. 
In the past the Buddha cultivated oceans of practices, Edifying innumerable beings in all quarters, Benefiting the living by all sorts of means: This liberation door Dragon King has found. 
The Buddha saves sentient beings with great knowledge, Clearly understanding all of their minds And taming them with various powers: Adornment Banner, seeing this, gives rise to joy. 
Spiritual powers appear responsively, like reflections of a light; The wheel of teaching in reality is like space, Being thus in the world for incalculable eons: This is realized by the Beneficent King. 
Sentient beings are blinded by ignorance, always confused; The light of Buddha illumines the path of safety To rescue them and cause suffering to be removed: Fearsome contemplates this teaching well. 
Floating and sinking in the ocean of desire, full of all pains; The all-illumining light of wisdom annihilates this all, And having removed pain, then expounds the truth: 
This is the realization of Splendid Arrays. The Buddha body responds to all—none do not see it. With various techniques it teaches the living, Sound like thunder, showering the rain of truth: This teaching High Intellect enters. 
The pure light is not shone in vain— Any who meet it, it will cause to dissolve heavy barriers; It expounds Buddha’s virtues without any bounds: Grave Arms can clarify this profound principle. 
To give peace and comfort to all sentient beings, He practiced great compassion for innumerable ages, Removing all pains by various means: This is the vision of Pure Flower. 
Spiritual powers independent and inconceivable, That body appears throughout the ten directions, Yet nowhere does it come or go: This is what Enormous Face understands. 
Furthermore, the naga king Virupaksha found the door of liberation extinguishing all the burning pains of the state of nagas. 
Shakra found the door of liberation of instantaneously transforming his own naga form and manifesting the forms of countless beings. 
The naga king Cloud Sound Banner found the door of liberation speaking the boundless ocean of Buddha-names with a pure clear voice in all realms of being. 
The naga king Cloud Banner found the door of liberation showing all sentient beings the ocean of great joy and virtue. 
The naga king Takshaka found the door of liberation destroying all fears with the pure voice of salvation. 
The naga king Boundless Steps found the door of liberation showing the form bodies of all Buddhas and the succession of their eons. 
The naga king Pure Form found the door of liberation producing the ocean of great delight and joy of all sentient beings. 
The naga king Great Sound Traveling Everywhere found the door of liberation manifesting the pleasing, unobstructed sound that is equal to all. 
The naga king No Heat or Torment found the door of liberation annihilating all the sufferings of the world with the cloud of great compassion that covers all. 
At that time, naga king Virupaksha, imbued with the power of the Buddha, looked over all the hosts of nagas, and said in verse, See how the Buddha’s teaching is always thus: It helps and benefits all sentient beings; It can, by the power of great compassion and pity, Rescue those who have fallen into fearful ways. The various differences of all sentient beings The Buddha shows all on the tip of a hair, Filling the world with spiritual demonstrations: Shakra sees the Buddha this way. 
The Buddha, by means of unlimited spiritual power, Tells of his names and epithets, as many as all beings— He makes them all hear whichever they like: 
Thus can Cloud Sound understand. The beings of infinite, boundless lands The Buddha can make enter a single pore While sitting at rest among those hosts. 
The irascible minds of all sentient beings, Their bondage and ignorance, are deep as the sea; The Buddha compassionately removes it all: Flame naga, observing this, can see it clearly. 
The virtuous powers of all sentient beings Appear clearly in the Buddha’s pores— Having shown this, he returns all to the ocean of blessings: This is the vision of High Cloud Banner. 
The pores of the Buddha’s body radiate the light of wisdom; That light intones a sublime sound everywhere— All who hear it are free from worry and fear: Takshaka realizes this way. 
The lands, adornments, and succession of ages Of all the Buddhas of all times Appear as they are in the Buddha’s body: Broad Steps sees this spiritual power. 
I observed the Buddha’s practice in the past, Making offerings to the ocean of all Buddhas, Increasing his joy with all of them: 
This is the entry of naga Swift. The Buddha, by means of expedient sound adapted to type, Expounds truth for the masses, making them rejoice. That sound is pure and sublime, enjoyed by all who hear: Going Everywhere, hearing this, joyfully awakens. 
No Heat or Torment realizes this. Furthermore, the yaksha king Vaishravana found the door of liberation saving evil beings by means of boundless skill in means. 
The yaksha king Independent Sound found the door of liberation examining all sentient beings, saving them with appropriate techniques. 
The yaksha king Solemn Weapon Bearer found the door of liberation of ability to give sustenance to all emaciated evil sentient beings. 
The yaksha king Great Wisdom found the door of liberation extolling the ocean of virtues of all sages. 
The yaksha king Lord of Flaming Eyes found the door of liberation observing all sentient beings and engendering great compassion and knowledge. 
The yaksha king Adamantine Eye found the door of liberation aiding and comforting all sentient beings by various appropriate means. The yaksha king Arm of Courage and Strength found the door of liberation entering into the meanings of all teachings. 
The yaksha king Bravely Resisting General found the door of liberation guarding all sentient beings, causing them to abide in the Way, with none living in vain. 
The yaksha king Power to Smash High Mountains found the door of liberation producing the light of wisdom and power of the Buddhas whenever called to mind. 
At that time the great yaksha king Learned, imbued with the power of the Buddha, looked over all the assembly of yakshas and said in verse, The evils of sentient beings are extremely fearsome— They do not see the Buddha for hundreds, thousands of eons. Drifting through life and death, they suffer myriad pains— To rescue them, the Buddhas appear in the world. 
The Buddha saves and protects all worlds, Appearing before all sentient beings To put a stop to the pains of transmigration in fearsome realms: Independent Sound enters this gate of teaching. 
Sentient beings’ evil deeds create multiple barriers; The Buddha demonstrates sublime principles to break through them, While lighting up the world with a bright lamp: This truth Weapon Bearer can see. 
The Buddha cultivated practices over oceans of eons past, Praising all the Buddhas in the ten directions— Therefore he has a lofty, far-reaching fame: This is what is understood by Wisdom. 
His wisdom is like space, unbounded; His reality-body is immense, inconceivable— Therefore he appears in all ten directions: Flaming Eyes can observe this. 
All sentient beings are on false paths— Buddha shows them the right path, inconceivable, Causing all worlds to be vessels of truth: This Brave General can understand. 
All virtuous activities in the world Come from the Buddha’s light; The ocean of Buddha’s wisdom is immeasurable: Such is the liberation of Materially Rich. 
Recall the countless eons of the past When the Buddha cultivated the ten powers, Able to fulfill all the powers: This is comprehended by High Banner. 
The mahoraga king Lord of Sublime Eyes found the door of liberation comprehending the equality of all virtuous powers without any attachments. 
The mahoraga king Supreme Light Banner found the door of liberation knowing the virtues of all the Buddhas and giving rise to joy. 
The mahoraga king Polar Mountain Guts found the door of liberation of certain unshakability in the face of all objects, finally reaching the other shore. The mahoraga king Pleasing Light found the door of liberation of showing the path of equality to all unequal beings. 
This truth Adorned Sound has entered. Realizing the real cosmos has no formal characteristics, The ocean of transcendent ways completely fulfilled, His great light saves all sentient beings: 
The kinnara king Delight to the Beholder found the door of liberation manifesting all bodies of exquisite form. 
The garuda king Pure Speed found the door of liberation of the power of energy to perfect all means of transcendence. The garuda king Nonregressing Mind found the door of liberation of bold power entering the realm of enlightenment. 
The titan king Universal Shining found the door of liberation of securely establishing all sentient beings by various techniques. 
The titan king Good Sound found the door of liberation of the practice of sure equanimity entering into all states of being. 
Great Power can understand this. The Buddha appears in the world to save the living, Revealing the way of complete knowledge, Causing all to give up suffering and attain peace and bliss: This teaching Universal Shining expounds. 
The ocean of blessings in the world Buddha’s power can produce and purify; Buddha can show the realm of liberation: Adornment of Firm Action enters this door. 
At that time the day spirit Displaying Palaces, imbued with the power of the Buddha, surveyed all the day spirits and said in verse, The Buddha’s knowledge is like space; it has no end. His light shines throughout the ten directions. He knows the mental patterns of all sentient beings. There is no world he does not enter. 
The great light of the Buddha body Illumines the ten directions, Manifesting in every place: Traveling Everywhere sees this way. The Buddha body is like space; Unborn, it clings to nothing, It is ungraspable and without inherent nature: 
The Sage appears in all worlds, Sitting in all their palaces, Raining the boundless great teaching: This is the perspective of All Directions. The Buddhas’ wisdom is most profound; Free in all ways, they appear in the world, Able to clarify all genuine truths: 
The preaching of his wondrous voice fills all directions: This is Technique Whirlpool’s sphere. The light of the Buddha has no end; It fills the cosmos, inconceivably, Teaching, edifying, liberating beings: This Pure Fragrance watches and sees. 
All lands in the ten directions See the Buddha sitting on his seat Becoming clearly enlightened with great realization: This is where Joyful Sound enters in. 
This is what Clearly Seeing has understood. The gates of the teaching are boundless as the sea— He expounds it with one voice, making all understand, Preaching forever, with never an end: 
He practiced relinquishment for countless ages, Able to give up eyes, hard to part with, enough to fill a sea— This practice of relinquishment was for the sake of all beings: This Wonderful Eyes happily understands. Boundless forms, like blazing clouds of jewels, Appear in sanctuaries throughout the world: 
Those boundless great techniques Respond to all the lands; Those who meet the Buddha’s light All see the Buddha-body. Having served all the Buddhas, Many as atoms in a billion lands, His virtue is as vast as space, Looked up to by all. 
His mystical power is impartial, Appearing in all lands; While sitting at rest in the sublime enlightenment site He appears before all sentient beings. 
Blazing clouds illumining all With various spheres of light Extending throughout the universe, Showing where the Buddha acts. 
Furthermore, the enlightening being Universally Good entered into the ocean of techniques of inconceivable doors of liberation, and entered into the ocean of virtues of the Buddha. 
That is to say, there was a door of liberation called purifying all buddha-lands, pacifying the sentient beings and causing them all to be ultimately emancipated. 
There was a door of liberation called going to all realms of complete virtues cultivated by all the Buddhas. 
There was a door of liberation called the great ocean of vows defining the stages of all enlightening beings. 
There was a door of liberation called everywhere manifesting infinite bodies, numerous as atoms in the cosmos. 
There was a door of liberation called explaining an inconceivable number of different names throughout all lands. 
There was a door of liberation called showing all the boundless realms of enlightening beings’ psychic powers in all atoms. 
There was a door of liberation named showing the events of the formation and decay of the ages of past, present, and future, in the space of an instant. 
There was a door of liberation named showing the oceans of faculties of all enlightening beings, each entering their own spheres. 
There was a door of liberation named ability to make various bodies appear by mystic powers all throughout the boundless cosmos. 
There was a door of liberation called showing the processes of all enlightening beings’ practices, entering into the great techniques of universal knowledge. 
At that time, the enlightening being Universally Good, by virtue of his own accomplishment, and also receiving the spiritual power of the Buddha, having looked over the ocean of all the assemblies, spoke these verses, The immense, vast fields adorned by the Buddha Are equal in number to all atoms; Pure children of Buddha fill them all, Raining the inconceivable, most sublime teaching. As in this assembly we see the Buddha sitting, So it is also in every atom; The Buddha-body has no coming or going, And clearly appears in all the lands there are. Demonstrating the practices cultivated by enlightening beings, The various techniques of innumerable approaches to their stages, Expounding as well the inconceivable truth, He causes the Buddha-children to enter the realm of reality. Producing phantom buddhas numerous as atoms, Corresponding to the inclinations of all beings’ minds, The expedient doors into the profound realm of truth, Boundlessly vast, all he expounds. 
Buddha teaches widely, with wonderful voice— All stages of enlightenment are thoroughly clear. 
Appearing before each sentient being, He gives all the Buddha’s equal truth. 
The realm of the Buddha has no bounds— In an instant the cosmos is filled; In every atom he sets up an enlightenment site, Proving enlightenment in all, creating mystic displays. Buddha cultivated practices in the past Extending through countless eons Adorning all buddha-fields, Appearing unhindered, like space. The Buddha’s spiritual powers are unlimited, Filling the boundless reaches of all time— Even if one spent countless eons constantly Observing, one would never be wearied or jaded. 
Observe the realms of Buddha’s mystic power— All lands in all quarters are beautifully pure: 
He appears therein, in every one, Instantaneously changing, in infinite forms. 
Buddha, in past ages in the world, Served an infinite ocean of Buddhas; Therefore all beings are like river rapids Coming to make offerings to the World Honored One. 
Buddha of yore for the sake of all beings Cultivated an ocean of boundless compassion, Entering birth and death along with all beings, Teaching the masses, making them pure. 
Buddhas abide in the matrix of the cosmos of real thusness— Signless, formless, free from all taints. 
The enlightening being Deep Beautiful Sound of Great Enlightened Virtue found the door of liberation peacefully abiding in the ocean of all the great vows of Vairocana, the Illuminator. 
In an instant of thought he turns the wheel of truth, Accommodating it to all states of mind. 
Buddha, over countless vast eons, Has appeared everywhere before sentient beings; According to his past cultivation, He shows his purified realm of action. 
I see everywhere in all directions And see the Buddhas showing mystic powers, All sitting in sanctuaries realizing enlightenment, Surrounded by listening crowds. 
The impartial, signless body of true suchness, The pure reality-body of untainted light; With knowledge and calm, with innumerable bodies, He preaches the truth, adapting to all. 
In accord with what Buddha cultivated Up to his perfection of all knowledge, Now he radiates light through the cosmos Showing it all therein. 
Buddha shows mystic powers through his original vow, Illuminating all in the ten directions; What the Buddha practiced of yore, All is expounded in these networks of light. 
There is no end of worlds in all directions— No equals, no bounds, each one distinct. 
At that time the Buddha’s lion seat, its round platform of exquisite flowers of many jewels, its base, steps, doors, and all its embellishments, each produced as many great enlightening beings as there are atoms in a buddha-land. Their names were Oceanic Wisdom, Sovereign King of Occult Powers; Thunder Shaking All; Topknot of Lights of Many Jewels; Bold Intelligence of the Sun of Knowledge; Seal of Knowledge Made of Jewels of Inconceivable Qualities; Hundred Eye Lotus Topknot; Light Spheres of Golden Flames; Universal Sound of the Cosmos; Cloud Sound Pure Moon; Banner of Light of Benevolent Courage: these were the leaders, and there were as many of them as atoms in many buddha-lands. At the same time as they appeared, these enlightening beings each produced clouds of various offerings: 
for example, clouds of flowers of all jewels, clouds of all subtle fragrances of lotus blossoms, clouds of orbs of jewel lights, clouds of fragrant flames of boundless realms, clouds of jewel-like light spheres from the treasury of the sun, clouds of all pleasing musical sounds, clouds of flames of light from all jewel lamps, with boundless colors and forms, clouds of branches, flowers, and fruits from trees of many jewels, clouds of regal jewels with inexhaustible pure radiance, clouds of all the finest decorative gems; there were as many such clouds of various offerings as there are atoms in a buddha-world. 
Each of those enlightening beings produced such clouds of offerings unceasingly, raining on the oceanic assemblies at all enlightenment sites. Having manifested these clouds, they circled the Buddha to the right, circling him countless hundreds and thousands of times. In whatever direction they came from, there, not far from the Buddha, they magically produced innumerable lotus lion seats of various jewels, and each sat crosslegged thereon. 
The spheres of actions of these enlightening beings were pure and vast as the sea. They had attained the state of universality of illumination of knowledge and wisdom. Following the Buddhas, they were unhindered in their actions. They were able to enter the ocean of all principles of discernment and elucidation, and had mastered the teaching of inconceivable liberation. 
They had already mastered all techniques of concentration formulae, and were able to contain the ocean of all the teachings. They dwelt in the stage of equanimous knowledge of past, present, and future. They had attained the immense joy of profound faith. Their boundless stores of blessings were most pure. 
At that time, the enlightening being Oceanic Wisdom, Sovereign King of Occult Powers, the great spiritual hero, empowered by the Buddha, surveyed the oceans of masses at the scene of enlightenment and said in verse, Buddha knows what all Buddhas have realized— Unhindered as space, he illumines all, His light pervading countless lands everywhere. 
He sits amidst the hosts, all magnificently pure. 
The Buddha’s virtues cannot be measured; They fill all the cosmos in every direction. 
Sitting under every enlightenment tree, All the great powers assemble like clouds. 
Buddha has such spiritual powers, Manifesting infinite forms at once. The Buddha’s sphere is beyond bounds— Individuals see according to their liberation. 
Buddha passed oceans of eons Working in all realms of being Teaching creatures by various means, Having them accept and practice enlightening ways. 
Vairocana, replete with magnificent refinements, Sits on a lotus-bank lion seat. 
All the assembled hosts are pure; Silently all gaze in respect. 
The Sage sits upon supreme embellishments. Beautiful windows of various jewels, Draped with lotuses of exquisite gems, Always producing sublime sounds delighting all hearers: Thereon Buddha sits, most radiant of all. 
The infinite colors of the ground are all distinct; Gold dust is spread all around, Flowers and jewels strewn about, All beautifying Buddha’s throne. 
All of them appear at this enlightenment scene. The Buddha’s enormous spiritual power Sheds light showering gems everywhere: This treasury of jewels is scattered over the site, Beautifying the ground all around. 
Precious lamps, infinite, rain from the sky, Studded with regal sapphires, All emitting subtle sounds speaking truth: This the earth spirits cause to appear. 
Arrays of banners of flowery silk, Jewel trees with decorated branches and boughs, Garlands of pearls draped on all sides; The Ocean of Wisdom sits calmly therein. 
In the jewels appear enlightening beings, Going everywhere to serve the Buddhas. 
Thus now in the nets of light He can tell it all, throughout all quarters. 
Buddha’s knowledge is unhindered, comprehending all times; All he shows in an instant, in his hair pores: The Buddhas’ teachings, lands, and sentient beings: 
Buddha cultivated extensively for countless eons Transcendent power to deal with all truths; Thus he has perfected natural power, Appearing throughout all lands. 
Then the ocean of worlds of arrays of flower banks, by the power of the Buddha, all shook in six ways, in eighteen manners: 
that is, they trembled, trembled all over, trembled all over in all directions; they welled up, welled up all over, welled up all over in all directions; they surged, surged all over, surged all over in all directions; they quaked, quaked all over, quaked all over in all directions; they roared, roared all over, roared all over in all directions; they crashed, crashed all over, crashed all over in all directions. 
These various world leaders each caused clouds of inconceivable offerings to appear, raining on the ocean of beings at the site of enlightenment: 
clouds of ornaments of all fragrant flowers; clouds of decorations of all precious stones; clouds of flower nets of all jewel flames; clouds of spheres of light of jewels of boundless varieties; clouds of treasuries of pearls of all colors; clouds of all precious sandalwood scents; clouds of umbrellas made of all kinds of precious substances; clouds of diamonds with pure resonance; clouds of necklaces of jewels shining like the sun; clouds of banks of lights of all gemstones; clouds of all sorts of decorations. These clouds of adornments were infinite, inconceivably numerous. These world leaders each produced such clouds of offerings, showering upon the ocean of beings at the Buddha’s site of enlightenment, all reaching everywhere. 
As in this world the world leaders joyfully produced such offerings, so did all the world leaders in all worlds of the ocean of worlds of arrays of flower banks make such offerings. 
In each of their worlds there was a Buddha sitting on the site of enlightenment. The individual world leaders’ various resolutions of faith, foci of concentration, methods of meditation, practice of methods assisting enlightenment, accomplishments, joys, approaches, understandings of the teachings, access to the realm of Buddha’s spiritual powers, access to the realms of Buddha’s abilities, entryways into the Buddha’s liberation, were the same as in the flower bank ocean of worlds in all the oceans of worlds in the entire space of the whole cosmos. Appearance of the Buddha Then the enlightening beings, by mystical power, produced sound issuing spontaneously from the clouds of offerings, speaking verses: Countless eons of practice complete, You’ve become truly awake under the enlightenment tree: 
You appear universally to liberate beings, Like clouds filling all to the end of time. 
An infinite number of enlightening beings Have all come here to behold you: 
How can we know the stages of the Buddhas? 
How can we observe the Buddha’s sphere? 
The empowerment of the Buddha has no bounds: 
What is the Buddha’s realm of action That can be entered by wisdom? 
Buddha’s power is pure and unlimited: 
Please show it to us enlightening beings. 
What are your vast meditation states? 
How do you purify fearlessness? 
Your mystic powers cannot be measured: 
Please explain in accord with beings’ dispositions. 
The Buddhas, kings of truth, are like the world leaders— Free wherever they go, none can constrain them: This and other great teachings Please expound for the benefit of all. 
How are the Buddha’s eyes innumerable, As also are the other organs of sense? And how are the minds also countless? Please show us a way to know about this. 
As are the oceans of worlds and oceans of beings, All oceans of arrangements in the cosmos, So are the oceans of Buddhas—unbounded: Please tell all to the children of Buddha. 
The ocean of transcendent ways, forever beyond conception, The ocean of techniques for universal liberation, The ocean of all the aspects of the teaching, Please expound at this enlightenment site. 
At that point the Buddha, knowing what the enlightening beings were thinking, emitted a multitude of light rays from his teeth. Those light rays were as numerous as atoms in a buddha-field: 
they included, for example, light rays of flowers of jewels illumining everywhere; light rays producing various sounds adorning the universe; light rays draping subtle clouds; light rays showing the Buddhas of the ten directions sitting on their sites of enlightenment making mystical displays; light rays of umbrellas of clouds of flames of all jewels; light rays filling the universe without impediment; light rays adorning all buddha-fields; light rays setting up banners of pure diamonds; light rays adorning the scenes of enlightenment where hosts of enlightening beings were assembled; light rays with subtle vibrations intoning the names and epithets of all the Buddhas. 
There were as many such light rays as there are atoms in a buddha-field, and each individual ray had as many light beams accompanying it. 
Those lights all contained all exquisite jewellike hues, and they each illumined oceans of worlds as numerous as atoms in a billion buddha-lands. 
The congregations of enlightening beings in all the other oceans of worlds could see this Lotus Bank Array ocean of worlds within those lights. 
By the spiritual power of the Buddha, those lights, in the presence of all those enlightening beings, intoned these verses: Cultivating oceans of practices over countless eons, Making offerings to oceans of Buddhas everywhere, Teaching and liberating the oceans of all beings, Now fulfilling sublime enlightenment—The Universal Illuminator. 
From his pores come magic clouds With light shining through all quarters, Awakening those able to receive the teaching, Causing them to approach enlightenment, pure, unhindered. 
Buddha traversed all paths of existence, Teaching and developing the living beings; The mystic powers at his command are infinite: Instantly he causes all to be freed. 
The enlightenment tree of precious gems Is embellished with the finest adornments; Buddha truly awakes under it, Emanating light, majestically shining. 
The roar of his great voice fills all quarters, Preaching for all the way to great peace. According to the mental dispositions of beings, He wakes them by various means. He practiced transcendent ways and fulfilled them, As many as atoms in a thousand lands. All the powers he has already attained; You all should go and pay him respect. 
Buddha-children of all quarters, as many as atoms of lands, All come together, with joy; Having showered clouds of offerings, Now they stand before Buddha with single-minded gaze. 
One tone of the Buddha contains an infinity, Able to expound the deep ocean of scriptures, Raining the sublime teaching in accord with all minds; That most honored human you all should go see. 
The vows of Buddhas of all times Are told under the enlightenment tree; All appear in an instant: Hurry to the Buddha’s spot. Vairocana’s great ocean of knowledge Shines from his face for all to see. Now, awaiting the gathering of the masses, he’s about to speak: 
At that time, all the masses in the oceans of worlds in the ten directions, awakened by the Buddha’s light, all went to Vairocana Buddha’s place and made offerings. 
For example, to the east of this Flower Bank Array ocean of worlds there is an ocean of worlds called Array of Lotuses of Pure Light: 
among its world systems is a land called Diamond Mine of Jewel Necklaces; the Buddha there was called Infinite King Awakening Space with the Water of Truth; among that Buddha’s vast congregation was a great enlightening being named Lotus Banner Contemplating the Supreme Teaching who came to the Buddha with a group of enlightening beings as numerous as atoms in an ocean of worlds; each produced ten kinds of clouds of forms of enlightening beings, filling space and not dissolving. 
They also manifested ten kinds of clouds of jewel mountains, ten kinds of clouds of spheres of sunlight, ten kinds of clouds of jewel flower ornaments, ten kinds of clouds of music containing all tones, ten kinds of clouds of powder incense trees, ten kinds of clouds of myriad forms of perfume and incense, and ten kinds of clouds of trees of all kinds of fragrances. Clouds of offerings such as these, as many as atoms in an ocean of worlds, filled all of space, not dispersing. Having caused these clouds to appear, the enlightening beings bowed to the Buddha and offered them to him. They then magically produced in the eastern quarter lion seats of banks of lights of various flowers and sat crosslegged on those seats. 
South of this Flower Bank ocean of worlds is an ocean of worlds called Mine of Ornaments of Radiance of Moons Made of All Jewels. Among its world systems is a land called Array of Boundless Light Spheres. 
The Buddha there was named Polar Mountain King with the Virtues of the Light of Universal Knowledge. 
Among that Buddha’s immense congregation was an enlightening being named Wisdom Universally Illumining the Ocean of Truths, who came to the Buddha along with a group of enlightening beings as numerous as atoms in an ocean of worlds; each produced ten kinds of clouds of jewels from mines of lights of all adornments, filling space without dispersing. 
They also manifested ten kinds of clouds of all-illumining regal jewels, raining all kinds of ornaments, ten kinds of clouds of blazing jewels intoning the names and epithets of the Buddhas, ten kinds of clouds of jewels expounding all the Buddhas’ teachings, ten kinds of clouds of jewel trees adorning the scene of enlightenment, ten kinds of jewel clouds of precious light projecting myriad phantom buddhas, ten kinds of jewel clouds displaying the forms of the adornments of all sites of enlightenment, ten kinds of jewel clouds of lamps of intense flames expounding the realm of the Buddhas, ten kinds of jewel clouds of forms of the palaces of infinite lands, and ten kinds of jewel clouds showing images of the Buddhas of past, present, and future. Jewel clouds such as these, as many as atoms in an ocean of worlds, all pervaded space without dispersing. Having caused these clouds to appear, the enlightening beings bowed to the Buddha and offered them to him; then each produced in the southern quarter lotus bank lion seats of sapphires and rose gold, then sat crosslegged on the seats. 
To the west of this Flower Bank ocean of worlds there is an ocean of worlds named Pleasant Jewel Light. Among the world systems therein is a land called Producing the Best Life-Supports. 
The Buddha there was named Array of Quality Jewels of Fragrant Flowers. 
Among the vast congregation of that Buddha was a great enlightening being called Universal Arrays of Moonlight’s Fragrant Flames, who, together with as many enlightening beings as atoms in an ocean of worlds, came to the Buddha, each producing ten kinds of clouds of mansions of all kinds of precious fragrant flowers, filling all space without dispersing. 
They also produced ten kinds of clouds of mansions of precious stones of boundless colors and forms, ten kinds of clouds of mansions of fragrant flames from precious lamps, ten kinds of clouds of mansions of all pearls, ten kinds of clouds of mansions of all precious flowers, ten kinds of clouds of mansions decorated with jewel ornaments, ten kinds of clouds of mansions manifesting the treasuries of lights of all adornments in the ten directions, ten kinds of clouds of mansions of all kinds of embellishments from throughout the ten directions, ten kinds of clouds of mansions studded with all kinds of precious stones, and ten kinds of clouds of mansions with gates of flowers and networks of chimes. These mansion clouds, as numerous as atoms in an ocean of worlds, all filled space without dispersing. Having caused these clouds to appear, the enlightening beings bowed to the Buddha and presented them as offerings; then they produced in the western quarter lion seats of great treasuries of gold leaves, and then sat crosslegged on these seats. 
To the north of this Flower Bank ocean of worlds there is an ocean of worlds called Treasuries of Light Spheres of Lapis Lazuli Lotuses. Among the world systems therein is a land called Array of Blue Lotuses. The Buddha’s name was King of Sound of the Banner of Universal Knowledge. 
Among that Buddha’s vast congregation was a great enlightening being named Lion Stretch Light, who, with a group of enlightening beings as numerous as atoms in an ocean of worlds, came to the Buddha, each manifesting ten kinds of clouds of beautiful trees of all kinds of fragrant jewels, which filled space without dispersing. 
They also produced ten kinds of clouds of trees displaying arrays of all trees of infinite colors and forms, ten kinds of clouds of trees adorned with all flowers, ten kinds of clouds of trees adorned with spheres of light of the radiance of all jewels, ten kinds of clouds of trees adorned with physical forms of enlightening beings, perfumed with all kinds of sandalwood, ten kinds of clouds of trees inconceivably adorned with scenes of past sites of enlightenment, ten kinds of clouds of trees of sunlike light from treasuries of clothes made of all kinds of jewels, and ten kinds of clouds of trees emanating all kinds of pleasing sounds. Clouds such as these, numerous as atoms in an ocean of worlds, extended throughout space without dispersing. Having caused these clouds to appear, the enlightening beings bowed to the Buddha and presented them as offerings; then they each magically produced in the northern quarter lion seats of banks of lotuses with jewel lamps, and sat crosslegged on those seats. 
Northeast of this Flower Bank ocean of worlds there is an ocean of worlds called Rose Gold and Lapis Lazuli Banner. Among the world systems there is a land called Array of Jewels. 
The Buddha there was called Fearless Lamp of All Truths. 
Among that Buddha’s vast congregation was a great enlightening being called Inexhaustible Mine of Virtues of the Lamp of Supreme Light, who came, with as many enlightening beings as there are atoms in an ocean of worlds, to the Buddha, each producing ten kinds of clouds of lion thrones of stores of jewel lotuses of boundless forms, which filled space without dispersing. 
They also produced ten kinds of clouds of lion thrones of stores of lights of diamonds, ten kinds of clouds of lion thrones adorned with all kinds of decorations, ten kinds of clouds of lion thrones of banks of flames of lamps ringed with jewels, ten kinds of clouds of lion thrones showering jewel ornaments all over, ten kinds of clouds of lion thrones of treasuries of precious ornaments of all fragrant flowers, ten kinds of clouds of lion thrones of mines of regal jewels showing the adornments of the seats of all Buddhas, ten kinds of clouds of lion thrones of treasuries of jewel branches and stems of trees of all kinds of precious stones, ten kinds of clouds of lion thrones of all arrays of ornaments, steps, and doors, and ten kinds of clouds of lion thrones of banks of lights adorned with gems and perfumes. Such clouds as these, as many as atoms in an ocean of worlds, all filled space without dispersing. Having caused these clouds to appear, the enlightening beings bowed to the Buddha and presented them to him as offerings. Then, in the northeast direction each magically produced a lion seat of jewel lotuses with banners of lights of precious stones and sat crosslegged thereon. 
Southeast of this Flower Bank ocean of worlds is an ocean of worlds called Gold Embellished Lapis Lazuli Light Shining Everywhere. 
Among its world systems is a land called Pure Fragrant Light. The Buddha there was named King of Profound Faith and Universal Joy. 
Among the Buddha’s vast congregation was a great enlightening being called Universal Light of the Lamp of Wisdom, who came to the Buddha along with a group of enlightening beings as numerous as atoms in an ocean of worlds, each producing ten kinds of clouds of drapes of all kinds of wish-fulfilling jewels, which filled all of space without dispersing. 
They also caused to appear ten kinds of clouds of drapes adorned with all flowers of sapphires, ten kinds of clouds of drapes of all fragrant jewels, ten kinds of clouds of drapes of lamps with jewel flames, ten kinds of clouds of drapes of regal jewels displaying the Buddhas’ spiritual powers expounding the teachings, ten kinds of clouds of drapes of gems in the forms of all clothing adornments, ten kinds of clouds of drapes of lights of masses of all jewels, ten kinds of clouds of drapes of sounds of chimes on jewel nets, ten kinds of clouds of drapes on jewel pedestals with lotus nets, and ten kinds of clouds of drapes displaying the forms of all inconceivable adornments. Clouds of drapes of jewels such as these, as many as atoms in an ocean of worlds, all filled space without dispersing. Having caused these clouds to appear, the enlightening beings bowed to the Buddha and presented them as offerings. Then, to the southeast, each magically produced a lion seat of banks of jewel lotuses and sat crosslegged thereon. 
Southwest of this Flower Bank ocean of worlds is an ocean of worlds called Sunlight Shining Everywhere; among its world systems is a land called Lion Sunlight. 
The Buddha there was called Sound of Light of Universal Knowledge. 
Among that Buddha’s vast congregation was a great enlightening being named Topknot of Flames of Radiant Flower Lights, who came to the Buddha with a group of enlightening beings, as many as there are atoms in an ocean of worlds, each manifesting ten kinds of clouds of parasols of beautiful ornamental jewels, filling space without dispersing. 
They also produced ten kinds of clouds of parasols of flowers of arrays of light beams, ten kinds of clouds of parasols of treasures of pearls of boundless colors, ten kinds of clouds of parasols of diamonds emanating the sounds of compassion of all enlightening beings, ten kinds of clouds of parasols of blazing garlands of jewels, ten kinds of clouds of parasols draped with nets of chimes embellished with precious stones, ten kinds of clouds of parasols decorated with branches of jewel trees, ten kinds of clouds of parasols of diamonds like the sun shining everywhere, ten kinds of clouds of parasols of all kinds of perfume and incense, ten kinds of clouds of parasols of stores of sandalwood, and ten kinds of clouds of parasols of arrays of universal lights of the vast sphere of buddhahood. Such clouds of parasols of precious substances, numerous as atoms in an ocean of worlds, all filled space without dispersing. Having caused these clouds to appear, the enlightening beings bowed to the Buddha and presented them as offerings. Then, to the southwest, they each magically produced a lion seat of banks of adornments of flames of sapphire light and sat crosslegged thereon. 
Northwest of this Flower Bank ocean of worlds is an ocean of worlds called Precious Light Radiance. Among its world systems is a land called Array of Myriad Fragrances. The Buddha there was called Light of the Ocean of Infinite Virtues. 
Among that Buddha’s congregation was a great enlightening being called Jewel King of Inexhaustible Light, who, together with as many enlightening beings as there are atoms in an ocean of worlds, came to the Buddha, each producing ten kinds of clouds of light spheres of radiance of all jewels, filling space without dispersing. 
They also produced ten kinds of clouds of light spheres of all beautiful flowers, ten kinds of clouds of light spheres of all phantom buddhas, ten kinds of clouds of light spheres of the buddha-lands of the ten directions, ten kinds of clouds of light spheres of the jewel trees and thunderous sound of the realm of the Buddhas, ten kinds of clouds of light spheres of all regal gems, ten kinds of clouds of light spheres instantaneously displaying the forms of infinite beings, ten kinds of clouds of light spheres of the voice of the Buddha’s great vow, and ten kinds of clouds of light spheres of diamonds emanating sounds edifying all sentient beings. Such clouds of light spheres, numerous as atoms in an ocean of worlds, all filled space without dispersing. Having produced these clouds, the enlightening beings bowed to the Buddha and presented them as offerings. Then, to the northwest, they each produced a lion seat of treasuries of awesome qualities of infinite light and sat crosslegged thereon. 
Below this Flower Bank ocean of worlds there is an ocean of worlds called Treasury of Exquisite Qualities of Lotus Blossom Fragrance. 
Among its world systems is a land called Radiance of Light of a Jewel Lion. The Buddha there was named Light of the Cosmos. 
In the vast congregation of that Buddha was a great enlightening being named Wisdom Flaming with the Light of the Universe, who, together with as many enlightening beings as there are atoms in an ocean of worlds, came to the Buddha, each producing ten kinds of clouds of light beams of mines of all jewels, filling space without dispersing. 
They also produced ten kinds of clouds of light beams of all fragrances, ten kinds of clouds of light beams producing the sounds of all Buddhas explaining the truth, ten kinds of clouds of light beams revealing the arrays of all buddha-lands, ten kinds of clouds of light beams of palaces of all beautiful flowers, ten kinds of clouds of light beams displaying the work of the Buddhas of all ages teaching sentient beings, ten kinds of clouds of light beams of flower buds of all inexhaustible treasures, and ten kinds of clouds of light beams of all kinds of decorated thrones. Clouds of light beams such as these, numerous as atoms in an ocean of worlds, filled all space without dispersing. Having caused these clouds to appear, the enlightening beings bowed to the Buddha and presented them as offerings. Then each created, in the nadir, a lion seat of lotuses with lamps with jewel flames, and sat crosslegged thereon. 
Above this Flower Bank ocean of worlds is an ocean of worlds called Radiant Arrays of Precious Stones. Among the world systems there is a land called Formless Subtle Light. 
The Buddha there was called Unimpeded Light of Virtue. 
Among that Buddha’s vast congregation was a great enlightening being called Vigorous Intellect with Unhindered Power, who, along with as many enlightening beings as atoms in an ocean of worlds, came to the Buddha, each producing ten kinds of clouds of light-flames of jewels of boundless physical forms, filling space without dispersing. 
They also produced ten kinds of clouds of light-flames of webs of precious stones, ten kinds of clouds of light-flames of the ornaments of all the vast buddha-lands, ten kinds of clouds of light-flames of all exquisite fragrances, ten kinds of clouds of light-flames of all adornments, ten kinds of clouds of light-flames of the mystical displays of the Buddhas, ten kinds of clouds of light-flames of all beautiful tree-flowers, ten kinds of clouds of light-flames of all diamonds, ten kinds of clouds of light-flames of jewels bespeaking the practices of infinite enlightening beings, and ten kinds of clouds of light-flames of lamps of all pearls. Clouds of light flames like these, as numerous as atoms in an ocean of worlds, all filled space without dispersing. Having caused these clouds to appear, the enlightening beings bowed to the Buddha and presented them as offerings. Then, at the zenith, they each produced a lion seat of lotus banks of light intoning the voices of the Buddhas and sat crosslegged thereon. 
In this way, in as many oceans of worlds as there are atoms in ten billion buddha-fields, there were as many great enlightening beings, each surrounded by a group of enlightening beings as numerous as atoms in an ocean of worlds, who came to the gathering. These enlightening beings each produced clouds of offerings of various adornments, as numerous as atomic particles in an ocean of worlds, which all filled space without dispersing. And having produced these clouds, they bowed to the Buddha and presented them as offerings; then, in the direction from which they had come, all magically produced lion seats with various precious adornments and sat crosslegged on them. 
After having thus seated themselves, those enlightening beings each produced, from the hair pores of their bodies, light rays of the various colors of all jewels, as many as atoms in ten oceans of worlds; in each light ray there appeared as many enlightening beings as there are atoms in ten oceans of worlds, all sitting on lion seats of banks of lotuses. These enlightening beings all could enter into every atom of the oceans of structures in all universes. 
In each individual atom were vast fields, as many as atoms in ten buddha-worlds; in each field were all the past, present, and future Buddhas. 
These enlightening beings were all able to go to all these Buddhas, associate with them, and provide them with offerings, and in each and every thought-instant, by means of mastery of dream-power, demonstrated teachings enlightening as many sentient beings as there are atoms in an ocean of worlds; in every instant, by the teaching showing how celestial beings die and are born, they enlightened as many sentient beings as atoms in an ocean of worlds; in every instant, by explaining the teaching of the acts and practices of enlightening beings, they enlightened as many sentient beings as atoms in an ocean of worlds; in every instant, by the teaching of the Buddha’s virtues and mystical displays which stir all lands, they enlightened as many sentient beings as atoms in an ocean of worlds; in every instant, by the teaching of beautifying and purifying all buddha-lands, revealing the ocean of all great vows, they enlightened as many sentient beings as atoms in an ocean of worlds; in every instant, by the teaching of the Buddha’s voice which contains the languages of all sentient beings, they enlightened as many sentient beings as atoms in an ocean of worlds; in every instant, by the teaching which can shower the rain of all Buddha teachings, they enlightened as many sentient beings as atoms in an ocean of worlds; in every instant, by the teaching of light illuminating everywhere in the ten directions, pervading the cosmos and showing mystical demonstrations, they enlightened as many beings as atoms in an ocean of worlds; in every instant, by the teaching of all Buddhas’ power of liberation manifesting the body of Buddha everywhere, filling the cosmos, they enlightened as many sentient beings as atoms in an ocean of worlds; in every instant, by the teaching of the universally good enlightening being setting up the ocean of all sites of enlightenment with all assemblies of beings, they enlightened as many sentient beings as atoms in an ocean of worlds. 
In this way, throughout all universes, adapting to the mentalities of sentient beings, they caused them all to awaken. 
In every instant they each caused as many sentient beings as atoms in a polar mountain who had fallen into miserable states to be forever relieved of their sufferings; each caused that many sentient beings stuck in wrong concentrations to enter right concentration; each caused that many sentient beings to be born in celestial spheres according to their inclinations; each caused that many sentient beings to rest secure in the states of Buddhas’ disciples or self-enlightened ones; each caused that many sentient beings to serve good teachers and act virtuously; each caused that many sentient beings to set their minds on supreme enlightenment; each caused that many sentient beings to head for the enlightening being’s stage of nonregression; each caused that many sentient beings to attain the eye of pure wisdom and see all things impartially, as does the Buddha; each caused that many sentient beings to abide securely in the powers and the oceans of vows, and to purify the buddha-lands by means of inexhaustible knowledge; each caused that many sentient beings to dwell in the vast ocean of Vairocana’s vows and be born in the family of the Buddhas. 
At that time the enlightening beings simultaneously raised their voices within the lights and spoke in verse, saying, In the light rays wondrous sounds are produced, Pervading all lands in the ten directions, Expounding the virtues of the Buddha’s children, Able to enter the wondrous path of enlightenment. 
Cultivating practices for oceans of eons, never wearied, Enabling suffering beings to realize liberation, Spirits never downcast, never worn out: Buddha children can well enter these techniques. 
Cultivating appropriate means for oceans of eons, Infinite, boundless, leaving out none, Entering into all the aspects of the teachings, They constantly teach, yet their essence is silent and tranquil. 
The vows of the Buddhas of past, present, and future, All have they mastered, all consummated; Then do they thereby benefit all beings As their own pure practical work. 
In the congregations of all the Buddhas, Going everywhere throughout the ten directions, All, by the ocean of profound knowledge and wisdom, Enter the Buddha’s way of ultimate peace. 
Each of the light rays, boundless, Enters inconceivable lands; The eye of pure knowledge can see it all: This is enlightening beings’ sphere of action. 
Enlightening beings can, resting on a single hairtip, Stir all lands in the ten directions Without causing fear in the beings there: This is their stage of pure skill in means. 
Infinite bodies in each individual atom Furthermore manifest lands variously arrayed; Instantaneous death and birth, all do they show: Those who’ve attained the unhindered mind. 
All ages in the past, present, and future They can show in a single instant; Knowing the body is illusory, without substance or sign Are those who realize the nature of things unimpeded. 
They’re all able to enter the supreme practice of the universally good, So all sentient beings like to see them, Buddha children can abide by this teaching, With a great sound roaring within their lights. 
Then the Buddha, wishing to enable all the enlightening beings to realize the spiritual power of the boundless realm of the Enlightened One, emitted a light from between his brows. That light was called Treasury of the Light of Knowledge of All Enlightening Beings Illumining the Ten Directions. Its form was like a cloud of lamps with jewellike light. It shone throughout all buddha-fields in the ten directions, revealing all the lands and beings therein. 
In every single atom it revealed innumerable Buddhas showering the teachings of all the Buddhas of all times, in accord with the differences in character and inclination of the various sentient beings. 
It clearly showed the Buddha’s ocean of transcendent ways, and also rained infinite clouds of various emancipations, causing the sentient beings to forever cross over birth and death. It also showered clouds of the great vows of the Buddhas, and clearly showed, in all worlds in the ten directions, the universally good enlightening beings’ congregations at the sites of enlightenment. Having done all this, the light swirled around the Buddha, circling to the right, then went in under his feet. 
That is to say, its stem was a mixture of various gems; its bud was of diamond; its petals were all the jewels in the universe; its pistils were of fragrant gems; rose gold adorned its base; exquisite nets covered it above; its radiant color was pure; it instantaneously displayed the boundless miracles of the Buddhas; it could produce all kinds of sounds; its diamonds reflected the body of Buddha. 
In its sounds it could expound all the practical undertakings cultivated by enlightening beings. When this flower had sprung up, in an instant there was, in the curl of white hair on the Buddha’s brow, a great enlightening being named Supreme Sound of All Truths, together with a group of enlightening beings, as numerous as atoms in an ocean of worlds: they all came forth together and circled the Buddha to the right innumerable times; then, having bowed to the Buddha, Supreme Sound of All Truths sat on the flower dais, while the other enlightening beings sat on the pistils. 
This enlightening being Supreme Sound of All Truths comprehended the profound realm of reality, gave rise to great joy, and entered the sphere of action of the Buddha, his knowledge unobstructed. He entered the unfathomable ocean of the Buddha’s reality-body, and went to where the Buddhas were in all lands. In each hair pore of his body he showed mystical powers. In every moment of thought he contemplated the entire cosmos. 
Then, in the midst of the assembly, empowered by the Buddha, he looked over the ten directions and said in verse, The Buddha’s body fills the cosmos, Appearing before all beings everywhere— In all conditions, wherever sensed, reaching everywhere, Yet always on this seat of enlightenment. In each of the Buddha’s pores Sit Buddhas many as atoms in all lands, Surrounded by masses of enlightening beings Expounding the supreme practice of the universally good. Buddha, sitting at rest on the enlightenment seat, Displays in one hair oceans of fields; The same is true of every single hair, Thus pervading the cosmos. He sits in each and every land, Pervading the lands one and all; Enlightening beings from everywhere gather, All coming to the enlightenment scene. 
Oceans of enlightening beings with virtues and lights Numerous as atoms in all lands All are in the congregation of the Buddha, Filling the entire cosmos. In lands numerous as atoms in the cosmos He appears in every congregation; This realm of knowledge of body-distribution Can be established in the practice of universal goodness. In the congregations of all the Buddhas Enlightening beings of supreme knowledge sit, Each hearing the teaching, conceiving joy, Cultivating themselves in every situation for boundless ages. 
Truly awakening at the site of enlightenment And turning the wheel of truth. All lands, wide and vast, Billions of ages, inconceivable, Can be shown in a moment’s span In the enlightening beings’ concentration. 
Then another great enlightening being in the assembly, named Lion Stretch Wisdom Light, empowered by the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said, Vairocana Buddha Can turn the wheel of truth In all the lands of the cosmos, Filling it like clouds. 
In all the great oceans of worlds In all the ten directions Buddha’s power of mind and will Turns the wheel of truth. 
In the vast assemblies of beings In all lands His names are not the same; He expounds the truth according to need. 
Buddha’s majestic powers Were made by the vows of universal goodness and wisdom; In all lands That wondrous sound reaches everywhere. 
Buddha’s bodies are numerous as atoms in lands, Showering the rain of truth everywhere; Unborn, without distinction, Appearing in all worlds. 
What he practiced in the past Over countless billions of eons In all lands, many as atoms, That wondrous sound can fully tell. 
Nets of lights pervade All the numberless lands; In the lights are Buddhas Teaching all beings everywhere. 
The Buddha-body, without distinction, Fills the cosmos, Able to manifest physical forms, Teaching according to potentials. 
Different are the various names Of all the guides In all worlds of all times; They are spoken so all may see. 
The cycles of sublime teachings Of all the Buddhas Of past and present All gathered here can hear. 
Then another great enlightening being in the assembly, named Treasury of Qualities of Wisdom of the Ocean of Truth, empowered by the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said, Buddha children in this assembly Cultivate all knowledge and wisdom; These people can enter Such gates of means. 
In every buddha-body For billions of ages, inconceivable, They practiced ways of transcendence And purified all the lands. 
To every buddha-field They go without exception; Seeing the Buddhas’ mystic power, They enter the Buddhas’ realm. 
The far-reaching sound of the Buddhas Is heard throughout the cosmos; Enlightening beings can understand, And enter the ocean of sound. 
Reaching stage after stage, Dwelling in the stage of power, They diligently worked for eons, And such is their attainment. 
Then another great enlightening being in the assembly, named Universal Light of the Lamp of Wisdom, empowered by the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said, All the Buddhas Are beyond all forms; Who can understand this truth Sees the Guide of the World. 
Born from the sea of blessings, Abiding in the stage of wisdom, They investigate all things And cultivate the supreme path. 
In immense lands in all quarters, For billions of eons diligently practicing, They are able to roam in true knowledge Of the sea of all phenomena. 
According to the mentalities of beings It appears everywhere before them; Showing various means of training, It turns them to the Buddha-way. 
By the spiritual power of the Buddha Are enlightening beings born; Sustained by the strength of the Buddha, They see all enlightened ones. 
All the guides With boundless spiritual powers Awaken enlightening beings Throughout the entire cosmos. 
By the Buddha’s power They examine all phenomena; As they enter, abide, and leave, All they see is clear. 
In all things Boundless are the aspects of teaching; Developing omniscience, One enters the deep ocean of reality. 
Abiding in the buddha-land Appearing in all places, No coming and no going: 
All Buddha’s teachings are thus. 
In the ocean of sentient beings The buddha-body appears like a reflection; According to the differences in their understandings Thus do they see the Guide. 
In each and every hair pore He manifests mystical powers; The pure ones who practice the vow Of universal wisdom can see. 
Buddha, with each of his bodies, Teaches in every place, Pervading the whole cosmos, Beyond the reach of thought. 
Then another great enlightening being in the congregation, named Inexhaustible Light of Majestic Wisdom, empowered by the Buddha, surveyed the ten directions and said, In each and every buddha-land Sits Buddha on all enlightenment sites, Surrounded by assembled groups, Conquering the armies of demons. 
Traveling unimpeded to all lands Throughout the universe, In all groups of beings Buddha always teaches. 
In all places there He guides the worlds, teaching truth. 
In the subtle teaching he expounds The essence of things is undifferentiated; Based on the one real truth, He expounds various characteristics of things. 
In all lands we see Buddha sitting on the enlightenment site; Buddha’s body appears like reflections: 
Its birth or death cannot be found. Then another great enlightening being in the assembly, named Wisdom Illumining the Universe, empowered by the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said, Inconceivable is the form Of the Buddha’s subtle body; Those who see it rejoice, Respecting and believing the teaching. All the features of the Buddha’s body Each manifest innumerable Buddhas Entering all worlds everywhere, Into each atom therein. The infinite, boundless Buddhas Of all oceans of lands Each, in every instant, Display their spiritual powers. 
Enlightening beings of great knowledge Enter deeply into the ocean of truth; Sustained by the power of the Buddha, They can know his techniques. 
If any be already established In the practical vows of universal goodness and wisdom, They see in all those lands The mystic powers of all Buddhas. 
Able to observe All the Buddhas’ bodies, Form and sound unhindered, They’ll understand all realms. 
Able to abide in the sphere of knowledge Of all buddha bodies, They’ll plunge into buddhahood Embracing the whole cosmos. 
As many as atoms in buddha-lands, This many lands They can cause in an instant To appear in every atom. 
With the ocean of all languages, In all sounds according to type, In all buddha-lands, He expounds the pure teaching. In all lands are seen The miracles of the Buddha; Hearing the Buddha preach the truth, They head for enlightenment. In each atom Of all lands in the cosmos Buddha, by the power of liberation, Manifests physically therein. 
The miracles shown in a single hair, Even if told of by all the Buddhas For innumerable eons, Could not be completely defined. 
that is to say, because you can activate all the cycles of the enlightening teaching, revealing the ocean of knowledge and wisdom of all enlightened ones, universally illumine all the oceans of distinctions everywhere, without exception, cause sentient beings to clear away confusion and affliction and attain purity, universally accept all lands without attachment, deeply enter the sphere of all enlightened ones without impediment, and universally expound the virtues and qualities of all enlightened ones; because you are able to enter into the true character of all things and develop knowledge and wisdom, analyze all the media of the teachings, comprehend the faculties of all living beings, and because you are able to hold the ocean of written teachings of all the Buddhas.” At that time all the Buddhas of the ten directions then bestowed on the great enlightening being Universally Good the knowledge that enters into the power inherent in omniscience, the knowledge that enters into the infinity of the cosmos, the knowledge that perfects the realization of the sphere of all enlightened ones, the knowledge of the becoming and decay of all oceans of worlds, the knowledge of the full extent of the worlds of all sentient beings, the knowledge that abides in the extremely profound liberation of all enlightened ones and the nondiscriminating knowledge of all meditation states, the knowledge that enters into the ocean of all faculties of enlightening beings, the knowledge of elocution to turn the wheel of the teaching in the ocean of languages of all sentient beings, the knowledge that enters in all ways into the bodies of all oceans of worlds in the cosmos, and the knowledge that comprehends the voices of all Buddhas. 
As in this world in the presence of the Buddha the enlightening being Universally Good experienced the Buddhas bestowing such knowledge, so in all oceans of worlds, as well as in each atom of all those worlds, so did all the enlightening beings Universally Good there experience this. Because they had realized that state of mental focus in this way. Then the Buddhas of the ten directions each extended his right hand and patted Universally Good on the head. 
Their hands were each adorned with the marks of greatness, being finely webbed, emanating light, fragrance, and flames. They also produced the various wondrous tones of all Buddhas. And within it were manifested the phenomena of mystical powers, the ocean of vows of universal goodness of all enlightening beings of past, present, and future, the cycles of pure teachings of all enlightened ones, as well as the images of the Buddhas of past, present, and future. As in this world Universally Good was patted on the head by all the Buddhas of the ten directions, so in all the oceans of worlds, and in each atom of those worlds, the enlightening beings Universally Good there were patted on the head by the Buddhas of the ten directions. 
Then the enlightening being Universally Good arose from this concentration; when he did so, he rose from media of oceans of concentrations numerous as atoms in all oceans of worlds. For example, he rose from the medium of concentration of skillful knowledge realizing that the worlds of past, present, and future have no distinction in the succession of instants; he rose from the medium of concentration of knowledge of all the subtlest and most minute constituents of all universes in all times; he rose from the medium of concentration on the manifestation of all buddha-fields of past, present, and future; he rose from the medium of concentration revealing the dwelling places of all living beings; he rose from the medium of concentration of knowledge of various differences in locations of the universes of the ten directions; he rose from the medium of concentration of knowledge of boundlessly vast clouds of buddha-bodies existing in every atom; he rose from the medium of concentration of explanations of the ocean of inner principles in all things. When the enlightening being Universally Good rose from such media of concentration, all the enlightening beings each found oceanic clouds of concentrations, numerous as atoms in an ocean of worlds, found oceanic clouds of spells, oceanic clouds of techniques to teach everything, oceanic clouds of ways of felicitous expression, oceanic clouds of practices, oceanic clouds of lights from the knowledge of the treasury of virtues of all who realize thusness, oceanic clouds of nondiscriminating techniques of the powers, knowledges, and wisdom of all enlightened ones, oceanic clouds of Buddhas each manifesting myriad lands in each and every pore, oceanic clouds of enlightening beings one by one manifesting descent from the palace of the Tushita heaven to be born on earth and become an enlightened Buddha, turn the wheel of the teaching, and enter into ultimate extinction, all as numerous as atoms in an ocean of worlds. 
As when in this world the enlightening being Universally Good rose from concentration all the hosts of enlightening beings received such blessings, so in all the oceans of worlds, as well as in each atom of each world, the same thing occurred. 
At that time, by the spiritual power of all the Buddhas and the power of Universally Good’s concentration, all oceans of worlds in the ten directions trembled. Each world was arrayed with precious elements and gave forth wondrous sound, explaining all things. And on each Buddha, in the ocean of sites of enlightenment where the masses gathered, everywhere there rained ten kinds of clouds of regal jewels: clouds of beautiful gold star jewels, jewels like precious discs descending, shining light jewels, jewels of the treasury manifesting the images of enlightening beings, jewels extolling the names of Buddhas, jewels of brilliant light illuminating the sites of enlightenment in buddha-fields everywhere, jewels whose light reflects the various miracles everywhere, jewels praising the virtues of all enlightening beings, jewels with a light that shines like the sun, jewels whose delightful music is heard everywhere. 
Universally Good is present in all lands Sitting on a jeweled lotus throne, beheld by all; He manifests all psychic powers And is able to enter infinite meditations. 
The Universally Good always fill the universe With various bodies flowing everywhere, With concentration, psychic power, skill and strength, In a universal voice teaching extensively without hindrance. 
In every land, in the presence of all the Buddhas, Various states of concentration revealing psychic powers, Each psychic power pervades everywhere In all lands of the ten directions. 
As with the Buddhas of all lands, So it is in all the atoms of the lands as well; The phenomena of concentration and mystic powers Are the will power of the illuminator. 
Universally Good physically is like space, Abiding by reality, not a land, According to the heart’s desires of all beings Manifesting all kinds of embodiments, equal to all. 
He reproduces his body infinitely and dwells there; All lands of his manifestation are purified, And in an instant are seen many eons. 
Universally Good lives peacefully in all lands: 
The spiritual powers he displays are incomparable; The trembling extending everywhere Causes those who look to be able to see. 
Such independence, inconceivable, Is manifest in the lands of the ten directions To reveal the universal entrance of all meditations; In the clouds of buddha light his praises are sung. 
You have purified this body of reality. 
In the congregations of all buddha-fields Universally Good is omnipresent there; The light of the oceans of universal virtue and wisdom Equally illumine everywhere, so all are visible. 
Entering into all particles of the cosmos, The body is endless and undifferentiated; Omnipresent as space, It expounds the great teaching of the realization of thusness. 
The Formation of the Worlds Having thus observed and examined all these, he declared to all the enlightening beings in the ocean of congregations at all scenes of enlightenment, “Children of Buddha, the Buddhas’ pure knowledge of the formation and disintegration of all oceans of worlds is inconceivable. 
Their pure buddha-bodies are inconceivable. Their oceans of boundless forms illumining everywhere are inconceivable. Their marks and subsidiary refinements, all pure, are inconceivable. 
Their ocean of powers of magical displays to civilize and develop sentient beings is inconceivable. Their oceans of courageous taming of all sentient beings, letting none go to ruin, is inconceivable. Their abode in the state of buddhahood is inconceivable. Their entry into the realm of realization of thusness is inconceivable. 
If any have pure faith and unshakable minds And are always able to associate with good teachers, All the Buddhas will give their power So they can enter enlightened knowledge. 
Beyond flattery and deception, hearts pure, Always gladly kind and compassionate, of joyful natures, Determination broad and great, faith profound: Such people, hearing this teaching, are glad. 
Dwelling on the ground of universally good vows, Cultivating the pure ways of enlightening beings, Regarding the cosmos like space: These people can know the Buddha’s sphere. 
Such enlightening beings gain true benefit Seeing the Buddha’s mystical powers; None who practice other paths can know: Only those of universally good practice can understand. 
Sentient beings are infinite Yet Buddha guards them all in his thoughts; Teaching the truth, reaching all: The power of Vairocana’s realm. 
All lands are in my body And so are the Buddhas living there; Watch my pores, And I will show you the Buddha’s realm. 
The practice and vows of Universally Good are boundless; I have already fully cultivated them. The vast body of the realm of the universal eye Is the Buddha’s sphere: listen clearly. 
Then the great enlightening being Universally Good said to the great masses, “O Children of Buddha, there are ten things about the world oceans which the Buddhas of past, present, and future have explained, do explain, and will explain. What are these ten? They are the causes and conditions of the origination of the world oceans, the bases of the world oceans, the forms of the world oceans, the substances and natures of the world oceans, the adornments of the world oceans, the purity of the world oceans, the appearance of Buddhas in the world oceans, the eons of subsistence of the world oceans, the differences in changes over the ages of the world oceans, and the aspects of the world oceans that have no differences. 
“Children of Buddha, if explained in brief, there are ten kinds of causes and conditions by which all oceans of worlds have been formed, are formed, and will be formed. 
They are: 
because of the Buddhas’ mystical powers, because they must be so by natural law, because of the acts of all sentient beings, because of what is realized by all enlightening beings developing omniscience, because of the roots of goodness accumulated by both enlightening beings and all sentient beings, because of the power of the vows of enlightening beings purifying lands, because enlightening beings have accomplished practical undertakings without regressing, because of the enlightening beings’ freedom of pure resolve, because of the independent power flowing from the roots of goodness of all enlightened ones and the moment of enlightenment of all Buddhas, and because of the independent power of the vows of the Universally Good. 
This is a summary explanation of ten kinds of causes; if I were to explain in full, there are as many as atoms in an ocean of worlds.” Then the great enlightening being Universally Good, in order to reiterate the meaning of what he had said, receiving the power of the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and spoke these verses: 
The boundless ocean of myriad lands explained Vairocana Buddha has all beautifully purified. The World Honored One’s realm is inconceivable; Such are his knowledge, wisdom, and mystic powers. 
Enlightening beings cultivate the practice of oceans of vows, Universally adapting to the inclinations of sentient beings. 
The mentalities of sentient beings are boundless; The enlightening beings’ lands extend throughout all ten directions. 
Enlightening beings aim for omniscience, Diligently cultivating various spiritual powers, Generating oceans of infinite vows, Developing vast, expansive lands. 
Cultivating oceans of practices, without bound, They enter the realm of buddhahood, also infinite; In order to purify the lands in the ten directions, They spend countless eons in each land. 
Sentient beings are muddled by afflictions, Their conceptions and inclinations are not the same; According to their mental states they perform inconceivably many acts, Thereby forming the oceans of all lands. 
The treasury of adornments of the lands of Buddha-children Is made of jewels of undefiled light; This depends on a mind of vast resolute faith. Their dwelling places in all quarters are all like this. 
Enlightening beings can cultivate the universally good practice, Traveling paths as numerous as atomic particles in the cosmos, In each atom revealing countless lands Pure and vast as space. 
They manifest mystic powers equal in extent to space And go to enlightenment sites where the Buddhas are; Upon their lotus seats they reveal many forms, In each and every body containing all lands. 
In a single instant they reveal past, present, and future, Where all oceans of lands are formed. 
Buddha, by appropriate techniques, enters them all: 
This is what Vairocana has purified. 
Then the enlightening being Universally Good said to the congregation, “O Children of Buddha, each of the oceans of worlds has bases of support as numerous as atoms in an ocean of worlds. That is to say, they may rest on all adornments, or in space, or on the lights of all jewels, or on the lights of all Buddhas, or on the lights of the colors of all jewels, or on the voices of all Buddhas, or on illusory actions, or on thunderbolt bearers in the form of powerful titans, or on the bodies of all the leaders of the worlds, or on the bodies of all enlightening beings, or on the ocean of all different embellishments produced by the power of the vows of the universally good enlightening beings. The oceans of worlds have such bases as these, as many as atoms in an ocean of worlds.” Then, in order to reiterate the meaning of this, Universally Good, receiving the power of the Buddha, surveyed the ten directions and said in verse, All the various lands there are Filling space in the ten directions Sustained by Buddha’s mystic power Appear in all places, so all can see. 
There are some varieties of lands All made of undefiled jewels, Pure gems, the most exquisite, Radiating everywhere oceans of light. 
Then there are lands of pure light Which rest in the realm of space; Some are in oceans of jewels, Some rest in mines of light. Buddha, in the midst of this ocean of groups, Expounds teachings, all skillful and subtle; The realm of the Buddhas is boundlessly vast: 
Beings who see it are gladdened at heart. Some are embellished with precious stones Shaped like flower lamps in vast arrays, Their clouds of fragrant flame-light blazing with color, Covered with webs of jewel lights. 
Some lands have no boundaries; They rest in the deep, immense lotus sea, Broad, pure, unique among worlds, Because they’re adorned by Buddhas’ goodness. 
Some world-oceans revolve, Stabilized by Buddha’s power; Enlightening beings are everywhere there, Always seeing immeasurably vast treasures. 
Some rest in thunderbolt hands, Some on celestial leaders’ bodies; The supremely honored Vairocana Is always here actively teaching. 
Some rest evenly on jewel trees, Or likewise on clouds of fragrant flames; Some rest on great bodies of water, Some in the ocean of indestructible diamond. Some rest on thunderbolt banners, Some are in flower seas; Vast mystic powers all-pervading, Vairocana here can appear. Some long, some short, there are innumerable kinds; Different too are the rings they form. Their stores of beautiful adornments are extraordinary: 
Thus each of them are different, But all rest on the ocean of vows. Some lands are always in space, With Buddhas like clouds filling them. 
Some hang upside-down in space, Sometimes existing, sometimes not; Some lands are extremely pure, Resting in enlightening beings’ precious crowns. The great spiritual powers of the Buddhas everywhere All are seen herein; The voices of the Buddhas fill them all, Produced by the power of deeds. 
Some lands fill the universe, Pure, undefiled, arising from mind, Like reflections, illusions, boundlessly vast, Each different, like in Indra’s net. 
Realms of actions are inconceivable: Buddha’s power reveals them for all to see. Inside the particles of each land Constantly revealing the Buddha-lands, Their numbers infinite, equal to beings: 
Such is the action of the Universally Good. In order to fully develop beings He cultivated practice here for infinite eons, Producing great miraculous displays Extending everywhere through the cosmos. 
In each atom of the lands of the cosmos Rest the vast oceans of worlds; Clouds of Buddhas equally cover them all, Filling every place. 
Like the free action in one atom So it is in all atoms; All the great occult powers of Buddhas and enlightening beings Vairocana can cause to appear. All the vast lands Are like reflections, illusions, or flames: 
Then the enlightening being Universally Good said further to the great congregation, “Children of Buddha, the oceans of worlds have various different forms and characteristics. That is to say, some are round, some square, some neither round nor square. There are infinite distinctions. 
There are as many forms such as these as there are atoms in an ocean of worlds.” Then, to review this point, Universally Good, imbued with the power of the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said, The oceans of lands are variously different: Various adornments, various supports; Different forms, all beautiful, pervade the ten directions: You should together all observe them. Some are round, some are square, Some triangular, some octagonal; Gemstone-wheel shaped, lotus blossoms, and so on: 
All are different, according to deeds. Some have arrays of pure flames, Mixed with gold, most rarely fine, All doors open, with no resistance: 
This is from deeds broadminded and pure. 
The store of boundless differences of the oceans of worlds Is like clouds draped in the sky, Jewel discs spread on the ground in wonderful arrays, The lights of the Buddhas shining therein. 
All lands, distinctions of mind, Appear reflected in various lights; In these oceans of worlds Buddhas each manifest mystical powers. 
Some lands are dirty, some are pure; Pleasant or painful, each is different. 
This comes from the inconceivable ocean of acts: Cyclic phenomena are always like this. 
Inside a single hair pore, inconceivable lands With various bases, many as atoms: 
In each of them a universal illuminator Expounds the truth in the midst of the crowd. 
In a single atom, great and small lands, Variously different, as numerous as atoms; Level, high and low, each is different: 
Buddha goes to all to operate the teaching. 
The lands manifested in a single atom Are all the occult power of the original vow: 
According to the various differences in inclination of mind All can be made, in the midst of space. 
In all atoms of all lands Buddha enters, each and every one, Producing miracle displays for sentient beings: 
Such is the way of Vairocana. 
Then the enlightening being Universally Good also said to the great assembly, “Children of Buddha, know that the oceans of worlds have various substances. Some have bodies of arrays of all jewels, some are of various ornaments made of all precious substances, some are of lights of all jewels, some are of lights of various colors, some are of lights of various adornments, some are composed of Buddhas’ powers, some are of characteristics of fine gems, some are made of miraculous displays of Buddhas, some are of jewel sun discs, some are of extremely minute, fine jewels, some are made of radiance of all jewels, some are of various fragrances, some are made of crowns of precious flowers, some are of all jewel reflections, some are made of what is manifested by all adornments, some are made of an instant of mind manifesting the whole cosmos, some are made of jewels in the forms of enlightening beings, some are made of jewel flower pistils, some are made of the spoken sounds of the Buddhas.” Then, to repeat this, Universally Good surveyed the ten directions by the Buddha’s power and said, There are some oceans of worlds Compounded of jewels, Solid and unbreakable, Resting on precious lotus blossoms. 
Some are pure light beams Of unknowable origin; These arrays of all light beams Rest in empty space. 
Some are made of pure light And also rest on light rays Embellished with clouds of light Where enlightening beings roam. 
There are some oceans of lands Born of the power of vows, Existing like reflections: They can’t be grasped or explained. 
Some are made of precious stones Emitting sunlike light; Discs of pearls adorn the ground, And enlightening beings abound. 
Some lands are made of jewel flames, Covered with clouds of flames, The radiance of the jewels superb; All comes from results of acts. 
Some are born of subtle forms, With various features adorning the ground, Like crowns holding all jewels; These come from the Buddha’s work. 
Some are born from the ocean of minds, Existing according to what the minds understand. Like illusions, they have no locus: All are mental constructions. 
Some are made of the precious light Of the Buddha’s aura; All the Buddhas appear therein, Each producing miracles. 
Some universally good enlightening beings Produce various oceans of lands, Adorned by the power of their vows, All exceptionally sublime. 
Then the enlightening being Universally Good also said to the great congregation, “Know that the oceans of worlds have various adornments. Some are adorned by all ornaments producing beautiful clouds, some by explanations of the virtues of all enlightening beings, some by explanations of the rewards of actions of all sentient beings, some by revelations of the ocean of vows of all enlightening beings, some by representations of the images of all Buddhas of past, present, and future, some by the spheres of occult powers revealing boundless eons in a single moment, some by production of all buddha-bodies, some by production of fragrant clouds of all jewels, some by radiant lights showing the wonderful things in all enlightenment scenes, some by illustration of the practices and vows of all universally good ones. 
There are as many such adornments as atoms in an ocean of worlds.” Then, to repeat, Universally Good, imbued with the power of the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said, The vast oceans of lands are boundless; All are made from pure action, With various adornments and various abodes, They fill all ten directions. 
Clouds of jewel flames of boundless forms, Vast arrays of adornments, not the same, Always appear in all oceans of lands, Radiating subtle sounds expounding the truth. 
Adorned by the various great vows Of the enlightening beings’ boundless sea of virtues, These lands simultaneously produce sublime sounds Shaking the network of the lands of the ten directions. 
The ocean of beings’ acts is vast, immeasurable; According to the results they effect, the lands are each different. The adornments in all places Can tell of this, by the Buddha’s powers. 
The spiritual powers of Buddhas past, present, and future Appear throughout the oceans of lands; In each phenomenon all the Buddhas appear: Thus do they purify—you should observe. 
Past, future, and present eons, All lands in the ten directions, And all the adornments therein, All appear in each land. In all phenomena are countless Buddhas: 
As many as beings, filling the world; In order to teach they produce mystic effects Whereby they adorn the oceans of lands. 
All the adornments emit beautiful clouds Of various flowers and fragrant flames, With clouds of jewels appearing as well: The oceans of worlds are embellished with these. 
All sites of enlightenment in the ten directions Are complete with all kinds of adornment; Flowing lights spread afar, like clouds of color: All are shown in this ocean of lands. 
The practice of the vows of the universally good Buddha children have practiced for eons as many as beings; Boundless lands have they all adorned, All appearing in all places. 
Then Universally Good also said to the congregation, “Know that in the oceans of worlds there are oceans of purifying techniques as many as atoms in an ocean of worlds. That is to say, the enlightening beings associate with all good teachers to cultivate the same roots of goodness; they cause great clouds of virtues to grow, extending throughout the universe; they clarify all their great beliefs; they contemplate the spheres of all enlightening beings and abide therein; they cultivate all means of transcendence and fulfill them; they contemplate all stages of enlightenment and enter them; they produce the ocean of all pure aspirations; they cultivate all practices essential for emancipation; they enter into the ocean of all adornments; they perfect the power of purifying methods. 
There are as many of these and others as there are atoms in an ocean of worlds.” Then, to reiterate, Universally Good looked over the ten directions by the power of the Buddha invested in him, and said, The adornments of all oceans of worlds Are born from countless techniques, vows, and powers; All the oceans of lands always shine, Produced by the power of countless pure deeds. 
Forever associating with good teachers, Together doing good works, all pure, With great compassion extending to all beings, Thereby are world-oceans adorned. 
Concentration on all the teachings, Meditation, liberation, and skill in means Are all purified with the Buddha: Thus are the world-oceans born. 
Developing boundless certainty, Able to understand like the Buddha, Having purified patience and skill in means, Thus can boundless lands be purified. 
Cultivating supreme practices to aid sentient beings, Virtue great and always growing, Like clouds spreading as far as space: Thus are world-oceans perfected. 
The transcending means are infinite, many as beings; All have the Buddhas practiced to perfection; Transcendent vow-taking has no end: Pure world-oceans are born from here. 
Purely practicing all peerless truths, Developing boundless liberating practices, Edifying beings by various means: Thus are beautified oceans of worlds. 
Practicing techniques of adornment, Entering the ocean of teachings of enlightened virtues, Causing all beings to dry up the source of suffering: Thus are vast lands perfected. 
The ocean of powers is peerlessly great, Causing all beings to plant roots of good, Making offerings to all the enlightened: Thus are boundless lands all purified. 
Then Universally Good addressed the masses again: 
“Buddha children, know that in each ocean of worlds there are differences in the manifestation of the Buddhas, as many as atomic particles in an ocean of worlds. That is, some manifest small bodies, some large bodies, some manifest short lives, some long lives, some only adorn and purify a single buddha-land, some adorn and purify innumerable buddha-lands, some only reveal one vehicle of teaching, some reveal inconceivably many vehicles of teaching, some appear to tame a few sentient beings, some tame boundless sentient beings. Such differences as these are as many as atomic particles in an ocean of worlds.” Then Universally Good, to review, looked over the ten directions by the power he received from the Buddha, and said, Various accommodating methods of the Buddhas Appear in all the oceans of worlds, All adapted to the inclinations of sentient beings: This is the Buddhas’ power of skillful expedients. 
The reality-body of the Buddhas is inconceivable: Colorless, formless, beyond any image, Yet able to manifest myriad forms for sentient beings, Causing them to see, according to their inclinations. 
Some manifest short lives for beings, Some appear to live for countless eons; The reality-body manifests throughout the ten directions, Appearing in the world according to suitability. 
Some there are who beautify and purify all The inconceivable oceans of worlds in all directions; And some only purify one single land, Yet showing all within that one. 
Some, according to the mentalities of sentient beings, Reveal inconceivably many various vehicles of liberation; Some only expound one vehicle of teaching, Yet within that one are revealed innumerable methods. 
Some there are who, naturally enlightened, Cause a few beings to abide in the Way; Some can in a single instant Awaken countless deluded ones. 
Some produce mystical clouds from their pores Which manifest countless, boundless Buddhas Appearing in all worlds, Liberating beings by various means. 
Some there are whose spoken sounds pervade everywhere Explaining truth in accord with mental inclinations of beings, Through inconceivably many eons Taming oceans of countless beings. 
Some have infinite beautified worlds, Their congregations pure, sitting solemnly, Buddhas like clouds spreading over, Filling the oceans of worlds in the ten directions. 
The techniques of the Buddhas are inconceivable, All appearing in accord with beings’ minds, Abiding in various beautified fields, Extending throughout all lands. 
Then Universally Good again addressed the great assembly: 
“Buddha-children, know that the oceans of worlds have as many spans of existence as there are atoms in an ocean of worlds. That is, some abide for an incalculable eon, some abide for an infinite eon, some abide for a boundless eon, some abide for an incomparable eon, some abide for an uncountable eon, some abide for an unspeakable eon, some abide for an inconceivable eon, some abide for an immeasurable eon, some abide for an inexplicable eon. There are as many such spans as atoms in an ocean of worlds.” Then, to review, Universally Good, looking over the ten directions by the power received from the Buddha, said, Among the oceans of worlds are various ages, Adorned by vast, extensive technical skills; Observing all the lands in the ten directions, The differences in the measures of their ages become clear. I see that the eon lengths in the world-oceans of the ten directions Are innumerable, same as sentient beings: 
Then Universally Good again addressed the assembly: 
There is no difference in the techniques of the teaching cycles in each ocean of worlds; there is no difference in that in each ocean of worlds all oceans of worlds everywhere enter into the individual atom; there is no difference in that in each and every atom of each ocean of worlds are manifest the vast realms of all the Buddhas of the past, present, and future. The aspects of the oceans of worlds which are not different are, briefly stated, thus; if they are fully told, there are as many as atoms in an ocean of worlds.” Then the enlightening being Universally Good, to recapitulate, looked over the ten directions by the power of the Buddha and said in verse, In each atom are many oceans of worlds, Their locations each different, all beautifully pure; Thus does infinity enter into one, Yet each unit’s distinct, with no overlap. Within each atom are inconceivably many Buddhas Appearing everywhere in accord with beings’ minds, Reaching everywhere in all oceans of worlds: This technique of theirs is the same for all. 
The Flower Bank World “This Flower Bank Array ocean of worlds is supported by as many atmospheres as there are atoms in the polar mountain. The bottommost atmosphere is called Impartial Abode; it holds arrays of blazing flames of all jewels above it. 
The next atmosphere is called Producing Various Precious Adornments; it holds diamond banners radiant with pure light above it. 
The next higher atmosphere is called Precious Power; it holds chimes of all jewels above it. 
The next higher atmosphere is called Impartial Flavor; it holds diamond orbs of the appearance of sunlight above it. 
The next higher atmosphere is called Various Universal Adornments; it holds flowers of light discs above it. 
The next higher atmosphere is called Universal Purity; it holds flaming lion thrones of all flowers above it. 
The next higher atmosphere is called Sound Pervading the Ten Directions; it holds banners of all regal pearls above it. 
The next higher atmosphere is called Light of All Jewels; it holds all diamond tree flowers above it. 
The next higher atmosphere is called High Velocity Universal Support; it holds mountainous clouds of all fragrant gems above it. 
The next higher atmosphere is called Various Mansions in Motion; it holds clouds of pedestals of all precious colors and fragrances above it. 
The uppermost of those atmospheres as numerous as atoms in a mountain is called Repository of Supreme Light; it holds an ocean of fragrant water, adorned by radiant diamonds. 
In this ocean of fragrant water is an enormous lotus blossom, called Banner of Fragrance, with pistils of all kinds of lights; this Flower Bank Array ocean of worlds rests therein. 
This ocean of worlds is square and level, pure and stable, surrounded by diamond circular mountains. 
Its lands, seas, and trees each have distinct boundaries.” Then Universally Good, to recapitulate, looked over the ten directions with the power of the Buddha and said in verse, In the past the Buddha, in all states of being Cultivated pure deeds with Buddhas as many as atoms; Thus he attained the Flower Bank Array ocean of world With all kinds of jewel lights. 
His vast clouds of mercy cover all; He has given up his body innumerable times. 
Because of the power of his past eons of practice, This world now has no defilements. 
It emanates great light, which abides throughout space; Held by atmospheric power, it doesn’t tremble or quake. It is adorned everywhere by jewels of Buddha’s treasury; The power of Buddha’s vows has made it pure. 
Strewn about are flowers of beautiful mines of jewels, Resting in the sky through the power of ancient vows. 
Over an ocean of various adornments, stable and strong, Clouds of light spread, filling the ten directions. 
In all the jewels are clouds of enlightening beings Traveling to all quarters, blazing with light; Rimmed with glowing flames, beautiful flower ornaments Circulate throughout the universe, reaching everywhere. 
From all the jewels emanates pure light Which totally illumines the ocean of all beings; Pervading all lands in the ten directions, It frees them from pain and turns them to enlightenment. 
The Buddhas in the jewels are equal in number to all beings; From their hair pores they emanate phantom forms: 
Celestial beings, world rulers, and so on, Including forms of all beings as well as Buddhas. 
Their magical light beams are as many as all things; In the light they intone the names of all Buddhas. 
By various means they teach and civilize, Accommodating all the various minds everywhere. 
The vast cloud of his vows extends throughout the cosmos, Edifying all beings throughout all time. 
Having completed the practice of the state of knowledge of universal good, All the adornments there are emerge from here. Then Universally Good again addressed the great congregation: 
“Children of Buddha, the surrounding mountains of this Flower Bank Array ocean of worlds rest on lotus blossoms of sun-pearls. Their mass is made of sandalwood crystals, their peaks of majestic diamonds. 
They are covered with beautiful flowers and fragrant herbs, and studded with bright pearls. 
Nets of precious stones are draped all around. There are as many such beautiful adornments as there are atoms in an ocean of worlds.” Then, to recapitulate, Universally Good, the enlightening being, receiving spiritual power from the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said in verse, The great ocean of worlds has no bounds; Its circumference of jewels is pure and multicolored. All the adornments it has are of rare beauty; This comes from the spiritual power of the Buddha. Rings of jewels, rings of exquisite incense, As well as rings of pearls and lamp flames— Various beautiful treasures adorn it, Whereon rest a pure ring of mountains. 
Their mines are of solid jewels, They’re decorated with rose gold, Their light blazes throughout the ten directions; Inside and out they shine, all pure and clear. Made of masses of diamonds, Also raining beautiful jewels, Their jewel atmospheres are unique and different, Radiating pure light beautifying everywhere. The fragrant rivers divide into streams of infinite hues, Scattering flower-jewels and sandalwood, With lotuses thickly blooming, like clothing spread, And rare plants abundantly growing, all of them aromatic. 
Countless jewel trees adorn everywhere, The colors of their blooming flowers radiantly bright; Various kinds of fine raiment are placed thereon, With clouds of light shining everywhere, all round and full. Countless, boundless great enlightening beings Holding canopies, burning incense, fill the universe, Each producing all wonderful voices Everywhere expounding the Buddhas’ true teaching. 
The trees of precious elements have branches of jewels, Each jewel branch emitting light; Vairocana’s pure body Enters therein, causing all to see. 
In all the adornments are manifest buddha-bodies Of boundless forms and countless numbers, All going to all quarters, reaching everywhere, The beings they teach also being limitless. 
All the adornments emit sublime sounds Expounding the circle of the Buddha’s original vows— Buddha’s independent power causes them to pervade All the pure oceans of lands there are. 
Then Universally Good also said, “The land within the surrounding mountains of this ocean of worlds is all made of diamond. Its stable, strong adornments cannot be broken. It is clean and level. 
It is fringed by precious stones and contains repositories of jewels. It is arrayed at intervals with all kinds of gems in the various forms of all sentient beings. 
It is strewn with jewel dust and spread with lotus blossoms, with jewels from fragrant mines placed among them. The various adornments fill everywhere, like clouds. It is decorated with all the embellishments of all the buddha-lands of past, present, and future. 
Enlightening beings’ celestial crowns and jewel necklaces Are spread all over the ground as decorations; Sandalwood-scented jewels are strewn about, All radiating pure, exquisite light. 
Jewel flowers flame, producing subtle light; Flames of light, like clouds, illuminate all. These flowers, and myriad jewels, Are strewn over the ground for adornment. Dense clouds rise and fill the ten directions With tremendous rays of light that have no end, Reaching all lands in the ten directions Expounding the Buddha’s vivifying teaching. 
All the Buddha’s vows are in the jewels Revealing boundless, vast eons; What the Supreme Knower did in days gone by Is all seen within these jewels. 
Into all the jewels of this ground Come and enter all the Buddha-fields— And into each atom of those buddha-fields Also enter all lands. 
In the Flower Bank world, adorned with wondrous jewels Enlightening beings travel throughout the ten directions, Expounding the universal vows of the Great Hero: 
This is their power of freedom in enlightenment sites. The ground arrayed with beautiful precious stones Radiates pure light replete with all adornments Filling the cosmos, equal to space; Buddha’s power naturally manifests like this. 
Those who master the vows of universal good, Those of great knowledge who enter the Buddha’s realm, Can know, in this ocean of lands, All such mystic transformations as these. Then Universally Good also said to the assembly, “In the land masses of this ocean of worlds are seas of fragrant waters, as numerous as atoms in unspeakably many buddha-fields. All beautiful jewels adorn the floors of those seas; gems of exquisite fragrances adorn their shores. They are meshed with luminous diamonds. 
Their fragrant waters shine with the colors of all jewels. Flowers of all kinds of gems swirl on their surfaces. Sandalwood powder settles on the bottom of the seas. 
Boundless enlightening beings, holding various canopies, manifest mystic powers causing the adornments of all worlds to appear therein. 
Stairways of ten kinds of precious substances are set out in rows, with balustrades of ten kinds of jewels surrounding them. 
White lotuses ornamented with jewels, as many as atoms in four continents, are spread over the waters, in full bloom. 
Heaps of jewels of fragrant mines form the shores, Orbs of sun-flame pearls are spread like clouds; Garlands of lotuses and exquisite jewels Adorn everywhere, pure, without taint. 
The fragrant waters are clear and contain all colors; Precious flowers swirl, radiating light. Sounds that cause all to quake are heard far and near, Expounding the subtle truth by the Buddha’s mystic powers. 
The arrays of stairways contain all jewels And are studded at intervals with pearls; The surrounding balustrades are all made of jewels With nets of lotuses and pearls draped like clouds. 
Gemstone trees stand in rows, Flower buds blossom, their luster bright; Various music is always playing: Buddha’s mystic power makes it so. 
White lotuses of various superb jewels Are spread in arrays on the fragrant water seas. Rays of fragrant flames never cease: Their vast auras fill everywhere. 
Banners of bright pearls, ever radiant, Drapes of fine clothing ornamenting, Nets of crystal bells intone the sound of truth, Causing hearers to head for buddha-knowledge. 
Lotuses of jewels form castles Adorned with multicolored gems, While clouds of pearls shade the four corners, Thus adorning the seas of fragrant waters. 
Walls surround everything With facing towers arrayed on them. Countless lights are always shining, Variously adorning the pure clear seas. Vairocana, in ancient times, Beautified and purified various oceans of lands Like this, vast, broad, without bounds: 
Then Universally Good went on to say to the great congregation, “Each one of the fragrant seas has as many rivers of fragrant waters as there are atoms in four continents, circling them to the right. All of them have diamond banks adorned with crystals of pure light, always manifesting clouds of jewel color lights of the Buddhas, as well as the speech sounds of all sentient beings. The causal practices cultivated by the Buddhas, their various forms and characteristics, all emerge from the swirls in the rivers. There are networks of crystals and chimes of many jewels, wherein appear the adornments of all the oceans of worlds. 
From those fragrant waters constantly emerge clouds of light with the radiance of all jewels, continuing uninterrupted. 
If the full story be told, each river has as many adornments as atoms in an ocean of worlds.” Then, to reiterate, Universally Good, with the psychic power he received from the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said, Currents of pure fragrance fill the great rivers, Beautiful diamonds form their banks. Rings of jewel dust are spread on the ground; The various ornaments are all rare and fine. 
Jewel stairways arrayed in rows, beautifully adorned, Balustrades surrounding, all extremely fine, Flower decorations, with stores of pearls, And various garlands draped all around. 
The fragrant waters’ jewellike luster is pure, Always spewing crystals in rushing currents; The flowers undulate with the ripples, All producing music intoning sublime truths. 
The mud is made of sandalwood powder, All splendid jewels swirl together; Aromas of stores of scent spread therein, Emitting flames circulating fragrance everywhere. 
In the rivers are produced wonderful jewels, All emitting lights of blazing color; The lights cast reflections forming terrace seats Complete with canopies and garlands of pearls. 
In the diamonds appear bodies of Buddhas, Their lights illumining the ten directions’ lands; Circles of them decorate the river beds, Always full of fragrant water, clear. 
Crystal nets, bells of gold, Cover the rivers, broadcasting Buddha’s voice, Preaching all ways to enlightenment And the sublime practice of universal good. 
The crystals of the jewel banks are extremely pure, And always produce the tones of the Buddhas’ original vows, Telling of and showing The past deeds of all Buddhas. 
From the whirls of those rivers enlightening beings Constantly emerge, like clouds, All traveling in the vast, extensive lands, Till all the universe is filled. 
Pure pearls are spread like clouds Covering all the fragrant rivers; Those pearls are as many as the appearances from Buddha’s brow, Clearly showing the images of all enlightened ones. Then Universally Good also said to the great assembly, “The land in between these rivers of fragrant waters is all variously adorned with beautiful jewels. Each land space has as many white lotuses decorated with jewels as there are atoms in four continents, surrounding and filling everywhere. 
Each has as many forests of jewel trees as atoms in four continents, standing in orderly rows, with each tree constantly producing clouds of all ornaments, diamonds shining within them. The fragrances of all kinds of flowers fill everywhere. Those trees also produce subtle sounds, speaking of the great vows practiced by all the Buddhas in all ages. 
The lands in between the fragrant rivers all have such adornments.” Then, to reiterate, Universally Good, receiving spiritual power from the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said, The land is level and thoroughly pure, Garnished with gold and jewels. 
In each atom of this ground All Buddha-children cultivate the Way; All see the lands predicted for their futures, All of them pure according to their wishes. Then Universally Good went on to declare, “The adornments of the ocean of worlds of the Buddha are inconceivable. 
Each object in this Flower Bank Array ocean of worlds is adorned by as many pure qualities as there are atoms in an ocean of worlds.” Then, to reiterate this point, Universally Good, imbued with spiritual power from the Buddha, surveyed the ten directions and said, Every place in this ocean of lands Is embellished with myriad jewels, Their flames leaping into the sky, spreading like clouds, Their light penetrating, always covering all. 
I’ll tell you. 
In these seas of fragrant waters, numerous as atoms in unspeakably many buddha-fields, rest an equal number of world systems. Each world system also contains an equal number of worlds. Those world systems in the ocean of worlds have various resting places, various shapes and forms, various substances and essences, various locations, various entryways, various adornments, various boundaries, various alignments, various similarities, and various powers of maintenance. “Some of these world systems rest on seas of gigantic lotuses, some rest on seas of jewel flowers of boundless forms, some rest on seas of ornaments of treasures from repositories of all pearls, some rest on seas of perfume, some rest on seas of all flowers, some rest on seas of crystal webs, some rest on seas of swirling light, some rest on seas of enlightening beings’ jewelled crowns, some rest on seas of the bodies of all the various living beings, some rest on diamonds emanating the sounds of the voices of all Buddhas. 
“Some of these world systems are shaped like high mountains, some like rivers, some like whorls, some like whirlpools, some like wheel rims, some like altars, some like forests, some like palaces, some like mountain banners, some like all geometric figures, some like wombs, some like lotus blossoms, some like baskets, some like bodies of sentient beings, some like clouds, some like the distinguishing features of Buddhas, some like spheres of light, some like webs of various pearls, some like all doors, some like various ornaments. Their shapes, if fully told of, number as many as atoms in an ocean of worlds. “As for the substances of these world systems, some are made of clouds of jewels of all quarters, some of multicolored flames, some of light beams, some of flames of precious scents, some of cotton flowers adorned by all jewels, some of images of enlightening beings, some of auras of Buddhas, some of physical forms of Buddhas, some of the light of one precious element, some of the lights of many precious elements, some of the sounds of the sea of blessings and virtues of all living beings, some of the sounds of the sea of actions of all living beings, some of the pure sounds of the sphere of all Buddhas, some of the sounds of the sea of great vows of all enlightening beings, some of the sounds of the formation and disintegration of the adornments of all lands, some of the sounds of the methods and techniques of all Buddhas, some of the sounds of the voices of boundless Buddhas, some of the voices of goodness of all sentient beings, some of the sounds of the mystical demonstrations of all Buddhas, some of the pure sounds of the ocean of virtue of all Buddhas. 
If fully told, there as many of these as atoms in an ocean of worlds.” Then Universally Good, to reiterate what he meant, looked over the ten directions by the power bestowed on him by the Buddha and said in verse, The stable, marvelous adornments of the systems of worlds, Vast, pure treasuries of light, Rest on seas of lotus blossom jewels Or on perfume seas, and so on. 
Pure light is the substance of some; Some, flower banks, and some, clouds of jewels; Some world systems are made of flames, Resting in indestructible mines of jewels. 
Clouds of lamps, colored lights of flames, and more: Various, boundless forms, all pure; Some are composed of sound, Of the inconceivable teachings of Buddha. 
Some are sound produced by the power of vows, Some of sounds of miraculous displays, Some are those of beings’ virtues, Or the sounds of Buddhas’ qualities. 
The individual different aspects of the world systems Are inconceivable, without end. The ten directions are filled with them, Their vast adornments manifesting spiritual powers. 
All the immense lands of the ten directions Enter into this system of worlds; Though we see all in the ten directions enter, Really there is no coming and no entry. 
One world system enters all, And all completely enter one; Their substances and characteristics remain as before, no different: Incomparable, immeasurable, they all pervade everywhere. 
In the atoms of all lands Are seen Buddhas existing there; The voices of their oceans of vows are like thunder, Subduing all sentient beings. 
The Buddha’s body pervades all lands, Which are also filled by countless enlightening beings; The Buddha’s freedom has no equal, Edifying all conscious creatures. 
Then Universally Good said, “These seas of fragrant waters, numerous as atoms in unspeakably many buddha-fields, are in the Flower Bank Array ocean of worlds, spread out like the net of Indra, king of the gods. 
The sea of fragrant water in the very center is called Boundless Light of Beautiful Flowers. Its floor is made of diamond banners reflecting the forms of all enlightening beings. It produces huge lotuses called Diamond Adornments of All Scents. 
The Buddha of this world is called Undefiled Lamp of the Eye of Purity. 
“Above this, past worlds as numerous as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called Beautiful Array of Lotus Flowers of Various Scents, bounded by all kinds of ornaments, resting on a network of jewel lotus blossoms, shaped like a lion throne, covered with nets of pearls of the colors of all jewels, surrounded by as many worlds as atoms in two buddha-fields. The Buddha is called Supreme Radiance of Lion Light. “Above this, past worlds as numerous as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called All-Illuminating Light of Ornaments of All Jewels, bounded by an atmosphere of perfume, resting on garlands of various gems, octagonal in shape, covered by clouds of solar discs of crystals with subtle light, surrounded by as many worlds as atoms in three buddha-fields. The Buddha is called Banner of Supreme Knowledge Like Pure Light. 
The Buddha is called Pure Eye of Flowers of Virtue. “Above this, past worlds as many as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called Repository of Undefiled Flames, shaped like a row of jewel lamps, resting on a sea of banks of jewellike flames, covered by clouds of various bodies constantly raining perfume, surrounded by as many worlds as atoms in eight buddha-fields. The Buddha is called Invincible Power Of Wisdom. “Above this, past worlds as many as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called Sublime Pure Sound, shaped like a fylfot, resting on a sea of jewel raiment, covered with clouds of drapes adorned with all flowers, surrounded by as many worlds as atoms in nine buddha-fields. 
The Buddha there is called Joyful Countenance of Lotus Light. “Above this, past as many worlds as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called Sublime Sound; the Buddha there is called Wonderfully High Jewel Lamp. “Above this, past as many worlds as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called Light of Arrays of Myriad Jewels; the Buddha there is called Banner of Sounds of the Cosmos. “Above this, past as many worlds as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called Diamond Treasury of Fragrance; the Buddha there is called Sound of Light. 
“Above this, past worlds as numerous as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called Mine of Pure Exquisite Ornaments; the Buddha there is called Great Lion of Unexcelled Wisdom. “Above this, past worlds as numerous as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called Producing Lotus Thrones; the Buddha is called King of of Light Illumining the Cosmos. “Above this, past as many worlds as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called Jewel Banner Sound; the Buddha there is called Universal Repute of Great Virtue. “Above this, past as many worlds as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called Diamond Ornament Treasury; the Buddha there is called Lotus Sun Light. 
“Above this, past as many worlds as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called High Bank of Flames; the Buddha there is called Great Cloud Banners Majestically Appearing in All Quarters. “Above this, past as many worlds as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called Sanctuary Adorned with Light; the Buddha there is called Incomparable Knowledge Illumining Everywhere. “Above this, past as many worlds as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called Producing Ornaments of All Jewels; the Buddha there is called King of Mystic Powers Widely Liberating Sentient Beings. “Above this, past as many worlds as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called Beautiful Palace Adorned With Light; the Buddha there is called Vast Intellect Establishing All Truths. 
“Above this, past as many worlds as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called Sphere of Subtle Light; the Buddha there is called Enlightening Wisdom with the Sound of the Light of the Cosmos. “Above this, past as many worlds as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called Roaring Crystal Banner; the Buddha there is called Lotus Light with Beautiful Arms Always Hanging Down. “Above this, past as many worlds as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called Sphere of Extreme Stability; the Buddha there is called Light of the Sea of Nonregressive Virtue. “Above this, past as many worlds as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called Array of Light Beams; the Buddha is called Omniscient All-Conquerer. 
“Above this, past as many worlds as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called Producing Pure Particles; its Buddha is Transcending the Gods. “Above this, past as many worlds as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called Scent of Metamorphic Productions of Universal Light; its Buddha is Scented Elephant of Unbreakable Power. “Above this, past as many worlds as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called Vortex of Light; its Buddha is Good Reputation of Proven Logic. “Above this, past as many worlds as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called Sea of Jewel Necklaces; its Buddha is Incomparable Light Shining Everywhere. 
“Above this, past as many worlds as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called Great Awesome Radiance; its Buddha is Sound of the Cycles of Teaching of Boundless Virtue. “Above this, past as many worlds as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called Jewel Lotus Pond Abode of Common Peace; its Buddha is Showing Knowledge Entering into the Inconceivable. “Above this, past as many worlds as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called Level Ground; its Buddha is King of Light of Jewels of Virtue. “Above this, past as many worlds as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called Mass of Aromatic Crystals; its Buddha is Exquisite Adornments of the Sea of Inexhaustible Virtue. 
The Buddha there is called Light of Supreme Virtue. “Above this, past as many worlds as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called Wonderful Canopy; its Buddha is Mind Free in All Things. “Above this, past as many worlds as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called Jewel Adorned Lion Throne; its Buddha is called Great Dragon Abyss. “Above this, past as many worlds as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called Producing Diamond Thrones; its Buddha is called Ascending the Lotus Platform of a Lion Throne. 
“Above this, past as many worlds as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called Supreme Lotus Sound; its Buddha is All-Enlightening Light of Knowledge. “Above this, past as many worlds as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called Good Customs; its Buddha is King of Sublime Light Holding the Earth. “Above this, past as many worlds as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called Sound of Happiness; its Buddha is King of the Lamp of Truth. “Above this, past as many worlds as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called Jewel Treasury Indra’s Net; its Buddha is Not Seen in Vain. 
“Above this, past as many worlds as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called Fragrant Light Cloud; its Buddha is Contemplative Wisdom. “Above this, past as many worlds as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called No Enmity; its Buddha is Ocean of Energetic Supreme Intellect. “Above this, past as many worlds as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called Banner of Lights of All Adornments; its Buddha is Sovereign King Able to Produce Delightful Lotuses Anywhere. “Above this, past as many worlds as atoms in a buddha-field, is a world called Hair-Curl Adornments, shaped like a half-moon, resting on a sea of crystal flowers from the polor mountain, covered by clouds of radiant diamonds of all kinds of ornaments, surrounded by as many worlds as atoms in twenty buddha-fields, all uniformly pure. 
“Beyond the sea of fragrant water called Sphere of Inexhaustible Light is another sea of fragrant water, called Full of Subtle Light, with a world system called Everywhere Undefiled. Next to that is a sea of fragrant water called Canopy of Radiance, with a world system called Boundless Adornments. Next to that is a sea of fragrant water called Array of Exquisite Jewels, with a world system called Parametric Form of Aromatic Crystals. Next there is a sea of fragrant water called Producing the Sounds of Buddha’s Voice, with a world system called Well-Structured Array. 
Next is a sea of fragrant water called Sandalwood Balustrade Treasury of Sound, with a world system called Egregious Banner. Next is a sea of fragrant water called Adornment of Light of Diamonds of Wonderful Fragrance, with a world system called Power of Light Appearing Everywhere. 
Next is a sea of fragrant water called Cloud of Intense Radiance of Lapis Lazuli Bamboo, with a world system called Everywhere Producing the Sounds of All Quarters. Next is a sea of fragrant water called Mass of Light Flames of the Ten Directions, with a world system called Always Producing Metamorphic Displays Distributed Throughout the Ten Directions. Next is a sea of fragrant water called Gold-Producing Crystal Banner, with a world system called Form of Diamond Banners. Next is a sea of fragrant water called Great Equal Adornments, with a world system called Circle of Bravery. 
Next is a sea of fragrant water called Gold Banner, with a world system called Expounding Mysteries. Next is a sea of fragrant water called Light Beams Shining Everywhere, with a world system called Everywhere Adorned. Next is a sea of fragrant water called Tranquil Sound, with a world system called Appearing Hanging Down. “There are as many such seas as atoms in unspeakably many buddha-fields. 
Next is a sea of fragrant water called Flowers of Many Jewels Blooming, with a world system called Form of Space. Next is a sea of fragrant water called Tent of Glory Shining Everywhere, with a world system called Everywhere Adorned with Unimpeded Light. Next is a sea of fragrant water called Sandalwood Tree Blossoms, with a world system called Whirl Appearing Everywhere. 
Next is a sea of fragrant water called Mind King Crystal Wheel Ornaments, with a world system called Manifesting the Unobstructed Light of Buddha. Next is a sea of fragrant water called Necklace of Masses of Jewels, with a world system called Clearing Away Doubt. Next is a sea of fragrant water called Everywhere Adorned with Rings of Pearls, with a world system called Flowing from the Vows of the Buddhas. “There are as many such seas as atoms in unspeakably many buddha-fields. 
Next is a sea of fragrant water called Containing All Ornaments, with a world system called Jewel Light Shining Everywhere. 
Next is a sea of fragrant water called Beautiful Sound of Music of All Drums, with a world system called Round and Full, Level and Straight. 
All of the worlds in each of these systems rest on various adornments, connecting with each other, forming a network of worlds, set up, with various differences, throughout the Flower Bank Array ocean of worlds.” Then, to recapitulate, the enlightening being Universally Good, receiving power from the Buddha, said in verse, The Flower Bank ocean of worlds Is equal to the universe. 
Its adornments are extremely pure, Resting peacefully in space. In this ocean of worlds Are inconceivably many world systems; Each one independent, They are not all mixed up. 
In the Flower Bank world-ocean The world systems are well arrayed With different shapes and adornments Varying in appearance. 
The sounds of Buddhas’ displays Are the substance of various systems; Seeing according to the power of acts, The world systems are finely adorned. 
Polar Mountain city networks, Circular shapes of whirlpools, Immense lotus flowers blooming, They circle one another. 
Mountain banner palace shapes, Whirling diamond shapes: Like this are the inconceivable Vast systems of worlds. 
Flames of pearls from the ocean, Inconceivable nets of light: The world systems like this All rest on lotus blossoms. 
The webs of light of each system Cannot be fully described: In the lights appear all the lands Throughout the seas in ten directions. 
Into the ornaments adorning All the systems of worlds Enter all the lands, Making all visible everywhere. The world systems are inconceivable, The worlds are boundless; Their various fine embellishments Derive from the Great Sage’s power. In each of the systems of worlds The worlds are inconceivably many; Some forming, some decaying, Some have already crumbled away. Like leaves in a forest, Some growing and some falling, So too in these systems thus Do worlds form and decay. 
Beings’ bodies’ differences Arise from the mind’s discriminations; Thus are the lands varied All depending on acts. 
Just as the Guide is seen In various different forms, So do beings see the lands According to their mental patterns. 
The borders of all the worlds Are draped with lotus nets; Their various features different, Their adornments are all pure. 
In those lotus nets Rest networks of lands With various adornments, Inhabited by various beings. 
Some lands Are dangerous and uneven; Because of beings’ afflictions They see them in this way. 
Innumerable kinds of worlds, Defiled as well as pure, Develop according to beings’ minds, Maintained by enlightening beings’ power. 
In some lands Is purity as well as defilement; This arises from the force of deeds Under the influence of enlightening beings. 
Some lands are made of pure jewels Radiating light, With various fine adornments Purified by the Buddhas. 
In each system of lands Are eonic fires, inconceivable; While it appears disastrous, The places always remain secure. 
By the force of beings’ acts Are many lands produced, Supported by wind atmospheres, Or resting on water spheres. 
The phenomena of the worlds Are thus variously seen; Yet they really have no origination And also no disintegration. 
In each moment of mind Are infinite lands produced; By the Buddha’s spiritual power All are seen as pure. 
Some lands are made of dirt, Their substance very hard; Dark, with no light shining, They’re inhabited by evildoers. 
Some lands are made of thunderbolts, Mixed up and terrifying, With much misery and little happiness, The abodes of those of scant virtue. 
Some are made of iron, Some of ruddy copper, With stone mountains, steep and fearsome, Full of animals. Among the lands are hells Where beings cannot be saved from pain: 
Always in the dark, Burnt by seas of flame. 
Some, again, have animals Of various wretched forms; Because of their own evil deeds They always suffer affliction. 
Some see a nether-world, Oppressed by hunger and thirst; Climbing great mountains of fire, They suffer extreme pain. 
There are also some lands Composed of precious elements, With various kinds of mansions; These are realized by pure deeds. 
You should observe these worlds, The humans and celestials therein: Developed by results of pure deeds, They feel happiness all the time. 
In each and every pore Are unthinkable billions of lands, Adorned in various ways, With never any cramp. 
By the individual acts of beings These worlds are infinite in kind: Therein are born attachments And differences of misery and happiness. Some lands are made of jewels Always radiating boundless light; Diamond lotus flowers Adorn them, totally pure. 
Some lands are made of light Resting too on spheres of light: Golden, with sandalwood scent, Flaming clouds illumining all. 
Some lands are made of lunar discs, Draped with fragrant robes, In a lotus blossom, Filled with enlightening beings. Some lands are made of many jewels, Their colors without impurities, Like the imperial net of Indra, Always shining with light. Some lands are made of fragrance, Some are diamond flowers; Their forms of crystal light Are most pure when looked into. There are also inconceivably many lands Made of flower wreaths, Filled with phantom Buddhas And radiance of enlightening beings. 
Some lands are made Of diamond flowers with pure light; Some are sounds of Buddhas teaching, Forming boundless networks of arrays. Some lands are like the jeweled crowns Of enlightening beings; Some are shaped like thrones Issuing from magical light. 
The pure lands realized by those Who practice the vows of universal good Manifest within themselves the adornments Of past, present, and future lands. 
You should observe, O Children of Buddha, The spiritual power in the systems of worlds: The worlds of the future, all They’ll show you, like in a dream. 
The worlds of the ten directions, The oceans of lands of the past, All within a single land Show their forms, like phantoms. 
All Buddhas of past, present, and future, As well as their lands, Can all be observed In a single world system. 
The spiritual power of all Buddhas Shows many lands in an atom: Of various kinds, all clearly seen, Like reflections, they have no true reality. 
There are many lands Whose forms are like oceans; And lands like polar mountains Are inconceivable in number. 
Some lands are well disposed, Formed like Indra’s net; Some are shaped like forests, With Buddhas filling them. Some are shaped like jewel discs, Some like lotus blossoms, Or octagonal, with all decorations; They’re various, and all pure. Some are shaped like seats, Some again are triangular; Some are like pure jewels, Castle walls, or celestial bodies. 
Some are like gods’ topknots, Some like the half-moon; Some are like crystal mountains, Some like the solar orb. The shape of some of the worlds Is like whirlpools in a fragrant sea; Some are spheres of light, Purified by Buddhas past. Some are shaped like wheel rims, Some are altar-shaped; Some are like Buddha’s hair curl, His flesh topknot, or large long eyes. 
Some are like Buddha’s hand, Some like thunderbolts, Some are like mountains of flames; Enlightening beings fill them all. Some are shaped like lions, Some like seashells; Of infinite colors and forms, Their substances are each distinct. 
Some lands last an eon, Some exist for ten eons, Or for more eons than atoms In a hundred thousand lands. 
In a single eon Lands are seen to dissolve; Measureless or countless, Or inconceivably many of them. 
Some lands have a Buddha, And some lands do not; Some have just one Buddha, And some have countless Buddhas. If a land has no Buddha, Then a Buddha from another world Will mystically appear there To manifest the works of Buddhas— Dying in heaven and descending in spirit, Residing in a womb and being born, Vanquishing demons and becoming enlightened, Turning the wheel of the unexcelled teaching; According to the inclinations of beings’ minds Buddha manifests various forms, Teaching them the sublime truth In accord with each of their faculties. In each buddha-field A Buddha appears in the world, Spending billions of years Expounding unexcelled truths. If beings are not vessels of truth, They cannot see the Buddhas; If any have the will, They see Buddha everywhere. 
Herein each and every Buddha Shows countless mystic transformations, Pervading the entire universe, Taming the ocean of beings. 
Their pure sounds can shake far-off realms; Wherever they reach there are no pains. Some have crystal lights Or lights from ornaments Or from enlightenment scenes Shining in the crowds. Buddha emanates a great light Filled with phantom Buddhas; That light touches all with its glow, Pervading the whole cosmos. Some lands are terrifying, With great howls of pain, Those voices most bitter and harsh, Frightening all who hear. 
There are some lands That produce wonderful sounds from clouds; They’re filled with jewel seas, Crystal trees, and music. 
The power of the vows of universal good Intones wondrous sayings in billions of worlds, That sound like thunder shaking, Remaining for endless ages. 
Vairocana “In that world Supreme Sound was a sea of fragrant water called Pure Light. 
From the midst of that sea rose a great polar mountain of lotus flowers, called Banner Adorned All Over with Flowery Flames. It was surrounded by balustrades made of ten kinds of precious elements. 
On the mountain was a great forest, called Circle of Branches with Jewel Flowers. Arrayed all around it were innumerable flower towers and jewel terraces. Everywhere was richly embellished with innumerable banners of exquisite fragrances, jewel mountain pennants, and jewel lotus blossoms. Innumerable nets of aromatic crystal lotus blossoms were draped all around. 
Fragrant clouds shone. All of these were countless, impossible to fully record. “There were a million billion trillion cities all around the forest, with various beings living in them. East of this forest was a huge city called Flame Light, the capital city of a human king, surrounded by a million billion trillion cities, all made of pure, beautiful jewels, each one seventy leagues long and seventy leagues wide, with walls made of seven kinds of precious substances. 
The palaces and mansions were all adorned with jewels, draped with various beautiful nets, and graced within with perfumes and scattered flowers. 
There were a million billion trillion gates, all decorated with jewels, with forty-nine jewel banners in front of each gate, arrayed in ranks. There were also a million billion gardens and groves all around, with various mixed scents and the fragrances of crystal trees wafting through them and perfuming everything. Myriad birds sang in harmony, a delight to the hearer. “The inhabitants of this great city had all perfected the bases of mystic power as a result of what they had done. 
Whatever they wanted came to them when they thought of it. “Just south of that city was a celestial city called Adorned with Tree Blossoms. 
To the right of that was a great dragon city called Ultimate. 
Next to that was a yaksha city called Supreme Banner of Diamonds. 
Next was a gandharva city called Beautiful Palace. 
Next was a titan city called Jewel Wheel. 
Next was a garuda city called Array of Beautiful Jewels. 
Next was a royal Brahma heaven city called Various Wonderful Adornments. 
Diamonds showed the bodies of enlightening beings. 
There were various exquisite flowers everywhere. 
“In front of that sanctuary was an ocean called Fragrant Diamonds, which produced a huge lotus flower called Flaming Circle of Flower Pistils. That flower was a hundred billion leagues across; its stem, leaves, pistils, and base were all of wonderful jewels. 
“In the first eon of that world Supreme Sound as many Buddhas as atoms in ten mountains appeared in the world. 
The first Buddha was called Supreme Clouds on the Mountain of All Virtues. 
“At that point the Buddha emitted a great light beam from between his brows. 
That light beam was called Producing the Sounds of All Roots of Goodness, and was accompanied by as many light rays as atoms in ten buddha-fields. 
That light filled all lands in the ten directions, and if there were any sentient beings with the potential to be harmonized, that light touched them with its radiance and they immediately awoke on their own, ending all feverish confusion, sundering the web of obstruction, smashing the mountains of barriers, clearing away all pollution, developing great faith and resolution, producing excellent roots of goodness, forever leaving the fears of the various difficulties, annihilating all the miseries of mind and body, conceiving the will to see the Buddha and head for omniscience. 
“In the great city Flame Light was a king called Benevolent Mind a Joy to Behold. He reigned over a million billion trillion cities. He had thirty-seven thousand wives and concubines, the principal one being Auspicious Sign of Blessings. He had five hundred sons, the eldest being Light of Great Power, who himself had a thousand wives, the principle one being Exquisite Sight. 
At that time, the prince Light of Great Power, having seen the Buddha’s light, due to the power of the roots of goodness he had cultivated, immediately realized ten kinds of teachings: he realized the concentration of the spheres of the virtues of all Buddhas; he realized all-sided memory power of all Buddha teachings; he realized transcendent knowledge containing a vast store of skillful techniques; he realized the great culture of kindness harmonizing and pacifying all living beings; he realized great compassion whose reverberations are like clouds extending everywhere; he realized the great joy of the supreme mind which gives birth to boundless virtues; he realized the great equanimity which is aware of all things as they really are; he realized the great spiritual power of the impartial treasury of extensive skill in means of liberation; he realized the great aspiration which increases power of faith; he realized the gate of brilliant intellectual powers entering into omniscience. 
“Then Prince Light of Great Power, having attained illumination of these teachings, receiving mystic power from the Buddha, looked over the great masses and spoke some verses, saying, The Buddha sits on the site of enlightenment; Pure and clear is his great radiant light, Like a thousand suns emerging Illumining all over space. 
After countless billions of ages Does the Guide appear; Now the Buddha’s come into the world, Beheld and attended by all. 
Observe the Buddha’s light, Its inconceivable phantom Buddhas, In every single palace Reposed in true absorption. 
See the Buddha’s mystic powers Producing clouds of flames from his pores, Illuminating the world With light that has no end. 
Illumined by Buddha’s light, All beings are peacefully happy; All pains of existence cleared away, Their minds are filled with joy. 
See the hosts of enlightening beings Gathering from the ten directions, All emitting crystal clouds Extolling the praises of Buddha. 
The enlightenment site produces wondrous sound, Extremely deep and far reaching, Able to eliminate the suffering of sentient beings; This is the Buddha’s spiritual power. 
Everyone’s paying reverent respect, All greatly joyful at heart, Together before the World Honored One, Gazing at the King of Truth. 
“When the prince, Light of Great Power, spoke these verses, his voice pervaded the world Supreme Sound, by the mystic power of the Buddha. 
The king, Benevolent Mind a Joy to Behold, heard these verses and was greatly pleased; he looked at his retinue and said in verse, You should quickly assemble All the various kings, Their princes and great ministers, Their governors, and the rest. Announce in all the cities They should beat the great drum Gathering all the people To go and see the Buddha. At every single crossroad Jewel bells should be rung: Let wives, children, households, Together go to see the Buddha. 
All the city castles Should be ordered cleaned: Raise beautiful banners everywhere Decorated with jewels. 
Myriad skeins of jewel gauze, Music wafting like clouds, Beautifully arrayed in the sky: Let everywhere be filled. 
Let the streets be cleaned, Showered with beautiful cloth; Adorn your jeweled chariots And see the Buddha with me. 
Each, according to his power Shower ornaments everywhere, All like clouds spreading Filling the whole sky. 
Lotus canopies of fragrant flames, Half-moon jewel necklaces, And countless fine garments: You should dispense them all. Seas of the greatest perfumes, Discs of finest crystal, As well as purest sandalwood: All should fill the skies. 
Garlands of many jewels, Ornaments pure and flawless, As well as crystal lamps: 
Set all of them in the air. Bring them all to the Buddha With hearts full of joy; Wives, children, retinue, all Go see the World Honored One. 
There was also the gandharva king Gladdening Sight from the city Undefiled, with a company of ninety-seven billion. 
The kings from a million billion trillion such cities, along with their retinues, all went together to the Buddha Supreme Cloud on the Mountain of All Virtues, prostrated themselves at his feet, then sat to one side. 
“Then that Buddha, in order to harmonize and pacify the sentient beings, expounded the scripture Universal Collection of Methods of Freedom of All Buddhas of Past, Present, and Future, along with subsidiary scriptures as numerous as atoms in the world, causing all beings to receive benefit according to their mentalities. 
“At that point the enlightening being Light of Great Power, having heard this teaching, attained the lights of the ocean of teachings collected in former ages by the Buddha Supreme Cloud on the Mountain of All Virtues. That is to say, he attained the light of knowledge of concentration on the equality of all groups of things; the light of knowledge of all truths entering and abiding in the mind in its initial determination for enlightenment; the light of knowledge of the pure eye of the repository of the omnipresent light of all the universes of the ten directions; the light of knowledge contemplating the ocean of great vows of all Buddhas; the light of knowledge of pure action entering the boundless sea of virtue; the light of knowledge of the storehouse of immensely powerful speed heading for the stage of nonregression; the light of knowledge of the sphere of emancipation with the power to appear in any form anywhere in the universe; the light of knowledge certainly entering the ocean of fulfillment of all virtuous qualities; the light of knowledge of the ocean of perfection of the adornment of certain understanding of all Buddhas; the light of knowledge of the ocean of spiritual power by which the boundless Buddhas of the cosmos appear before all sentient beings; the light of knowledge of the states of the powers and fearlessness of all Buddhas. “Then the enlightening being Light of Great Power, having attained innumerable such lights of knowledge, imbued with power from the Buddha, spoke these verses: 
I’ve heard the Buddha’s wondrous teachings And attained the light of knowledge, Whereby I see the World Honored One’s Deeds in days of yore. 
All the places he was born, His different names and physical forms, And his offerings to the Buddhas: All of this I see. 
In the past he served All the enlightened ones, Practicing for innumerable eons, Purifying oceans of worlds. 
Giving up his body Without any bound or limit, Cultivating supreme action, He purified oceans of lands. 
Ears, nose, head, and limbs, As well as his dwelling places: All he gave up, numberless, To purify all worlds. 
Able in every land Through unthinkable eons To practice enlightening acts, He purified oceans of lands. 
By the power of the vow of universal good In all oceans of Buddhas, He cultivated innumerable practices Purifying oceans of worlds. 
As by the light of the sun We can see the solar orb, By the light of Buddha knowledge I see The path the Buddha traveled. 
I see the great pure light Of Buddha’s ocean of worlds Calmly realizing enlightenment Pervading the whole cosmos. 
I will, like the World Honored One, Purify oceans of lands, And by the Buddha’s spiritual power Practice enlightening ways. 
“Then the Buddha Supreme Clouds on the Mountain of All Virtues spoke these verses for the enlightening being Light of Great Power: 
Mine of blessings, of wide renown! For the purpose of aiding all beings You set forth on the road of enlightenment. 
You’ve attained the light of knowledge Filling the universe; Your virtue and wisdom are both great, You shall attain the deep ocean of knowledge. 
Cultivating practices in a land For as many eons as atoms: As you have seen me doing thus, So you’ll attain such knowledge. 
It is not those of base deeds Who are able to know these techniques: Only by determined effort Can one purify an ocean of worlds. 
In each and every atom Cultivating for countless eons, Only such a one is able To adorn the buddha-lands. 
Spending eons in transmigration For the sake of every being Without weariness of mind, One will then become a guide of the world. 
Offering support to every Buddha Until the end of time, Never getting tired of it, One will attain the highest path. 
Great Light, you’ve given me offerings And thereby attained great power, Causing beings as many as atoms To mature and turn toward enlightenment. 
The great enlightening beings Who cultivate the practice of universal good Adorn the Buddhas’ oceans of worlds Throughout the universe. 
That Buddha Supreme Clouds on the Mountain of All Virtues lived for fifty billion years; after he passed away, there appeared in the world another Buddha, named King of Adornments of the Good Eye of the Transcendent Ways, who also attained true awakening in that great forest Circle of Branches with Jewel Flowers. 
Buddha’s mystic powers have no end, Appearing in every single land; Such is the Buddha’s knowledge, unimpeded: 
That Buddha expounded for them the scripture The Pure Adornments of the Essential Nature of the Cosmos of Realities, with as many subsidiary scriptures as atoms in an ocean of worlds. 
You’ve entered into my enlightenment practices, The ocean of means I employed in the past; That which my practices purified, This sublime action, you understand. 
Giving offerings to all the Buddhas, Adorning the lands, all pure, Cultivating mystic practices in all ages, You’ll fulfill the great virtues of Buddhas. “When the Buddha King of Adornments of the Good Eye of Transcendent Ways had entered extinction, the king Benevolent Mind a Joy to Behold also subsequently passed away, and his son Light of Great Power inherited the position of great monarch, in that great forest Circle of Branches with Jewel Flowers a third Buddha appeared in the world, by the name of Ocean of Supreme Virtue. At that time, when the sovereign Light of Great Power saw the signs of that Buddha’s realization of enlightenment, he went, together with his family and courtiers, his armies, and the populace of the cities, towns, and villages, all carrying seven kinds of jewels and precious metals, to that Buddha and presented a great mansion adorned with all kinds of aromatic crystals. Then that Buddha, there in the forest, expounded the scripture The Illuminating Activity of the Enlightening Being with the Universal Eye, along with subsidiary scriptures as numerous as atoms in a world. 
At that time the enlightening beings formulated these thoughts: “If the World Honored One looks upon us with compassion, may he, in accord with our inclinations, reveal to us the buddha-fields, the Buddhas’ abodes, the adornments of the buddha-fields, the nature of buddhahood, the purity of buddha-lands, the teachings expounded by the Buddhas, the substances and natures of the buddha-lands, the powers and qualities of the Buddhas, the formation of the buddha-fields, the great enlightenment of the Buddhas. Just as the Buddhas of all worlds in the ten directions, in order to develop all enlightening beings, to cause the family of the enlightened ones to continue uninterrupted, to rescue all sentient beings, to cause all living beings to be forever free from all afflictions, to comprehend all actions, to expound all truths, to clear away all defilements, and to forever cut through all webs of doubt, explain the enlightening beings’ ten abodes, ten practices, ten dedications, ten treasuries, ten stages, ten vows, ten concentrations, ten powers, and ten peaks, and explain the sphere of buddhahood, the mystic forces of Buddhas, the actions of Buddhas, the powers of Buddhas, the fearlessness of Buddhas, the meditations of Buddhas, the psychic abilities of Buddhas, the freedom of Buddhas, the nonobstruction of Buddhas, the sense faculties of Buddhas, the powers of analysis and articulation of Buddhas, the knowledge and wisdom of Buddhas, and the transcendence of Buddhas, so also may the Buddha, the World Honored One, explain this for us.” Then the Buddha, knowing what the enlightening beings were thinking, manifested mystic powers to them, according to their particular types. 
When he had done that, there came, from a world called Golden, whose Buddha was called Immutable Knowledge, which was to the East, past as many worlds as atoms in ten buddha-fields an enlightening being of that world, named Manjushri, along with as many enlightening beings as atoms in ten buddha-lands. When they arrived, they bowed, and then produced lotus bank lion seats to the east and sat crosslegged on them. 
In the South, past as many worlds as atoms in ten buddha-lands, was a world called Sublime Color, with a Buddha called Unhindered Knowledge. There was an enlightening being there named Chief of the Awakened, who, together with as many enlightening beings as atoms in ten buddha-lands, came to the Buddha, bowed, and the to the south produced lotus bank lion seats and sat crosslegged on them. 
In the West, past as many worlds as atoms in ten buddha-lands, was a world called Lotus Blossom Color, with a Buddha called Darkness-Destroying Knowledge. There was an enlightening being there, named Chief in Riches of Truth, who, along with as many enlightening beings as atoms in ten buddha-lands, came to the Buddha, bowed, produced lotus bank lion seats to the west and sat crosslegged on them. 
In the North, past as many worlds as atoms in ten buddha-lands, was a world called Golden Flower Color, with a Buddha called Knowledge of Dignified Conduct. There was an enlightening being there, named Chief of the Precious, who, with as many enlightening beings as atoms in ten buddha-lands, came to the Buddha, bowed, produced lotus bank lion seats to the north and sat crosslegged on them. 
In the northeast, past as many worlds as atoms in ten buddha-lands, was a world called Blue Lotus Color, with a Buddha called Knowledge of Characteristics. There was an enlightening being there, called Chief of the Virtuous, who, with as many enlightening beings as atoms in ten buddha-lands, came to the Buddha, bowed, produced lotus bank lion seats to the northeast and sat crosslegged on them. 
In the southeast, past as many worlds as atoms in ten buddha-lands, was a world called Gold Color, with a Buddha called Ultimate Knowledge. There was an enlightening being there called Chief in Vision, who, with as many enlightening beings as atoms in ten buddha-lands, came to the Buddha, bowed, produced lotus bank lion seats to the southeast and sat crosslegged on them. 
In the southwest, past as many worlds as atoms in ten buddha-lands, was a world called Jewel Color, with a Buddha called Supreme Knowledge. There was an enlightening being there called Chief in Effort, who, with as many enlightening beings as atoms in ten buddha-lands, came to the Buddha, bowed, produced lotus bank lion seats to the southwest and sat crosslegged on them. 
In the northwest, past as many worlds as atoms in ten buddha-lands, was a world called Diamond Color, with a Buddha called Independent Knowledge. There was an enlightening being there called Chief in Doctrine, who, with as many enlightening beings as atoms in ten buddha-lands, came to the Buddha, bowed, produced lotus bank lion seats to the northwest and sat crosslegged on them. 
In the nadir, past as many worlds as atoms in ten buddha-lands, was a world called Crystal Color, with a Buddha called Pure Knowledge. There was an enlightening being there called Chief in Knowledge, who, with as many enlightening beings as atoms in ten buddha-lands, came to the Buddha, bowed, produced lotus bank lion seats in the nadir and sat crosslegged on them. 
In the zenith, past as many worlds as atoms in ten buddha-lands, was a world called Equal Color, with a Buddha called Observing Knowledge. There was an enlightening being there called Chief in Goodness, who, with as many enlightening beings as atoms in ten buddha-lands, came to the Buddha, bowed, produced lotus bank lion seats in the zenith and sat crosslegged on them. 
Then the great enlightening being Manjushri, empowered by the Buddha, looked over all the congregations of enlightening beings, and spoke these words: 
“These enlightening beings are most rare. 
O Children of Buddhas! 
The Buddhas’ lands are inconceivable. The Buddhas’ abodes, the adornments of their fields, the nature of buddhahood, the purity of buddha-lands, the teachings of the Buddhas, the manifestation of the Buddhas, the formation of the buddha-lands, and the complete perfect enlightenment of the Buddhas are all inconceivable. 
Because all the Buddhas in the worlds in the ten directions know that the inclinations of sentient beings are not the same, and so they teach and train them according to their needs and capacities. The extent of this activity is equal to the realm of space of the cosmos. 
“Children of Buddhas, in the four quarters of this world Endurance, the Buddha, with various bodies, names, forms, sizes, life spans, situations, faculties, birth places, languages, and observations causes all living beings to individually perceive and know differently. 
In these four quarters, the Buddha is sometimes called Fulfiller of All Aims, sometimes called The Full Moon, sometimes called The Lion Roarer, sometimes called Shakyamuni, sometimes called The Seventh Sage, sometimes called Vairocana, sometimes called Gautama, sometimes called The Great Mendicant, sometimes called The Supreme, sometimes called The Guide; there are ten thousand such names, individually letting beings know and see in various ways. 
“East of this region is a world called Good Protection: there the Buddha may be called Adamantine, or Free, or Possessor of Knowledge and Wisdom, or Invincible, or King of Sages, or Noncontention, or Capable Leader, or Joyful Heart, or Incomparable, or Beyond Philosophy; there are ten thousand such names, individually letting sentient beings know and see in various ways. 
“South of this region is a world called Difficult to Endure: there the Buddha may be called King of the Gods, or Precious Name, or Undefiled, or Truth Teller, or Tamer, or Joyful, or Great Renown, or Giver of Aid, or Infinite, or Supreme; there are ten thousand such names, individually letting people know and see in various ways. 
“West of this region is a world called Personal Wisdom: there the Buddha may be called God of Waters, or Gladdening Sight, or Supreme Monarch, or Celestial Tamer, or Real True Wisdom, or Arrived at the Ultimate, or Joyous, or Objective Knowledge, or Done with All Tasks, or Abiding in Goodness; there are ten thousand such names, letting beings know and see in various ways. 
“North of this region is a world called Lion of Existence: there the Buddha may be called Great Sage, or Ascetic, or World Honored One, or Supreme Field, or Omniscient, or Good Mind, or Pure, or Master of Universal Sound, or Supreme Giver, or Attained by Difficult Practice; there are ten thousand such names, individually letting beings know and see in various ways. 
“Northeast of this region is a world called Subtle Observation: there the Buddha may be called Demon Queller, or Completed, or Dispassionate, or Celestial Virtue, or Free from Greed, or Supreme Wisdom, or Equanimity of Mind, or Unconquerable, or Sound of Wisdom, or Rarely Appearing; there are ten thousand such names, letting beings know and see in various ways. 
“Southeast of this region is a world called Joy and Happiness: there the Buddha may be called Ultimate Dignity, or Mass of Light Flames, or Universal Knower, or Secret Mystery, or Liberation, or Inherently Secure, or Acting According to Truth, or King of Pure Eyes, or Great Courage, or Energetic Power; there are ten thousand such names, causing beings to individually know and see in various ways. 
“Southwest of this region is a world called Extremely Solid and Firm: there the Buddha may be called Peaceful Abiding, or King of Knowledge, or Complete, or Immutable, or Subtle Eye, or Supreme Monarch, or Sound of Freedom, or Giver of All, or Sages of the Masses, or Supreme Mountain; there are ten thousand such names, letting beings know and see in various ways. 
“Northwest of this region is a world called Wonderful Ground; there the Buddha may be called Universal, or Flames of Light, or Jewel Topknot, or Worthy of Remembrance, or Unexcelled Meaning, or Always Joyful, or Inherently Pure, or Sphere of Light, or Long Arms, or Abiding in the Fundamental; there are ten thousand such names, letting beings know and see in various ways. 
“Below this region is a world called Radiant Wisdom: the Buddha there may be called Collecting Roots of Goodness, or Lionlike, or Razorlike Intellect, or Golden Flames, or All-Knower, or Ultimate Sound, or Benefactor, or Arrived at the Ultimate, or God of Truth, or Universal Conqueror; there are ten thousand such names, letting beings know and see in various ways. “Above this region is a world called Holding the Ground: 
there the Buddha may be called Possessor of Knowledge and Wisdom, or Pure Face, or Conscious Wisdom, or Leader, or Adorned by Conduct, or Gladdener, or Wish Fulfilled, or Blazelike, or Ethical, or The One Path; there are ten thousand such names, letting beings know and see in various ways. 
“In this world Endurance there are a hundred billion regions, wherein the Buddha has a million billion various names, letting all sentient beings know and see in various ways. 
“East of this world Endurance is another world, called Secret Teaching: there the Buddha may be called Impartial, or Excellent, or Soother, or Enlightening Mind, or Speaker of Truth, or Attainer of Freedom, or Supreme Body, or Great Courage, or Peerless Knowledge; there are a million billion such diverse names, letting beings know and see in various ways. 
“South of this world Endurance is another world, called Abundance: there the Buddha may be called Original Nature, or Diligent Intellect, or Unexcelled Honored One, or Great Torch of Knowledge, or Nonreliant, or Treasury of Light, or Treasury of Wisdom, or Treasury of Virtue, or God of Gods, or Great Independent One; there are a million billion such names, letting beings know and see in various ways. 
“West of this world Endurance is a world called Undefiled: there the Buddha may be called Wish Fulfilled, or Knower of the Way, or Resting in the Fundamental, or Able to Untie Bonds, or Comprehending Truth, or Easily Discerning, or Supreme Insight, or Pacifying Action, or Ascetic Practicer, or Replete with Power; there are a million billion such various names, letting beings know and see in varous ways. 
“North of this world Endurance is a world called Inclusion: there the Buddha may be called Forever Free from Suffering, or Universal Liberation, or Great Hidden Treasury, or Knowledge of Liberation, or Storehouse of the Past, or Jewel Light, or Detached from the World, or State of Nonobstruction, or Treasury of Pure Faith, or Imperturbable Mind; there are a million billion such names, letting sentient beings know and see in various ways. 
“Southeast of this world Endurance is a world called Beneficial: there the Buddha may be called Manifesting Light, or Knowledge of Extinction, or Beautiful Sound, or Supreme Faculties, or Ornamental Canopy, or Energetic Faculties, or Arrived at the Other Shore beyond Discrimination, or Supreme Stability, or Simple Speech, or Ocean of Wisdom; there are a million such diverse names, letting beings know and see in various ways. 
“Southwest of this world Endurance is a world called Rarefied: there the Buddha may be called Master among Sages, or Possessor of All Treasures, or Liberated from the World, or Faculty of Universal Knowledge, or Excellent Speech, or Clear Sight, or Freedom of the Senses, or Great Immortal Teacher, or Guiding Work, or Adamantine Lion; there are a million billion such names, letting beings know and see in various ways. 
“Northeast of this world Endurance is a world called Joy: there the Buddha may be called Mass of Beautiful Flowers, or Sandalwood Canopy, or Lotus Treasury, or Transcendent beyond All Things, or Jewel of Truth, or Reborn, or Pure Exquisite Canopy, or Immense Eye, or Possessor of Good Qualities, or Concentrated on the Truth, or Network Treasury; there are a million billion such names, letting beings know and see in various ways. 
“Below this world Endurance is a world called Door Bolt: there the Buddha may be called Producing Flames, or Poison Queller, or Bow of the King of Gods, or No Constant Location, or Aware of the Fundamental, or Stopping Increase, or Great Speed, or Always Gladly Giving, or Discerning the Way, or Banner of Victory; there are a million billion such names, letting beings know and see in various ways. 
“Above this world Endurance is a world called Shaking Sound: there the Buddha may be called Banner of Courage, or Infinite Treasure, or Glad Magnanimity, or Celestial Light, or Appearance of Good Omen, or Transcending Objects, or Master of All, or Nonregressing Wheel, or Beyond All Evil, or Omniscient; there are a million billion such names, letting beings know and see in various ways. 
“As in this world Endurance, so in the eastern direction, in hundreds of thousands of billions, countlessly, innumerably, boundlessly, incomparably, incalculably, unrecountably, unthinkably, immeasurably, unspeakably many worlds, throughout the entire space of the cosmos, the names and epithets of the Buddhas are variously different; the same is true of the South, West, and North, the four intermediate directions, and the zenith and the nadir. 
Just as when the Buddha was an enlightening being, by means of various discussions, various speeches, various words, various actions, various consequences, various situations, various techniques, various faculties, various beliefs, and various stations, attained maturity, so he causes sentient beings to perceive in this way, teaching them thus.” The Four Holy Truths “The holy truth of the the accumulation of suffering, in this world Endurance, may be called bondage, or disintegration, or attachment to goods, or false consciousness, or pursuit and involvement, or conviction, or the web, or fancified conceptualizing, or following, or awry faculties. 
“The holy truth of the extinction of suffering, in this world Endurance, may be called noncontention, or freedom from defilement, or tranquility and dispassion, or signlessness, or deathlessness, or absence of inherent nature, or absence of hindrance, or extinction, or essential reality, or abiding in one’s own essence. 
“The holy truth of the path to the extinction of suffering, in this world Endurance, may be called the one vehicle, or progress toward serenity, or guidance, or ultimate freedom from discrimination, or equanimity, or putting down the burden, or having no object of pursuit, or following the intent of the saint, or the practice of sages, or ten treasuries. 
“In this world there are four quadrillion such names to express the four holy truths in accord with the mentalities of sentient beings, to cause them all to be harmonized and pacified. 
“What in this world is called the holy truth of suffering is, in that world Secret Teaching, called the sense of striving and seeking, or not being emancipated, or the root of bondage, or doing what shouldn’t be done, or contending and struggling in all manner of situations, or total lack of power to analyze, or being depended on, or extreme pain, or hyperactivity, or things with form. 
What is called the holy truth of the accumulation of suffering is, in that world Secret Teaching, called following birth and death, or habitual attachment, or burning, or continuous revolving, or corrupt senses, or continuing existences, or evil behavior, or emotional attachment, or the source of illness or categorization. 
What is called the holy truth of the extinction of suffering is, in that world Secret Teaching, also called the ultimate truth, or emancipation, or praiseworthy, or peace, or the place good to enter, or docility, or singleness, or faultlessness, or freedom from greed, or resolution. 
What is called the holy truth of the path to extinction of suffering is, in that world Secret Teaching, also called bold generalship, or superior action, or transcendence, or having skill in means, or impartial eye, or detachment from extremes, or comprehensive understanding, or inclusion, or supreme eye, or contemplating the four truths. 
In the world Secret Teaching, there are four quadrillion such names to explain the four holy truths, to cause sentient beings to be harmonized and pacified according to their mentalities. 
“What is, in this world Endurance, called the holy truth of suffering, is, in the world Abundance, also called fear, or individual mortality, or disgusting, or what should be worked on, or change, or ensnaring enemy, or deceptive usurper, or hard to work with, or false discrimination, or possessor of power. 
What is called the holy truth of the accumulation of suffering is, in that world Abundance, called corruption, or ignorance, or great enemy, or sharp blade, or taste of destruction or revenge, or not one’s own thing, or bad guidance, or increasing darkness, or ruining goodness. 
What is called the holy truth of the extinction of suffering is, in that world Abundance, called great meaning, or benefit, or goal of goals, or infinity, or what should be seen, or detachment from discrimination, or supreme pacification, or constant equanimity, or worthy of living together, or nonfabrication. 
What is called the holy truth of the path to extinction of suffering is, in that world Abundance, called able to burn up, or the highest class, or certitude, or unbreakable, or profound techniques, or emancipation, or not mean or base, or mastery, or essence of liberation, or capable of setting free. 
In that world Abundance there are four quadrillion such names to explain the tour holy truths, to cause sentient beings to be harmonized and pacified according to their mentalities. 
“What is, in this world Endurance, called the holy truth of suffering, is, in the world Undefiled, also called regret, or dependency, or aggravation, or dwelling within walls, or one flavor, or untruth, or living at home, or abode of deluded attachment, or false views, or innumerable. 
What is called the holy truth of the accumulation of suffering is, in the world Undefiled, also called no real thing, or only having words, or not pure, or place of birth, or grasping, or baseness, or increase, or heavy burden, or producer, or roughness. 
What is called the holy truth of the extinction of suffering is, in the world Undefiled, also called incomparable, or thoroughly cleared, or removal of defilement, or supreme faculties, or harmony, or independence, or extinction of confusion, or most excellent, or the ultimate, or breaking the seal. 
What is called the holy truth of the path to the extinction of suffering is, in that world Undefiled, called something indestructible, or the part of appropriate means, or the basis of liberation, or reality of basic nature, or the blameless, or the most pure, or the boundary of all existences, or maintaining what is received complete, or producing the ultimate, or pure discernment. 
In the world Undefiled there are four quadrillion such names to explain the four holy truths, to cause all sentient beings to be harmonized and pacified according to their mentalities. 
“What is, in this world Endurance, called the holy truth of suffering, is, in the world Rich Pleasure, also called the place of emotional attachment, or root of danger and harm, or the sectors of the ocean of existence, or made by accumulation, or discriminating senses, or aggravation, or origination and destruction, or hindrance, or base of sword blades, or made of sets. 
What is called the holy truth of the accumulation of suffering is, in the world Rich Pleasure, called detestable, or names, or endless, or different sets, or not to be loved, or able to grab and bite, or crude things, or emotional attachment, or receptacle, or stirring. 
What is called the holy truth of the extinction of suffering is, in that world Rich Pleasure, called end of continuation, or revelation, or no label, or nothing to practice, or no object of vision, or nondoing, or extinction, or already burnt out, or casting off the heavy burden, or purged. 
What is called the holy truth of the path to extinction of suffering is, in that world Rich Pleasure, called serene action, or emancipating action, or diligent practice and experience, or gone to tranquility, or infinite life, or comprehensive knowledge, or the ultimate path, or difficult to practice, or reaching the other shore, or invincible. 
In the world Rich Pleasure there are four quadrillion such names to explain the four holy truths, to cause all sentient beings to be harmonized and pacified according to their mentalities. 
“What is in this world Endurance, called the holy truth of suffering, is, in the world Inclusion, also called able to plunder and usurp, or not a good friend, or full of fear, or various fancies, or the nature of hell, or untruth, or the burden of covetousness, or roots of deep gravity, or changing with moods, or fundamental vanity. 
What is called the holy truth of the accumulation of suffering is called, in that world Inclusion, greedy attachment, or wrong accomplishment, or the evil of excess, or nothing that can be explained, or nothing that can be apprehended, or continuous revolving in circles. 
What is called the holy truth of the extinction of suffering is, in the world Inclusion, called nonregression, or beyond speech, or formlessness, or enjoyable, or stability, or supreme wonder, or freedom from folly, or extinction, or detachment from evil, or escape. 
What is called the holy truth of the path to extinction of suffering is, in the world Inclusion, called beyond words, or noncontention, or teaching and guidance, or good dedication, or great skill, or a variety of techniques, or spacelike, or serene action, or supreme knowledge, or ability to understand truth. 
In the world Inclusion there are four quadrillion such names to explain the four holy truths, to cause sentient beings to be harmonized and pacified according to their mentalities. 
“What is, in this world Endurance, called the holy truth of suffering, is, in the world Beneficial, also called the heavy burden, or instability, or like a robber, or aging and death, or made of craving, or transmigration, or fatigue, or bad condition, or growth, or the sharp blade. 
What is called the holy truth of the accumulation of suffering is, in the world Beneficial, called decay, or confusion, or regression, or powerlessness, or loss, or opposition, or disharmony, or doing, or grasping, or wishing. 
What is called the holy truth of the extinction of suffering is, in the world Beneficial, also called escape from prison, or real truth, or freedom from troubles, or protection, or detachment from ill, or docility, or the fundamental, or abandoning the cause, or nonstriving, or noncontinuation. 
What is called the holy truth of the path to the extinction of suffering is, in that world Beneficial, also called arriving at nonexistence, or the seal of the totality, or the treasury of meditation, or attainment of light, or the nonregressive state, or ability to put an end to being, or the wide great road, or ability to tame, or having peace and security, or nonroutinized faculties. 
In the world Beneficial there are four quadrillion such names to explain the four holy truths, to cause sentient beings to be harmonized and pacified according to their mentalities. 
“What is, in this world Endurance, called the holy truth of suffering, is, in the world Rarefied, also called dangerous desires, or place of bondage, or misguided action, or receptivity, or shamelessness, or rooted in greed, or the ever-flowing river, or constant disintegration, or of the nature of torch fire, or full of stress and anxiety. 
What is called the holy truth of the accumulation of suffering is, in that world, called broad ground, or tendency, or distance from wisdom, or obstruction, or fear, or laxity, or taking in, or attachment, or ignorance being master of the house, or continuous bonds. 
What is called the holy truth of the extinction of suffering is, in that world, also called fulfillment, or immortality, or selflessness, or absence of inherent nature, or end of discrimination, or abode of peace and happiness, or infinitude, or cutting off transmigration, or cutting off compulsive mental activity, or nonduality. 
What is called the holy truth of the path to extinction of suffering is, in that world, also called great light, or ocean of explanation, or analyzing meaning, or the way of harmony, or freedom from attachment, or breaking the continuum, or the broad highway, or the basis of impartiality, or pure methods, or supreme insight. 
In that world Rarefied are four quadrillion such names to explain the four holy truths, to cause sentient beings to be harmonized and pacified according to their mentalities. 
“What is, in this world Endurance, called the holy truth of suffering, is, in the world Joy, called continuous revolving, or birth, or loss of benefit, or habitual attachment, or the heavy load, or discrimination, or inward danger, or gathering, or wrong abode, or of the nature of misery and affliction. 
What is called the holy truth of the accumulation of suffering is, in that world, also called the ground, or conveniences, or wrong timing, or untruth, or bottomless, or possessiveness, or departure from morality, or afflictions, or narrow views, or accumulation of defilement. 
What is called the holy truth of the extinction of suffering is, in that world, called destroying dependency, or not indulging, or truth, or equality, or purity, or freedom from sickness, or undistorted, or formless, or free, or birthless. 
What is called the holy truth of the path to extinction of suffering is, in that world, called entering the supreme realm, or cutting off accumulation, or transcending comparison, or vast nature, or end of discrimination, or the path of spiritual power, or multitude of appropriate techniques, or practice of right mindfulness, or the ever quiet road, or embracing liberation. 
In that world Joy there are four quadrillion such names to explain the four holy truths, to cause beings to be harmonized and pacified according to their mentalities. 
“What is, in this world Endurance, called the holy truth of suffering, is, in the world Door Bolt, also called decaying form, or like a broken vessel, or the product of ego, or embodiment of various tendencies, or numerous routines, or the gate of the multitude of ills, or inherent pain, or that which should be abandoned, or flavorlessness, or coming and going. 
What is called the holy truth of the accumulation of suffering is in that world called activity, or the poison of anger, or conglomeration, or sensation, or selfishness, or mixed poison, or empty names, or opposition, or imitation, or astonishment. 
What is called the holy truth of the extinction of suffering is in that world called no accumulation, or ungraspable, or wonder medicine, or incorruptible, or nonattachment, or immeasurable, or vast, or the sphere of awakening, or freedom from addiction, or absence of obstruction. 
What is called the holy truth of the path to extinction of suffering is in that world called peaceful action, or detachment from craving, or ultimate reality, or entry into truth, or the essential ultimate, or manifestation of purity, or concentration, or heading for liberation, or salvation, or supreme action. 
In that world Door Bolt there are four quadrillion such names to express the four holy truths, to cause sentient beings to be harmonized and pacified according to their mentalities. 
“What is, in this world Endurance, called the holy truth of suffering, is, in the world Shaking Sound, also called hidden sickness, or the mundane, or the dwelling place, or conceit, or the nature of habitual attachment, or the torrent, or unenjoyable, or hypocrisy, or the evanescent, or difficult to control. 
What is called the holy truth of the accumulation of suffering is in that world called that which must be controlled, or mental tendencies, or that which binds, or arising in every thought, or extending to the future, or combination, or discrimination, or the gateway, or blown by the wind, or concealment. 
What is called the holy truth of the extinction of suffering is in that world called no reliance, or ungraspable, or returning, or freedom from conflict or small, or great, or pure, or inexhaustible, or broad, or priceless. 
What is called the holy truth of the path to extinction of suffering is in that world called analytic observation, or ability to destroy the enemy, or seal of knowledge, or ability to enter the essence, or unopposable, or limitless meaning, or able to enter knowledge, or the path of harmony, or eternal imperturbability, or the highest truth. 
In that world Shaking Sound there are four quadrillion such names to explain the four holy truths, to cause sentient beings to be harmonized and pacified according to their mentalities. 
“Just as in this world Endurance there are four quadrillion names to express the four holy truths, so in all the worlds to the east—hundreds of thousands of billions, countlessly, innumerably, boundlessly, imcomparably, incalculably, unspeakably, inconceivably, immeasurably, inexplicably many worlds, in each there are an equal number of names to express the four holy truths, to cause the sentient beings there to all be harmonized and pacified in accordance with their mentalities. 
And just as this is so of the worlds to the east, so it is with all the infinite worlds in the ten directions.” Awakening by Light As in this place the Buddha, the World Honored One, was seen sitting on a lotus bank lion throne, surrounded by as many enlightening beings as atoms in ten buddha-lands, so also sat the hundred billion Buddhas in a hundred billion continents. 
In each case, because of the spiritual force of the Buddhas, in each of the ten directions was a great enlightening being, each with a company of as many enlightening beings as atoms in ten buddha-lands, who came to the Buddha. 
Their names were Manjushri, Chief of the Awakened, Chief in Riches of Truth, Chief of the Precious, Chief of the Virtuous, Chief in Vision, Chief in Effort, Chief in Doctrine, Chief in Knowledge, and Chief in Goodness. 
The lands from whence these enlightening beings came were respectively called Golden World, Sublime Color World, Lotus Color World, Saffron Flower Color World, Blue Lotus Color World, Gold Color World, Jewel Color World, Diamond Color World, Crystal Color World, and Equal Color World. 
These enlightening beings had each cultivated pure practice in the company of Buddhas—the Buddha of Immutable Knowledge, the Buddha of Unhindered Knowledge, the Buddha of Knowledge of Liberation, the Buddha of Knowledge of Dignified Conduct, the Buddha of Knowledge of Characteristics, the Buddha of Ultimate Knowledge, the Buddha of Supreme Knowledge the Buddha of Independent Knowledge, the Buddha of Pure Knowledge, and the Buddha of Observing Knowledge. 
Then the Manjushris in all places, in the presence of each of the Buddhas, spoke up simultaneously and said in verse, If any see the Truly Awake As becoming liberated and divorced from taints And not attached to any world, They have not realized the eye of the Way. 
If any know the Buddha’s Substance and form have no existence, And by cultivation gain clear understanding, Such people will soon be Buddhas. 
Who can see this world Unstirred in mind, And likewise Buddha’s body, Will attain supreme knowledge. 
If, regarding the Buddha and truth, One understands that they are equal, Having no thought of duality, One will walk on the inconceivable plane. 
If one sees the Buddha and oneself Resting in equality, Without abode, entering nowhere, One will become one of the Rare. 
Form and feeling have no sets: Nor do conception, action, consciousness; Any who can know this way Will become great sages. 
Whether mundane or transmundane views, Having risen beyond them all While well able to know the truth, One will become a great illuminate. 
If, toward omniscience, One engenders dedication, Seeing mind without origination, One will gain the greatest name. 
Living beings have no birth, Nor either any decay; If one attains such knowledge as this, One will realize the unexcelled way. 
In one understanding infinity, Within infinity, one: Realizing their origin’s interdependent One will attain to fearlessness. 
Then the light beams passed this world and illuminated ten lands in the eastern direction, also doing likewise in the South, West, North, the four intermediate directions, and the zenith and nadir. 
In all of those worlds were a hundred billion continents called Jambudvipa, and so on, including a hundred billion heavens of the ultimate of form—everything in all those realms was clearly revealed. 
In each of the Jambudvipa continents the Buddha was seen sitting on a lotus bank lion throne surrounded by as many enlightening beings as atoms in ten buddha-lands; and in each one, due to the spiritual force of the Buddha, ten great enlightening beings from the ten directions, each accompanied by as many enlightening beings as atoms in ten buddha-lands, came to the Buddha; those enlightening beings were called Manjushri, etc., the lands they came from were called Golden, etc., and the Buddhas they served were called Immutable Knowledge, etc. 
Then the Manjushris in all those places, each in the presence of the Buddha in that place, all simultaneously spoke out, saying these verses: Sentient beings lack wisdom, Wounded and poisoned by the thorns of craving; For their sake we seek enlightenment: Such is the law of all Buddhas. 
Seeing all things, Giving up extremes, Once enlightened, never regressing, They turn the incomparable wheel of truth. 
For inconceivable eons Cultivating various practices vigorously In order to liberate beings: This is the power of the great sages. 
The Guide conquers demons Bravely and invincibly, Preaching subtle truths in his light Because of kind compassion. 
By knowledge and wisdom Breaking the barriers of afflictions, In an instant seeing all: This is the spiritual power of Buddhas. 
Beating the drum of the great teaching, Awakening all lands in the ten directions, Making all turn toward enlightenment: Independent power can act like this. 
Without breaking the infinite boundaries, Traveling through the billions of lands Without attachment to any existent: Such is freedom like the Buddhas’. 
The Buddhas are like space, Ultimately forever pure; Those who rejoice in remembering this Will fulfill all of their vows. 
In each and every one of the hells They pass innumerable eons; In order to liberate sentient beings They’re able to bear these pains. 
Without begrudging body or life, Always preserving the Buddhas’ teachings, With egoless mind harmonious, One can attain the enlightened way. 
Then the light beams passed ten worlds and illuminated a hundred lands in the eastern direction, also doing likewise in every other direction. 
In all of those worlds were a hundred billion continents called Jambudvipa, and so on, including a hundred billion heavens of the ultimate of form—everything in all those realms was clearly revealed. 
In each of the Jambudvipa continents the Buddha was seen sitting on a lotus bank lion throne surrounded by as many enlightening beings as atoms in ten buddha-lands; and in each one, due to the spiritual force of the Buddha, ten great enlightening beings, from the ten directions, each accompanied by as many enlightening beings as atoms in ten buddha-lands, came to the Buddha; those enlightening beings were called Manjushri, etc., the lands they came from were called Golden, etc., and the Buddhas they served were called Immutable Knowledge, etc. 
Then the Manjushris in all those places, each in the presence of the Buddha in that place, all simultaneously spoke out, saying these verses: Buddha understands things are like phantoms; Comprehending, he is unhindered. His mind is pure and free from attachments; He harmonizes and pacifies all beings. 
Some see him first born, His color like a mountain of gold; Living in his final body, He’s forever a moon of humanity. 
Some see him walking around, Replete with boundless virtues; Attention and intellect well employed, The Great Man walks like a lion. 
Some see his violet eyes Gazing in the ten directions; Sometimes he shows a smile, To accommodate beings’ wishes. Some see his lion roar, His supreme, incomparable body Manifesting his last incarnation, Speaking naught but the truth. 
Some see him leaving home, Shedding all bonds, Practicing the acts of Buddhas, Always contemplating extinction. 
Some see him sitting on the enlightenment site Awakening knowledge of all things, Reaching the other shore of all virtues, Darkness and affliction ended. 
Some see the supreme man Full of great compassion Turning the wheel of teaching Liberating numberless beings. Some see the lion roar, Its awesome light unique, Transcending all the worlds With peerless mystic power. 
Some see the mind at peace, Like a lamp gone out forever; Variously manifesting spiritual mastery, The ten-powered one can be like this. 
Then the light beams passed a hundred worlds and illumined a thousand worlds in each of the ten directions. 
In all of those worlds were a hundred billion continents called Jambudvipa, and soon, including a hundred billion heavens of the ultimate of form—everything in all those realms was clearly revealed. 
In each one of the Jambudvipa continents the Buddha was seen sitting on a lotus bank lion throne surrounded by as many enlightening beings as atoms in ten buddha-lands; and in each one, due to the spiritual force of the Buddha, ten great enlightening beings from the ten directions, each accompanied by as many enlightening beings as atoms in ten buddha-lands, came to the Buddha, those enlightening beings were also called Manjushri, etc., the lands they came from were also called Golden, etc., and the Buddhas they served were also called Immutable Knowledge, etc. 
Then the Manjushris in all those places, simultaneously spoke up, saying these verses: The Buddha comprehends, without peer, The exceedingly profound truth; Sentient beings cannot understand, So he reveals it step-by-step. 
The nature of self has never existed, And possessions of self are also nil; So how come the enlightened ones Are able to have their bodies? 
The liberated ones, with knowledge and conduct, Are beyond category or compare; All the logic and reasoning of the world Cannot find any fault in them. 
The Buddhas are not worldly clusters, Elements, senses, born and dying things; Phenomenal sets cannot produce them: Thus they’re called human lions. 
Their nature is fundamentally empty and inactive, They’re liberated within and without; Detached from all delusive ideas: Such is the peerless state. 
Their substance and nature never moves, Selfless, no coming or going; Yet they can awaken the worlds, Pacifying all, without bound. 
They always enjoy contemplating extinction, Uniform, without duality; Their minds do not increase or decrease, Yet manifest boundless powers. 
They do not do the deeds That cause results for sentient beings, Yet can understand unhindered: 
Such is the enlightened way. All kinds of living beings Transmigrate through all realms; Buddhas, not discriminating, Liberate the boundless kinds. 
The Buddhas’ golden color Is not existent, yet pervades all existences; According to the inclinations of beings, They teach them ultimate peace. 
Then the light beams passed a thousand worlds and illumined ten thousand worlds in all directions; in all of those worlds were a hundred billion continents called Jambudvipa, and so on, including a hundred billion heavens of the ultimate of form—everything in all those realms was clearly revealed. 
In each one of the Jambudvipa continents the Buddha was seen sitting on a lotus bank lion throne surrounded by as many enlightening beings as atoms in ten buddha-lands; and in each one, due to the spiritual force of the Buddha, a great enlightening being from each of the ten directions, each accompanied by as many enlightening beings as atoms in ten buddha-lands, came to the Buddha; those enlightening beings were also called Manjushri, etc., the lands they came from were also called Golden, etc., and the Buddhas they served were also called Immutable Knowledge, etc. 
Then the Manjushris in all those places, each in the presence of the Buddha in that place, all simultaneously spoke out, saying these verses: Developing great compassion To save and protect all sentient beings, Forever leaving human and celestial realms: 
This is what work should be done. Always with faith in the Buddha, The mind never regressing, Associating with the enlightened ones: This is what work should be done. 
Intent on the virtues of buddhahood, The will never receding, Abiding in pure cool wisdom: This is what work should be done. 
In all manner of activities, Always remembering the Buddhas’ virtues, Without ever a lapse day or night: 
This is what work should be done. Observing the boundless past, present, and future, Studying enlightened virtues Without ever tiring of it: This is what work should be done. 
Observing the real characteristics of the body, All being void and nil, Detaching from self, with no egotism: This is what work should be done. 
A mind seeing beings as equal, Not creating discrimination, Entering the realm of real truth: 
This is what work should be done. Lifting up boundless worlds, Drinking up all the oceans: This power of knowledge of psychic attainment Is the kind of work that should be done. 
Contemplating the various lands, Their material and immaterial aspects, Able to know them all: 
This is what work should be done. The atoms of all lands everywhere Are, each and every one, a Buddha; To be able to know their number: 
This is what work should be done. Then the light beams passed ten thousand worlds and illuminated a hundred thousand worlds in all directions. 
In all of those worlds were a hundred billion continents called Jambudvipa, and so on, including a hundred billion heavens of the ultimate of form—everything in all those realms was clearly revealed. 
In each of the Jambudvipa continents the Buddha was seen sitting on a lotus bank lion throne surrounded by as many enlightening beings as atoms in ten buddha-lands; and in each one, due to the spiritual force of the Buddha, a great enlightening being from each of the ten directions, each accompanied by as many enlightening beings as atoms in ten buddha-lands, came to the Buddha; those enlightening beings were called Manjushri, etc., the lands they came from were called Golden, etc., and the Buddhas they served were called Immutable Knowledge, etc. 
Then the Manjushris in all those places, each in the presence of the Buddha in that place, all simultaneously spoke out, saying these verses: If one sees the Human Tamer In terms of form or family, These are diseased eyes, perverted views: They can’t know the supreme truth. 
The various formal characteristics of the Buddha Cannot be assessed by any being; Though billions and trillions together calculate, Those features and virtues are yet more boundless. The Buddha does not have forms as substance: It’s just the formless, quiescent state: 
Yet the physical forms and dignities are complete, Seen by worldlings in accord with their wishes. 
The Buddhas’ reality is subtle and hard to fathom; No words or speech can reach it. It is not compounded or uncompounded; Its essential nature is void and formless. Buddha’s body is unborn, beyond imagination; It is not a cluster of diverse elements. 
Having the power of freedom and certain insight, He travels the fearless, inexpressible path. 
Body and mind equanimous, Liberated within and without, Abiding forever in true awareness, He has no attachment, no bondage. 
The illumined one whose mind is pure Acts without habituation; With the eye of knowledge reaching everywhere He greatly aids living beings. 
One body is infinite, And the infinite too are one; Understanding all the worlds, He manifests forms everywhere. 
This body comes from nowhere And accumulates nothing either; It is due to beings’ discrimination That they see various bodies of Buddha. 
Mind discriminates worlds, But that mind has no existence; The enlightened know this truth, And thus see the Buddha-body. 
Then the light beams passed a hundred thousand worlds and illumined a million worlds, in each of the ten directions. 
In all of those worlds with a hundred billion continents called Jambudvipa, and so on, including a hundred billion heavens of the ultimate of form—everything in all those realms was clearly revealed. 
In each of the Jambudvipa continents the Buddha was seen sitting on a lotus bank lion throne surrounded by as many enlightening beings as atoms in ten buddha-lands; and in each one, due to the spiritual force of the Buddha, ten great enlightening beings from the ten directions, each accompanied by as many enlightening beings as atoms in ten buddha-lands, came to the Buddha; those enlightening beings were called Manjushri, etc., the lands they came from were called Golden, etc., and the Buddhas they served were called Immutable Knowledge, etc. 
Then the Manjushris in all those places, each in the presence of the Buddha in that place, all simultaneously spoke out, saying these verses: The enlightened one most free, Transcending the world, relying on nothing, Replete with all virtues, Liberates creatures from all states of being. 
Unaffected, unattached, Without conceptions, resting nowhere, Substance and essence immeasurable: 
Those who see all praise. Light pervasive, clear and pure, Clearing away mundane afflictions, Immutable, beyond extremes: This is enlightened knowledge. 
Any who see the enlightened Free from discrimination in body and mind Will have no more doubts or hesitation In regard to anything. 
In all worlds, everywhere Turning the wheel of teaching, Natureless, with nothing turned, The Guide expounds expedients. 
Having no doubt as to truth, Forever ending mental fabrication, Not producing a discriminating mind: This is awareness of enlightenment. 
Comprehending different things, Not sticking to verbal explanations, With no “one” or “manifold”: This is following Buddha’s teaching. 
In many there’s no oneness; Neither has one plurality: Abandoning both of these, Comprehensively enter the qualities of buddhahood. 
Sentient beings and their lands Are all completely null; With no reliance or discrimination One can enter Buddha’s enlightenment. 
Of sentient beings and lands Unity or difference cannot be found; Insightfully seeing like this Is called knowing the meaning of Buddha’s teaching. 
Then the light beams passed a million worlds and illuminated a billion worlds in each of the ten directions. 
In all of those worlds were a hundred billion continents called Jambudvipa, and so on, including a hundred billion heavens of the ultimate of form—everything in all those realms was clearly revealed. 
In each of the Jambudvipa continents the Buddha was seen sitting on a lotus bank lion throne surrounded by as many enlightening beings as atoms in ten buddha-lands; and in each one, due to the spiritual force of the Buddha, a great enlightening being from each of the ten directions, each accompanied by as many enlightening beings as atoms in ten buddha-lands, came to the Buddha; those great enlightening beings were called Manjushri, etc., the lands they came from were called Golden, etc., and the Buddhas they served were called Immutable Knowledge, etc. 
Then the Manjushris in all those places, each in the presence of the Buddha in that place, all simultaneously spoke out, saying these verses: Wisdom peerless, teaching boundless, Gone beyond the sea of existences, reaching the other shore, Life span and radiance without compare: This is the power of the Virtuous One’s skill. 
Clearly understanding all the Buddhas’ teachings, Always observing all times tirelessly, Even when perceiving objects, not discriminating: This is the power of the Inconceivable One’s skill. 
Contemplating sentient beings without any concept thereof, Observing all existences without such ideas, Always abiding in meditative stillness yet not binding the mind: This is the power of skill of unhindered wisdom. 
Skillfully comprehending all things, With right mindfulness diligently cultivating the path of nirvana, Enjoying liberation, divorcing partiality: This is the power of skill of the peaceful, dispassionate one. 
If any can exhort to complete enlightenment, Heading for all-knowledge of the cosmos, And influence beings to enter into truth: This is the power of skill of dwelling in the Buddha-mind. 
Able to enter into all truths the Buddhas teach With vast knowledge and wisdom unobstructed, Able to arrive at every destination: This is the power of skill of cultivation of freedom. 
Always abiding in nirvana, like empty space, Able to transform and appear anywhere at will: 
Day and night, day and month, year and era, The signs of the beginning and end, formation and disintegration of the worlds: Remembering and thoroughly knowing these Is the power of skill of knowledge of measures of time. 
All living beings have birth and death; Material and immaterial, thinking or unthinking: Knowing all the various names Is the power of skill of abiding in the inconceivable. 
Of past, present, and future times, Understanding all that’s said, Yet knowing all times are equal: 
This is the power of skill of incomparable understanding. Then the light beams passed a billion worlds and illuminated ten billion worlds in each of the ten directions. 
In all of those worlds were a hundred billion continents called Jambudvipa, and so on, including a hundred billion heavens of the ultimate of form—everything in all those realms was clearly revealed. 
In each of the Jambudvipa continents the Buddha was seen sitting on a lotus bank lion throne surrounded by as many enlightening beings as atoms in ten buddha-lands; and in each one, due to the spiritual force of the Buddha, ten great enlightening beings from the ten directions, each accompanied by as many enlightening beings as atoms in ten buddha-lands, came to the Buddha; those great enlightening beings were called Manjushri, etc., the lands they came from were called Golden, etc., and the Buddhas they served were called Immutable Knowledge, etc. 
Then the Manjushris in all those places, each in the presence of the Buddha in that place, all simultaneously spoke out, saying these verses: Having cultivated extensive difficult practices, Diligently working day and night, Having crossed the hard to cross, with a lion’s roar, Teaching all beings—this is the practice. 
Sentient beings whirl in the sea of craving and greed, Shrouded by the web of ignorance, terribly oppressed; The Most Benevolent bravely cuts it all away, We vow to also do so—this is the practice. 
Worldlings have no control, attached to sense desires; Falsely discriminating, they suffer myriad pains. Practicing the Buddhas’ teaching, always control the mind, Vowing to cross over this—this is the practice. Sentient beings, attached to self, enter birth and death; Looking for a limit to this, none can be found. Serving all the enlightened to obtain the wondrous teaching, Explain it to others—this is the practice. 
Living beings are helpless, wrapped up in sickness, Forever sunk in evil ways, producing the three poisons, The fierce flames of a great fire always burning them; With a pure heart to rescue them, this is the practice. 
Sentient beings, confused, have lost the right path; Always going the wrong way, they enter the house of darkness. For their sake lighting the lamp of truth, To be a light forever—this is the practice. 
Sentient beings bob and sink in the ocean of existences; Their troubles are boundless, they have no place to rest. To make for them an ark of truth To ferry them over—this is the practice. 
Sentient beings are ignorant and don’t see the fundamental; Confused, foolish, crazed, in the midst of danger and difficulty. Buddhas pity them and set up a bridge of teaching With right awareness, to let them climb—this is the practice. 
Seeing beings on perilous paths, Oppressed by the pains of age, illness, and death, Develop unlimited skill in means And pledge to save them all—this is the practice. 
Hearing the truth, believing without doubt, Comprehending essential emptiness without shock or fear, Appearing in all realms in appropriate forms, Teach all the deluded—this is the practice. 
Then the light beams passed ten billion worlds and illumined in all ten directions a hundred billion worlds, a trillion worlds, a hundred trillion worlds, a quadrillion worlds, a hundred quadrillion worlds, a quintillion worlds, a hundred quintillion worlds; in this way countless, unquantifiable, boundless, imcomparable, uncountable, unaccountable, unthinkable, immeasurable, unspeakable numbers of worlds, to the utmost extent of the realm of space of the cosmos, in all ten directions, were likewise illumined. 
In all of those worlds were a hundred billion continents called Jambudvipa, and so on, including a hundred billion heavens of the ultimate of form—everything in all those realms was clearly revealed. 
In each of the Jambudvipa continents the Buddha was seen sitting on a lotus bank lion throne surrounded by as many enlightening beings as atoms in ten buddha-lands; and in each one, due to the spiritual force of the Buddha, a great enlightening being from each of the ten directions, each accompanied by as many enlightening beings as atoms in ten buddha-lands, came to the Buddha; those great enlightening beings were called Manjushri, etc., the lands they came from were called Golden, etc., and the Buddhas they served were called Immutable Knowledge, etc. 
Then the Manjushris in all those places, each in the presence of the Buddha in that place, all simultaneously spoke out, saying these verses: In one instant observing measureless eons Without going, coming, or dwelling, Thus comprehending the events of past, present, and future, Buddhas transcend expedients and fulfill ten powers. 
With incomparable good repute in all quarters, Forever out of trouble, always rejoicing, They go to all lands To explain such a teaching for all. 
For the benefit of beings, they supported the enlightened, Attaining a comparable result, according to their will; Readily acknowledging all truths, They reveal spiritual powers everywhere. 
From their first offerings to the enlightened their minds were flexible and patient; They entered deep meditative concentration and observed the nature of things. Exhorting all beings to aspire to enlightenment, Through this they speedily attained the unexcelled reward. Who seeks truth everywhere with undivided mind To cultivate virtues to full maturity, Eliminating all duality of being and nonbeing: Such people truly see the Buddha. 
Going to all lands in all directions, Expounding the sublime teaching for the welfare of the many, Abiding in reality without any wavering: Such people’s virtues are the same as Buddha. 
The cycles of wondrous teaching turned by the Buddhas Are all aspects of enlightenment; If one, having heard, can realize the nature of things, Such a person will always see Buddha. 
If one does not see the Ten Powered as empty, phantomlike, Though one sees one sees not, as though blind. Discriminating and grasping forms one does not see Buddha; Having finally divorced attachment, then can one see. 
Sentient beings are variously different, according to their actions; In the ten directions, inside and out, it’s hard to see them all: The Buddha-body’s unhindered, pervading all directions, And cannot be completely seen, in just the same way. 
Like unto the infinite worlds in space, Without coming or going, pervading the ten directions, Becoming and disintegrating having no resting place, So does Buddha pervade space in the same way. 
An Enlightening Being Asks for Clarification Chief of the Awakened answered in verse, saying, Benevolent One, you ask the meaning of this To awaken all the ignorant. 
I will answer according to the essence: Listen clearly, Benevolent One. Phenomena have no function And have no individual nature; Therefore all of them Do not know one another. 
Like the waters in a river, Their rushing flow races past, Each unaware of the others: So it is with all things. 
It’s also like a mass of fire, Blazing flames shoot up at once, Each not knowing the others: Phenomena are also thus. 
Also like a continuous wind Fanning and drumming whatever it hits, Each unaware of the other: So also are all things. 
Also like the various levels of earth, Each based on another, Yet unaware of the others: Thus are all phenomena. 
Eye, ear, nose, tongue, body, Mind, intellect, the faculties of sense: By these one always revolves, Yet there is no one, nothing that revolves. 
The nature of things is fundamentally birthless, Yet they appear to have birth; Herein there is no revealer, And nothing that’s revealed. 
Eye, ear, nose, tongue, body, Mind, intellect, the faculties of sense: All are void and essenceless; The deluded mind conceives them to exist. Seen as they truly are, All are without inherent nature. 
The eye of reality is not conceptual: This seeing is not false. 
Real or unreal, False or not false, Mundane or transmundane: There’s nothing but descriptions. 
Then Manjushri asked Chief in Riches of Truth, “Since all sentient beings are not sentient beings, why does the Buddha appear in their midst for their sake and teach them according to the time, according to their lives, according to their species, according to their actions, according to their understandings, according to their philosophies, according to their inclinations, according to their expedients, according to their thoughts, according to their observations?” Chief in Riches answered him in verse: 
This is the realm of the learned Who delight in ultimate peace. I will explain for you; Now please listen clearly. 
Analyze the body within: Who herein is the “self”? Who can understand this way Will comprehend the existence or not of the self. 
This body is a temporary set-up And has no place of abode; Who understands this body Will have no attachment to it. 
Considering the body carefully, Everything will be clearly seen: Knowing all the elements are unreal, One will not create mental fabrications. 
Based on whom does life arise, And based on whom does it disappear? Like a turning wheel of fire, Its beginning and end can’t be known. 
The wise can observe with insight The impermanence of all existents; All things are empty and selfless, Forever apart from all signs. 
All consequences are born from actions; Like dreams, they’re not truly real. From moment to moment they continually die away, The same as before and after. 
Of all things seen in the world Only mind is the host; By grasping forms according to interpretation It becomes deluded, not true to reality. 
All philosophies in the world Are mental fabrications; There has never been a single doctrine By which one could enter the true essence of things. 
By the power of perceiver and perceived All kinds of things are born; They soon pass away, not staying, Dying out instant to instant. 
Then Manjushri asked Chief of the Precious, “All sentient beings equally have four gross physical elements, with no self and nothing pertaining to self—how come there is the experience of pain and pleasure, beauty and ugliness, internal and external goodness, little sensation and much sensation? 
And all this while there is no good or bad in the realm of reality.” Chief of the Precious answered in verse: According to what deeds are done Do their resulting consequences come to be; Yet the doer has no existence: This is the Buddha’s teaching. 
Like a clear mirror, According to what comes before it, Reflecting forms, each different, So is the nature of actions. 
And like a skillful magician Standing at a crossroads Causing many forms to appear, So is the nature of actions. 
Like a mechanical robot Able to utter various sounds, Neither self nor not self: So is the nature of actions. 
And like different species of birds All emerging from eggs, Yet their voices not the same: So is the nature of actions. 
Just as in the womb All organs are developed, Their substance and features coming from nowhere: 
So is the nature of actions. Also like being in hell— The various painful things All come from nowhere: So is the nature of actions. 
Also like the sovereign king With seven supreme treasures— Their provenance cannot be found: So is the nature of actions. 
And as when the various worlds Are burnt by a great conflagration, This fire comes from nowhere: So does the nature of actions. 
Then Manjushri asked Chief of the Virtuous, “Since that which the Buddhas realize is but one truth, how is it that they expound countless teachings, manifest countless lands, edify countless beings, speak in countless languages, appear in countless bodies, know countless minds, demonstrate countless mystic powers, are able to shake countless worlds, display countless extraordinary adornments, reveal boundless different realms of objects, whereas in the essential nature of things these different characteristics cannot be found at all?” Chief of the Virtuous answered in verse: 
The meaning of what you ask Is deep and hard to fathom. The wise are able to know it, Always delighting in Buddha’s virtues. 
Just as the nature of earth is one While beings each live separately, And the earth has no thought of oneness or difference, So is the truth of all Buddhas. 
Just as the nature of fire is one, While able to burn all things And the flames make no distinction, So is the truth of all Buddhas. 
Just as the ocean is one With millions of different waves Yet the water is no different: So is the truth of all Buddhas. 
And as the nature of wind is one While able to blow on all things And wind has no thought of oneness or difference: So is the truth of all Buddhas. 
Also like great thunderheads Raining all over the earth, The raindrops make no distinctions: So is the truth of all Buddhas. 
Just as the element earth, while one, Can produce various sprouts, Yet it’s not that the earth is diverse: So is the truth of all Buddhas. 
Just as the sun without clouds overcast Shines throughout the ten directions, Its light beams having no difference: So is the truth of all Buddhas. 
And just as the moon in the sky Is seen by all in the world Yet the moon doesn’t go to them: So is the truth of all Buddhas. 
Just as the king of the gods Appears throughout the universe Yet his body has no change: So is the truth of all Buddhas. 
Then Manjushri asked the enlightening being Chef in Vision, “Buddhas as fields of blessings are one and the same to all—how is it that when sentient beings give alms to them, the resulting rewards are not the same—various forms, various families, various faculties, various property, various masters, various followers, various official positions, various virtuous qualities, various kinds of knowledge—and yet the Buddhas are impartial toward them, not thinking of them as different?” Chief in Vision answered in verse: 
Just as the earth is one Yet produces sprouts according to the seeds Without partiality toward any of them, So is the Buddhas’ field of blessings. 
And just as water is uniform Yet differs in shape according to the vessel, So is the Buddhas’ field of blessings: It differs only due to beings’ minds. 
And just as a skilled magician Can make people happy, So can the Buddhas’ field of blessings Cause sentient beings joy. 
As a king with wealth and knowledge Can bring gladness to the masses, So can Buddhas’ field of blessings Bring peace and happiness to all. 
Like a clear mirror Reflecting images according to the forms, So from Buddhas’ field of blessings Rewards are obtained according to one’s heart. 
Like a panacea Which can cure all poisoning, So does Buddhas’ field of blessings Annihilate all afflictions. 
And just as when the sun comes up It illuminates the world, Thus does Buddhas’ field of blessings Clear away all darkness. 
Like the clear full moon Shining over the earth, So is Buddhas’ field of blessings Equal in all places. 
Just as a great conflagration Can burn up all things, So does Buddhas’ field of blessings Burn up all fabrication. Just as a violent wind Can cause the earth to tremble, So does Buddhas’ field of blessings Move all living beings. 
Then Manjushri asked Chief in Effort, “The Buddhas’ teaching is one, which all beings can see—why don’t they all immediately cut off all the bonds of afflictions and win emancipation? 
Furthermore, in their clusters of material form, clusters of sensation, conception, coordination-activity, and consciousness, the realms of desire, form, and formlessness, as well as ignorance and craving, they are no different—this is the Buddha’s teaching; why is it of benefit to some and not to others?” chief in Effort answered in verse: 
Listen well and clearly And I will answer truly. Some are quickly freed, And some can hardly escape. If one wishes to eliminate The countless faults and ills, One should work with diligence On the Buddha-teaching. 
For example, a little bit of fire Moisture in the kindling will extinguish; So it is with those who’re lazy About the Buddha-teaching. 
Just as when you drill for fire And stop before the fire appears The heat will immediately disappear: So it is with the indolent. 
When a man with a magnifying glass Doesn’t focus the sun’s rays on anything, Fire can never be obtained: So it is with the lazy. 
Like when the dazzling sun shines A child shuts its eyes And complains “Why can’t I see?”: 
So too are the lazy like this. Like a man lacking hands and feet Wanting to shoot all over the earth With arrows made of reeds: So too are the lazy ones. 
Like using a single hair To take the ocean water Trying to drain the ocean: So also are the slothful. 
Like when the eon fire flares Trying to put it out with a little water: So are those who are lazy About the Buddha’s teaching. 
Like someone who sees space While sitting still, unmoving, And says he is traveling through it: So is the lazy one. 
Then Manjushri asked Chief in Doctrine, “According to what the Buddha says, if any sentient beings accept and hold the true teaching, they can cut off all afflictions. Why then are there those who accept and hold the true teaching and yet do not cut off afflictions, who go along with anger and resentment, go along with jealousy and stinginess, go along with deception and flattery, compelled by the power of these things, having no will to detach from them? 
Listen well and clearly To the true meaning of what you ask. It is not only by much learning That one can enter the Buddhas’ teaching. 
Like a man floating in water Who dies of thirst, afraid of drowning: 
So are those who are learned Who do not apply the teaching. 
Like a person skilled in medicine Who can’t cure his own disease: So are those who are learned But do not apply the teaching. 
Like someone counting others’ treasures Without half a coin of his own: So is the one who is learned Who doesn’t practice the teaching. 
Like one who’s born in a royal palace Yet who freezes and starves: So are those who are learned But do not practice the teaching. 
Like a deaf musician Who pleases others, not hearing himself: So is the one who is learned Who does not apply the teaching. 
Like a blind embroiderer Who shows others but cannot see: So are those who are learned But do not practice the teaching. 
Like a ship’s captain Who dies at sea: So are those who are learned But do not apply the teaching. 
Like someone on a corner Saying all kinds of fine things, While having no real inner virtue: So are those who don’t practice. 
Then Manjushri asked Chief in Knowledge, “In the Buddha teaching, knowledge is chief—so why do the Buddhas, in dealing with people, sometimes praise generosity, sometimes praise self-control, sometimes praise tolerance, sometimes praise effort, sometimes praise meditation, sometimes praise wisdom, or again sometimes praise kindness, compassion, joy, and equanimity, yet all the while there is ultimately but one truth whereby to attain emancipation and realize complete perfect enlightenment?” Chief in Knowledge answered in verse: 
Son of Buddha, most rare Is the ability to know beings’ minds. As for what you ask, Listen well and I’ll explain. 
Of the past, future, And present guides, None expounds just one method To become enlightened. 
Buddhas know beings’ minds, Their natures each different; According to what they need to be freed, Thus do the Buddhas teach. 
To the stingy they praise giving, To the immoral they praise ethics; To the angry they praise tolerance, To the lazy they praise effort. To those with scattered minds they praise meditative concentration, To the ignorant, they praise wisdom; To the inhuman, they praise kindness and sympathy, To the malicious, compassion. To the troubled they praise joy, To the devious they praise equanimity. Thus practicing step-by-step, One gradually fulfills all Buddha teachings. 
It’s like first setting up a foundation Then building the room: Generosity and self-control, like this, Are bases of enlightening beings’ practices. 
Just like building a castle To protect all the people: So are tolerance and effort Protecting enlightening beings. 
And just as a universal monarch Can bestow all felicities: 
So can kindness, compassion, joy and equanimity Give enlightening beings happiness. 
Then Manjushri asked Chief in Goodness, “The Buddhas, the World Honored Ones, attain emancipation by means of one path alone; why then are the things in the Buddha-lands we see now various and not the same? 
That is to say, the worlds, the realms of beings, the teaching and training, the life span and auras of light, the miracles, the congregations, the modes of teaching and doctrinal bases, each have differences, yet all include all the truths of the Buddhas, whereby complete perfect enlightement is attained.” Chief in Goodness answered in verse: 
Manjushri, truth is always thus: 
The Kings of Truth have just one truth. People unhindered by anything, They leave birth and death by one road. All the Buddha bodies Are just one reality-body: One in mind, one in wisdom, The same in power and fearlessness. 
According to their dedications When originally starting out for enlightenment, They developed such lands, Congregations, and teachings. 
The adornments of all buddha-lands Are totally complete; According to differences in beings’ actions They seem to be unalike. 
The buddha-lands and buddha-bodies, The congregations and explanations: Such Buddhist teachings as these No sentient beings can see. 
When their minds are purified And their vows fulfilled, Such illuminated people Then are able to see. 
According to beings’ mental inclinations And the force of the fruits of their deeds, There seem to them to be differences; This is due to Buddhas’ mystic powers. 
Buddha-lands have no discrimination, No hatred and no attachment: But according to beings’ minds They seem to have differences. 
Because of this, in the worlds What is seen is different: This is not the fault Of the enlightened sages. 
In all worlds Those who are fit to receive the teaching Always see the Hero of humanity: Such is the Buddhas’ teaching. 
Then these enlightening beings said to Manjushri, “Son of Buddha, we have each spoken of our understanding. 
We ask you, benevolent one, to use your wonderful powers of elucidation to expound the realm of the enlightened—what is the sphere of the Buddhas, what are the causal bases of the sphere of the Buddhas, what are the methods of liberation in the sphere of the Buddhas, what are the entries into the states of the Buddhas, what is the wisdom in the realm of the Buddhas, what are the laws of the realm of the Buddhas, what are the explanations of the states of the Buddhas, what is the knowledge of the sphere of the Buddhas, what is the realization of the realm of the Buddhas, what are the manifestations of the states of the Buddhas, what is the extent of the sphere of the Buddhas?” Manjushri answered in verse: 
The profound realm of the Buddhas Is equal in extent to space; All beings enter it, Yet really nothing’s entered. 
The sublime causes Of the Buddhas’ profound states Could not be fully told In a billion eons of talk. 
According to beings’ minds and wisdom, Buddhas lead them on and aid them; This is the realm of the Buddhas, Liberating beings this way. 
Able to enter all lands In the world, The body of knowledge is formless And cannot be seen by others. The Buddhas’ knowledge is free, Unhindered in all times; This realm of wisdom Is equanimous as space. 
The realms of beings of the cosmos Ultimately have no distinction; Thoroughly knowing all of them Is the sphere of the enlightened ones. 
All languages and sounds There are in the worlds Buddhas’ knowledge can comprehend Without discrimination. 
Not perceptible to sense consciousness And not the sphere of mind, Its nature fundamentally pure, Buddhas’ knowledge teaches living beings. 
Not action, not affliction, With no thing and no abode, No looking and no object, Their realization’s equanimous throughout the world. 
The minds of all sentient beings In the past, present, and future, The enlightened, in one instant, Can thoroughly comprehend. 
Then all the differences in state, activity, realm, body, faculties, birth, results of keeping precepts, results of breaking precepts, and in resulting lands of all sentient beings in this world Endurance, by the Buddha’s spiritual power all became clearly manifest. In the same way all these various differences of all sentient beings in the infinite worlds throughout the space of the cosmos in all directions were all clearly revealed by the Buddha’s mystic power. 
Purifying Practice Manjushri said to Chief in Knowledge, “Excellent, O Child of Buddha! 
You have asked this out of a desire to benefit many, to bring peace to many, out of pity for the world, to profit and gladden celestial and human beings. 
Child of Buddha, if enlightening beings use their minds properly, they can attain all supreme qualities, can have a mind unhindered in regard to all enlightening teachings, can remain on the Path of the Buddhas of past, present, and future, never leaving it even while living in the midst of sentient beings, can comprehend the characteristics of all things, cut off all evil and fulfill all good. 
They will be physically most excellent, like Universally Good; all of their practical vows they will be able to fulfill, and will be free in all ways, and will be guides for all sentient beings. 
How can they use their minds so as to attain all supreme sublime qualities? 
Enlightening beings at home Should wish that all beings Realize the nature of “home” is empty And escape its pressures. 
While serving their parents, They should wish that all beings Serve the Buddha, Protecting and nourishing everyone. 
While with their spouses and children, They should wish that all beings Be impartial toward everyone And forever give up attachment. 
When attaining desires, They should wish that all beings Pull out the arrow of lust And realize ultimate peace. 
On festive occasions They should wish that all beings Enjoy themselves with truth And realize amusement’s not real. 
If in palace rooms, They should wish that all beings Enter the sanctified state, Forever rid of defiled craving. 
When putting on adornments, They should wish that all beings Give up phony decoration And reach the abode of truth. 
When climbing up in balconies, They should wish that all beings Ascend the tower of truth And see through everything. 
When they give something, They should wish that all beings Be able to relinquish all With hearts free of clinging. 
When in gatherings or crowds, They should wish that all beings Let go of compounded things And attain to total knowledge. 
If in danger and difficulty, They should wish that all beings Be free, Unhindered wherever they go. 
When they give up home life, They should wish that all beings Have no hindrance in leaving home, And that their minds be liberated. 
Entering a monastery They should wish that all beings Expound various principles Of noncontention. 
Going to tutors and teachers, They should wish that all beings Skillfully serve their teachers And practice virtuous ways. 
Seeking initiation, They should wish that all beings Reach the nonregressing state, Their minds without impediment Shedding lay clothing, They should wish that all beings Cultivate roots of goodness And abandon the yoke of transgressions. 
When shaving off their hair, They should wish that all beings Forever divorce all afflictions And pass on to ultimate tranquility. 
Putting on religious garb, They should wish that all beings Be undefiled in mind And fulfill the Way of the Great Sage. 
When they formally leave home, They should wish that all beings Leave home with the Buddha And rescue one and all. 
Taking refuge in the Buddha, They should wish that all beings Continue the lineage of Buddhas, Conceiving the unexcelled aspiration. 
Taking refuge in the Teaching, They should wish that all beings Enter deeply into the scriptures And their wisdom be deep as the sea. 
Taking refuge in the Community, They should wish that all beings Order the masses, All becoming free from obstruction. 
When receiving the learners’ precepts, They should wish that all beings Learn self-control well And not do any wrong. 
Receiving a mentor’s instruction, They should wish that all beings Bear themselves with dignity And that their actions be truthful. 
Receiving a teacher’s guidance, They should wish that all beings Enter the knowledge of birthlessness And reach the state of independence. 
Receiving the full set of precepts, They should wish that all beings Fulfill all means of liberation And master the supreme teaching. 
When entering a hall, They should wish that all beings Ascend to the unexcelled sanctuary And rest there secure, unshakable. 
When setting out a seat, They should wish that all beings Cause good principles to bloom And see their true character. 
Sitting up straight, They should wish that all beings Sit on the seat of enlightenment, Their minds without attachment. 
Sitting cross-legged, They should wish that all beings Have firm and strong roots of goodness And attain the state of immovability. 
Cultivating concentration, They should wish that all beings Conquer their minds by concentration Ultimately, with no remainder. 
When practicing contemplation, They should wish that all beings See truth as it is And be forever free of opposition and contention. 
When uncrossing the legs, They should wish that all beings Observe that all acts and all things Return to dispersal and extinction. 
When lowering the feet and resting, They should wish that all beings Attain liberation of mind, Resting at peace, unstirred. 
When raising the legs, They should wish that all beings Leave the sea of birth and death And fulfill all good qualities. 
When putting on lower garments, They should wish that all beings Wear the foundations of goodness And have a sense of shame and conscience. 
When putting on a belt, They should wish that all beings Bundle roots of goodness And not let them be lost. 
When putting on an outer garment, They should wish that all beings Attain supreme bases of goodness And reach the Other Shore of the teaching. 
Putting on monastic robes, They should wish that all beings Enter the foremost rank And attain imperturbability. 
Taking a toothstick in hand, They should wish that all beings Attain the wonderful teaching And be ultimately pure. 
When chewing on the toothstick, They should wish that all beings Be harmonious and pure in mind, Biting through all afflictions. 
When going to the toilet, They should wish that all beings Reject greed, hatred, and folly, And clean away sinful things. 
When going to wash thereafter, They should wish that all beings Speedily go To the transmundane. 
When washing off the body’s filth, They should wish that all beings Be pure and harmonious And ultimately without defilement. 
When washing the hands with water, They should wish that all beings Have pure clean hands To receive and hold Buddha’s teaching. 
When washing the face with water, They should wish that all beings Attain the pure teaching And be forever free from defilement. 
Picking up a staff, They should wish that all beings Establish great works of charity And point out the road of truth. 
Taking up a bowl, They should wish that all beings Perfect the vessel of truth And receive human and divine support. 
Setting out on a road, They should wish that all beings Go where the Buddha goes, Into the realm of nonreliance. 
When on the road, They should wish that all beings Tread the pure realm of reality, Their minds without obstruction. 
Seeing a road uphill, They should wish that all beings Forever leave the world, Their minds free from weakness. 
Seeing a road downhill, They should wish that all beings Be humble in mind And develop enlightened bases of virtue. 
Seeing a winding road, They should wish that all beings Abandon false paths And forever purge wrong views. 
Seeing a straight road, They should wish that all beings Be straight and true in mind, Without flattery or deceit. 
Seeing a dusty road, They should wish that all beings Get rid of dust and dirt And attain the state of purity. 
Seeing a dust-free road, They should wish that all beings Always practice great compassion, Their hearts refreshing and nourishing. 
Seeing a dangerous road, They should wish that all beings Abide in the realm of truth And avoid the troubles of wrongdoing. 
Seeing a group of people, They should wish that all beings Expound the most profound teaching, That all be harmoniously united. 
If they see a big tree, They should wish that all beings Divorce egotistic contentiousness And be free of anger and resentment. 
If they see a grove, The should wish that all beings Be worthy of the respect Of celestials and humans. 
If they see high mountains, They should wish that all beings’ Roots of goodness stand out, Their peak beyond anyone’s reach. 
If they see thorny trees, They should wish that all beings May quickly cut away The thorns of the three poisons. 
Seeing trees with luxuriant foliage, They should wish that all beings Make a canopy of light With stability and liberation. 
If they see flowers blooming, They should wish that all beings’ Mystic spiritual powers Be like blossoming flowers. 
If they see blossoms on trees, They should wish that all beings’ Features be like flowers, With all marks of distinction. If they see fruits, They should wish that all beings Attain the supreme teaching And realize the way of enlightenment. 
If they see a big river, They should wish that all beings Gain entry into the stream of truth And enter the ocean of Buddha-knowledge. 
If they see a reservoir, They should wish that all beings Quickly awaken to The truth of the oneness of the Buddhas. 
If they see a pond, They should wish that all beings Be fully accomplished in speech And be skillful in preaching. 
If they see a well, They should wish that all beings Have full powers of elucidation To explain all things. 
If they see a spring, They should wish that all beings’ Skill in means increases And their good roots be inexhaustible. 
If they see a bridge, They should wish that all beings Carry all across to freedom Like a bridge. If they see flowing water, They should wish that all beings Develop wholesome will And wash away the stains of delusion. 
Seeing a garden cultivated They should wish that all beings In the garden of sense desires Clear away the weeds of craving. 
Seeing a forest of “sorrowless” trees They should wish that all beings Forever divorce greed and lust And not produce anxiety and fear. 
If they see a park, They should wish that all beings Diligently cultivate the practices Leading to Buddhas’ enlightenment. 
Seeing people wearing ornaments They should wish that all beings Be adorned with a Buddha’s Thirty-two marks of distinction. 
Seeing the unadorned They should wish that all beings Give up decorations And practice austerity. 
Seeing people attached to pleasure They should wish that all beings Delight themselves with truth, Not abandoning love for it. 
Seeing the unattached They should wish that all beings Have no care in their minds For fabricated things. 
Seeing happy people They should wish that all beings Always be peaceful and happy, Gladly supporting the Buddhas. 
Seeing people suffer They should wish that all beings Attain fundamental knowledge And eliminate all misery. 
Seeing people with no maladies They should wish that all beings Enter true wisdom And never have sickness or afflictions. 
Seeing people sick They should wish that all beings Know the body is empty and null And divorce opposition and conflict. 
Seeing handsome people They should wish that all beings Always have pure faith In the enlightened and enlightening ones. 
Seeing ugly people They should wish that all beings Not become attached To anything not good. 
Seeing grateful people They should wish that all beings Be able to know the blessings Of the Buddhas and enlightening beings. 
Seeing ungrateful people They should wish that all beings Not increase the punishment Of those who are bad. 
If they see mendicants, They should wish that all beings Be harmonious and tranquil, Ultimately conquering themselves. 
Seeing brahmins They should wish that all beings Always maintain pure conduct, Getting rid of all evil. 
Seeing ascetics They should wish that all beings By austere practices Reach the ultimate state. 
Seeing self-disciplined people They should wish that all beings Strongly maintain their will in practice And not give up the Buddhas’ path. 
Seeing people wearing armor They should wish that all beings Always wear the armor of virtue, Heading for the teacherless state. 
Seeing the unarmed They should wish that all beings Be forever rid of all Doings that are not good. 
Seeing people debate They should wish that all beings Be able to refute All erroneous doctrines. 
Seeing people of proper livelihood They should wish that all beings Succeed in pure livelihood Without improper behavior. 
If they see a king, They should wish that all beings Become kings of truth, Always expounding the right teaching. 
If they see a prince, They should wish that all beings Be reborn from the truth And be children of Buddha. 
If they see an elder, They should wish that all beings Be able to clearly cut off And not practice evil ways. 
If they see a great minister, They should wish that all beings Always maintain right mindfulness And practice all virtues. 
If they see a castle, They should wish that all beings Gain strong and firm bodies And indefatigable minds. 
If they see a capital, They should wish that all beings Collect all virtuous qualities And always be joyful and blissful. 
Seeing someone in a forest, They should wish that all beings Be worthy of praise and honor Of celestials and humans Entering a village to beg, They should wish that all beings Enter the profound realm of truth, Their minds without impediment. 
Coming to someone’s door, They should wish that all beings Enter into all Doors of Buddha’s teaching. 
Having entered a house, They should wish that all beings Might enter the vehicle of buddhahood Which is equal in all times. 
Seeing someone who doesn’t give They should wish that all beings Never ever give up Supremely virtuous ways. 
Seeing those who give They should wish that all beings Forever abandon The three evil paths and their miseries. 
If they see an empty bowl, They should wish that all beings Be pure of heart And empty of afflictions. 
If they see a full bowl, They should wish that all beings Completely fulfill All virtuous ways. 
If they receive respect, They should wish that all beings Respectfully practice All the Buddha’s teachings. 
If they get no respect, They should wish that all beings Not act in any ways That are not good. 
Seeing people with conscience They should wish that all beings Act with discretion And cover their organs. 
Seeing the shameless They should wish that all beings Give up shamelessness And abide in the way of kindness. 
If they get fine food, They should wish that all beings Should fulfill their aspirations And be free from envy and longing. 
If they get poor food, They should wish that all beings Should not fail to obtain The taste of all meditations. 
Getting soft food They should wish that all beings Be imbued with compassion, Their minds becoming gentle. 
Getting coarse, dry food They should wish that all beings Have no attachments And cut off mundane craving. 
When they eat, They should wish that all beings Feed on the joy of meditation And be sated by delight in truth. 
When tasting flavor, They should wish that all beings Attain the supreme savor of buddhahood And be filled with the elixir of immortality. 
When the meal is finished, They should wish that all beings Accomplish all their tasks And fulfill the Buddha’s teachings. 
When they explain the teaching, They should wish that all beings Attain inexhaustible eloquence And widely expound the essentials of the teaching. 
When they leave a place, They should wish that all beings Deeply enter enlightened knowledge, Forever leaving the triple world. 
When they enter a bath, They should wish that all beings Enter omniscient knowledge, Knowing past, present, and future are equal. 
While washing their bodies, They should wish that all beings Be undefiled in body and mind, Radiantly pure inside and out. 
In the blistering heat of the day They should wish that all beings Cast off myriad afflictions, Putting an end to them all. 
When the heat subsides and begins to cool, They should wish that all beings Experience the highest truth And be ultimately cool. 
When reciting scripture, They should wish that all beings Accord with the Buddha’s teachings, Remembering without forgetting. 
If they get to see a Buddha, They should wish that all beings Be all like Universally Good, Handsome and well adorned. 
When seeing a Buddha’s tomb, They should wish that all beings Be honored as the shrine And receive the offerings of celestials and humans. 
Reverently gazing at the shrine, They should wish that all beings Be looked up to by all Celestials and humans. 
Bowing their heads to the shrine, They should wish that all beings Be exalted beyond the view Of gods and men. 
Circumabulating the shrine, They should wish that all beings Act without offense And develop omniscience. 
Circling the shrine thrice, They should wish that all beings Diligently see the Buddha’s path Without indolence of mind. 
Praising the Buddha’s virtues, They should wish that all beings Fulfill all virtues Extolled endlessly. 
Praising the Buddha’s distinguishing marks, They should wish that all beings Develop the buddha-body And realize formless truth. 
When washing their feet, They should wish that all beings Fulfill the bases of spiritual powers, Unhindered wherever they go. 
When going to sleep at night, They should wish that all beings Attain physical ease And undisturbed minds. 
Awakening from sleep, They should wish that all beings Awaken omniscience, Perceiving in all directions. 
“Child of Buddha, if enlightening beings use their minds in this way, they will attain all supremely wonderful qualities, which cannot be dislodged by any gods, demons, monks, brahmins, gandharvas, titans, etc., or by any Buddhist followers or self-enlightened ones.” Chief in Goodness Now I have, for the sake of the enlightening beings, Explained the purifying practices cultivated by Buddhas in the past; Benevolent One, you too, in this assembly should Expound the supreme virtues of practical application. 
Then Chief in Goodness responded in verse: Very good, Benevolent One—you should listen clearly. Those virtues and merits cannot be measured: 
I will now tell a little, as well as I can, But it will be but as a drop of the ocean. 
When an enlightening being first determines on the Way, Vowing to seek and realize Buddhas’ enlightenment, The virtues therein are boundless, Immeasurable, beyond compare. 
How much the more so, through countless, boundless eons, To fully practice the virtues of the stages and transcendent ways; Even all the Buddhas of the ten directions Together could not fully expound them all. 
Of such boundless great virtues I will now tell a little bit, Like the space trod by a bird’s feet, Or like a mote of dust of the earth. 
When enlightening beings determine to seek enlightenment, This is not without cause, not without conditions; Engendering pure faith in the Buddha, Teaching, and Community, By this they produce a broad, magnanimous mind. 
Not seeking objects of desire or positions of authority, Wealth, personal enjoyment, or fame, It is only to forever annihilate creatures’ miseries And to benefit the world that they rouse their will. 
Always wanting to profit and gladden all beings, They adorn lands and make offerings to Buddhas. Accepting the right teaching, they cultivate its knowledges; To realize enlightenment they arouse their minds. 
Deep faith, belief, and resolution always pure, They honor and respect all Buddhas, As well as their Teachings and Communities; Making offerings with ultimate sincerity, they rouse their will. 
Deeply believing in the Buddha and the Buddha’s teaching, They also believe in the Way traversed by buddhas-to-be, And believe in unexcelled great enlightenment: Thereby do enlightening beings first rouse their will. 
Faith is the basis of the Path, the mother of virtues, Nourishing and growing all good ways, Cutting away the net of doubt, freeing from the torrent of passion, Revealing the unsurpassed road of ultimate peace. 
When faith is undefiled, the mind is pure; Obliterating pride, it is the root of reverence, And the foremost wealth in the treasury of religion, Being a pure hand to receive the practices. 
Faith is generous, the mind not begrudging; Faith can joyfully enter the Buddha’s teaching; Faith can increase knowledge and virtue; Faith can assure arrival at enlightenment. 
Faith makes the faculties pure, clear and sharp; The power of faith is strong and indestructible. Faith can annihilate the root of affliction, Faith can turn one wholly to the virtues of buddhahood. Faith has no attachment to objects: Transcending difficulties, it reaches freedom from trouble. 
Faith is the unspoiled seed of virtue, Faith can grow the seed of enlightenment. Faith can increase supreme knowledge, Faith can reveal all Buddhas. Therefore I’ll explain in steps practicing in accord: Faith is most powerful, very difficult to have; It’s like in all worlds having The wondrous wish-fulfilling pearl. 
If one can always faithfully serve the Buddhas, Then one can keep the precepts and cultivate studies; If one always keeps the precepts and practices what one learns, Then one can embody all virtuous qualities. 
Self-control can develop the basis of enlightenment, Study the foundation of cultivating virtues; Always acting in accord with discipline and study, One will be praised for excellence by all enlightened ones. 
If one always faithfully serves the Buddhas, Then one can assemble great offerings. 
If one can assemble great offerings, One’s faith in Buddha is beyond conception. If one always faithfully serves the honorable Teaching, Then one will tirelessly listen to the Buddha’s teaching. 
If one hears the Buddha’s teaching without tiring of it, One’s faith in the Teaching is inconceivable. If one always faithfully serves the pure Community, Then one’s faith will never regress. 
If one’s faith never regresses, One’s power of faith is unshakable. If nothing can shake one’s power of faith, Then one gains purity, clarity, and sharpness of sense. 
If one has purity, clarity, and sharpness of sense, One can avoid bad associates. If one can avoid bad associates, Then one can approach good associates. 
If one can be with good associates, Then one can cultivate great goodness. If one can cultivate great goodness, One can perfect great causal power. 
If one perfects great causal power, Then one can attain supremely certain understanding. If one attains supremely certain understanding, Then one will be protected by the Buddhas. 
If one is protected by the Buddhas, Then one can arouse the will for enlightenment. If one can arouse the will for enlightenment, Then one can diligently cultivate the virtues of buddhahood. 
If one can diligently cultivate the virtues of buddhahood, Then he can be born in the family of the enlightened. If one gets to be born in the family of the enlightened, Then one can practice skillful liberative techniques. 
If one can develop skill in means of liberation well, Then one can reach purity of the faithful mind. If one gains purity of the faithful mind, Then one can increase supreme will. 
If one can increase supreme will, Then one can always practice the transcendent ways, If one always practices the transcendent ways, Then one can fulfill the Great Vehicle. 
If one can fulfill the Great Vehicle, Then one can give offerings to Buddhas in the right way. If one can make offerings to Buddhas in the right way, Then one can remember Buddha with unwavering mind. 
If one can remember Buddha with unwavering mind, Then one can always see infinite Buddhas. If one always sees infinite Buddhas, Then one sees the essence of the enlightened is eternal. 
If one sees the essence of the enlightened is eternal, Then one can know the truth never dies. If one can know the truth never dies, Then one attains unhindered powers of elucidation. 
If one attains unhindered powers of elucidation, Then one can expound boundless teachings. If one can expound boundless teachings, Then one can compassionately liberate beings. 
If one can compassionately liberate beings, Then one can attain a mind of unshakable compassion. If one can attain a mind of unshakable compassion, Then one can appreciate the most profound truth. 
If one can appreciate the most profound truth, Then one can abandon the errors of fabrication. If one can abandon the errors of fabrication, Then one can divorce conceit and indulgence. 
If one can get rid of conceit and indulgence, Then one can benefit all beings together. If one can benefit all beings, Then one can be in birth-and-death unwearied. 
If one can be in birth-and-death unwearied, Then one can be invincibly brave and strong. If one can be invincibly brave and strong, Then one can bring forth great spiritual powers. 
If one can bring forth great spiritual powers, One will know the activities of all sentient beings. If one knows the activities of all sentient beings, Then one can mature and perfect living beings. If one can mature and perfect living beings, One will attain the knowledge to save all beings. 
If one attains the knowledge to save all beings, Then one can perfect the means of salvation. 
If one can perfect the means of salvation, One then will give beings unlimited benefit. If one gives beings unlimited benefit, One will fulfill the techniques of supreme knowledge. 
If one fulfills the techniques of supreme knowledge, One will remain on the heroic unexcelled path. If one remains on the heroic unexcelled path, One can crush the power of all demons. 
If one can crush the power of all demons, One can get beyond the realm of the four demons. If one can get beyond the realm of the four demons, Then one can reach the stage of nonregression. 
If one can reach the stage of nonregression, One attains profound acceptance of the nonorigination of things. If one attains deep acceptance of the nonorigination of things, One will receive the Buddhas’ prediction of enlightenment. 
If one’s enlightenment is foretold by the Buddhas, Then all the Buddhas will appear in one’s presence. If all the Buddhas appear in one’s presence, One will comprehend the profound, mystic use of spiritual powers. 
If one comprehends the deep mystic function of spiritual powers, One will be remembered by all the Buddhas. If one is remembered by the Buddhas, Then one will adorn oneself with the qualities of buddhahood. 
If one adorns oneself with the qualities of buddhahood, One will attain a splendid body of felicity. If one attains a splendid body of felicity, One’s body will be radiant as a mountain of gold. 
If one’s body is radiant as a mountain of gold, It will be adorned with the thirty-two marks of distinction. If one is adorned with the thirty-two marks, One will be adorned with accompanying refinements. If one is adorned with the accompanying refinements, The light of one’s aura will be unlimited. 
If one’s aura light is infinite, One will be adorned with inconceivable light. 
If one is adorned with inconceivable light, That light will produce lotus blossoms. If the light produces lotus blossoms, Innumerable Buddhas will sit on the blossoms, Appearing everywhere in the ten directions, Able to pacify all sentient beings. 
If able to harmonize beings this way, One manifests infinite mystical powers. 
If one manifests infinite mystical powers, One dwells in inconceivable lands, Expounding inconceivable teachings, Gladdening inconceivably many beings. 
If one explains inconceivable teachings Gladdening inconceivably many beings, Then with wisdom and power of elucidation One guides in accord with being’s minds. 
If one uses wisdom and powers of elucidation To guide in accord with beings’ minds, Then one will never lose Action guided by wisdom. 
If one never loses Action guided by wisdom, Then one’s will power will be sovereign, And one will appear physically in any state of being. 
If one’s will power attains the freedom To manifest a body in any state of being, Then one will be able, when teaching, To accord with any language, inconceivably. 
If one can, when teaching, Adopt any language, according to the congregation, Then one will instantly know all The minds of all sentient beings. 
If one can instantly know The minds of all sentient beings, One will know afflictions arise from nowhere And will not sink and drown in birth and death. 
If one knows afflictions come from nowhere And will never drown in birth and death, Then one attains the body of the essence of truth And appears in the world by the power of truth. 
If one attains the virtuous body of the essence of truth And appears in the world by the power of truth, One will attain all the stages and freedoms of enlightenment, Practice the ways of transcendence and be supremely liberated. 
If one attains the stages and freedoms of enlightenment, Practices the transcendent ways and is supremely liberated, One will attain the great spiritual powers of the anointed And abide in the most supreme meditations. 
If one attains the great spiritual powers of the anointed And abides in the most supreme meditations, Then in the presence of the Buddhas One will be annointed and ascend to that rank; One will be anointed with the elixir of deathlessness By all the Buddhas in the ten directions. 
If one is anointed with elixir By the Buddhas of the ten directions, One’s body will be all-pervasive as space, Abiding at rest, immovable, filling the ten directions. 
If one’s body is pervasive as space, Abiding at rest, immovable, filling all directions, One’s action will be beyond compare, Unknowable to gods and men. 
Enlightening beings practice acts of great compassion, Vowing to liberate all successfully; Those who see, hear, listen, accept, or make offerings, They cause all to attain peace and happiness. 
Those great beings have magnificent spiritual powers; Their eye of reality is always complete, without any lack; The wonderful practices of virtuous ways and other such paths Are supreme jewels which they cause to appear. 
Just like clusters of diamonds in the ocean, By their mystic powers they produce many jewels; Without decrease or increase, and inexhaustible: Such is the mass of enlightening beings’ virtues. 
Where there are lands with no Buddha, There they appear to attain enlightenment; Where there are lands where the Teaching’s unknown, They expound there the treasury of sublime doctrines. 
Without discrimination, without effort, They reach everywhere in a single instant, Like the moonlight extending everywhere, Teaching beings by innumerable techniques. 
In the worlds of the ten directions Constantly they show the way of Buddhahood: Turning the wheel of the true teaching and entering extinction, Down to the distribution of their relics. 
Sometimes they show the paths of followers or self-enlightened ones; Sometimes they show the universal adornment of full buddhahood; Thus they open up the teachings of the three vehicles, Widely liberating beings for infinite eons. 
They may manifest the forms of dragon girls or boys, Or celestial dragons, or titans too, Down to mahoragas and so on: They let everyone see according to desire. 
Living beings’ forms and features are unalike, Their behaviors and sounds are also countless; All of these enlightening beings can make appear By the mystic power of the oceanic reflection meditation. 
Beautifully purifying inconceivable lands, Making offerings to all enlightened ones, Emanating great light without bound, They liberate sentient beings without limit too. 
Their knowledge and wisdom is independent and inconceivable, Their speech in explaining truth is unhindered, Their generosity, self-control, tolerance, energy, and meditation, Wisdom, skill in means, spiritual powers, and such, Are all likewise free, By the power of Buddha’s flower garland meditation. 
They enter concentration on one atom And accomplish concentration on all atoms, And yet that particle doesn’t increase: In one are manifest inconceivable lands. 
Of the many lands in that one atom, Some have Buddhas, some do not; Some are polluted, some are pure; Some are large, some are small; Some are forming, some disintegrating; Some are upright, some are sideways; Some are like heat-mirages on a vast plain, Some are like Indra’s net in the heavens. 
What in one atom is manifest Is also manifest in all atoms; This is the mystic power of concentration and liberation Of these sages of great renown. 
If they want to make offerings to all Buddhas, They enter into concentration and produce mystic transformations, Able to reach throughout the universe with one hand To give offerings to all the enlightened ones. 
The most beautiful flowers in all realms, Perfumes, incense, and priceless jewels: Such as these all emerge from their hands To present to the Conquerors under the trees of enlightenment. 
Priceless jewel raiment, with mixed perfumes, Precious banners and canopies, all finely adorned, With flowers of gold and curtains of jewels: All of these rain from their palms. Whatever wonderful things there be in all realms That may be worthy to offer to the Supreme Honored One, All shower from their palms, all complete, And they bring it to the enlightenment trees to offer to the Buddhas. 
All the artful music of the ten directions: Bells and drums, harps and lyres, various different kinds, All played harmoniously, with beautiful tones, All emerges from the enlightening beings’ palms. All eulogies that be in the ten directions, Praising the virtues of the enlightened ones, All of their various wonderful words Are intoned from within their palms. The enlightened beings’ right hands radiate pure light: 
Within the light is fragrant water raining from the sky, Sprinkling the buddha-lands of the ten directions, As offerings to all the Lamps that Light the Worlds. 
Also they emit wondrous arrays of light beams Producing countless jewel lotus blossoms; The colors and forms of the flowers are all superb, And these they present to the Buddhas. 
They also emit flower garlands of light With all kinds of flowers bunched into drapes, Scattered all over the lands everywhere As presents to all the Honored Ones of great virtue. 
They also emit lights adorned with perfumes, Various wonderful scents massed into drapes, Scattered all throughout the lands everywhere As presents to the Honored Ones of great virtue. 
They also emit lights adorned with powdered incense, Various incenses collected into drapes, And distribute them throughout all worlds As gifts to the Honored Ones of great virtue. 
They also emanate lights adorned with raiment, Various fine robes gathered into drapes, And distribute them throughout all worlds As offerings to the Honored Ones of great virtue. 
They also emit lights adorned with jewels, Various beautiful jewels massed into drapes, And distribute them throughout all worlds As presents to the Honored Ones. 
They also produce lights adorned with lotuses, Various lotuses assembled into drapes, And distribute them throughout all worlds As gifts to the Honored Ones. 
They also emit lights necklace adorned; Various fine necklaces gathered into drapes They distribute throughout all worlds To offer to the Honored Ones. 
They also emanate lights adorned with pennants Radiant with multicolored patterns, Of all kinds, innumerable, all superbly fine: With these they decorate the buddha-lands. 
Canopies adorned with melanges of jewels, Draped with finely embroidered flags, And crystal chimes intoning Buddhas’ voices: These they take to offer the enlightened ones. 
Their hands producing such inconceivable gifts, They present them to a Guide, And do the same to all the Buddhas, With their great psychic powers of concentration. 
Enlightening beings dwell in concentration, Dealing with beings by various abilities, All of them guiding by innumerable means, By the virtuous principles they practice. 
Some use the approach of offerings to Buddhas, Some use the approach of inconceivable generosity, Some use the approach of austerity and discipline, Some use the approach of unshakable tolerance, Some use the approach of ascetic effort, Some use the approach of tranquil meditation, Some use the approach of certain, thorough knowledge, Some use the teaching of practical expedients, Some use the teachings of the pure abodes and psychic powers, Some use the approach of the benefits of the means of salvation, Some use the approach of the adornments of knowledge and virtue, Some use the teaching of conditioning and liberation, Some use the teachings of faculties, powers, and the right path, Some use the teaching of followers’ liberation, Some use the teaching of purity of self-awakened ones, Some use the teaching of the freedom of the Great Vehicle, Some use the teaching of the miseries of impermanence, Some use the teaching of no self and no life, Some use the teaching of impurity and detachment from desire, Some use the approach of extinctive concentration. According to the differences in beings’ ailments They all use teaching-medicines to cure them. According to the inclinations of beings’ minds They all use expedients to satisfy them. According to the differences in sentient beings’ behaviors They all use adaptive skills to perfect them. 
The characteristics of such spiritual powers of concentration Cannot be fathomed by any gods or men. 
Having a wondrous concentration called according to actions, Enlightening beings abide in this and observe everywhere, Appearing as appropriate to liberate sentient beings, Causing them to gladly change according to the truth. 
Where there is famine and disaster in the age, They give means of comfort to all in the world, Causing them to be satisfied according to their desires, Creating benefit for all sentient beings. 
They may give away fine food and drink, Sumptuous clothing, garlands of jewels, And even a royal throne, To cause those who like generosity to accord with the teaching. 
Adorned with flower garlands, anointed with perfume, With dignified behavior, they liberate beings, Liked and esteemed by all in the world. 
Their appearance and their garb They adopt as is appropriate to please And cause those who like form to follow the Path. 
With exquisite voices like songs of birds, Wondrous tones in harmony, Complete with all kinds of pure voice, They preach to beings according to their likes. 
Eighty-four thousand gates of teaching Do the Buddhas use to liberate beings: And according to the different teachings They use what’s appropriate to liberate. 
Sentient beings’ pains and pleasures, gains and losses, etc., Whatever things are done by beings of the world, Enlightening beings can appear to do the same things, Whereby to liberate all living beings. 
The suffering of all worldly beings Is deep and wide and boundless like the sea; Enlightening beings, sharing their tasks, can tolerate it all, To cause them to benefit and gain peace and happiness. 
If any do not know the way to emancipation And do not seek liberation, to leave turmoil behind, Enlightening beings show them relinquishment of nation and wealth, Satisfaction in detachment and peace of mind. 
If the home is a place of bondage by attachments, In order to cause sentient beings to all escape trouble They show home-leaving and attainment of liberation, Without craving for any pleasures. 
Enlightening beings manifest the practice of ten kinds of action And also practice the ways of great people, Including the practices of seers and sages, Because they want to benefit sentient beings. 
If there are beings whose life span is immeasurable, Whose afflictions are slight and pleasures complete, Enlightening beings, being free in their midst, Show the suffering of the ills of age, sickness, and death. 
In the cases of those with greed, hatred, and ignorance, The raging fires of these afflictions always blazing, Enlightening beings manifest aging, sickness, and death for them, To cause those sentient beings to all be tamed. 
The Buddhas’ ten powers and fearlessness, As well as their eighteen unique qualities, All their countless virtues, Are manifested to liberate beings. 
Knowledge of others’ minds, appropriate teaching, and ability to appear anywhere Are all free functions of the enlightened ones; The great enlightening beings manifest them all, Able to cause sentient beings to all be tamed. 
Just like lotus blossoms, to which water does not adhere, In the same way they are in the world, provoking deep faith. 
With extraordinary thoughts and profound talent, as cultural kings, Song and dance, and conversation admired by the masses, All the various arts and crafts of the world They manifest, like magicians. 
Some become grandees, city chiefs, Some become merchants, caravan leaders; Some become physicians and scientists, Some become kings and ministers. Some become great trees in the plains, Some become medicines or jewel mines; Some become pearls that fulfill all wishes, Some show the right path to sentient beings. 
If they see a world just come into being, Where the creatures don’t yet have the tools for livelihood, Enlightening beings become craftsmen And teach them various skills. 
They do not make anything that will oppress or afflict living beings: They only explain things that will be of benefit to the world; Various fields of knowledge, such as incantational arts and medicinal herbs, And all contained therein they can explain. 
The excellent practices of all the sages Faithfully looked up to by humans and divines, Such difficult practices and austerities Enlightening beings can perform according to need. 
Some become non-Buddhist mendicants, Some practice asceticism alone in the forest; Some go naked, without any clothes, Being teachers and leaders of such groups. 
Some show various practices of wrong livelihood, Practicing incorrect principles as supreme; Some manifest the postures of brahmin ascetics, Becoming leaders of such groups. 
Some expose themselves to the heat of fire and sun, Some practice cults imitating animals, Some put on filthy clothing and worship fire: In order to transform such cultists, they become their teachers. 
Some make a show of visiting shrines of various deities, Some make a show of entering the water of the Ganges River, Some eat roots and fruits, all making a show of these practices, While always contemplating the truth that transcends them. 
Some show themselves kneeling or standing on one foot, Some lie on thorns or in dust and dirt; Some lie on pounding stones, seeking release, And become teachers and leaders of such groups. 
Of such followers of heretical paths They observe the minds and understandings, and do the same things; The ascetic practices they demonstrate, worldlings cannot bear: They cause them to be tamed after seeing them. 
Sentient beings are deluded and accept false teachings; Sticking to wrong views, they suffer many pains: For them are expediently taught wonderful principles To cause them to understand the genuine truth. 
The four truths may be explained in local magical language, Or the four truths may be told in skillful esoteric language, Or the four truths may be spoken in direct human speech, Or the four truths may be told in the language of divine mystery; The four truths are explained through analysis of words, The four truths are explained through ascertainment of principles, The four truths are explained skillfully refuting others, The four truths are explained undisturbed by outsiders; The four truths may be explained in several languages, Or they may be explained in all languages. 
In whatever languages beings understand The four truths are explained for them, to liberate them. All the teachings of all Buddhas Are thus explained exhaustively, Knowing the realm of language is inconceivable: This is called the power of concentration of expounding the truth. 
There is a supreme concentration called peace and bliss Which can universally save and liberate all sentient beings, Radiating a great light, inconceivable, Causing those who see it to all be pacified. 
This light emanated is called “good manifestation”— If any sentient beings encounter this light, It will cause them to benefit, without fail: 
By this way they can attain unsurpassed knowledge; It first shows the Buddhas, Shows the Teaching, shows the Community, shows the Right Path, And also shows the Buddhas’ tombs and images— By this the light is formed. 
It also emits a light called “shining” Which outshines the lights of all the gods, Removing all barriers of darkness, Benefiting all living beings. 
This light awakens all sentient beings, Inducing them to offer lamps to the Buddhas; Because they present lamps to the Buddhas, They can become supreme lamps in the world. 
Burning oil lamps and butter lamps, As well as various bright torches, And lamps of finest jewels with fragrant herbs, And presenting them to the Buddhas, they attain this light. 
It also emits a light called “salvation”: This light can awaken all beings And cause them to develop great determination To liberate the living from the sea of desire. 
If one can universally produce this determination To liberate the living from the sea of desire, Then one can cross over the torrents of afflictions And lead the way to the sorrowless citadel of freedom. 
By building bridges and rafts Wherever there is water on the roads, Criticizing fabrication and praising dispassionate calm, Thereby is this light attained. 
It also emanates a light called “annihilating attachment”: This light can awaken all beings, Causing them to give up objects of desire And concentrate on the savor of the sublime teaching of liberation. 
If one can give up objects of desire And concentrate on the subtle true savor of liberation, One can, with the Buddha’s rain of sweet dew, Extinguish all the cravings in the world. 
By charitably giving ponds, wells, and springs, Only seeking the unsurpassed way of enlightenment, Criticizing desires and praising meditation, It is possible to produce this light. 
It also radiates a light called “joy”: This light can awaken all beings, Causing them to long for perfect enlightenment And determine to realize the teacherless path. 
Making statues of the Buddha of Great Compassion, Adorned with all distinguishing marks, sitting on a flower, And by always praising Buddha’s supreme virtues Can this light thereby be produced. It also emits a light called “appreciation”: 
If they always appreciate the Buddhas, Their teachings and communities, Then in the congregations of the Buddhas They’ll attain acceptance of the profound truth of the emptiness of things. 
Enlightening sentient beings without number, Making them always remember the Buddha, Teaching, and Community, Is whereby this light is attained. 
It also emanates a light called “collection of virtues”: This light can awaken all beings, Inducing them to practice unlimited giving in various forms, Aspiring thereby to the unexcelled Path. Establishing great charitable functions without imposing limits, Satisfying the needs of all who come, Not letting their hearts feel any lack, Is whereby this light is made. 
It also emits a light called “full knowledge”: This light can awaken all beings, Causing them to instantly, in one principle, Understand innumerable teachings. Analyzing teachings for sentient beings And determining the real true meaning, Skillfully expounding the meanings of the teachings, without lack, Is how this light is made. 
It also radiates a light called “lamp of wisdom”: This light can awaken all beings And cause them to know sentient beings are inherently empty and at rest, And that all things have no existence. Explaining that all things are empty, with no controller, no self, Like illusions, like flames, like the moon reflected in the water, And also like dreams or reflected images, Is how this light is made. It also emits a light called “mastery of the teachings”: 
This light can awaken all beings And cause them to attain inexhaustible mnemonic command To retain all the teachings of the Buddhas. Honoring and supporting the holders of the teachings, Serving and protecting the sages and saints, Handing on various teachings to beings, Is how this light is produced. 
It also emanates a light called “able to relinquish”: This light can awaken miserly people, Making them realize all wealth is impermanent, And enjoy giving, without attachment. Able to subdue stubborn stinginess, Understanding wealth is like dreams or floating clouds, Causing the pure mind of generosity to grow, Is how this light is attained. 
It also radiates a light called “removing heat”: This light can awaken the immoral And cause them to maintain pure precepts And determine to realize the teacherless path. Inducing sentient beings to accept moral precepts And to purify the practice of virtuous actions And causing them to be inspired to seek enlightenment Is how this light is made. 
It also emits a light called “adornment of tolerance”: This light can awaken bad-tempered beings, Causing them to get rid of anger and divorce conceit, And gladly be tolerant and harmonious. When the violence of beings is hard to endure, To be unmoved in mind, for the sake of enlightenment, Always happily extolling the virtues of tolerance, Is how this light’s produced. It also radiates a light called “intrepitude”: 
This light can awaken the lazy, Causing them always to respect and support The Buddha, Teaching, and Community, without weariness. 
If they always support and respect The Buddha, the Teaching, and the Community, They can get beyond the realms of the four demons And quickly attain unsurpassed enlightenment. 
Exhorting sentient beings to progress, Always diligently supporting the Buddha, Teaching, and Community, Wholeheartedly guarding the Teaching when it’s about to perish, Is how this light can be made. 
It also emanates a light called “tranquility”: This light can awaken the scatter-minded, Causing them to detach from greed, anger, and folly, With their minds unstirring and properly stabilized. Abandoning all bad associates, Meaningless talk and impure action, Praising meditation and solitude: 
Thus is this light produced. It also radiates a light called “adornment of wisdom”: This light can awaken the ignorant and deluded, Causing them to realize the truth and understand conditional origination, Their faculties, knowledge, and wisdom penetrating thoroughly. 
If they can realize the truth and understand conditioned origination, Their faculties, knowledge, and wisdom penetrating, They’ll attain the state of “sun-lamp” mental focus With the light of wisdom and perfect the fruit of buddhahood. 
Being able to give away country and wealth For the sake of enlightenment, seeking the right teaching, Then, having heard it, single-mindedly applying it and explaining to others, Is how this light may be made. 
It also emits a light called “buddha-wisdom”: This light can awaken all conscious creatures, Causing them to see innumerable, boundless Buddhas, Each sitting on jewel lotus flowers. Praising the Buddhas’ powers and liberation, Telling of the Buddhas’ freedom without bound, Manifesting Buddhas’ powers and mystic abilities, Is how this light may be produced. 
It also emanates a light called “fearlessness”: This light shines on those in fear And causes the speedy annihilation Of all inhuman harmful things. Being able to give beings freedom from fear, Exhorting the ceasing of all affliction and injury encountered, Rescuing those in danger, the orphaned and the helpless, Is how this light can be made. 
It also radiates a light called “peace”: This light can illumine those who are ill And cause all pains to be relieved So all can gain the bliss of right concentration. Dispensing medicine to cure afflictions, Anointing with precious life-prolonging perfume, Giving butter, oil, honey, and milk for nourishment, Is how this light can be made. 
It also emits a light called “seeing Buddha”: This light can awaken those about to die, Causing them to see any Buddha they think of, So when their life ends they can be born in that Buddha’s pure land. To exhort the dying to remembrance of Buddha, And show them icons for them to behold, Causing them to take refuge in the Buddha, Is how this light can be made. 
It also emanates a light called “delight in the Teaching”: This light can awaken all beings, Causing them to always delight in the true teaching, Listening to it, expounding it, writing and copying it. Being able to expound the teaching when it’s about to perish, Causing those who seek the teaching to be fulfilled, Appreciating the teaching and striving to practice it, Is how this light can be made. 
It also radiates a light called “wondrous sound”: This light can awaken enlightening beings And cause all voices heard in the world To be to the hearer the voice of Buddha. Praising the Buddha out loud, And presenting music like bells and chimes, And causing all creatures to hear the sound of Buddha, Is how this light can be made. 
It also emits a light called “dispensing elixir”: This light can awaken all beings, Causing them to give up all indulgence And fully practice all virtues. Explaining the instability of created things And how they’re filled with countless vexations, Always happily extolling the bliss of dispassionate tranquility Is how this light can be made. 
It also emanates a light called “supreme”: This light awakens all beings, Causing them to hear from the Buddhas, The supreme teachings of discipline, concentration, and knowledge. Always gladly praising all Buddhas’ Supreme self-control, concentration, and knowledge, In this way seeking the unexcelled Path, Is how this light is attained. 
It also radiates a light called “jewel adornment”: This light can awaken all beings, Causing them to attain an inexhaustible treasury of jewels To offer to the enlightened ones. Presenting various excellent jewels To the Buddhas and Buddhas’ shrines, Also giving them generously to the poor, Is how this light can be made. 
It also emits a light called “adornment of fragrance”: This light can awaken all beings, Causing those who sense it to be pleased And assured of fulfilling enlightened virtues. Spreading the ground with exquisite incense To offer to the supreme Guides, And also therewith making shrines and icons, Is how this light can be made. 
It also emanates a light called “various adornments” With jewel pennants and canopies beyond number, Burning incense, scattering flowers, playing music, Filling cities, inside and out. Having originally presented the Buddhas with various adornments: Wonderful dancing and music, Perfumes, flowers, pennants, canopies, and such, Is how this light was made. 
It also radiates a light called “purification” Which causes the ground to be flat as a palm. Adorning the Buddhas’ shrines and their surroundings Is how this light can be made. It also emits a light called “great clouds” Which can produce fragrant clouds and rain fragrant water. Sprinkling the shrines and their precincts Is how this light is made. 
It also emanates a light called “adornments” Which can cause the naked to be clothed. Giving fine things to adorn the body Is how this light is made. It also radiates a light called “excellent savor” Which can cause the hungry to get fine food. Giving various delicacies Is how this light is made. 
It also radiates a light called “great wealth” Which causes the poor to gain treasure. Giving unlimited things to the Buddha, Teaching, and Community, Is how this light can be made. It also emits a light called “clarity of eye” Which can cause the blind to see all forms and colors. Giving lamps to Buddhas or their shrines Is how this light is made. 
It also emanates a light called “clarity of ear” Which can cause the deaf to be able to hear. Playing music for Buddhas or at their shrines Is how this light is made. 
It also radiates a light called “clarity of nose” By which one can smell scents hitherto unnoticed. Giving incense to the Buddhas and their shrines Is how this light is made. 
It also emits a light called “purity of tongue” Able to praise the Buddhas in beautiful tones. Forever getting rid of coarse, unwholesome speech Is how this light is made. 
It also emits a light called “purity of body” Which causes the impaired to be fully restored. Prostrating the body to Buddhas and their shrines Is how this light is made. 
It also radiates a light called “purity of mind” Causing the absent-minded to gain right mindfulness. Practicing concentration till totally mastered Is how this light is made. 
It also emanates a light called “purity of form” Causing one to see the inconceivable forms of Buddhas. Adorning shrines in various beautiful forms Is how this light is made. 
It also emits a light called “purity of sound” Causing knowledge of the basic emptiness of the nature of sound. Contemplating the dependent origination of sound, like echoes in a valley Is how this light is made. 
It also radiates a light called “purity of scent” Causing all bad odors to be sweetly purified. Washing the shrines and enlightenment trees with fragrant water Is how this light is made. 
It also emits a light called “purity of taste” Which can eliminate all poisons in food. Continued support of the Buddha, Community, and parents Is how this light is made. 
It also emanates a light called “purity of feeling” Able to soften what’s unpleasant to touch; Though spears and swords rain from the sky, It can change them all to flower garlands. 
By having in the past spread the roads With perfumes, scattered flowers, and robes For the Buddhas to walk upon Is how such a light was attained. 
It also radiates a light called “purity of phenomena” Able to cause all hair pores to expound Inconceivable wonderful teachings So all who hear joyfully understand. 
What originates from causes and conditions has no origination; The reality-body of the Buddhas is not a body; The nature of things is eternally like space: By explaining these meanings is there light like this. 
Such incomparable gateways of lights Are innumerable, like sand grains of the Ganges River; All emerge from the Great Sage’s pores, Each performing a distinct function. 
As the lights emanated from a single pore Are countless, innumerable as the Ganges’ sands, So are those of each and every pore: This is the power of the Sage’s concentration. 
According to the lights attained by past practice, Those who practice likewise, according to their affinities, Now radiate lights therefore like this: This is the freedom of the Sage’s knowledge. 
Those who practiced virtuous deeds like the Buddha And had appreciation and rejoiced in accord, Who saw what he did and then did likewise, They are all able to see this light. 
If any practice virtuous deeds themselves And make offerings to innumerable Buddhas, Always aspiring to the virtues of buddhahood, They are awakened by this light. 
Just as when those born blind don’t see the sun It is not because there’s no sun appearing in the world— All those who have eyes can clearly see it, Each doing their work according to their occupations, So it is with the lights of the Great Being— Those who have wisdom all can see, While ordinary folk with false beliefs and low understanding Cannot perceive these lights at all. 
Crystal palaces and chariots Painted with precious ethereal scents Are naturally supplied to those with virtue: They cannot be occupied by the virtueless ones; So it is with the Great Being’s lights: 
Those of deep knowledge are all illumined, While the ignorant, with false beliefs and poor understanding Are not able to see these lights at all. 
If any who hear of the varieties of these lights Can develop pure and profound faith and resolution, They’ll sunder forever the web of all doubts And promptly complete the banner of virtue. 
There’s a supreme concentration that can produce Arrays of retinues, all free, Incomparable assemblies of Buddha-children Of all buddha-lands in the ten directions: There is a lotus blossom, adorned with lights, Of equal extent to a billion world galaxy, On which the enlightening being sits, completely filling it— This is the mystic power of this concentration. 
There are also lotus blossoms surrounding, As many as atoms in ten lands, On which the hosts of Buddha-children sit, Abiding in the spiritual power of this concentration. 
Having fully developed good causes in the past And fully practiced the virtues of buddhahood, Such people surround the enlightening being, All joining their palms and gazing tirelessly. 
Like the bright moon among the stars Is the enlightening being in the midst of the congregation. Such is the practice of the great being Entering the spiritual power of this concentration. 
As manifested in one region Surrounded by hosts of Buddha-children, So it is in all regions, Abiding in this spiritual power of concentration. 
There’s a supreme concentration called “network of loci”— The enlightening being dwelling in this teaches widely, Appearing bodily in all quarters, Sometimes entering concentration, sometimes emerging: Sometimes entering right concentration in the East And emerging from concentration in the West, Sometimes entering right concentration in the West And emerging from concentration in the East, Sometimes entering right concentration in other directions And emerging from concentration in still others, Sometimes entry and emergence pervade all ten directions: This is called the enlightening being’s concentration power. 
Appearing before and associating with All the countless Buddhas In the lands throughout the East While dwelling in this concentration, silent and unmoving, And emerging from concentration In the presence of all the Buddhas Of the worlds in the West, Making unlimited offerings to all of them; Appearing before and associating with All the countless Buddhas In the lands throughout the West While remaining in concentration, silent and unmoving, And emerging from concentration In the presence of all the Buddhas Of the worlds in the East, Making unlimited offerings to all of them, Thus does the enlightening being enter All the worlds of the ten directions, Sometimes manifesting concentration, silent and unmoving, Sometimes manifesting respectful offering to the Buddhas. 
Entering right concentration in the eye-organ, Emerging from concentration in the field of form, Showing the inconceivability of the nature of form, Unknowable to all gods and men; Entering right concentration in the field of form And emerging from concentration in the eye, without disturbing the mind, Explaining the eye is birthless and has no origin, By nature empty, null, and doing nothing; Entering right concentration in the ear faculty And emerging from concentration in the field of sound, Distinguishing the sounds of all languages, Unknowable to gods and men, Entering right concentration in the field of sound, Emerging from concentration in the ear, the mind undisturbed, Explaining the ear is birthless and has no origin, By nature empty, null, and doing nothing; Entering right concentration in the nose faculty And emerging from concentration in the field of scent, Discovering all the most excellent fragrances, Unknowable to gods and men, Entering right concentration in the field of scent, Emerging from concentration in the nose, mind undisturbed, Explaining the nose is birthless and has no origin, Empty by nature, null, and doing nothing; Entering right concentration in the tongue faculty, Emerging from concentration in the field of flavor, Discovering all the most exquisite flavors Unknowable to gods and men, Entering right concentration in the field of flavor, Emerging from concentration in the tongue, mind undisturbed, Explaining the tongue is birthless and has no origin, By nature, empty, null, and doing nothing; Entering right concentration in the faculty of the body, Emerging from concentration in the field of touch, Able to clearly distinguish all textures, Unknowable to gods and men, Entering right concentration in the field of touch, Emerging from concentration in the body, mind undisturbed, Explaining the body is birthless and has no origin, By nature empty, null, and doing nothing; Entering right concentration in the mental faculty, Emerging from concentration in the field of phenomena, Discerning the characteristics of all things, Unknowable to gods and men, Entering right concentration in the field of phenomena, Emerging from concentration in the mental organ, mind undisturbed, Explaining the mind is birthless and has no origin, By nature empty, null, and doing nothing; Entering right concentration in the body of a youth, Emerging from concentration in the body of an adult, Entering right concentration in the body of an adult, Emerging from concentration in the body of one aged, Entering right concentration in the body of one aged, Emerging from concentration in the body of a devout woman, Entering right concentration in the body of a devout woman, Emerging from concentration in the body of a devout man, Entering right concentration in the body of a devout man, Emerging from concentration in the body of a nun, Entering right concentration in the body of a nun, Emerging from concentration in the body of a monk, Entering right concentration in the body of a monk, Emerging from concentration in the body of a learner or nonlearner, Entering right concentration in the body of a learner or nonlearner, Emerging from concentration in the body of a self-enlightened one, Entering right concentration in the body of a self-enlightened one, Emerging from concentration in the body of a fully enlightened one, Entering right concentration in the body of an enlightened one, Emerging from concentration in the body of a celestial being, Entering right concentration in the body of a celestial being, Emerging from concentration in the body of a dragon, Entering right concentration in the body of a dragon, Emerging from concentration in the body of a yaksha, Entering right concentration in the body of a yaksha, Emerging from concentration in the body of a ghost, Entering right concentration in the body of a ghost, Emerging from concentration in a hair pore, Entering right concentration in one hair pore, Emerging from concentration in all hair pores, Entering right concentration in all pores, Emerging from concentration on a hairtip, Entering right concentration on a hairtip, Emerging from concentration in an atom, Entering right concentration in an atom, Emerging from right concentration in all atoms, Entering right concentration in all atoms, Emerging from concentration in diamond ground, Entering right concentration in diamond ground, Emerging from concentration on a crystal tree, Entering right concentration on a crystal tree, Emerging from concentration in Buddha’s aura, Entering right concentration in Buddha’s aura, Emerging from concentration in rivers and seas, Entering right concentration in rivers and seas, Emerging from concentration in the element fire, Entering right concentration in the element fire, Emerging from concentration in the wind, mind undisturbed, Entering right concentration in the element wind, Emerging from concentration in the element earth, Entering right concentration in the element earth, Emerging from concentration in the mansion of heaven, Entering right concentration in the mansion of heaven, Emerging from concentration in space, mind undisturbed: 
This is called the inconceivable freedom of concentration Of the one with infinite virtues, Which all the Buddhas of the ten directions Could not thoroughly expound even in countless eons. 
All the enlightened ones together explain That the consequences of beings’ actions are unthinkably many. The metamorphic emanations of the dragons, the masteries of the Buddhas, And the spiritual powers of enlightening beings are also inconceivable. Though one try to illustrate this by metaphor, After all there is no metaphor that can be likened to this; However, people of wisdom and intelligence Understand their meaning by means of similitudes. Buddha’s followers’ minds dwell in the eight liberations And the transformations they display are all freely done: 
They can manifest many bodies by one body And can make one body of many bodies. They can enter fire-concentration in space, Walking, standing, sitting, and lying, all in the sky, Producing water from the upper body and fire from the lower, Or fire from the upper body and water from the lower. In this way, in the moment of one thought, They can transform freely in innumerable ways. 
They do not fully have great compassion And do not seek buddhahood for the sake of all beings, Yet still they can manifest such inconceivable things— How much more is the power of the great benefactors, enlightening beings: Like sun and moon traveling through space, Their lights’ reflections appearing in all places, In springs, ponds, reservoirs, and water in vessels, In jewellike rivers and seas—they reflect everywhere: 
So it is with the forms of enlightening beings— They appear everywhere, inconceivably; This is all the freedom of concentration, Which only the enlightened can completely realize. 
Like the images of four armies in the ocean water, Each distinct, not merging or mixing, Their swords, spears, bows and arrows, are many and diverse, Their armor, helmets, and chariots are not the same: Whatever the differences in the forms they have, All are reflected in the water, Yet the water itself does not discriminate— The concentration of enlightening beings is also like this. 
In the ocean are spirits called “good at sound” Whose voices universally adapt to all creatures of the sea, And who completely understand all their languages And make them all joyful and happy: 
Those spirits have greed, malice, and folly, Yet they can still understand all sounds— How much more the enlightening beings’ power of mental command— Can they not cause all beings joy? 
There is a woman named Explanatory Ability Who was born through her parents’ supplication to heaven: If one can divorce evil and delight in truth, One can enter her body and engender wondrous eloquence. 
She still has desire, aversion, and ignorance, Yet can bestow elucidating powers in accord with practice— How much the more so can enlightening beings full of wisdom Bestow benefits on sentient beings. 
Like a magician who knows the ways of magic Can produce any number of various things, Make an instant seem a day, a month, a year, Produce a city rich and very happy; The magician has greed, anger, and ignorance still, Yet can delight the world with magic ability— How much the more so can the power of meditation and liberation Bring all creatures joy. 
When the gods and titans fought, The titans lost and ran away; Their armaments, chariots, and soldiers They hid at once where none could see. 
They have greed, malice, and folly, Yet are still capable of inconceivable transformations; How much the more can dwelling in fearlessness of supernormal powers Now manifest independent freedom. 
Indra, king of gods, has a royal elephant— When it knows the king wants to go somewhere, It transforms itself, creating thirty-three heads, Each head having six tusks, With the waters of seven ponds on each tusk, Clean and fragrant, pure, still and full; In the water of each pure pond Are seven lotuses in beautiful array; On each of those adorning lotus blossoms Are seven celestial jadelike maidens Skillfully dancing and playing music Entertaining Indra, king of gods. That elephant can also lose its original form And transform its body to be like that of the gods, Completely the same in bearing and action— It has this miraculous power of transformation. 
It still has greed, anger, and ignorance, Yet nonetheless can manifest such miraculous powers— How much the more is one replete with skill and knowledge Free in all states of concentration. 
Like the metamorphosed phantom body of a titan Walking on the diamond stratum, standing in the ocean, The water at the deepest part of the ocean only reaching its midriff While its head is level with the soaring polar mountain— It has greed, anger, and ignorance, Yet still can display such great wonders— How much the more does the demon-quelling Lamp that Lights the World Have awesome mystic powers at his command. 
When the gods and the titans warred King Indra’s magic power was inconceivable— However many the troops of titans were, Indra manifested as many bodies to oppose them. 
The titans had the idea “Indra is coming at us And will surely capture and bind us,” So they were all anxious and scared. Indra manifested a body with a thousand eyes, Holding thunderbolts, throwing flames, Armored, armed, and awesomely majestic; The titans, seeing this, all retreated. 
Indra, with the power of a little virtue Still could defeat a great enemy— How much more is the savior of all Replete with virtues, all at his command. 
In the heaven of happiness is a celestial drum Produced as a consequence of deeds of the gods; It knows when the gods are indulging themselves, And spontaneously produces this sound in the sky: “All objects of desire are transient, Like bubbles, foam—empty, unreal; All existents are like dreams, like mirages, Like floating clouds, the moon in the water. 
Indulgence is an enemy, a torment and a pain— It’s not the immortal way, but the path of birth and death. Any who act indulgently Will enter the mouth of the shark of death. 
As the root of all the miseries in the world, All wise people shun it. 
The qualities of objects of desire are perishable— You should take pleasure in what’s real and true.” When the gods of the thirty-three heavens hear this sound, They all go up into the hall of good teaching And Indra preaches for them the subtle teaching, Making them docile and tranquil, removing greed and craving. 
That sound is formless and cannot be seen, Yet it can benefit the celestial beings— How much the more, manifesting bodies adapting to inclinations, Can enlightening beings rescue and liberate the living. 
When the gods and titans warred, By the superior power of the gods’ virtue The celestial drum sounded, telling the hosts, “You should not worry or fear,” And the gods, hearing this declaration, Were rid of fear and increased in strength. 
Then the titans’ hearts trembled with fright And their troops all retreated and fled. The wonderful ambrosial concentration is like that heavenly drum: 
It always produces the sound of dispassion, conquering demons; Great compassion mercifully rescues all, Causing all beings to end their afflictions. 
Indra has intercourse with all the goddesses, Ninety-two trillion in number, Causing each to think to herself That the king is amusing her alone. 
As he responds to all the goddesses’ bodies, So it is in the hall of good teaching— He can instantly manifest supernatural powers And go to everyone to preach to them. 
Indra, who has greed, anger, and ignorance, Can cause all in his retinue to be happy— How much the more is skillful spiritual power Able to cause all to rejoice. 
The king of the heaven of access to others’ enjoyments Has sovereignty in the realm of desire; With habitual confusion for a snare, He captures and binds all ordinary folk. 
He has greed, anger, and ignorance, Yet has mastery over sentient beings— How much the more is the possessor of the ten independent powers Able to cause beings to act in accord. 
The great brahma king of the billion world galaxy Can appear in all the abodes Of the brahma gods and sit with them, Speaking in the subtle, pure brahma voice. 
He abides in the worldly brahma path, Yet still commands concentration and supernatural powers— How much the more so does the transcender of the world, unexcelled, Have mastery of meditation and liberation. 
The god Maheshavara’s knowledge is sovereign: When the dragons of the sea shower rain, He can count distinctly every drop, Discerning them all in a single instant: 
If one has diligently practiced and learned for countless eons And attained the supreme knowledge of enlightenment, How would such a one not be able To instantly know the minds of all beings? 
The consequences of sentient beings’ actions are inconceivably many, Being as a great wind power, producing the worlds: Vast oceans, mountains, celestial palaces, Radiance of jewels, and all sorts of things; They also can produce clouds and bring rain, And can disperse and dissolve all cloudiness, And can ripen all grains, And comfort the living. 
The wind cannot learn transcendent wisdom, Or learn the qualities of buddhahood, Yet still can perform inconceivable deeds— How much the more so one who fulfills all vows. 
The various voices of men and women, The calls of birds and beasts, The sounds of oceans, rivers, and thunder, Can all delight sentient beings’ minds— How much the more one who knows the nature of sound is like echoes, Who attains to unhindered, wonderful eloquence, And teaches the truth as appropriate to each, Is able to bring joy to the creatures of the world. 
The ocean has a special extraordinary quality— It can be an equal reflector of all; Sentient beings, precious things, rivers and streams— All it contains, prohibiting none. 
One with inexhaustible meditation, concentration, and liberation, Can also be a seal of equanimity, equally reflecting, like this; The wonderful practices of virtue and knowledge This one cultivates all without tiring. 
When the dragon kings of the ocean roam about, They are free wherever they may be, Producing clouds covering the earth, Those clouds of various decorative colors: 
In the sixth heaven, of access to others’ enjoyments, The clouds are the color of gold; In the heaven of enjoyment of emanations they’re the color of ruddy pearls; In the heaven of happiness, they’re the color of frost and snow; In the heaven of timely portion they’re the color of lapis lazuli; In the heaven of thirty-three celestial realms they’re opal colored; In the heaven of the four kings they’re crystal colored; Over the oceans, they’re diamond colored; Among kinnaras they’re incense colored; In the dragons’ abodes they’re lotus colored; Where yakshas live, the color of white geese; Among titans, the color of mountain rocks; In the region of Uttara, the color of golden flames; In Jambudvipa, the color of sapphire; In the other continents, their adornments are mixed— These are given according to the likes of the creatures. 
Also in the heaven of access to others’ enjoyments Lightning in the clouds shines like sunlight; In the heaven of enjoyment of emanations, it’s like moonlight; In the heaven of happiness, like rose gold; In the timely portion heaven, it’s the color of jadelike snow; In the thirty-threefold heaven, the color of golden flames; In the four kings’ heaven, the color of all jewels; In the ocean, the color of red pearls; In the realm of the kinnaras, the color of lapis lazuli; In the abode of dragons, the colors of a mine of jewels; Where the yakshas live, the color of crystal; Among the titans, the color of onyx; In the realm of Uttara, the color of fiery pearls; In Jambudvipa, the color of sapphires; In the other continents, the embellishments are mixed— As are the colors of the clouds, so is the lightning. 
In the heaven of access to others’ enjoyments, thunder is like the voice of Brahma; In the heaven of enjoyment of emanations, it’s like the sound of great drums; In the heaven of happiness it’s like the sound of singing; In the heaven of timely portion it’s like the voices of goddesses; In the heaven of thirty-three celestial regions It’s like the various sounds of kinnaras; In the heaven of the four world-guarding kings It’s like the sounds produced by grandharvas; In the ocean it sounds like mountains crashing together; Among the kinnaras, it’s the sound of pipes, In the castles of the dragons, it sounds like the call of kalavinka birds; In the yakshas’ abode it’s like the voices of dragon maidens; Among the titans, it sounds like a celestial drum; Among humans, it’s like the sound of the surf. 
In the heaven of free access to others’ enjoyments rain perfumes With various mixed flowers as embellishments; In the heaven of enjoyment of emanations rain cotton flowers, Mandarava flowers, and rich perfumes; In the heaven of happiness rain crystals Complete with adornments of various jewels; The jewels in the topknots there are like moonlight, The exquisite clothes worn there are the color of gold; In the heaven of time rain banners and canopies, Garlands, perfumes, and beautiful decorations, As well as excellent raiment the color of pearl And various kinds of music; In the heaven of thirty-three realms rain wish-fulfilling jewels, Solid black aloes and sandalwood fragrance, Various perfumes of heavenly flowers Raining down intermingled with each other; In the citadels of the world guardians rain delicacies With color, aroma, and flavor with strengthening power; It also rains inconceivable beautiful jewels, All made by the dragon kings. 
Also in the oceans It rains increasingly, like a whirl, And rains inexhaustible treasuries of jewels, And rains various jewel ornaments as well. In the world of kinnaras it rains necklaces, Lotuses of many colors, robes, and jewels, Flowers that grow in the rains, and golden colored flowers, With various kinds of music all included therein. 
In the castles of the dragon kings rain ruddy pearls; Among the titans it rains weapons Conquering all enemies. 
In the continent Uttara it rains necklaces And also rains innumerable exquisite flowers; In the continents Purvavideha and Aparagodaniya It rains various ornamental articles; In the continent Jambudvipa it rains pure water, Fine, refreshing, always at appropriate times, Nourishing flowers, fruits, and herbs, Ripening all the crops. 
Innumerable such beautiful adornments, Various clouds, lightning, thunder, and rain, The dragon kings can freely make Without moving their bodies, without discrimination In their world, the ocean, they dwell, Yet can manifest this inconceivable power— How much the more those who enter the ocean of truth and embody virtue Can produce great mystical transformations. 
The doors of liberation of the enlightening beings Cannot be revealed by any similes, But I have, with these metaphors, Said something of their free power. Foremost knowledge, vast wisdom, True knowledge, boundless wisdom, Extraordinary wisdom, supreme wisdom— Such a teaching has now been explained. This teaching is rare and most extraordinary; If people who have heard it can accept, Can believe, absorb, praise, and explain it, This accomplishment is to be considered most difficult. Of all the ordinary people in the world It’s hard to find one with faith in this teaching. 
To hold a galaxy on one’s head Without moving, for one eon, Is not to be considered difficult Compared to believing this teaching. To pick up ten buddha-lands in the hand And stand in space through an eon Is not to be considered hard Compared to believing this teaching. If one provides comforts for an eon To the homes of beings numerous as atoms in ten lands, His merit is not to be considered supreme— One who believes this teaching is most excellent. 
Even spending an eon serving Buddhas as many as atoms in ten lands, One’s merit will be greater, supreme, If one can recite and hold this book. 
When the enlightening being Chief in Goodness had spoken these verses, the worlds in the ten directions quaked in six ways, the palace of demons was shrouded, the realms of ill ceased; the Buddhas of the ten directions appeared before him and each patted him on the head with his right hand and praised him, saying, “Excellent! 
You incisively explain this teaching, and we all accordingly rejoice.” End of the second assembly. 
Ascent to the Peak of Mount Sumeru Then Indra, having set up this throne for the Enlightened One, bowed and joined his palms, reverently facing the Buddha, and said, “Welcome, World Honored One; welcome, Blissful One; welcome, Realized One, Perfectly Enlightened One: 
please be so compassionate as to sojourn in this palace.” Then the Buddha, accepting his invitation, entered the Hall of Surpassing Wonder. 
This also took place in the same way in all the worlds of the ten directions. 
Then, due to the Buddha’s spiritual power, all the music in the palaces spontaneously ceased, and Indra recalled to himself how he had planted roots of goodness with Buddhas of the past; he spoke in verse, saying, Kashyapa Buddha had great compassion, Supreme among the auspicious. That Buddha has come into this palace, Hence this place is most auspicious. 
Kanakamuni’s vision was unobstructd, Supreme among the auspicious. That Buddha has come into this palace, Hence this place is most auspicious. 
Krakucchanda was like a mountain of gold, Supreme among the auspicious. That Buddha has come into this palace, Hence this place is most auspicious. 
Vishvabhu Buddha was undefiled, Supreme among the auspicious. That Buddha has come into this palace, Hence this place is most auspicious. 
Shikhin Buddha was free from discrimination, Supreme among the auspicious. That Buddha has come into this palace, Hence this place is most auspicious. 
Vipashin Buddha was like a full moon, Supreme among the auspicious. That Buddha has come into this palace, Hence this place is most auspicious. 
Pushya clearly realized the ultimate truth, Supreme among the auspicious. That Buddha has come into this palace, Hence this place is most auspicious. 
Tishya Buddha’s eloquence was unhindered, Supreme among the auspicious. That Buddha has come into this palace, Hence this place is most auspicious. 
Padma Buddha was utterly pure, Supreme among the auspicious. That Buddha has come into this palace, Hence this place is most auspicious. 
Dipankara Buddha was effulgent, Supreme among the auspicious. That Buddha has come into this palace, Hence this place is most auspicious. 
As in this world the king of the thirty-threefold heaven, Indra, by the spiritual power of the Buddha, extolled the virtues of ten Buddhas, so did all the Indras in the worlds of the ten directions also praise the Buddhas’ virtues. 
Then the World Honored One entered the Hall of Surpassing Wonder and sat crosslegged: 
this hall suddenly became vastly spacious, like the dwelling places of all the celestial hosts. 
The same thing happened in all worlds in the ten directions. 
Eulogies on Mount Sumeru At that juncture the Buddha emitted a hundred thousand billion light beams of sublime hue from the toes of his feet, illumining all the worlds in the ten directions, so that the Buddhas and congregations in the palaces of the Indras atop Mt. Sumerus were all revealed. 
Then the enlightening being Wisdom of Truth, infused with spiritual power from the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said in verse, Buddha emits a pure light Showing all the Guides of the worlds Sojourning in the Halls of Wonder On the peaks of Mt. Sumerus. All of the kings of gods Invited the Buddhas into the palace, All with ten beautiful verses Praising the enlightened ones. 
Among those great assemblies The groups of enlightening beings Have come from the ten directions And sit calmly on the seats they made. 
The enlightening beings in those congregations All have the same names as we And the names of the lands they come from Are also the same as ours. 
The Buddhas of their own lands Also have the same names as ours; Each one has, with a Buddha, Purely cultivated unexcelled practices. Buddha-children, you should observe The Buddha’s power of freedom: 
In all the Jambudvipas All think the Buddha’s there. 
We now see the Buddha On top of Sumeru: It’s the same in the ten directions, By the Buddha’s power of freedom. 
In each world They determine to seek the Buddha-way, And based on such a vow Practice enlightening deeds. 
Buddha, with various bodies, Travels throughout the worlds, Unhindered in the cosmos, Beyond the ken of anyone. 
The light of his wisdom always shines everywhere, Removing all the darkness of the world; It has no compare at all: 
How can it be comprehended? Then the enlightening being Total Wisdom, infused with the power of the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said in verse, Even if one always looked at Buddha For a hundred thousand eons, Not according to the absolute truth But looking at the savior of the world, Such a person is grasping appearances And increasing the web of ignorance and delusion, Bound in the prison of birth and death, Blind, unable to see the Buddha. 
Observing all things To be without inherent existence, Whatever their appearances of origin and disappearance, Being just provisional descriptions, All things are unborn, All things are imperishable: To one who can understand this The Buddha will always be manifest. 
The nature of things is fundamentally empty and null, With no grasping and no vision. The emptiness of inherent nature is Buddha; It cannot be assessed in thought. 
If one knows the inherent nature Of all things is like this, This person will not be affected By any afflictions. 
Ordinary people seeing things Just pursue the forms And don’t realize things are formless: Because of this they don’t see Buddha. 
The Sage is detached from the realms of time, Replete with the marks of greatness, Dwelling in nondwelling, Omnipresent without moving. 
I observe all things And clearly understand them; Now I see the Buddha With certainty, free from doubt. 
Wisdom of Truth has already explained The real nature of the Enlightened; From him I have understood That enlightenment’s inconceivable. 
Then the enlightening being Supreme Wisdom, receiving power from the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said in verse, The Enlightened One’s great wisdom Is rare, beyond compare; All beings in the worlds Cannot reach it in their thoughts. Ordinary people’s deluded views Grasp forms and are not veritable. 
Buddha is beyond all forms, So not within their view. 
The deluded and unknowing Wrongly grasp the forms of the five clusters, Not understanding their true nature; Such people don’t see Buddha. 
Knowing that all things Have no inherent being of their own, Understanding the nature of things this way One will see Vairocana. 
Caused by the preceding five clusters, Succeeding clusters arise in continuum; Comprehending this nature, One sees Buddha, inconceivable. 
Just like a jewel in the dark Cannot be seen if there is no lamp, With no one to explain Buddha’s teaching Even the intelligent cannot comprehend it. 
And like an eye with cataracts Cannot see pure beautiful colors, So too the impure mind Cannot see the Buddha’s teaching. 
And as the bright clear sun Cannot be seen by the blind, Those who have no wisdom Can never see the Buddhas. 
If one can remove the eye’s cataracts And abandon the concept of form And not see in terms of things, Then one can see the Buddha. 
Total Wisdom has explained The enlightenment of the Buddhas; I, having learned from him, Have gotten to see Vairocana. 
Then the enlightening being Virtuous Wisdom, imbued with power from the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said in verse, Things have no true reality; Because of wrongly grasping them as real Do ordinary people therefore Revolve in the prison of birth and death. 
Things expressed by words Those of lesser wisdom wrongly discriminate And therefore create barriers And don’t comprehend their own minds. 
If one doesn’t comprehend one’s own mind, How can one know the right path? 
Based on misconstrued intellect They increase all evils. 
Not seeing all things are empty, Always suffering the pains of birth and death, This is because such people Cannot yet have the pure objective eye. In the past I experienced suffering Because I didn’t see Buddha. 
So one should clarify the eye of reality And see what is to be seen. 
If one can see the Buddha, One’s mind will have no grasping; Such a person can then perceive Truth as the Buddha knows it. 
If one can see Buddha’s real teaching, One is said to have great knowledge; This person has pure eyes And can see into the world. 
No view is seeing Which can see all things; If one has any views about things, This is not seeing anything. The nature of all things Has no origin and no end. How wonderful the Great Guide: 
Awakened himself, he can awaken others. 
Supreme Wisdom has explained The truth realized by the Buddhas; We, having learned from him, Can know the Buddha’s true nature. 
Then the enlightening being Vigorous Wisdom, receiving power from the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said in verse, If one dwells on discrimination, One ruins the eye of purity; Ignorant, false views increase, And one never sees the Buddha. 
If one can understand falsehood As it is, without delusion, And know the basis of delusion is itself reality, One’s perception of Buddha will be pure. 
If there are views, this is defilement; This is not yet to be considered seeing. By dismissing all views Can one thus see Buddha. 
Things spoken of in conventional terms People wrongly conceptualize; Knowing the world is all birthless: 
This is seeing the world. If one sees seeing the world, This seeing is a feature of the world; In reality they’re equal, no different: This is called true insight. 
Such vision is free from delusions: Without indulgence, it’s free. 
All the different things Pointed out by the Buddhas Are impossible to apprehend Because their nature’s pure. 
The nature of things is fundamentally pure; Like space, it has no marks. Nothing at all can explain it: This do the wise observe. 
Divorcing the concept of things, Not indulging in anything, And not even cultivating this, One can see the great Sage. 
As Virtuous Wisdom explained, This is called one who sees Buddha; All the actions there be Are all inherently nil. 
Then the enlightening being Good Wisdom, infused with Buddha’s power, looked over the ten directions and said in verse, Extraordinary, the great beings, The countless enlightened ones Are free from taint, their minds are free; Self-liberated, they can liberate others. 
I see the Lamps of the Worlds As they are, without delusion, As one who has accumulated knowledge Over eons can see. 
The acts of ordinary people All soon pass away; Their nature is like space, So said to be without end. 
When the wise speak of endlessness, This is still not saying anything; Because inherent nature is endless, It can have an inconceivable end. 
In the endlessness spoken of There are no beings to be found; Knowing the nature of things is thus, One will see the Honored One. 
No view is called seeing, The birthless is called beings; Whether views or beings, Knowing they’ve no substantial nature, The seer dismisses entirely The subject and object of seeing; Not destroying reality, This person knows the Buddha. 
If one knows the Buddha And the truth the Buddha tells, One can illumine the world Like Buddha Vairocana does. 
The truly enlightened point out well The pure road of one truth; The great being Vigorous Wisdom Expounds innumerable teachings: 
Whether of existence or nonexistence, His conceptions are all removed: Thus he can see the Buddha And abide in reality. 
Then the enlightening being Knowing Wisdom, imbued with power from the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said in verse, Hearing the supreme teaching, I produce the light of wisdom Illumining all worlds everywhere, Seeing all the Buddhas. Herein there’s not the slightest thing: 
Only provisional names; Those who think there’s self and person Enter a dangerous path due to this. 
People who grasp and cling Think the body really exists: The Buddha is not something grasped, So they never get to see. 
These people lack the eye of wisdom And cannot see the Buddha, Circulating in the sea of birth and death Through uncountable eons. 
Contention is called birth-and-death, Noncontention is nirvana: Birth-and-death and nirvana Both cannot be grasped. 
If one pursues provisional names And grasp these two things One is not in accord with reality And doesn’t know the Sage’s subtle path. 
If one produces such conceptions— “This is Buddha, this is supreme”— One is deluded—this is not real truth; Thus one cannot see true awakening. 
If one can know this real body’s Quiescent character of true thusness, One can see the truly enlightened Transcending the path of speech. 
Things expressed in words Cannot disclose the character of reality; Only through equanimity can one see Things, including the Buddha. 
The Truly Enlightened in the past The future, and the present, Forever sever the root of discriminiation— That’s why they’re called Buddha. 
Then the enlightening being True Wisdom, empowered by the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said in verse. I’d rather suffer the pains of hell While able to hear the name of Buddha Than to experience boundless pleasure Without hearing the name of Buddha. 
The reason for suffering in the past Over countless eons Revolving within birth and death Is due to not hearing the name of Buddha. 
Not deluded about things, Realizing them as they truly are, Detached from all compounded forms: This is called unsurpassed awakening. 
The present is not compounded, Nor are the past and future; All things have no signs: This is the real body of Buddha. 
If one can see this way The profound truth of things, Then one can see all Buddhas’ Reality-body in its true aspect. Seeing what’s true as true And what’s not true as untrue: Such ultimate understanding Is the reason for the name of Buddha. 
Buddha’s truth cannot be perceived; Realizing this is called perceiving truth. The Buddhas practice this way: Nothing can be grasped. 
Knowing they are many because one And one because many, Realize all things have no basis And only arise from compounding. 
There is no creator or created: 
How can we know it is so? Because other than this naught is. All things have no abode: No definite locus can be found; The Buddhas abide in this, Ultimately unwavering. 
Then the enlightening being Unexcelled Wisdom, receiving Buddha’s power, looked over the ten directions and said in verse, The unexcelled great beings Dismiss the concept of creatures. None can surpasss them, That’s why they’re called unexcelled. 
The sphere attained by the Buddhas Has no fabrication and no discrimination; The gross has no existence, And neither does the fine. 
The realms accessible to Buddhas Are innumerable therein; True awareness is detached from numbers: This is the Buddhas’ true teaching. 
Buddha’s light shines everywhere, Destroying all darkness and gloom; This light neither has radiance Nor does not have radiance. 
It has no attachment to things, No thought and no defilement, No abode and no location, And does not destroy the nature of things. 
Herein there is no dualism, Yet neither is there oneness; One who sees well with great knowledge Skillfully abides according to truth. 
No mean and no duality, And not even any nonduality: All in the worlds is void— This is the vision of the Buddhas. 
People with no awakened understanding Buddha makes abide in the truth. 
All things have no abode— Understanding this, one sees one’s own body Is not a body, yet said to be so; Is not born yet manifests birth: No body and no view— This is the unexcelled Buddha-body. 
Thus has True Wisdom explained The nature of Buddhas’ subtle teaching; Any who hear this teaching Will attain the pure eye. 
Then the enlightening being Stable Wisdom, empowered by the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said in verse, How grand, the Great Light, The vigorous Unsurpassed Hero, Who appears in the world To help the confused. 
The Buddha observes all beings With a heart of great compassion, Seeing them in the three realms of existence Suffering over and over. 
Except for the Truly Enlightened, The honored Guide, full of virtue, There is none who can rescue All human and heavenly beings. 
If the Buddhas and enlightening beings Did not appear in the world, There would not be a single creature Who could have peace and ease. 
The Buddha, rightly awakened, As well as the sages and saints, Appear in the world, Able to bestow happiness on beings. 
If someone sees the Buddha, That is gaining great benefit; Hearing the name Buddha and developing faith Is a monument in the world. 
We see the World Honored Ones And consider it a great boon; Hearing such a wonderful teaching, We all shall attain enlightenment. 
The enlightening beings, in the past, By the spiritual power of Buddha, Attained the pure eye of wisdom And perceived the realms of the Buddhas. 
Now we see Vairocana And grow doubly in pure faith. 
Buddha’s knowledge is boundless And cannot be fully explained. 
Even if the enlightening beings Such as Supreme Wisdom, and I, Stable Wisdom, Were to speak for countless eons, We could not tell it all. 
The Ten Abodes Then the Buddhas gave the enlightening being Truth Wisdom unhindered knowledge, unattached knowledge, unbroken knowledge, knowledge free from ignorance, unvarying knowledge, knowledge without loss, immeasurable knowledge, unexcelled knowledge, unremitting knowledge, and knowledge that cannot be taken away. 
Because the power of this concentration is naturally this way in principle. 
Now the Buddhas all extended their right hands and rubbed Truth Wisdom’s head; then the enlightening being Truth Wisdom emerged from concentration and declared to the enlightening beings, “Children of Buddhas, the abode of enlightening beings is vast, as vast as the space of the cosmos. 
Enlightening beings dwell in the house of the Buddhas of past, present, and future. 
The abodes of enlightening beings I shall now explain. Buddha-children, there are ten kinds of abodes of enlightening beings, which the past, future, and present Buddhas have explained, will explain, and do explain. 
What are the ten? 
They are the abode of initial determination; the abode of preparing the ground; the abode of practice action; the abode of noble birth; the abode of fulfillment of skill in means; the abode of the correct state of mind; the abode of nonregression; the abode of youthful nature; the abode of prince of the teaching; the abode of coronation. 
These are called the ten abodes of enlightening beings, expounded by the Buddhas of past, future, and present. 
“What is the enlightening beings’ abode of initial determination? 
The enlightening beings, seeing the magnificence of the Buddhas, which people like to see, rarely encountered, having great power; or seeing their spiritual powers, or hearing predictions of enlightenment, or listening to their teachings and instructions, or seeing sentient beings suffering severe pains, or hearing the far-reaching teaching of enlightenment of the Buddhas, develop the determination for enlightenment, to seek omniscience. 
The enlightening beings arouse determination with ten difficult-to-attain objectives: 
the knowledge of what is so and what is not; knowledge of consequences of good and bad actions; knowledge of superiority and inferiority of faculties; knowledge of the differences of various understandings; knowledge of the differences of various realms; knowledge of where all paths lead; knowledge of all meditations, liberations, and concentrations; knowledge of past lives; clairvoyance; knowledge of the universal end of indulgence for all time. 
Here the enlightening beings should encourage and study ten things: 
diligently making offerings to the Buddhas; gladly remaining in the world; guiding worldly people to reject evil deeds; always carrying on instruction by means of the most sublime teaching; praising the unexcelled teaching; learning the virtues of buddhahood; being born in the presence of Buddhas and always being received into their company; expediently expounding tranquil concentration; extolling detachment from the cycle of birth and death; being a refuge for suffering beings. 
What is the reason? 
To cause enlightening beings’ minds to broaden in the Buddha’s teaching and to be able to understand whatever teaching they hear without depending on another’s instruction. 
“What is the enlightening beings’ abode of preparing the ground? 
Here the enlightening beings develop ten attitudes toward all living beings: 
altruism; compassion; wish to give happiness; wish to give security; pity; care; protecting; identification; considering them as teachers; considering them as guides. 
Here the enlightening beings should encourage and study ten things: 
study and learning; uncluttered tranquility; association with the wise; gentle, pleasing speech; speech appropriate to the occasion; fearlessness; understanding; acting in accord with the teaching; avoiding folly and delusion; stability. 
What is the reason? 
To cause enlightening beings to increase great compassion toward sentient beings, and to immediately understand whatever teachings they hear without relying on the instruction of another. 
“What is the enlightening beings’ abode of practice? 
Here enlightening beings contemplate all things through ten practices: 
observing that all things are impermanent, all things are painful, all things are empty, all things are selfless, all things have no creation, all things are flavorless, all things do not correspond to the names, all things have no locus, all things are apart from discrimination, all things lack stable solidity. 
Here the enlightening beings should encourage and study ten things: 
observing the realms of sentient beings, the realms of phenomena and principles, and the realms of the world; observing the elements of earth, water, fire, and air; observing the realms of desire, form, and formlessness. 
What is the reason? 
To cause enlightening beings’ knowledge to be perfectly clear, so they can immediately understand any teaching they hear without depending on the instruction of another. 
“What is the enlightening beings’ abode of noble birth? 
Here the enlightening beings are born from the wise teaching and perfect ten things: 
never regressing from the presence of the Buddhas; profoundly engendering pure faith; carefully examining things; thoroughly knowing living beings, lands, worlds, actions, consequences, birth and death, and nirvana. 
Here the enlightening beings should encourage and study ten things: 
knowing all past, future, and present Buddhas’ teachings; practicing and accumulating all past, future, and present Buddhas’ teachings; fulfilling all past, future, and present Buddhas’ teachings; and knowing that all Buddhas are equal. 
What is the reason? 
To cause progress in equanimity in respect to past, present, and future, and to be able to understand any teaching heard without relying on the instruction of another. 
“What is the enlightening beings’ abode of fulfilling skill in means? 
Here the roots of goodness cultivated by the enlightening beings are all to save all sentient beings, to benefit all sentient beings, to cause all sentient beings to be free from calamities and difficulties, to cause all sentient beings to leave the miseries of birth and death, to cause all sentient beings to develop pure faith, to cause all sentient beings to be harmonized and pacified, to cause all sentient beings to experience nirvana. 
Here the enlightening beings should encourage and learn ten things: 
to know sentient beings are boundless, to know sentient beings are infinite, to know sentient beings are countless, to know sentient beings are inconceivable, to know sentient beings’ infinite forms, to know sentient beings are immeasurable, to know sentient beings are empty, to know sentient beings create nothing, to know sentient beings possess nothing, to know sentient beings have no identity. 
What is the reason? 
To cause the mind to increase in mastery and have no attachments, and to immediately understand any teaching heard without depending on the instruction of another. 
“What is the enlightening beings’ abode of the correct state of mind? 
Here the enlightening being’s mind is steady and unwavering even when hearing these ten things: 
hearing the Buddha praised or reviled, the mind is steady and unwavering in regard to the Buddha’s teaching; hearing the teaching praised or reviled, the mind is steady and unwavering in regard to the Buddha’s teaching; hearing enlightening beings praised or reviled, the mind is steady and unwavering in regard to the Buddha’s teaching; hearing the practices of enlightening beings praised or reviled, the mind is steady and unwavering in regard to the Buddha’s teaching; hearing it said that living beings are finite or infinite, the mind is steady and unwavering in regard to the Buddha’s teaching; hearing it said that sentient beings are defiled or undefiled, the mind is steady and unwavering in regard to the Buddha’s teaching; hearing it said that sentient beings are easy to liberate or difficult to liberate, the mind is steady and unwavering in regard to the Buddha’s teaching; hearing it said that there is becoming or disintegration of the universe, the mind is steady and unwavering in regard to the Buddha’s teaching; hearing it said that the universe exists or does not exist, the mind is steady and unwavering in regard to the Buddha’s teaching. 
Here the enlightening being should study and encourage the study of ten things: 
that all things are signless; all things are insubstantial; all things cannot be cultivated; all things have no existence; all things have no true reality; all things are empty; all things lack inherent nature; all things are like illusions; all things are like dreams; all things have no discrimination. 
What is the reason? 
To cause the mind to progress further to attain nonregressing acceptance of the nonorigination of things, and immediately understand whatever teaching is heard, without depending on the instruction of another. 
“What is the enlightening beings’ abode of nonregression? 
Here the enlightening being remains firm and doesn’t regress even when hearing these ten things: 
hearing that Buddhas do or do not exist, the mind does not regress in the Buddha’s teaching; hearing that truth exists or does not exist, the mind does not regress in the Buddha’s teaching; hearing that enlightening beings do or do not exist, the mind does not regress in the Buddha’s teaching; hearing that enlightening beings’ practices do or do not exist, the mind does not regress in the Buddha’s teaching; hearing that enlightening beings do or do not attain emancipation through their practices, the mind does not regress in the Buddha’s teaching; hearing that there were or were not Buddhas in the past, the mind does not regress in the Buddha’s teaching; hearing that there will or will not be Buddhas in the future, the mind does not regress in the Buddha’s teaching; hearing there are or are not Buddhas in the present, the mind does not regress in the Buddha’s teaching; hearing that a Buddha’s knowledge is finite or infinite, the mind does not regress in the Buddha’s teaching; hearing that past, present, and future are uniform or not uniform, the mind does not regress in the Buddha’s teaching. 
Here the enlightening being should encourage and study ten far-reaching principles: 
explaining one is many; explaining many are one; literary expression according with meaning; meaning according with literary expression; nonexistence is existence; existence is nonexistence; formless is form; form is formlessness; nature is natureless; naturelessness is nature. 
What is the reason? 
To progress further, to be able to gain emancipation from all things, to understand any teaching without relying on another’s instruction. 
“What is the enlightening beings’ abode of youthful nature? 
Here the enlightening being abides in ten kinds of activity: 
physically acting without error; verbally acting without error; mentally acting without error; being born at will; knowing the various desires of sentient beings; knowing the various understandings of sentient beings; knowing the various realms of sentient beings; knowing the various activities of sentient beings; knowing the becoming and decay of the world; going anywhere freely by psychic projection. 
Here the enlightening being should encourage and study ten kinds of things: 
knowing all buddha-lands; activating all buddha-lands, maintaining all buddha-lands; observing all buddha-lands; visiting all buddha-lands; traveling in countless worlds; receiving innumerable teachings of Buddhas; manifesting a body with freedom to metamorphose; producing a far-reaching, universal voice; serving and providing for countless Buddhas in a single instant. 
What is the reason? 
To advance in skillfulness in applying teachings, to be able to understand any teaching without depending on another’s instructions. 
“What is the enlightening beings’ abode as the prince of the teaching? 
Here enlightening beings know ten things well: 
they know how sentient beings are born; they know the origin of afflictions; they know the continuation of habit energy; they know what techniques are to be employed; they know innumerable teachings; they understand all modes of dignified behavior; they know the differentiations of the world; they know past and future events; they know how to explain conventional truth; they know how to explain ultimate truth. 
Here the enlightening beings should study and encourage the study of ten things: 
the skills proper to a king of the teaching; the regulations and manners proper to a king of the teaching; the abode of a king of the teaching; that which a king of the teaching enters into; the contemplations proper to a king of the teaching; the coronation of a king of the teaching; the power and sustenance of a king of the teaching; the fearlessness of a king of the teaching; the repose of a king of the teaching; the praise of a king of the teaching. 
What is the reason? 
To promote progress in nonobstruction of mind, to understand any teaching spontaneously without relying on the instruction of another. 
“What is the enlightening beings’ abode of coronation? 
Here the enlightening being perfects ten kinds of knowledge: 
shaking countless worlds; illuminating countless worlds; supporting countless worlds; traveling to countless worlds; purifying countless worlds; teaching countless sentient beings; observing countless sentient beings; knowing the faculties of countless sentient beings; causing countless sentient beings to strive to enter enlightenment; causing countless sentient beings to be harmonized and pacified. 
This enlightening being’s body and physical activities, various manifestations of spiritual powers, past, future, and present knowledge, development of a buddha-land, state of mind, and realm of knowledge are all unknowable: 
even an enlightening being in the station of prince of the teaching cannot know them. 
Here the enlightening being should promote and study ten kinds of knowledge proper to Buddhas: 
knowledge of past, present, and future; knowledge of enlightening teachings; knowledge of the harmony of the universe; knowledge of the boundlessness of the universe; knowledge filling all worlds; knowledge illumining all worlds; knowledge supporting all worlds; knowledge of all sentient beings; knowledge of all things; knowledge of the infinite Buddhas. 
What is the reason? 
To increase in knowledge of all particulars and all means of liberation and spontaneously understand any teaching without depending on the instruction of another.” Then, due to the spiritual power of the Buddha, in each of the ten directions as many worlds as atoms in ten thousand buddha-lands quaked in six ways; there rained celestial flowers, celestial incense powder, celestial garlands, celestial perfumes, celestial jewel raiment, celestial jewel clouds, celestial ornaments; celestial music spontaneously played, with radiant lights and exquisite sounds. 
As in this world on the peak of Mt. Sumeru, in the palace of King Indra, the ten abodes were expounded and supernatural manifestations appeared, so also did the same thing transpire in all worlds. 
And due to the spiritual power of the Buddha, in the ten directions, past as many worlds as atoms in ten thousand buddha-lands, there were as many enlightening beings as atoms in ten buddha-lands who came here, filling the ten directions, and said these words: “Excellent, excellent! O Child of Buddha, you have explained this teaching well. 
We too all have the same name, Truth Wisdom, and the lands we come from are all called Truth Cloud, and the Buddhas in those lands are all named Sublime Truth. 
In the presence of our Buddhas we too expound the ten abodes, and the congregations and followings, the words and phrases, the doctrines and principles, are all like this, with no addition or omission. 
Receiving spiritual power from the Buddha, we have come into this assembly to be witnesses for you. 
As it is in this assembly, so it is in all the worlds there are in the ten directions.” Then the enlightening being Truth Wisdom, imbued with the power of the Buddha, looked over the ten directions, throughout the cosmos, and spoke these verses: 
Seeing the subtle body of the Supremely Wise, Replete with adorning marks and refinements, So honorable and rare to meet, Enlightening beings boldly make their resolve. 
Seeing incomparable great spiritual powers, Hearing tell of mind-reading and appropriate teaching, And the immeasurable sufferings of mundane beings, Enlightening beings thereby first become determined. 
Hearing the Enlightened Ones, universally supremely honored, Have perfected all meritorious and virtuous qualities, Like space, not discriminating, Thereby do enlightening beings develop resolve. 
The causes and effects of past, present, and future are called what is so; The inherent nature of self and phenomena is called what is not so. Wanting to know the genuine truth Do enlightening beings therefore arouse their will. 
All the good and evil deeds there be In past, future, and present worlds Do they want to know completely; Therefore enlightening beings are determined. 
All meditations, liberations, and concentrations, Defiled and pure, of countless kinds, They want to know all—entry, abiding, and exit; Therefore do enlightening beings arouse their aspiration. 
According to the sharpness or dullness of beings’ faculties, So are their powers of effort also various; Wanting to understand and know them all distinctly, Do enlightening beings therefore arouse determination. 
Sentient beings have various understandings And their mental inclinations are each different: Wanting to know all these innumerable inclinations Do enlightening beings therefore arouse their will. 
The realms of sentient beings are each different; There is no measure to all the worlds there are: Wanting to know completely their substance and nature Do enlightening beings rouse their aspiration. 
The paths of all fabricated actions Each have a destination; Wanting to know the true nature of all Do enlightening beings rouse their determination. 
The sentient beings of all worlds Bob and flow according to their deeds, without cease; Wanting to attain the celestial eye to see them all Do enlightening beings rouse their will. 
Such constitutions and such characteristics As there were in past ages They want to know, as former lives, So enlightening beings arouse aspiration. 
The continuity, appearance, and habit energy Of the binding delusions of all sentient beings They want to know thoroughly and finally, So enlightening beings thus rouse their will. 
Of all the various philosophies and theories Which sentient beings may set up They want to know the worldly truth, So enlightening beings thus rouse determination. 
All things are beyond speech— Their nature is empty, null, and creates nothing: Wishing to clearly arrive at this truth Do enlightening beings therefore rouse their will. 
Wanting to shake the worlds of the ten directions And overturn all the oceans, Fulfilling the great spiritual powers of the Buddhas, Do enlightening beings rouse determination. 
Wanting to emit lights from a single pore That will illumine infinite lands in the ten directions, In each light awakening all, Do enlightening beings therefore rouse aspiration. 
Wanting to take inconceivably many buddha-lands And put them in their palms, without moving, Comprehending all is like magic illusions, So enlightening beings rouse their determination. 
Wanting to take the beings of innumerable lands And put them on a hairtip without crowding, Knowing all have no person and no self, Therefore do enlightening beings arouse their will. 
Wanting to take drops from the ocean on a hair So as to dry up all the oceans While specifically knowing the number of drops, Therefore do enlightening beings rouse their aspiration. 
Reducing entirely to dust Inconceivable numbers of worlds, Wanting to know distinctly the number of particles Do enlightening beings arouse their will. 
Wanting to comprehend exhaustively The signs of becoming and decay of all worlds In countless eons past and future Do enlightening beings rouse their aspiration. 
Wanting to know all the teachings Of all the Buddhas of all times, All self-enlightened ones and Buddhas’ disciples, Do enlightening beings rouse their determination. 
Wanting to pick up with a single hair Countless, boundless worlds And know their substances and forms as they are, Do enlightening beings rouse their will. 
Wanting to put in a pore Countless mountain chains And know their sizes as they are Do enlightening beings rouse their aspiration. 
Wanting to preach appropriately to all kinds of beings ever With the single subtle voice of tranquility and peace And cause them all to purely, clearly comprehend, Do enlightening beings rouse their determination. 
To utter in a single word What is spoken by all sentient beings: Wanting to know all their inherent natures Do enlightening beings rouse their will. Producing all spoken sounds of the worlds To make all realize peaceful dispassion: 
Wanting to attain such a marvelous tongue Do enlightening beings rouse their aspiration. 
Wanting to cause all to see The signs of becoming and decay of all worlds And know they are born of conceptions Do enlightening beings rouse their determination. 
All worlds in the ten directions Are filled with countless Buddhas; Wanting to know all the teachings of those Buddhas Do enlightening beings arouse their will. 
Countless bodies of various transformations, Numerous as atoms in all worlds: Wanting to comprehend they all come from mind Do enlightening beings rouse this determination. 
Wanting to know in a single thought The measureless, countless Buddhas Of past, future, and present worlds Do enlightening beings rouse this aspiration. 
Wanting to expound the one phrase teaching For incalculable eons without exhausting it Yet have the expressions and nuances be each different Do enlightening beings therefore arouse this will. 
Wanting to know in a single thought The signs of cylic births and deaths Of all sentient beings everywhere Do enlightening beings rouse their aspiration. 
Wanting to go everywhere unhindered Through physical, verbal, and mental action And comprehend all times are empty and null Do enlightening beings rouse determination. 
Having thus determined to become enlightened They should be made to go to all lands To honor and provide for the Enlightened Ones, Whereby to cause them not to regress. 
Enlightening beings bravely seeking the Buddha-way Stay in birth and death unwearied For others extolling what will make them follow the way And thus cause them never to regress. 
Being honorable leaders in countless lands In the worlds of the ten directions, Teach like this for the enlightening beings Whereby to cause them not to regress. 
The supreme, the highest, the foremost, Profound and subtle purest teaching, Urge enlightening beings to teach to people Whereby to cause them to be rid of afflictions. 
The unshakable realm of victory, Peerless in all the worlds, Always extols for other enlightening beings To cause them not to regress. 
Buddha is the great powerful leader of the world, Replete with all merits and virtues, Causing enlightening beings to abide herein, Thereby teaching them to be superior people. 
To countless, boundless Buddhas’ places They can go and draw near, Always taken in to the company of Buddhas, Thus causing them not to regress. 
To destroy the wheels of birth and death And turn the wheel of the pure wonderous teaching Without attachment to any world: Such is the teaching for enlightening beings. 
All sentient beings fall into evil ways Bound and oppressed by measureless pains: To be saviors and reliances for them Is the teaching for enlightening beings. 
This is enlightening beings’ abode of initial determination: With single-minded will seeking the unexcelled path; As is the teaching of which I speak, So is the teaching of all the Buddhas. In the second abode, of preparing the ground, Enlightening beings should form this thought: 
“All sentient beings everywhere I vow to induce to follow the Buddhas’ teaching.” With a mind to aid them, with compassion, to give them peace and ease, To establish them securely, with sympathy and acceptance, Protecting sentient beings, looking upon them as the same as themselves, As teachers and as guides— Once abiding in these sublime states of mind Next they are directed to study and learn, To always enjoy peace and quiet and right meditation, And draw near to all good associates. 
Speaking gently, with no roughness or harshness, Always speaking appropriately to the situation, without fear, Comprehending the meaning of the teaching and acting in accord, Leaving ignorance and delusion behind, the mind unmoving: 
This is the practice of beginning study for enlightenment; Those who can do these things are true children of the Buddhas. 
I now explain what they should practice; Thus should Buddha-children diligently study: 
In the third abode of enlightening beings, practice, They should earnestly contemplate, according to Buddha’s teaching, The impermanence, painfulness, and emptiness of all things, The absence of self, person, and activity. 
All things cannot be enjoyed, None accord with their names, they have no location, There’s nothing of what is conceived, no true reality in them: Those who contemplate thus are called enlightening beings. 
Next they are made to observe the realms of sentient beings And urged to contemplate the elemental cosmos: All the various differentiations of the worlds They all should be urged to contemplate and observe. 
The worlds of the ten directions, and space, Their earth, water, fire, and air, The realms of desire, form, and formlessness, They are exhorted to investigate thoroughly. 
Examining the individual distinctions of those realms, Their substances and natures, exhaustively, Receiving this teaching, diligently cultivating its practice, Is what is called being true Buddha-children. 
Enlightening beings in the fourth abode, noble birth, Are born from the teachings of the sages; Comprehending that existents have no existence, They transcend things and are born in the realm of reality. 
Their faith in Buddha is firm and unbreakable, Their dispassionate mind contemplating things is at peace. Whatever beings there be, they comprehend all Are essentially false, without true reality. 
Worlds, lands, actions and rewards, Birth, death, and nirvana are all like this: Buddha-children, contemplating things this way, Are born from Buddha-parents and called Buddha-children. 
To know the accumulation and fulfillment Of all the Buddhas’ teachings In past, present, and future worlds, Thus they study, to the ultimate end. 
All the enlightened ones of past, present, and future They can contemplate, all equal, In which various distinctions cannot be found: Those who meditate thus comprehend the three time frames. 
If any can practice diligently, according to the teaching, The virtues of this fourth abode Such as I am now extolling, They will soon accomplish unsurpassed enlightenment. 
From here, enlightening beings of the fifth abode, Called the abode of fulfilling skill in means, Enter deeply into infinite expedient skills, Developing ultimate virtuous action. 
The virtues produced by enlightening beings Are all to rescue living beings: Dedicated to aiding and comforting them, They wholeheartedly pity them and liberate them. 
Removing difficulties for all beings, Drawing them out of existences, making them happy, They pacify all, leaving none out, Making them all turn to nirvana, full of virtue. 
Enlightening beings accept this teaching of the Buddha. These Buddha-children in the fifth abode Develop skillful means to liberate sentient beings; The Saint of Great Knowledge, with all virtues, Enlightens them with teachings like this. 
In the sixth abode, the fulfillment of right mindfulness, There is no confusion about the inherent nature of things; Meditating with right mindfulness, detaching from discrimination, One cannot be moved by any god or man. 
Hearing praise or slander of the Buddhas or their teachings, Of enlightening beings and the practices they perform, Or that sentient beings are finite or infinite, Defiled or undefiled, easy or hard to liberate, Or that the cosmos is great or small, becomes or decays, Or exists or does not, the mind is unmoved: 
Past, future, and present, Thinking clearly, always sure; All things are signless, Insubstantial, without inherent nature, empty, unreal, Like illusions, like dreams, beyond conception: They always delight in hearing such doctrines. 
Enlightening beings of the seventh abode of nonregression Never regress in spite of whatever they hear About Buddhas, the Teaching, or enlightening beings— Whether or not they exist, whether or not they escape, Whether or not there are Buddhas Past, present, and future, Whether Buddha-knowledge is finite or infinite, Whether the past, present, and future are uniform or various. 
One is many, many are one; Expression follows meaning, meaning follows expression; Thus do all interdependently become: This is what those who don’t regress should explain. 
Whether things have signs or are signless, Whether they have inherent nature or not; Various distinctions subsume each other: These people, hearing this, attain the ultimate. 
Enlightening beings in the eight abode, youthful nature, Fulfill physical, verbal, and mental actions All pure, without mistakes; They are freely born as they will And know the inclination of sentient beings, Their various understandings, each different, And all the factors involved therein And the signs of becoming and decay of all lands. 
Attaining to wondrous psychic powers of swiftness, They go anywhere as soon as they think of it: Listening to the teachings from various Buddhas, They praise and practice unflagging. 
They comprehend all Buddha-lands, Shaking, supporting, and contemplating, Going beyond incalculable buddha-lands, They travel in worlds without number, To ask about innumerable principles; Free to take on any physical form, Their skill in speech pervades everywhere As they serve countless Buddhas. 
Enlightening beings in the ninth abode, of the prince, Can see the difference in births of sentient beings; Knowing their afflictions and habits, They understand which techniques to employ. 
Individual differences in teachings and in modes of bearing, Dissimilarities of worlds, past and future times, In accord with their conventional and ultimate realities, All they know completely, leaving none out. 
The skillful set-ups of kings of the teaching, The doctrines they establish according to the situation, The palaces of kings of teaching and their entries As well as what is seen therein, The laws of coronation of the kings of teaching, Their spiritual capacities, empowerments, and fearlessnesses, Their rooms of repose, as well as their praises— With these they instruct the princes of the teaching, Explaining all this for them, exhaustively, And causing their minds to have no attachments; As they comprehend this and cultivate right mindfulness, All the Buddhas appear before them. 
True Buddha-kings of the tenth abode of coronation Fulfill the unexcelled, foremost teaching. 
All the countless worlds in the ten directions They can cause to quake, and illumine with their light, Maintaining and traveling to all without exception, Fully purifying and adorning them all. 
They teach sentient beings without number, Observing and knowing their faculties completely, Inspiring and training boundless beings too, Causing them all to turn to great enlightenment. Observing all phenomenal realms, They travel to all lands in the ten directions: 
Their embodiments and physical actions there, Their spiritual powers and metamorphoses, are unfathomable. The realms of lands of the Buddhas of all times Even the princes of the teaching cannot understand: 
The knowledge of all times of the all-seeing, Knowledge understanding all Buddhas’ teachings, Unhindered, boundless knowledge of the realm of realities, Knowledge filling all worlds, Supporting knowledge illumining the world, Knowledge comprehending the states of all beings, And the boundless knowledge of true awakening The Buddhas explain for them, so they will consummate them. 
Thus the enlightening beings of the ten abodes Are all born by transformation from the teachings of the enlightened; Their practices according to the virtues they have No humans or gods are able to fathom. 
In past, future, and present worlds, boundless are those Who set their minds to attain buddhahood; They fill all lands in the ten directions, All determined to become omniscient. 
Boundless is the totality of all lands; Boundless too are the states of worlds and beings, Their delusions, actions, and inclinations each different: Due to them enlightening beings aspire to enlightenment. 
The very first thought to seek buddhahood Worldlings, or even those Of the two vehicles cannot know— Much less the other virtuous practices. 
If one can lift with a single hair All the worlds in the ten directions, One can know these Buddha-children’s Progression toward the wisdom of the enlightened ones. 
If one can drain by drops with a hair The waters of all oceans in the ten directions, One can know the virtuous deeds Practiced by these Buddha-children in a single instant. 
If one can reduce all worlds to dust And know the specific number of each mote, Such a person alone can see The path traversed by these Buddha-children. 
The Buddhas of all places and times, All self-enlightened ones and Buddhas’ disciples, All with various powers of elucidation Illustrate the mind first bent on enlightenment. The virtues of this aspiration cannot be measured: 
If all the knowledges filling all realms of beings Were to explain together, they could not exhaust it, Much less the rest of the wondrous practices carried out. 
Religious Practice Truth Wisdom said, “Great enlightening beings, when performing religious practice, should attentively contemplate ten things objectively: 
the body, physical action, speech, verbal action, mind, mental action, Buddha, the Teaching, the religious community, and the precepts. They should contemplate in this way: Is the body religious practice? 
And so on, down to: Are precepts religious practice? 
If the body were religious practice, then religious practice would be not good, it would not be the true teaching, it would be defiled, it would be impure, it would be foul, it would be unclean, it would be disgusting, it would be intractable, it would be defined, it would be a corpse, it would be a mass of microbes. 
If physical action were religious practice, then religious practice would be walking, standing, sitting, lying down, looking around, up and down. 
If speech were religious practice, then religious practice would be sound and breath, chest, tongue, lips, exhalation and inhalation, constriction and relaxation, high and low, clear and unclear. 
If verbal activity were religious practice, then religious practice would be greetings, summary explanations, extensive explanations, metaphorical explanations, direct explanations, praise, criticism, definitions, explanations accommodated to conventions, clear explanations. 
If the mind were religious practice, then religious practice would be consideration and pondering, discrimination, various discriminations, conception, various conceptions, thought, various thoughts, acts of illusion and dreams. 
If mental activity were religious practice, then religious practice would be ideas, cold and heat, hunger and thirst, pain and pleasure, sorrow and joy. 
If Buddha is religious practice, is material form to be considered Buddha? Is sensation Buddha? 
Is conception Buddha? 
Is action Buddha? 
Are spiritual powers Buddha? Are works Buddha? Are resulting consequences Buddha? 
If the Teaching is religious practice, is extinction the Teaching? 
Is nirvana the Teaching? Is nonbirth the Teaching? Is nonorigination the Teaching? 
Is inexplicability the Teaching? 
Is nondiscrimination the Teaching? 
Is nonaction the Teaching? 
Is nonconjunction the Teaching? 
If the Community is religious practice, is heading for stream-entering the Community? Is the fruit of stream-entering the Community? Is heading for the state of once-returner the Community? 
Is the fruit of once-returner the Community? 
Is heading for the state of nonreturner the Community? 
Is the fruit of nonreturner the Community? 
Is heading for sainthood the Community? 
Is the fruit of sainthood the Community? Are those with the three super-knowledges the Community? 
Are those with the six paranormal powers the Community? 
If the precepts are religious practice, is the ordination altar the precepts? 
Is asking about purity the precepts? 
Is teaching proper manners the precepts? 
Is the threefold repetition the precepts? Is the instructor the precepts? Is the tutor the precepts? 
Is shaving off the hair the precepts? Is putting on the monastic garb the precepts? Is begging the precepts? Is right livelihood the precepts? 
“Having contemplated thus, having no attachment to the body, no clinging to practice, no dwelling on doctrine, the past gone, the future not yet arrived, the present empty, there is no doer, no receiver of consequences; this time doesn’t move, another time doesn’t shift—what thing is therein to be called religious practice? 
Where does religious practice come from? Where is it? 
Who is the body? By whom is it performed? 
Does it exist? 
Does it not exist? 
Is it form? 
Is it not form? 
Is it sensation? Is it not sensation? Is it conception? 
Is it not conception? Is it action? Is it not action? Is it consciousness? 
Contemplating in this way, because the reality of religious practice cannot be apprehended, because the things of past, present, and future are all empty, because the intellect has no attachment, because the mind has no obstruction, because the sphere of operation is nondual, because expedient means are free, because of acceptance of formless truth, because of contemplation of formless truth, because of knowing the Buddha’s teaching is equanimous, because of fulfilling all qualities of Buddhahood, is such practice called pure religious practice. 
“Ten things should also be cultivated: 
knowledge of what is so and what is not; knowledge of past, present, and future consequences of actions; knowledge of all meditations, liberations, and concentrations; knowledge of superiority and inferiority of faculties; knowledge of all kinds of understandings; knowledge of all kinds of realms; knowledge of where all paths lead; unhindered clairvoyance; unhindered knowledge of past lives; knowledge of the eternal cancellation of habit energy. 
Contemplating each of these ten powers of the enlightened, in each power are innumerable meanings; one should ask about them, and after having heard about them should arouse a mind of great kindness and compassion and observe sentient beings without abandoning them, reflect on the teachings unceasingly, carry out superlative deeds without seeking rewards, comprehend that objects are like dreams, like illusions, like reflections, like echoes, and like magical productions. 
If enlightening beings can unite with such contemplations, they will not entertain a dualistic understanding of things and all enlightening teachings will become evident to them: 
at the time of their first determination they will immediately attain complete perfect enlightenment, will know all things are the mind’s own nature, and will perfect the body of wisdom and understand without relying on another.” The Merit of The Initial Determination for Enlightenment Truth Wisdom said, “The truth of this is extremely deep, difficult to explain, difficult to know, difficult to discern, difficult to believe, difficult to experience, difficult to practice, difficult to master, difficult to think of, difficult to assess, difficult to approach and enter. 
Even so, by the power of the Buddha I will explain for you. 
“O Child of Buddha, suppose someone were to provide all comforts for all the beings of incalculable worlds in the eastern direction for a whole eon, and after that teach them to keep the five precepts with purity, and were to do the same thing in the southern, western, and northern directions, the four intermediate directions, and the zenith and nadir as well—do you think this person’s merit would be much?” Indra said, “Only a Buddha could know this person’s merit—no one else could be able to assess it.” Truth Wisdom said, “This person’s merit, compared to the merit of an enlightening being who has just determined to realize enlightenment, does not amount even to a hundredth, not even a thousandth, a hundred thousandth, a millionth, a hundred millionth, a billionth, a hundred billionth, a trillionth, a hundred trillionth, a quadrillionth, a quintillionth—that merit does not amount to the smallest imaginable fraction of the merit of determination for enlightenment. 
“Setting aside that example for the moment, suppose someone provided all the beings of ten infinities of worlds with medicines for a hundred eons, and then taught them to practice the path of ten virtues, serving them thus for a thousand eons; then teaching them to dwell in the four meditations for a hundred thousand eons, then teaching them to dwell in the four immeasurable states of mind for a hundred million eons, then teaching them to dwell in the four formless concentrations for ten billion eons, then teaching them to dwell in the state of stream-enterer for a hundred billion eons, then teaching them to dwell in the state of once-returner for ten trillion eons, then teaching them to dwell in the state of nonreturner for a quadrillion eons, then teaching them to dwell in sainthood for a quintillion eons, then teaching them to dwell in the path of the self-enlightened; do you think this person’s merit would be great?” The king of gods said, “Only a Buddha could know the merit of such a person.” Truth Wisdom said, “This person’s merit, compared to the merit of an enlightening being who has just determined to realize enlightenment, does not amount to a hundredth part, not even a thousandth, a hundred thousandth, or even the smallest imaginable fraction thereof. 
Because when the Buddhas first set their minds on enlightenment, they do not do so just to provide the beings of innumerable worlds in all directions with all comforts for a hundred eons or a hundred thousand quadrillion eons. 
They do not set their minds on enlightenment just to teach that many beings to cultivate morality and goodness, just to teach them to abide in the four meditations, four immeasurable minds, and four formless concentrations, just to teach them to attain the states of stream-enterer, once-returner, nonreturner, saint, and independently enlightened one. 
Rather, they set their minds on enlightenment to cause the lineage of the enlightened ones not to die out, to pervade all worlds, to liberate the sentient beings of all worlds, to know the formation and disintegration of all worlds, to know the defilement and purity of beings in all worlds, to know the inherent purity of all worlds, to know the inclinations, afflictions, and mental habits of all sentient beings, to know where all sentient beings die and are born, to know expedient means appropriate to the faculties of all sentient beings, to know the mentalities of all sentient beings, to know all sentient beings’ knowledge of past, present, and future, and to know all realms of Buddhas are equal. 
“Again, setting this example aside for the moment, suppose someone could, in a single instant, pass incalculably many worlds to the east, and did this instant after instant for an incalculable eon—no one could determine a limit to those worlds. 
Then suppose there were another person who could pass in a single instant all the worlds that the former person passed in an incalculable eon, and also went on thus for an incalculable eon. 
Then suppose there were yet another person, and another and another, up to ten, each of whom could pass in an instant all the worlds that the preceding one passed in an incalculable eon, and went on thus for an incalculable eon. 
Then suppose there were also such people in all the other nine directions. 
Thus in the ten directions there would be one hundred people, each successively passing in each and every instant of an eon as many worlds as the preceding passed in an eon: 
the limit of these worlds might be known, but the limit of the roots of goodness in the enlightening being’s initial determination on enlightenment cannot be known. 
Because enlightening beings do not set their minds on enlightenment just to go to and gain knowledge of a limited number of worlds; they set their minds on enlightenment to know all worlds in the ten directions. 
That is to say, they want to know subtle worlds are gross worlds, gross worlds are subtle worlds, upward facing worlds are downward facing worlds, downward facing worlds are upward facing worlds, small worlds are large worlds, large worlds are small worlds, wide worlds are narrow worlds, narrow worlds are wide worlds, one world is unspeakably many worlds, unspeakably many worlds are one world, one world enters unspeakably many worlds, unspeakably many worlds enter one world, defiled worlds are pure worlds, pure worlds are defiled worlds; they want to know the differentiations of all worlds in a single hair, and the unity of a single hair in all worlds. 
They want to know the production of all worlds in a single world. 
They want to know the insubstantiality of all worlds. They want to be able to know all vast worlds in a single moment of thought without any hindrance. This is why they set their minds on unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment. 
“Again, setting this example aside, suppose there is someone who can in a single thought know the number of eons of becoming and decay of innumerable worlds in the eastern direction, and does this for an incalculable eon; no one can determine the bounds of those numbers of eons. 
Then suppose there is a second person who can know in a single thought all the numbers of eons known by the first person over an incalculable eon. 
Again, continue this up to ten persons, then extend it to all ten directions. 
The limit of the number of eons of becoming and decay of all these incalculable worlds of the ten directions may be known, but the limit of the virtues of the enlightening being setting the mind on perfect enlightenment cannot be known. 
Because enlightening beings do not set the mind on unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment just to know the number of eons of becoming and decay of a certain limited number of worlds. 
It is to completely know the eons of becoming and decay of all worlds that they set their minds on unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment. 
That is, to know that long eons and short eons are equal; short eons and long eons are equal; one eon is equal to countless eons; countless eons are equal to one eon; eons with Buddhas are equal to eons without Buddhas; eons without Buddhas are equal to eons with Buddhas; in an eon with one Buddha there are unspeakably many Buddhas; in an eon with unspeakably many Buddhas there is one Buddha; finite eons are equal to infinite eons; infinite eons are equal to finite eons; eons that end are equal to endless eons; endless eons are equal to eons that end; unspeakably many eons are equal to one instant; one instant is equal to unspeakably many eons; all eons enter the noneon; the noneon enters all eons.1 They want to know instantly the eons of becoming and decay of all worlds of the entire past, present, and future—that is why they set their minds on unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment. 
This is called the initial determination’s adornment of great vows, the spiritual knowledge of all eons. 
“Again, setting aside this example, suppose someone could, in the time of a single instant, know the various different understandings of all the sentient beings in incalculably many worlds in the eastern direction, and went on like this instant after instant for a whole incalculable eon; now suppose a second person can know in a single instant all the differences in sentient beings’ understandings known by the first person in an incalculable eon, and also went on like this for an incalculable eon. 
Now apply this pattern successively up to the tenth person, and also to the other nine directions: 
the limit of the various different understandings of these sentient beings in the ten directions may be known, but the limit of the virtues of the enlightening being’s first determination on enlightenment cannot be known by anyone. 
to know the understandings of a particular limited number of sentient beings. 
They set their minds on unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment to know the various different understandings of all sentient beings in all worlds. 
That is, they want to know different understandings are boundless, and that one sentient being’s understanding is equal to countless sentient beings’ understandings; they want to attain the light of knowledge of liberative techniques appropriate to unspeakably many different understandings; they want to know all the individual different understandings in the ocean of sentient beings; they want to know all the infinite various understandings, good and bad, of past, present, and future; they want to know all understandings which resemble each other and those which don’t; they want to know all understandings are one understanding, one understanding is all understandings; they want to attain the enlightened ones’ power of understanding; they want to know the differences between understanding that can be surpassed and understanding that is unexcelled, understanding which has remainder and understanding without remainder, equal understandings and unequal understandings; they want to know the differences between dependent and independent understanding, common understanding and unique understanding, bounded understanding and boundless understanding, differentiated understanding and undifferentiated understanding, good understanding and bad understanding, mundane understanding and transmundane understanding; they want to attain the unhindered knowledge of liberation of the enlightened in respect to all subtle understanding, great understanding, infinite understanding, and understanding of the true state; they want to know, by means of infinite appropriate means, the pure understandings and defiled understandings, broad understandings and summary understandings, fine understandings and coarse understandings, of each and every sentient being in all realms of sentient beings in the ten directions; they want to know deeply secret understandings, expedient understandings, discriminating understandings, spontaneous understandings, understandings that arise according to causes, understandings that arise according to conditions, the networks of all understandings—to know these they set their minds on unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment. 
“Again, setting aside this example, suppose there is someone who can in one instant know the differences in faculties of all sentient beings in countless worlds in the eastern direction, and continues in this way for an incalculable eon; then suppose there is a second person who could know in one instant all the differences in faculties known by the first person, in each instant of an incalculable eon; extend this to the tenth person and apply it also to the other nine directions—the limit of the various differences in faculties of the sentient beings of the worlds of the ten directions might be known, but no one can know the limit of the virtues of the enlightening being’s initial determination for unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment. 
Because enlightening beings do not set their minds on unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment just to know the faculties of sentient beings in a given limited number of worlds. 
It is to know all the various differences in faculties of all beings in all worlds, wanting to know the network of all faculties, that they set their minds on unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment. 
“Again setting this example aside, suppose there is someone who can in a single instant know inclinations of all the sentient beings in countless worlds in the eastern direction, thus knowing more and more instant after instant for an incalculable eon. 
Extend this as before to ten people, and to all ten directions: the limit of the inclinations of these sentient beings of the ten directions might be known, but a limit to the virtues of the enlightening being’s first determination for unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment cannot be known by anyone. Because the enlightening being’s determination for enlightenment is not limited to just the purpose of knowing the inclinations of a limited number of sentient beings. It is to know all the inclinations of all beings in all worlds, wanting to know the network of all inclinations, that they set their minds on unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment. 
“Again, setting this example aside, suppose there is someone who can in a single instant know the techniques of all the sentient beings in countless lands in the eastern direction, and extend this example as before to ten people and to all ten directions: the extent of the various techniques of these sentient beings of the ten directions may be known, but the extent of the virtues of the enlightening being’s initial determination for enlightenment cannot be known by anyone. Because enlightening beings do not set their minds on unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment just to know the various techniques of beings of a limited number of worlds. It is to know all the techniques of all beings of all worlds, wanting to know the network of all techniques, that they set their minds on unexcelled complete enlightenment. 
“Again, setting this example aside, suppose there is someone who can in a single instant know the various different mentalities of sentient beings in countless worlds in the eastern direction, and extend this example as before to ten people and to all ten directions: the bounds of the various different mentalities of the sentient beings in all these worlds of the ten directions may be known, but the bounds of the virtues of the enlightening being’s first determination for unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment cannot be known to anyone. 
Because enlightening beings do not set their minds on unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment just to know the mentalities of a limited number of sentient beings; it is to know the various mentalities of the boundless sentient beings of the whole realm of space of the cosmos, wanting to completely know the network of all minds, that they set their minds on unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment. 
“Again, setting this example aside, suppose there is someone who can in a single instant know the various different actions of the sentient beings in countless worlds in the eastern direction; as before, extend this to the tenth person and to the ten directions: the bounds of the various different actions of these sentient beings of the ten directions may be known, but the bounds of the virtues of the enlightening being’s initial determination for unexcelled enlightenment cannot be known. 
They want to know the actions of all sentient beings of past, present, and future, and want to know the network of all actions—this is why they set their minds on unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment. 
“Again, leaving this example aside, suppose there is someone who can in one instant know the various afflictions of the sentient beings of countless worlds in the eastern direction, and thus knows more and more instant by instant for an entire incalculable eon; no one could know the bounds of the various differences of these afflictions. 
Now suppose there is a second person who can in one instant know all the differences in afflictions of sentient beings known by the first person in an incalculable eon, and also went on like this knowing more and more instant by instant for an incalculable eon. Again, extend this to the tenth person and the ten directions: 
the bounds of the differences of afflictions of these sentient beings of the ten directions may be known, but the limits of the virtues of the enlightening being’s initial determination on enlightenment cannot be known. 
Because enlightening beings do not set their minds on unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment just to know the afflictions of sentient beings in a limited number of worlds; they set their minds on unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment to know all the differences in afflictions of all beings in all worlds. 
In other words, they want to thoroughly know light afflictions and heavy afflictions, afflictions of sleep and afflictions of waking, the various differences in the innumerable afflictions of each and every sentient being, and their various musings and ruminations, to clear away all their confusions and defilements; they want to thoroughly know all afflictions based on ignorance and afflictions connected with affection, to cut off all bonds of afflictions in all realms of being; they want to thoroughly know all afflictions of greed, all afflictions of hatred, all afflictions of folly, and all afflictions of greed, hatred, and folly in equal measure, to sever the root of all afflictions; they want to thoroughly know all afflictions of ego, afflictions of possessions, and afflictions of conceit, to be totally aware of all afflictions; they want to thoroughly know all basic and concomitant afflictions arising from misconceptions, and the sixty-two views arising from the idea of a real body existing, to vanquish all afflictions; they want to know thoroughly the afflictions of mental shrouds and hindrances; to develop a heart of great compassion to rescue and protect, to sunder the web of all afflictions and cause the nature of omniscience to be utterly pure—this is why they set their minds on unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment. 
“Again, leaving this example aside, suppose there is someone who in the space of an instant presents countless Buddhas as well as sentient beings of innumerable worlds in the eastern direction with various fine foods and drinks, fragrant flowers and raiment, banners, pennants, canopies, parasols, sanctuaries with beautiful chambers, jeweled curtains and enclosures of nets, lion seats with various adornments, as well as all kinds of exquisite jewels, reverently honoring them, bowing to them and lauding them, humbly looking up to them, and continues thus unceasingly for countless eons, and also urges other sentient beings to make such offerings to the Buddhas, and after the Buddhas die sets up a monument for each one, the monuments high and wide, made of all kinds of precious substances from countless worlds, variously decorated, with countless statues of Buddhas in each monument, with radiance illuminating countless worlds, continuing this work for countless eons; and suppose the person did the same in the South, West, and North, the four intermediate directions, the zenith and the nadir: 
Do you think this person’s merit would be great?” The king of gods said, “Only a Buddha could know this person’s merit—no one else could assess it.” “Child of Buddha, this person’s merit, compared to the merit of the enlightening being’s initial determination for enlightenment, does not amount to a hundredth part, a thousandth, a hundred thousandth part, not even the smallest fraction. 
“Again setting this example aside, suppose there is a second person who can in a single instant perform all the acts of almsgiving performed by the first person in countless worlds, to the beings therein, for countless eons; and suppose this person went on like this, instant after instant, presenting innumerable kinds of offerings to countless Buddhas as well as the sentient beings of innumerable worlds, for innumerable eons; and suppose that a third person, up to a tenth person, could each perform in an instant all the almsgiving performed by the preceding person, and did so instant after instant, presenting boundless, incomparably many, uncountable, unaccountably many, unthinkably many, immeasurably many, unspeakably many, unspeakably unspeakably many offerings to infinite, untold Buddhas as well as to all the sentient beings in as many worlds, for unspeakably unspeakably many eons, and then after the passing of each Buddha, built a monument for each one, high and wide, as previously described. 
This merit too would not amount to even the smallest fraction of the virtue of the enlightening being’s initial determination for enlightenment. 
Because enlightening beings do not set their minds on unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment just to make offerings to a certain number of Buddhas. They set their minds on unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment to make offerings to all the innumerable, unspeakably unspeakably many past, present, and future Buddhas of the entire space of the whole cosmos in all directions. 
“Having aroused this determination, they are able to know the first attainment of true awakening as well as the final release of all Buddhas of the past, are able to believe in the roots of goodness of all Buddhas of the future, and are able to know the knowledge and wisdom of all Buddhas of the present. The virtues of those Buddhas, these enlightening beings can believe in, can accept, can cultivate, can attain, can know, can witness, and can perfect; they can be equal, of the same nature, as the Buddhas. 
Because these enlightening beings arouse their aspiration in order not to let the lineage of all enlightened ones die out; they arouse their aspiration in order to pervade all worlds; they arouse their determination in order to liberate the beings of all worlds; they arouse their aspiration in order to completely know the formation and disintegration of all worlds; they arouse their determination in order to completely know the defilement and purity of all beings; they arouse their minds in order to know the purity of the realms of desire, form, and formlessness in all worlds; they arouse their determination in order to completely know the inclinations, afflictions, and mental habits of all living beings; they arouse their aspiration in order to completely know the faculties and means of all beings; they arouse their determination in order to completely know the mental activities of all beings; they arouse their aspiration in order to know all beings’ knowledge of past, present, and future. 
Because they have set their minds on enlightenment, they are always remembered by all the Buddhas of past, present, and future, and will attain the unsurpassed enlightenment of all Buddhas of all times. 
Then they will be given the sublime teachings of all Buddhas of all times, and will be actually and essentially equal to all Buddhas of all times. 
Having cultivated the methods of fostering the Path used by all Buddhas of all times, consummated the powers and fearlessnesses of all Buddhas of all times, and adorned themselves with the unique qualities of all Buddhas of all times, they will thoroughly attain the knowledge and wisdom to explain the truth of all Buddhas of the cosmos. 
Because by means of this determination they will attain Buddhahood. 
“Know that such a person is thereupon the same as the Buddhas of all times, thereupon equal in perspective to the Buddhas of all times, thereupon equal in virtue to the Buddhas of all times, and attains the true knowledge of the ultimate equality of one body and infinite bodies of the Enlightened. 
“As soon as one sets the mind on complete enlightenment, one is praised by all the Buddhas of all quarters and can thereupon expound the teaching, edify and purify the beings of all worlds, and can thereupon shake all worlds, and can thereupon illumine all worlds, and can thereupon extinguish the pains of the states of misery in all worlds, and can thereupon beautify and purify all lands, and can thereupon manifest attainment of Buddhahood in all worlds, and can thereupon cause all living things to rejoice, and can thereupon enter into the essence of all reality realms, and can thereupon maintain the lineage of all enlightened ones, and can thereupon attain the light of wisdom of all Buddhas. 
“This enlightening being who has just aspired to enlightenment does not apprehend anything in the past, present, or future—whether Buddhas, Buddhas’ teachings, enlightening beings, principles of enlightening beings, solitary awakened ones, principles of solitary awakened ones, listeners, principles of listeners, the world, worldly things, the transmundane, transmundane things, sentient beings, or norms of sentient beings—the enlightening being only seeks omniscience and has no mental attachment to anything.” At that point, by the spiritual power of the Buddha, worlds as numerous as the atoms in ten thousand buddha-lands in each of the ten directions all quaked in six ways, rained celestial flowers, perfumes, incenses, garlands, robes, jewels, and ornaments, produced celestial music and radiated celestial lights and sounds. 
Now in each of the ten directions, beyond as many worlds as atoms in ten buddha-lands, were as many Buddhas as atoms in ten thousand buddha-lands, all named Truth Wisdom; each of them appeared bodily before the enlightening being Truth Wisdom and said these words: 
“Good, good! 
Truth Wisdom, you are now able to expound this teaching; we Buddhas, as many in each of the ten directions as atoms in ten thousand buddha-lands, also expound this teaching. 
All Buddhas teach in this way. As you expounded this teaching, there were as many enlightening beings as atoms in ten thousand buddha-lands who were inspired with the determination for enlightenment: 
we now give them all the prediction of enlightenment, that in the future, after ten unspeakable numbers of boundless eons, they will alike attain buddhahood in the same eon, and, appearing in the world, will all be called Pure Mind Buddha. The worlds they live in will each be different. We will all protect and keep this teaching, so that all the enlightening beings of the future who have not heard it will be able to hear it.” As in this world Endurance, atop the Mt. 
Sumerus of the four quarters, this teaching was spoken, to cause them to accept the teaching once they have heard it, so also was it spoken in all the countless worlds throughout the universe, to edify living beings. All those who expounded it were called Truth Wisdom. They spoke such a teaching by the spiritual power of the Buddhas, by the power of the Buddhas’ original vow, in order to reveal the Buddhas’ teaching, to illumine all with the light of knowledge, to expose the truth, to cause beings to realize the essence of things, to cause all congregations to rejoice, to reveal the causal basis of the Buddhas’ teaching, to realize the equality of all Buddhas, to comprehend the nonduality of the realm of reality. 
Then the enlightening being Truth Wisdom looked over all the congregations in all lands in the ten directions of the entire realm of space, and because he desired to perfect the living beings, because he wanted to purify all actions, results, and consequences, because he wanted to reveal the realm of reality, because he wanted to extirpate the roots of defilement, because he wanted to increase great faith and resolution, because he wanted to cause all to know the faculties of infinite sentient beings, because he wanted to cause all to know the equality of past, present, and future phenomena, because he wanted to cause all to contemplate the realm of nirvana, and because he wanted to increase inherently pure roots of goodness, he spoke these verses by the power of Buddha: To benefit the world enlightening beings make a great resolution, That resolution extending everywhere throughout the ten directions: Living beings, lands, the phenomena of past, present, and future, Enlightened as well as enlightening beings, supreme oceans, To the limits of space, equal to the cosmos, And all the worlds there are therein: In accord with Buddhas’ teachings, they go to every one; Arousing their minds this way, they never regress. 
They think of living beings with compassion, never abandoning them; They reject all that is harmful, benefiting all. 
Their light illumines the world, being as a refuge, Guarded by the Ten Powered inconceivably. 
They enter all lands in the ten directions, Manifesting all kinds of physical forms. 
In accord with Buddhas’ virtue and knowledge, boundless, They cultivate the appropriate causes, without any attachment. 
Some lands face upward, some sideways or inverted; Coarse, subtle, wide and vast—there are innumerable kinds: 
Once enlightening beings have roused the supreme aspiration, They can travel to all of them, unobstructed. Enlightening beings’ supreme practices cannot be all told: 
All they cultivate diligently without dwelling anywhere. Seeing all Buddhas, they’re always joyful, And enter everywhere into the ocean of profound truths. 
Pitying beings living in mundane dispositions, They cause them to clear away defilements, to be thoroughly pure; Succeeding to the lineage of Buddhas, they do not let it die out: 
They devastate the palace of demons, completely destroying them. 
Dwelling in the equanimity of the Enlightened, They skillfully cultivate subtle techniques. 
Developing aspiration for the realm of buddhahood, They are anointed by the Buddhas, their minds without attachment. 
Remembering to requite their debt to the Most Honorable Human, Their minds are incorruptible, like diamond. 
Able to clearly comprehend the sphere of Buddhas’ action, They naturally cultivate and practice enlightening deeds. 
The different thoughts of the various realms of beings are infinite— Their acts, their results, and their minds are also not one— Everything down to their various different faculties and natures Are all clearly seen once the great mind is developed. 
That mind is far-reaching, as vast as the cosmos; Without reliance, unchanging, like space— Heading for Buddha-knowledge without grasping anything, It clearly comprehends the realm of truth, apart from discriminatory thought. 
Knowing the minds of living beings without the concept of beings, Comprehending all things without the concept of things, Though discriminating all, yet free from discrimination, It goes to all lands, billions and trillions. 
Following, contemplating, able to enter all The wondrous troves of teachings of countless Buddhas, Knowing all the faculties and behaviors of living beings, Those who have reached this point are like the Buddha. 
Always in accord with the pure great vow, Gladly supporting the enlightened without turning back, Always pleasing to the sight of humans and celestials, Always protected mindfully by the Buddhas, Their minds are pure, free from dependence; Though they contemplate the profound teaching, they do not cling, Meditating thus for countless eons Without any attachments in the past, present, or future. 
Their minds are firm and sure, impossible to overcome; They proceed to Buddhas’ enlightenment without obstruction. 
Determined to seek the wondrous Way, they get rid of infantile ignorance; Traversing the whole cosmos, they do not complain of weariness. 
They know the phenomena of speech and language are all null and void; Only entering into true thusness, they cut off different interpretations. 
Harmoniously observing all the spheres of the enlightened, They comprehend all frames of time, their minds without obstruction. 
When enlightening beings first develop the vastly great mind, They can go to all lands in the ten directions: 
Aspects of truth beyond number or explanation Their light of knowledge illumines clearly. 
Liberating many with great compassion, utterly beyond compare, Their kindness extends everywhere, like space. 
And yet they do not discriminate in regard to living beings; Thus being pure, they roam through the world. 
Giving solace and comfort to living beings everywhere, Everything they do is true and genuine. 
Always with a pure heart, they don’t contradict themselves; They are always strengthened and protected by all the Buddhas. 
They remember everything that was in the past, And discern everything in the future. 
They enter all worlds in the ten directions To liberate beings, causing them to be detached. 
Enlightening beings have the light of sublime knowledge And understand causes and conditions beyond any doubt. 
They do away with all confusion and delusion, And in this way roam the reality-realm. 
All the palaces of demons they smash; All the blinders of living beings they destroy. 
Free from discrimination, minds undisturbed, They understand well the realm of the enlightened. 
They have removed the webs of doubt of all time And aroused faith in those who have realized thusness. 
By faith they’ve attained immutable knowledge, And because their knowledge is pure their understanding is true. 
In order to allow living beings to attain emancipation, And to benefit them universally throughout all time, They undergo long toils and hardships unflagging, Calmly enduring even the pains of the hells. 
Replete with boundless virtue and wisdom, They know all the faculties and inclinations of beings; They see all, including their works and deeds, And teach them in accord with their tendencies. 
They understand all is empty and selfless, Yet think kindly of beings, never abandoning them; With one subtle, sublime voice of great compassion They enter all worlds to teach. 
Emanating great lights of various colors, They shine on all beings, removing the darkness; In the lights are enlightening beings sitting on lotus blossoms Bringing forth the pure teaching for all beings. 
In a single pore they manifest many lands, With great enlightening beings filling them all. 
The knowledge of the congregation is different for each, While all can understand the minds of living beings. 
To unspeakably many lands in the ten directions They can go in an instant, to all of them, Aiding beings, giving offerings to Buddhas. 
From the Buddhas they ask the profound truth; They think of the enlightened ones as parents, And perform enlightening practices to benefit sentient beings. 
With wisdom and flexible means they penetrate the treasury of truths, Entering the profound realm of knowledge without any attachment. 
Meditating in accord with truth, they explain the reality-realm For countless eons, without being able to exhaust it. 
Though their knowledge skillfully penetrates, it has no location; They are not tired or wearied, have no attachment to anything. 
Born in the house of the Buddhas of past, present, and future, They experience the subtle reality-body of the enlightened ones. 
Manifesting various forms for all living beings, Like magicans there’s nothing they can’t make: 
Some manifest the beginning of practice of excellent action, Some manifest birth, up to leaving home, Some manifest fulfilling enlightenment under a tree, And some show extinction, for the benefit of beings. 
The rare truth in which enlightening beings abide Is only the realm of Buddhas, not the two vehicles. They are rid of concepts of body, speech, and thought, But can manifest them variously, according to the occasion. 
The Buddha-teachings attained by enlightening beings Sentient beings go crazy when thinking of. 
The knowledge of enlightening beings enters reality, their minds unhindered; Everywhere they manifest the independent powers of the Enlightened; In this they have no compare in all the world: How much the more when their excellent practices are added. 
Though they have not yet completely fulfilled omniscience, They have already attained the independent power of the enlightened. 
Already they abide on the ultimate path of the One Vehicle And enter deeply into the subtle highest truth. 
They know beings well, and appropriate and inappropriate times; For beings’ benefit they reveal spiritual powers: 
Multiplying their bodies, they fill all lands, Emanating pure light to remove the darkness of the world. 
Like dragon kings producing great clouds, They shower wonderful rains, filling and refreshing all. 
They see sentient beings as like illusions and dreams, Always revolving in circles from the force of their acts; With compassion and pity they rescue them all, Explaning to them the uncreated, pure nature of things. 
The infinity of Buddhas’ powers is also like this: Like space, it has no bounds. 
In order to enable sentient beings to attain liberation, They diligently practice for eons untiring. 
Pondering in various ways upon wondrous virtues, They skillfully cultivate the unsurpassed foremost of works; Never giving up the transcendent practices, They concentrate on developing omniscience. 
With one body they manifest innumerable bodies, Omnipresent throughout all worlds, Their minds pure, with no discrimination; Such is their instantaneous inconceivable power. 
They do not discriminate among worlds, They have no illusions about any thing; While they contemplate the teachings, they do not grasp them, And though they are always rescuing beings none are delivered. 
All worlds are only mental images: 
Knowing the realms of ideation are dangerous and deep, Enlightening beings manifest spiritual powers to rescue and liberate. 
Like the powers of a magician Are the spiritual metamorphoses of enlightening beings; Their bodies fill the cosmos and space For all to see according to their mentalities. Both distinctions of subject and object they have left behind: 
Whether defiled or pure, nothing do they grasp; Cognition of bondage or of liberation they entirely forget, Only vowing to grant bliss to all sentient beings. 
All worlds being only the force of ideation, They enter them by knowledge with minds free from fear. 
Their contemplation of all things is also thus: Investigating their past, present, and future, they cannot be apprehended. 
Able to enter into the whole of the past, Able to enter into the whole of the future, Able to enter into all places in the present, They always observe diligently how nothing exists. 
According with the dispassionate state of nirvana, They abide in noncontention and nonreliance. Their minds, like ultimate reality, have no compare: 
They are turned wholly to enlightenment, never to regress. 
Cultivating supreme practice without backsliding or weakening, They rest on enlightenment, unwavering. 
Buddhas, enlightening beings, and the worlds Throughout the cosmos, they all clearly understand. 
If you want to attain the supreme, foremost of paths, And be an omniscient sovereign of liberty, You should quickly develop the determination for enlightenment, Forever end indulgence and help sentient beings; Proceeding to enlightenment, mind pure, Your virtues will be vast and great beyond telling. 
I am setting this forth for the benefit of beings: Those of intelligence should listen well. 
Infinite worlds are all atoms: In each atom are infinite lands; The Buddhas in each are infinite: Enlightening beings see all clearly without any grasping; They know living beings without having such a concept, They know spoken words with no idea of speech. 
Their minds are unhindered in any world: 
They comprehend all without attachments. Their minds are broad and vast as space, They comprehend all things in all times. 
They annihilate all doubt and confusion, And correctly perceive the Buddhas’ teachings without clinging. 
To infinite lands in the ten directions They instantly go, their minds without attachment. 
Understanding the reasons for suffering in the world, They all dwell in the uncreated sphere of reality. 
To the assemblies of infinite Buddhas They go to call on them; Always being leaders, they ask the Buddhas About the vows and practices cultivated by enlightening beings. 
Their minds always remember the Buddhas of the ten directions, Yet without depending on or grasping anything. 
They constantly urge living beings to plant roots of goodness, Adorning their lands, making them pure. 
All sentient beings in all realms of existence They observe with unobstructed eyes: 
Their habits, natures, faculties, and understandings, Countless and boundless, all they clearly see. 
Aware of all defilement and purity, They cause them to cultivate themselves and enter the Way. 
Measureless, countless meditation concentrations Enlightening beings can enter in a single instant: 
Their perceptions, knowledges and objects therein They all know thoroughly and attain mastery. 
Enlightening beings, attaining this great knowledge, Immediately direct it to enlightenment, unhindered. 
Because they want to help and benefit living beings, Wherever they are they expound the principles of great people. 
They know the long and short eons of the worlds, A month, a fortnight, a day and a night, In each land are different, but equal in essence. 
Always diligently observing, they are not lax or indulgent; Going to all worlds in the ten directions, Yet they do not cling to place or location; Adorning and purifying all lands with exception, Yet they never produce the concept of purity. 
Sentient beings’ rights and wrongs, The differences in their deeds and the consequences, They accordingly reflect upon, entering the Buddha’s power And comprehending all of this. 
The various natures in all worlds, Various courses of action, and their realms of being, Sharp faculties as well as the middling and inferior— All such things do they observe and examine. 
Various understandings, pure and impure, Superior, inferior, and middling, all they clearly see. 
The acts of all beings and where they lead, The continuity of realms of being—all they can explain. 
Meditations, concentrations, liberations, trances, Defiled and pure, their causes and origins each different: 
These, plus the differences of pain and pleasure of past lives, Purely cultivating Buddha-power, all they can see. 
Sentient beings’ habitual delusions continue the various states of being— By cutting off these tendencies and states they attain peace and dispassion, Various tainted states do not arise anymore: 
The afflictions of the Enlightened are all extinguished: 
Their light of great knowledge illumines the world. 
Though enlightening beings have not yet attained Buddhas’ ten powers, yet they do not have doubt. 
Enlightening beings, in a single pore, Manifest the infinite lands of the ten directions: 
Some are defiled, some are pure, Made by various deeds—all do they comprehend. 
In a single atom, infinite lands, With infinite Buddhas and their offspring; The lands are each distinct, not mixed up: 
As of one, all they clearly see. 
In one pore they see all the worlds In the space of the ten directions. 
There is not a single place where there is no Buddha; Thus are the buddha-lands all pure. 
In a pore they see buddha-lands And also see all sentient beings: 
The three times and six dispositions are not the same— Day and night, month and hour, bondage and freedom. 
Thus do enlightening beings of great knowledge Single-mindedly head for the sovereignty of truth. 
Meditating on the abode of the Enlightened, They obtain boundless great joy. 
Enlightening beings multiply their bodies into countless billions To make offerings to all the enlightened ones; The manifestations of their spiritual powers are supreme, incomparable— They can abide in all the spheres of action of the Buddhas. 
They praise and look up to all the countless Buddhas And deeply savor the treasuries of all their teachings. 
Seeing the Buddhas, hearing their teachings, they diligently practice them, Their hearts joyful, as if they were drinking ambrosial elixir of immortality. 
Having attained the supreme concentration of the enlightened, They delve into all truths and their knowledge grows. 
Their faith is unshakable as a great mountain, Being a treasury of virtues for all living beings. 
Their compassion is great, extending to all living creatures: All they hope will soon develop universal knowledge. Yet they are always without attachment or dependence; Shedding afflictions, they’ve attained freedom. 
Vast in knowledge, with pity for sentient beings, They embrace all as the same as themselves. 
With awareness of emptiness, signlessness, and unreality, Yet they act, their minds unflagging. 
The virtues of enlightening beings’ determination for enlightenment Could not be exhaustively told even in a billion eons, Because it produces all the Enlightened Ones, And the bliss of the self-enlightened and Buddhas’ disciples. 
To give peace for countless eons To all the beings of the lands of the ten directions, Urging them to keep the five precepts and ten virtues, The four meditations, four equipoises, and such concentrations, And also giving them bliss for many eons, Causing them to cut off delusions and become saints, Amasses virtue which may be immeasurable, But cannot compare to the virtue of the will for enlightenment. 
Also, to cause millions to achieve individual awakening And attain the subtle path of noncontentious action, Does not amount to anything much at all Compared to the determination for enlightenment. 
If one could pass billions of lands in an instant And did so for immeasurable eons, The number of these lands might be assessed, But the virtues of the will for enlightenment cannot be known. 
The number of eons past, future, and present Is boundless, yet still might be known; But the virtue of rousing the mind to enlightenment Cannot be measured by anyone. 
This is because the determination for enlightenment extends everywhere, Knowing all discernments that exist, Comprehending past, present, and future in an instant, Benefiting innumerable sentient beings. 
The desires, understandings, means, and mental patterns Of the sentient beings of the worlds of the ten directions, As well as the bounds of space, might be measured, But the virtues of the aspirations for enlightenment cannot be assessed. 
That’s why their power has no bounds. 
Sentient beings’ desires, understandings, inclinations, Faculties, devices, and practices are all different; Enlightening beings know them all instantly, Same as the mind of omniscience. 
The deluded actions of living beings Continue through time without interruption, Yet their bounds still might be known; But the virtues of will for enlightenment are inconceivable. 
Will for enlightenment can divorce afflictions of action And provide offerings to all the Enlightened: 
Once habitual delusions are divorced, their continuity’s broken, And liberation is attained for all time. 
If one gives offerings to boundless Buddhas in an instant, And also gives to countless sentient beings, Fragrant flowers and garlands, Precious banners, canopies, and raiment, Fine food, excellent seats, and places to walk around, Various palaces, all finely adorned, Luminous, wonderful pearls, Wish-fulfilling jewels, radiating light, And brings such offerings moment after moment Over countless eons, beyond the power of speech, Though such a person’s accumulation of merit would be great, It does not equal the magnitude of the virtue of aspiring to enlightenment. 
None of the various examples told Can match the determination for enlightenment, Because the most honorable people of all times Have all been born from this aspiration. The will for enlightenment is unhindered, unlimited: 
No measure can be found for it. 
Vowing to fulfill omniscience, To forever deliver all beings, That aspiration is vast as space, Producing virtues equal to the cosmos. 
Their share of action extending everywhere, as though there were no difference, Forever leaving all attachments, equal to the Buddhas, Entering all gates of truth, Able to travel to all lands, Arriving at all spheres of knowledge, Perfecting all virtues, Able to relinquish everything, always consistent, Purifying behavior, free from attachment, Fulfilling unsurpassed virtues, Always persevering without regression, Entering deep concentration, always meditating, Uniting with vastly great knowledge and wisdom: 
This is the supreme stage of enlightening beings, Producing the path of all the Universally Good. 
All the Enlightened Ones of past, present, and future Protect the initial aspiration, Adorning it with spiritual powers and mystic transfiguration, With concentrations and spells. 
The living beings of the ten directions are infinite, As are the worlds and space: 
But the infinity of the enlightenment aspiration surpasses these: Hence it can give birth to all Buddhas. 
The will for enlightenment is the basis of the ten powers As well as the four special knowledges and fearlessnesses. 
The same is true of the eighteen unique qualities: All of them are attained from the aspiration for enlightenment. 
The Buddhas’ physically adorned bodies, As well as their equal body of reality, Their knowledge, wisdom, and nonattachment, worthy of honor, All can exist because of the determination for enlightenment. 
All the vehicles of individual illuminates and Buddhist disciples, The pleasures of the meditation states of the realm of form, As well as the trances of the formless realm, All have the will for enlightenment as their basis. 
The free pleasures of humans and gods, As well as the various pleasures of the other states of being, And the pleasures of progress, concentration, religious faculties and powers, and so on, All depend on the first aspiration to enlightenment. 
Based on the production of this far-reaching determination Can one practice the six ways of transcendence: 
Urging sentient beings to carry out right practice, Experiencing peace and happiness in the three realms, Abiding in the Buddhas’ unhindered true knowledge, Revealing all the wonderful actions there are, Able to cause countless living beings To cut off deluded actions and turn to nirvana, Making vows of boundless virtues To give happiness to all living beings, Carrying out these vows forever and ever, Always working so as to liberate beings, The infinite great vows inconceivable, Vowing to purify all living beings— Though empty, signless, wishless, without reliance, By the power of will, enlightening beings can reveal them. 
Understanding the inherent nature of things is like space; That all are quiescent, all equal, The gates of the teaching, countless, unspeakable, They expound to beings, without attachment. 
All Enlightened Ones of the worlds of the ten directions All praise the first aspiration for enlightenment; This inspired mind is adorned by infinite virtues And can arrive at the other shore, same as the Buddhas. 
Were those virtues to be expounded for as many eons As there are living beings, they could not be all told. 
Because this mind dwells in the vast house of the Enlightened, Nothing of the world can compare it or explain it. 
If you want to know all the truths of the Buddhas, You should quickly develop the determination for enlightenment. 
This determination is the most excellent of virtues, Assuring attainment of the unhindered knowledge of the enlightened. 
The mental activities of living beings might be counted, And so might the number of atoms in a land; The extent of space might be assessed, But the virtues of the will for enlightenment cannot be measured: 
It produces all the Buddhas of all times, And perfects happiness in all worlds, Increases all excellent virtues, Extirpates all confusion, Reveals all wondrous realms, Eliminates all obstacles, Develops all pure lands, Produces all enlightened knowledge. 
If you want to see all the Buddhas of the ten directions, And want to disburse from the inexhaustible treasury of virtue, If you want to extinguish the afflictions of beings, Quickly arouse the will for enlightenment. 
That is, “eon” is a division that is ultimately arbitrary. 
Clarifying Method “Furthermore, if great enlightening beings always diligently practice, to annihilate all the darkness of ignorance, conquer demons and enemies and control heretics, forever wash away all afflictions defiling the mind, they will all be able to perfect all roots of goodness, forever escape the difficulties of all miserable realms of being, purify all spheres of great knowledge, accomplish all the stages of enlightenment and their pure virtues—the transcending practices, mnemonic mastery, concentration, the six superknowledges, and the four fearlessnesses—adorning all Buddha-lands; their physical refinements as well, their bodily, verbal, and mental actions will all be perfectly complete. 
They will know well all the powers, fearlessnesses, unique qualities, omniscience, and spheres of action of all the Enlightened Ones, the Buddhas. 
In order to develop and mature all living beings according to their mentalities, they will take appropriate buddha-lands and expound the truth as necessary in accord with beings’ faculties and in accord with the time and situation. They will fulfill various immeasurable great Buddha-works, as well as innumerable other virtuous things, various practices, paths, and realms, and soon be equal to the enlightened ones. 
They can maintain and protect all the treasuries of truths assembled by the perfectly enlightened ones over their hundreds and thousands of immeasurable eons of cultivating enlightening practices, and can expound them unhindered and undisrupted by demons or heretics. They will hold the true teaching forever, and in all worlds when they teach they will be protected by celestial beings, yaksha kings, gandharva kings, titan kings, garuda kings, kinnara kings, mahoraga kings, human kings, Brahma kings, and enlightened kings of truth. 
All worlds will respect and support them, alike crowning them. 
They will always be under the care of the Buddhas, and will also be loved and respected by all enlightening beings. Attaining the power of roots of goodness, they will increase virtuous ways, expound the treasury of profound teachings of the Enlightened, and hold the true teaching, wherewith they will adorn themselves. 
Please expound the process of enlightening beings’ practices.” Then the enlightening being Vigorous Wisdom, wanting to reiterate his intention, spoke these verses: O famous one, well do you expound The virtues accomplished by enlightening beings, Deeply entering boundless great action Fulfilling pure teacherless knowledge. 
If enlightening beings, at their first inspiration, Accomplish the practice of virtue and wisdom, Enter the rank of freedom from birth, transcending the world, Universally attaining the principle of true enlightenment, Then how should they, in the Buddha-teaching, Stably and strongly practice with diligence, to progress further, To cause all the Enlightened Ones to rejoice, To be able to quickly enter the state of the Buddhas, Fulfill all the pure vows they carry out, And attain the vast treasury of knowledge and wisdom, And also be able to teach the truth to liberate beings Without their minds relying on or attached to anything, Fulfill all the transcendent ways of enlightening beings, Rescue and liberate all beings under their care, Forever maintain the lineage of Buddhas unbroken, So all they do is sure and not in vain, And they accomplish all tasks and win emancipation. 
Please explain this pure path, In accord with what all the Victors practice, To forever destroy the darkness of ignorance, Overthrow all demons and heretics, Wash away all defilements, To be able to approach the great knowledge and wisdom of the Enlightened And forever leave the dangers of the evil ways, To purify the extraordinary spheres of great knowledge, Attain the powers of the sublime way, next to the Supreme Honored One, To fulfill all virtues, Realize the supreme knowledge of the Enlightened, Live in innumerable lands And expound the truth according to the mentalities of the beings there, And perform the various great deeds of Buddhas. 
How can they attain the wonderful paths And expound the treasury of true teachings of the Enlightened, Always able to accept and hold the Buddha-teachings, Unsurpassable and incomparable? 
How can they be fearless like lions, Their acts pure as the full moon? How can they cultivate the Buddhas’ virtues, Like lotuses to which water does not adhere? 
Then the enlightening being Truth Wisdom said to the enlightening being Vigorious Wisdom, “Very good, Child of Buddha; you have asked about the pure practice cultivated by enlightening beings, out of compassion for the world, because you wish that many be aided and comforted, that many be benefited. 
Child of Buddha, you abide by the truth, you activate great vigor, increasing without recession; having already attained liberation, you are able to pose this question, the same as an enlightened one. 
Listen clearly, think well upon this; now, by the spiritual power of Buddha, I will explain a little of it for you. 
“Child of Buddha, once enlightening beings have developed the determination for omniscience, they should leave the darkness of ignorance and diligently guard themselves from indulgence and laxity. 
If enlightening beings abide by ten things, that is called nonindulgence: 
one is to keep the behavioral precepts; second is to abandon folly and purify the will for enlightenment; third is to like straightforwardness and reject flattery and deception; fourth is to earnestly cultivate virtues without regressing; fifth is to continually reflect on one’s aspiration; sixth is not to enjoy association with ordinary people, whether they be householders or monks; seventh is to do good deeds without hoping for worldly rewards; eighth is to forever leave lesser vehicles and practice the path of enlightening beings; ninth is to gladly practice what is good, not letting goodness be cut off; tenth is to always examine one’s own power of perseverance. 
If enlightening beings practice these ten things, this is called abiding in nonindulgence. 
“When enlightening beings persist in nonindulgence, they attain ten kinds of purity: 
acting in accord with what they say; consummation of attention and discernment; abiding in deep concentration without torpor or agitation; gladly seeking Buddha-teachings without flagging; contemplating the teachings heard according to reason, fully developing skillfully flexible knowledge; entering deep meditation and attaining the psychic powers of Buddhas; their minds are equanimous, without sense of high or low status; in regard to superior, middling, and inferior types of beings, their minds are unobstructed, and like the earth, they benefit all equally; if they see any beings who have even once made the determination for enlightenment, they honor and serve them as teachers; they always respect, serve, and support their preceptors and tutors, and all enlightening beings, wise friends, and teachers. 
These are called the ten kinds of purity of enlightening beings persisting in nonindulgence. 
“Enlightening beings abide in nonindulgence, evoke great vigor, produce correct mindfulness, engender supreme aspiration, and work unceasingly. Their minds are free from dependence on any thing. They are able to diligently cultivate the most profound teaching, and enter the gate of noncontention. 
Broadening their minds, they are able to accordingly comprehend boundless Buddha-teachings, causing the Enlightened Ones to all rejoice. 
“There are ten more things by which enlightening beings can cause the Buddhas to rejoice: 
persevering without regression; not begrudging their physical life; not seeking profit or support; knowing all things are like space; being skillful at contemplation, entering into all realms of reality; knowing the definitive marks of all things; always invoking great vows; developing the light of pure tolerant knowledge; examining one’s own virtues without exaggeration or underestimation; cultivating pure practices in accord with the way of nonstriving. 
This is called enlightening beings persisting in ten things whereby they are able to bring joy to all the Enlightened Ones. 
“There are ten more things by which they can make all Buddhas joyful: 
abiding securely in nonindulgence; abiding securely in acceptance of nonorigination; abiding securely in great kindness; abiding securely in great compassion; abiding securely in the fulfillment of the transcendent ways; abiding securely in the enlightening practices; abiding securely in great vows; abiding securely in skillful means; abiding securely in dauntless power; abiding securely in knowledge and wisdom, observing all things have no abode, like empty space. 
If enlightening beings abide in these ten things, they can cause all Buddhas joy. 
“There are ten things which cause enlightening beings to quickly enter the stages: 
skillfully fulfilling the twin practices of virtue and knowledge; ability to greatly adorn the path of the transcendent practices; knowledge clearly comprehending, not following others’ words; serving good friends, never abandoning them; always practicing perseverance, without laziness; skillful ability to abide in the psychic powers of Buddhas; cultivating roots of goodness without growing wearied; with a deep mind and incisive knowledge, adorning oneself with the teaching of the Great Vehicle; the mind not dwelling on the teachings of each stage; being of the same essential nature as all Buddhas of all times in virtue and liberative means. 
These ten things cause enlightening beings to quickly enter the stages. 
“Furthermore, when enlightening beings are in the first stage, they should carefully investigate all the principles and knowledge pertaining to it, the causes cultivated there, the effects realized, the spheres, functions, manifestations, distinctions, and attainments pertaining to it. 
They should carefully examine and realize that all things are one’s own mind, and have no attachments to anything; with this knowledge they enter the stages of enlightening beings and can steadfastly continue therein. 
“Those enlightening beings formulate these thoughts: ‘We should quickly enter the stages. 
If we sojourn in stage after stage, we will develop such great virtuous qualities; being replete with virtue, we will gradually enter the stage of buddhahood; once we are in the stage of buddhahood, we can perform boundless great buddha-works. Therefore we should always practice diligently and unremittingly, without wearying, adorning ourselves with great virtues and enter the stages of enlightening beings.’ “There are ten things which cause the practices of enlightening beings to be pure: giving up all possessions to satisfy the wishes of sentient beings; adhering to pure morality, not transgressing; being inexhaustibly gentle and tolerant; cultivating practices diligently without regressing; being free from confusion and mental disturbance, through the power of correct mindfulness; analyzing and comprehending the innumerable teachings; cultivating all practices without attachment; being mentally imperturbable, like a great mountain; extensively liberating living beings, like a bridge; knowing that all living beings are in essence the same as the Buddhas. 
These ten things make enlightening beings’ practices pure. 
“Once enlightening beings have attained purity in practice, they also attain ten even greater things: 
the Buddhas of other realms always protect them; their roots of goodness increase, going beyond any comparison; they are able to receive the boosting power of the Buddhas; they always find good people and are relied on by them; they remain diligent and are never heedless; they know all things are equal and not different; their minds always abide in unexcelled great compassion; they observe things as they really are, producing sublime wisdom; they are able to practice skillful techniques of liberation; they are able to know the Enlightened Ones’ power of skill in liberative means. 
These are the ten excellent qualities of enlightening beings. 
“Enlightening beings have ten pure vows: 
they vow to develop living beings to maturity, without wearying; they vow to fully practice all virtues and purify all worlds; they vow to serve the Enlightened, always engendering honor and respect; they vow to keep and protect the true teaching, not begrudging their lives; they vow to observe with wisdom and enter the lands of the Buddhas; they vow to be of the same essence as all enlightening beings; they vow to enter the door of realization of thusness and comprehend all things; they vow that those who see them will develop faith and all be benefited; they vow to stay in the world forever by spiritual power; they vow to fulfill the practice of Universal Good, and master the knowledge of all particulars and all ways of liberation. 
These are the ten pure vows of enlightening beings. 
“Enlightening beings can successfully fulfill their great vows by abiding by ten principles: 
never wearying in mind; preparing great adornments; remembering the superlative will power of enlightening beings; when hearing about the Buddha-lands, vowing to be born in them all; keeping their profound determination everlasting; vowing to develop all living beings fully; staying through all ages without considering it troublesome; accepting all suffering without aversion; having no craving for or attachment to any pleasures; always diligently protecting the unexcelled teaching. 
“When enlightening beings fulfill such vows, they attain ten inexhaustible treasuries: 
perception of the Buddhas; perfect memory power; certain understanding of all the teachings; compassionate salvation; various states of concentration; extensive blessings and virtues satisfying the hearts of all beings; profound knowledge to expound all truths; spiritual powers gained as a consequence of practice; subsistence for immeasurable eons; entry into boundless worlds. 
These are enlightening beings’ ten inexhaustible treasuries. 
“When enlightening beings have attained these ten treasuries, their virtue is complete, their knowledge is pure; they explain the truth to sentient beings according to their needs and capacities. 
How do enlightening beings explain the truth to sentient beings according to their needs and capacities? 
They know what beings do; they know their causes and conditions; they know their mental behavior; they know their inclinations. 
To those with much greed and desire they expound impurity; to those with much anger and hatred they expound magnanimity and kindness; to those with much ignorance and delusion they teach diligent contemplation; to those in whom these poisons of greed, hatred, and ignorance are equal, they expound the teaching of the development of the knowledge to overcome them. 
Those who like birth and death they teach about the three kinds of suffering. 
To those who are attached to where they are, they teach the empty nullity of places. 
To those who are lazy they talk of great vigor. 
To those who harbor conceit they explain the equality of things. 
To flatterers and deceivers they tell of the simple honesty of the hearts of enlightening beings. 
To those who like silence and tranquility they expound the Teaching extensively, so that they will accomplish it. 
When they expound the Teaching, their expressions interlink, the meanings are free from contradiction and confusion. 
They observe the context of the teachings, analyze them wisely, determine right and wrong, accord with the definitive marks of things—impermanence, dispassion, and selflessness—and progressively set up boundless practical approaches, to cause all sentient beings to cut off all doubt. 
They know all faculties well, enter into the teachings of the enlightened, experience true reality, know things are equal, cut off all attachment to things, eliminate all clinging, and always remember the Buddhas, their minds never leaving them for a moment. 
They know the substance and essence of sounds are equal, and have no attachment to verbalizations. 
They can skillfully expound examples and allegories, without any contradiction, to make everyone able to realize the impartial body of wisdom which all the Buddhas manifest everywhere according to need and suitability. 
At this time, enlightening beings give up everything external and internal, without attachment, to satisfy the hearts of sentient beings—thus they can purify the transcendent practice of giving. 
They keep ethical precepts without attachment, forever divorcing conceit—thus they can purify the transcendent practice of morality. 
They are able to tolerate all evils, with minds equanimous toward all beings, without disturbance or wavering, just like the earth, able to bear all—thus they can purify the transcendent practice of forbearance. 
They undertake all practices without laziness, never regressing in what they do, with indomitable courage and energy, not grasping or rejecting all virtues, but able to fulfill all aspects of knowledge—thus they can purify the transcendent practice of vigor. 
They have no attachment or greed for any objects of desire, are able to consummate the successive degrees of concentration, always meditate correctly, neither dwelling in or leaving concentration, yet able to dissolve all afflictions, produce innumerable facets of concentration, develop boundless great psychic powers, going back and forth successively from meditation state to meditation state, in one meditation enter boundless meditations, knowing all spheres of meditation, not discordant with the seal of knowledge of all concentrations and trances, able to quickly enter the stage of omniscience—thus they can purify the transcendent practice of meditation. 
Hearing the Teaching from the Buddhas and accepting and keeping it, associating with wise companions, serving them tirelessly, always glad to hear the teaching, never growing weary of it, thinking about what is heard according to the true principle, entering genuine concentration, divorcing all biased views, observing all things well, apprehending the definite mark of the character of reality, comprehending the effortless path of the Enlightened, riding on universal wisdom, entering the gate of the knowledge of all knowledge, attaining eternal rest—thus can they purify transcendent wisdom. 
“Manifesting all worldly occupations to teach living beings, never getting tired of it, appearing to them in forms pleasing to them, having no attachments to anything done, sometimes manifesting the acts of ordinary people, sometimes manifesting the acts of sages, sometimes manifesting birth and death, sometimes manifesting nirvana, able to keenly observe all doings and manifest all adornments without covetousness, entering all realms of existence to liberate sentient beings—thus can they purify the transcendent practice of skill in means. 
“Thoroughly developing all living beings, thoroughly adorning all worlds, making offerings to all Buddhas, completely arriving at the state of nonobstruction, thoroughly cultivating practice extending throughout the universe, physically remaining throughout all times, knowing the thoughts of all minds, being fully aware that all cyclic transformations return to extinction, appearing in all lands, completely realizing the knowledge and wisdom of the enlightened—thus they can purify the transcendent practice of vows. 
“Replete with the power of profound will, being without defilement, replete with the power of profound faith, being invincible, replete with the power of great compassion, never being wearied, replete with the power of great kindness, being impartial in action, replete with memory power, being able to skillfully retain all meanings, replete with the power of elucidation, causing all beings to be happy and fulfilled, replete with the power of transcendent practices, adorning the great vehicle, replete with the power of vows, never ceasing, replete with the power of spiritual abilities, producing innumerable miracles, replete with the power of strengthening and sustaining, able to induce faith and acceptance—thus can they purify the transcendent practice of power. 
“Knowing those who act on covetousness, knowing those who act on anger, knowing those who act on folly, knowing those who act equally on all of these, knowing those who cultivate learning, in a single thought knowing the actions of boundless sentient beings, knowing the minds of boundless sentient beings, knowing the truth of all things, knowing the powers of all enlightened ones, being aware of all aspects of the cosmos of reality—thus can they purify the transcendent practice of knowledge. 
“Child of Buddha, when enlightening beings thus purify the transcendent practices, fulfill the transcendent practices, do not give up the transcendent practices, they abide in the magnificently adorned vehicle of enlightening beings, and expound the Teaching to all sentient beings who come to their attention, causing them to increase pure conduct and attain liberation. 
Those who have fallen into evil ways they cause to aspire to enlightenment, those in difficulty they cause to diligently persevere. 
To the greedy they teach desirelessness. 
The wrathful they induce to practice equanimity. 
To those attached to views they explain interdependent origination. 
Beings in the realm of desire they teach to divorce unwholesome things like craving and hatred. 
To beings in the realm of form they teach analytic insight. 
To beings in the formless realm they expound subtle wisdom. 
To people of the two lesser vehicles they teach the practice of dispassion and tranquility. 
To those who like the great vehicle they expound the great adornment of the ten powers. 
“As in the past when they first aspired to enlightenment they saw innumerable beings fallen into evil ways, they made the great lion’s roar and said, ‘I should by means of various teachings appropriate to their needs and potentials rescue and liberate them’; enlightening beings, replete with such knowledge and wisdom, are able to liberate all sentient beings. 
“Child of Buddha, enlightening beings, endowed with such knowledge and wisdom, cause the lineage of the three treasures never to end. 
Great enlightening beings teach creatures to awaken the will for enlightenment, and therefore are able to cause the lineage of Buddhas not to be broken off. 
They always expound the treasury of the Teaching for sentient beings, and therefore are able to cause the lineage of the Teaching not to be cut off. 
They maintain the principles of the Teaching well, without opposition or violation, and therefore can cause the lineage of the religious community not to be cut off. Furthermore, they are able to praise all great vows, and therefore are able to cause the lineage of Buddhas not to be cut off. 
They analyze and explain the aspects of causality, and are therefore able to cause the lineage of the Teaching not to be cut off. 
They always earnestly practice the six principles of harmony and respect and therefore are able to cause the lineage of the religious community not to be cut off. 
Also, they plant the seeds of buddhahood in the field of sentient beings, and therefore are able to cause the lineage of Buddhas not to be cut off; they protect and keep the Teaching unreservedly, and therefore are able to cause the lineage of the Teaching not to be cut off; they unify and order the great community tirelessly, and therefore are able to cause the lineage of the religious community not to be cut off. 
Also, they serve and uphold the teachings spoken and the precepts established by the Buddhas of past, present, and future, and therefore are able to cause the lineage of the Buddha, Teaching, and Community to never be cut off. 
“Thus enlightening beings succeed to the Three Treasures, free from error in all they do: all of their actions they dedicate to omniscience, and therefore their physical, verbal, and mental actions are free from flaws; being free from flaws, all the good deeds they do, all the practices they carry out, edifying beings, teaching them according to their needs, are never in error even for a moment; all are in consonance with skill and knowledge, all are dedicated to omniscient knowledge, none passing in vain. 
“Cultivating and practicing good ways like this, enlightening beings fulfill ten kinds of adornments moment after moment: 
adornment of bodies—they appear as appropriate to beings who can be taught; adornment of speech—they cut off all doubts and cause everyone to rejoice; adornment of mind—they enter all meditations in a single instant; adornment of buddha-lands—all are pure, free from afflictions; adornment of auras—they radiate boundless light, illumining sentient beings everywhere; adornment of community—they unify communities and gladden them all; adornment of spiritual powers—they can appear freely, adapting to the minds of sentient beings; adornment of true teaching—they are able to attract all intelligent people; adornment of the state of nirvana—becoming enlightened in one place, they pervade the whole universe; adornment of skillful explanation—they teach in accord with the place, the time, the faculty, and capacity. 
“Perfecting these adornments, the physical, verbal, and mental actions of enlightening beings, moment after moment, are never wasted; all they dedicate to entering into omniscience. 
If any sentient beings see these enlightening beings, know that this also will not be in vain, for they will surely attain unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment. Any who hear their names, or make offerings to them, or live with them, or remember them, or leave home to follow them, or listen to them preach, or rejoice in their virtues, or respect them from afar, or even praise their names, will all attain unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment. 
“For example, it is as though there were a medicine, called ‘good to see,’ which removed all toxins from those who saw it; so it is with enlightening beings who have accomplished this teaching—if sentient beings see them, all the poisons of afflictions will be destroyed, and wholesome states will increase. 
“Enlightening beings, abiding by this teaching and earnestly applying it, destroy the darkness of ignorance by means of the light of wisdom; they conquer the armies of demons by the power of compassion; they check heretics by means of great knowledge and the power of virtue; they wipe out all afflictions staining the mind by means of adamantine concentration; they gather roots of goodness by the power of diligence; they avoid the difficulties of evil ways by means of the power of virtues of purifying buddha-lands; they purify their spheres of knowledge by the power of nonattachment; by the power of skill in means and knowledge they produce the transcendent practices of the stages of enlightening, as well as the various concentrations, six superknowledges, and four fearlessnesses, making them all pure; by the power of all virtues they fully develop the pure lands of all Buddhas, their boundless distinguishing marks and refinements, and complete physical, verbal, and mental adornments; by the power of observation with independent knowledge they know the powers, fearlessnesses, and unique qualities of all enlightened ones are equal; by the power of vast knowledge they comprehend the realm of omniscience; by the power of their past vows they manifest buddha-lands according to the needs of those to be taught, turn the wheel of the great teaching, and liberate innumerable living beings. 
“Great enlightening beings diligently practice these things, gradually accomplishing all the deeds of enlightening beings, till they attain equality with the Buddhas, become great teachers in boundless worlds, maintaining the true teaching, protected by all the Buddhas, guarding and upholding the vast treasury of truth. 
Attaining unhindered intellect, they enter deeply into the facts of the teaching, and in boundless worlds among the great masses they manifest different physical forms, according to type, replete with supremely excellent features; with unhindered powers of elucidation they skillfully explain the profound teaching. The spheres of their speech, well rounded, skillfully reach everyone, therefore are able to cause those who hear to enter the gate of inexhaustible knowledge. 
Because they have freedom of mind, they explain the great teaching adaptively, and no one can obstruct them. 
Because they have attained fearlessness, their hearts are free from cowardice. 
Because they are masters of teaching, none can excel them. 
Because they are masters of powers of elucidation, they teach continuously with eloquence. Because they are masters of mental command, they definitively disclose the real character of all things. 
Because they are masters of great compassion, they diligently teach sentient beings without flagging. 
Because they are masters of great kindness, they emanate a great web of lights pleasing all hearts. 
Thus do enlightening beings, on the high and wide lion throne, expound the Great Teaching; aside from the Enlightened Ones and the great enlightening beings of surpassing will and knowledge, no other beings can excel them, none can see their crowns, none can outshine them, and no one can stump them with difficult questions. 
“Child of Buddha, once enlightening beings have attained such independent power, even if there were a vast sanctuary the size of unspeakably many worlds filled with beings, each of whom had the majesty of a lord of a billion worlds, as soon as any of the enlightening beings showed themselves, they would outshine the whole crowd of such beings. 
With great kindness and compassion they would give them security where they were afraid and weak, and with profound wisdom they would examine their inclinations and teach them with fearless eloquence, causing joy to all. 
Because great enlightening beings have developed the sphere of immeasurable knowledge and wisdom; because they have developed immeasurable skillful discernment; because they have developed vast power of right mindfulness; because they have developed infinitely flexible intellect; because they have developed the total mental command to ascertain the true character of all things; because they have developed a boundless determination for enlightenment; because they have developed unerring powers of elucidation; because they have developed profound faith and resolve boosted by the Buddhas; because they have developed the power of knowledge to enter the assemblies of all Buddhas; because they have developed the pure mind that knows the Buddhas of all times are of the same essential nature; because they have developed the knowledge of enlightened ones of all times, and the great will and knowledge of all enlightening beings, and are able to be teachers of the truth, to open up the treasury of the true teaching of the Buddhas, and to protect and keep it.” Then, to restate what he meant, the enlightening being Truth Wisdom, by the spiritual power of the Buddha uttered these verses: 
Mind dwelling on enlightenment, gathering myriad virtues, Never self-indulgent, planting unshakable wisdom, Always mindful of the aspiration for enlightenment— At this all Buddhas rejoice. 
Mindfulness and will firm, self-motivated, Relying on nothing in the world, and never shrinking in fright, Entering the profound truth by the practice of noncontention— At this the Buddhas all rejoice. 
Once the Buddhas rejoice, enlightening beings are firm in effort— They cultivate virtue and wisdom, and all that assists the Path. 
Entering into the pure practices of all the stages, They fulfill the aspiration spoken of by the Enlightened. 
Practicing this, they attain the wondrous truth, And having attained to truth, they pass it on to others— According to mentalities, faculties, and natures, They teach in accord with whatever is fitting. 
Enlightening beings expound the Teaching for others Without giving up their own transcendent practices: 
Once they have accomplished the transcendent ways, They remain forever in the sea of existence, rescuing living beings. 
They practice diligently day and night, never flagging, Causing the seeds of the three treasures not to perish. 
All the pure practices they carry out They dedicate to the stage of enlightenment. 
The virtuous acts performed by enlightening beings Are all to develop and complete the living, To have them destroy obscurity and annihilate affliction, Subdue the demon armies and fulfill true awakening. 
Thus practicing, they attain Buddha-knowledge, Entering deeply into the treasury of truth of the Enlightened. 
As great teachers they expound the subtle truth, Like sweet elixir refreshing all. 
Their compassion and pity extends to all— They know the mind of every sentient being And expound to them in accord with their predilections Infinite, boundless enlightening teachings. 
Their deportment is calm as a majestic elephant, Their fearless courage is like that of a lion: 
Imperturbable as a mountain, their knowledge is like an ocean, And like a great rain, removing all heat. 
When Truth Wisdom had spoken these verses, the Buddha was delighted, and everyone reverentially put them into practice. 
Ascent to the Palace of the Suyama Heaven At that time the World Honored One, without leaving the foot of the enlightenment trees and the peaks of the polar mountains, headed for the jewel-adorned hall of the palace of the Suyama heaven. 
The king of the Suyama heaven, seeing from afar the Buddha coming, produced by magical powers a jewel lotus bank lion throne in his palace, with a million tiers of decorations, wrapped in a million golden nets, covered with a million drapes of flowers, a million drapes of garlands, a million drapes of perfumes, and a million drapes of jewels, surrounded by a million canopies each of flowers, garlands, perfumes, and jewels; a million lights illumined it. 
A million celestial kings of the Suyama heaven bowed in respect, a million Brahma kings danced for joy, a million enlightening beings sang praises. 
A million heavenly symphonies each played a million tones of truth, continuing endlessly; a million clouds of various flowers, a million clouds of various garlands, a million clouds of various ornaments, and a million clouds of various robes, covered all around; a million clouds of various wish-fulfilling jewels shone with light. 
Then that celestial king, having set out this throne, turned to the Buddha, the World Honored One, bowed and joined his palms with reverence and respect and said, “Welcome, O World Honored One; welcome, Felicitous One; welcome, Enlightened One; welcome, O Worthy; welcome, O Truly Awakened One. 
Please be so gracious as to sojourn in this palace.” Then the Buddha, accepting the invitation, ascended to the precious hall. This also took place in the same way everywhere in the ten directions. 
Then the celestial king, reflecting on the roots of goodness he had planted with past Buddhas, spoke these verses with the aid of the Buddha’s spiritual powers: The Buddha Renown, famed throughout the ten directions, Supreme among the Auspicious, Has been in this hall of jewels; Therefore this place is most auspicious. 
The Buddha Jewel King, lamp of the world, Supreme among the Auspicious, Has been in this pure hall; Therefore this place is most auspicious. 
The Buddha Joyful Eye, with unhindered vision, Supreme among the Auspicious, Has been in this adorned hall; Therefore this place is most auspicious. 
The Buddha Burning Lamp, lighting the world, Supreme among the Auspicious, Has been in this magnificent hall; Therefore this place is most auspicious. 
The Buddha Benefactor, aid of the world, Supreme among the Auspicious, Has been in this undefiled hall; Therefore this place is most auspicious. 
The Buddha Well Aware, who had no teacher, Supreme among the Auspicious, Has been in this hall of precious fragrance; Therefore this place is most auspicious. 
The Buddha Surpassing the Gods, a lamp in the world, Supreme among the Auspicious, Has been in this hall of sublime fragrance; Therefore this place is most auspicious. 
The Buddha No Departure, hero of philosophy, Supreme among the Auspicious, Has been in this hall of the universal eye; Therefore this place is most auspicious. 
The Buddha Unsurpassed, replete with all virtues, Supreme among the Auspicious, Has been in this well-adorned hall; Therefore this place is most auspcious. 
The Buddha Ascetic, benefiting the world, Supreme among the Auspicious, Has been in this hall of universal embellishment; Therefore this place is most auspicious. 
Just as the king of the Suyama heaven in this world, graced with the occult power of the Buddha, recalled the virtues of Buddhas of ancient times and extolled them, so did all the kings of the Suyama heavens in the ten directions laud the virtues of Buddhas. 
Then the World Honored One entered the jewel-adorned hall and sat crosslegged on the jewel lotus flower bank lion throne; the hall suddenly expanded vastly. The same thing happened in all worlds of the ten directions as happened in the abodes of the gods. 
Eulogies in the Palace of the Suyama Heaven Having come to the Buddha, these enlightening beings bowed at the Buddha’s feet, then each made jewel bank lion seats in their respective directions and sat thereupon. 
As in this world enlightening beings gathered this way in the Suyama heaven, so did this also take place in all worlds; the names of the enlightening beings, their worlds, and the Buddhas they associated with, were all the same. 
Then the World Honored One emanated from the top of his feet ten trillion beams of light of wonderful hues, illumining the ten directions; the Buddhas and congregations in the palaces of the Suyama heavens in all worlds were made clearly visible. 
Then the Enlightening being Forest of Virtues, imbued with power from the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said in verse, Buddha emanates great light Illumining the ten directions; All see the Honored One of heaven and earth Freely, without obstruction. 
Buddha sits in the Suyama palace Yet pervades all worlds in the cosmos; This phenomenon is most extraordinary, Wondered at by the world. 
The king of the Suyama heaven Has praised ten Buddhas in verse; What is seen in this assembly Is all the same everywhere. 
Those groups of enlightening beings All have the same names as ours: In every place in the ten directions They expound the unsurpassed teaching. The worlds from which they come Are also the same in name as ours: Each of them have, with their Buddhas, Perfected religious practice. 
The names of each of those Buddhas Are also the same as of ours; Their countries are rich and happy, Their spiritual powers are autonomous. 
Everywhere in the ten directions They think the Buddha’s there; Some see him in the human world, Some see him in heaven. The Buddha abides everywhere In all the various lands: We now see the Buddha In this celestial court. He made a vow of enlightenment That extended to every world in the cosmos; This is why Buddha’s power Pervades all inconceivably. 
Leaving behind worldly desires He fulfilled boundless virtue; Therefore he gained spiritual power And is seen by all beings. 
He traverses all worlds in the cosmos Like space, with no obstruction; One body, infinite bodies: His form cannot be grasped. 
Buddha’s virtues are boundless; How could they be measured? 
Neither abiding nor leaving, He permeates the cosmos. Then the enlightening being Forest of Wisdom, empowered by the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said in verse, The great leader of the world, Supreme honored one, free from defilement, Is hard to get to meet Even in countless eons. 
Buddha emits great light Visible to all the world; Preaching extensively for the multitudes, He benefits all living beings. 
Buddha appears in the world Removing the darkness of ignorance; Such a lamp of the world Is rare and hard to get to behold. 
Having cultivated generosity, self-control, and patience, Diligence and meditation, And ultimate transcendent wisdom, With them he lights the world. 
The Buddha has no peer; None comparable can be found. 
Without comprehending real truth No one can perceive him. Buddha’s body and psychic powers Are inconceivably free: Neither going nor coming, He speaks the truth to liberate. 
If any can see and hear The pure Teacher of humans and gods, They’ll leave forever the states of woe And cast off all miseries. 
For measureless, countless eons He cultivated enlightening practice; Who cannot know the meaning of this Cannot attain buddhahood. 
If one can know this meaning, One’s virtues will surpass One who makes offerings to countless Buddhas For inconceivable eons. 
Even if one gives to a Buddha Countless lands full of jewels, If one knows not this meaning, One never attains enlightenment. 
Then the enlightening being Forest of Victory, imbued with power from the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said in verse, As in the summer months With the sky clear and cloudless, The radiant sun blazes with light Filling the ten directions, That light boundless, Impossible to measure Even by those with eyes, Let alone the blind— So are the Buddhas— Their virtues are boundless; Even in inconceivable eons No one can know them in detail. All things have no provenance And no one can create them: 
There is nowhere whence they are born, They cannot be discriminated. 
All things have no provenance, Therefore they have no birth; Because there is no birth, Neither can extinction be found. 
All things are birthless And have no extinction either; Those who understand in this way Will see the Buddha. 
Because things have no birth, Their inherent nature is nonexistent; One who analyzes and knows this Will arrive at the profound truth. 
Because things have no inherent nature No one can comprehend them; When understanding things in this way, Ultimately nothing is understood. 
That which is said to have birth Is to manifest lands— If one can know the nature of lands One’s mind will not be confused: 
Examining according to truth The nature of the world and lands, If one is able to know this, One can explain all things. 
Then the enlightening being Forest of Fearlessness, by the power of the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said in verse, The Buddha’s immense body Reaches the extremities of the cosmos; Without leaving this seat It pervades all places. 
Whoever, hearing this teaching, Respects and has faith in it, Shall forever escape all the miseries Of the states of woe. 
Even going to many worlds, Uncountably numerous, Single-mindedly desiring to hear Of the powers of the Buddha, And such qualities of Buddhas, Their unexcelled enlightenment, Even wanting to hear for a moment, None is able to do so. 
If any in the past Believed this aspect of Buddha, They have already become Buddhas And are lamps of the world. 
If any will get to hear Of the Buddha’s free powers, And having heard will believe, They too will become Buddhas. 
If any in the present Can believe this teaching of Buddha, They will also become Buddhas And expound the teaching fearlessly. 
This teaching is hard to encounter Even in countless eons: If any get to hear it, Know it is the power of past vows. 
If any can accept and hold Such teachings of Buddha, And, upholding them, spread them too, They will become Buddhas. 
How much the more so those who work diligently, Firm of mind, not giving up: 
You should know such people Will certainly attain enlightenment. Then the enlightening being Forest of Conscience, empowered by the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said in verse, If people get to hear This rare teaching of freedom And can produce a joyful mind They’ll soon remove the webs of doubt. 
The one who knows and sees all Speaks these words himself; There’s nothing the Buddha knows not, Therefore he’s inconceivable. 
Never from lack of wisdom Has wisdom ever been born: Worldlings are always in the dark, And therefore none can produce it. 
Just as form and nonform Are two and not one, So are knowledge and ignorance: They are essentially different. 
As signs and signlessness, Birth-death and nirvana, Are distinct and not the same, So are knowledge and nescience. 
When a world first comes to be There’s no sign of decay: So it is with knowledge and ignorance: Their characteristics are not simultaneous. 
Like the enlightening beings’ first state of mind Does not coexist with their final state of mind, So it is with knowledge and nescience: These two minds do not coexist. 
Just as bodies of consciousness Are individual and don’t combine, So also knowledge and ignorance Ultimately have no communion. 
Just as a panacea Can eliminate all toxins, So also can knowledge Extinguish all ignorance. 
The Enlightened is unexcelled And also has no peer; He has no compare at all And is therefore hard to meet. 
Then the enlightening being Forest of Energy, empowered by the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said in verse, All things have no differentiation; No one can know them: Only among Buddhas are they known, Because Buddhas’ knowledge is ultimate. 
Just as gold and gold color Are in essence no different, So also phenomena and nonphenomena Are in essence no different. 
Sentient beings and not sentient beings Are both without reality: In this way the natures of all things In truth are nonexistent. 
Just as the future Has not the marks of the past, So also do all things Not have any marks at all. 
Just as the signs of birth and death Are all unreal, So also are all things Void of intrinsic nature. 
Nirvana cannot be grasped, But when spoken of there are two kinds, So it is of all things: When discriminated, they are different. 
Just as based on something counted There exists a way of counting, Their nature is nonexistent: Thus are phenomena perfectly known. 
It’s like the method of counting, Adding one, up to infinity; The numbers have no substantial nature: They are distinguished due to intellect. 
Just as the worlds have an end When burnt in the final holocaust Yet space is not destroyed: So is the Buddha’s knowledge. 
These sentient beings of the universe Each grasp characteristics of space: 
So it is of the Buddhas; Worldlings conceive of them arbitrarily. Then the enlightening being Forest of Power, by the Buddha’s power, looked over the ten directions and said in verse, All realms of living beings Are in the past, present, or future: The living beings of past, present, and future All dwell in the five clusters. 
The five clusters are based on actions, Actions are based on mind: Mental phenomena are like phantoms, And so indeed is the world. 
The world doesn’t make itself, Nor is it made by another: Yet it has a formation And also has a disintegration. 
Though the world has a formation And a disintegration, One who understands the world Would not speak this way. 
What is the world, What is not a world? 
The three times and five clusters Are called the world, Their extinction is “not the world”: Thus they are just temporary names. How are the clusters explained? What nature do they have? 
The nature of the clusters is indestructible, So it is called unborn. 
Analyzing these clusters, Their nature is fundamentally empty and nil; Because it is empty, it cannot be destroyed: This is the meaning of birthlessness. 
Since sentient beings are thus, So also are the Buddhas; Buddhas and Buddha-teachings Intrinsically have no existence. 
If any can know these things Truly, without delusion, The one who knows and sees all Will always be before them. 
Then the enlightening being Forest of Practice, empowered by the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said in verse, As in all worlds All the solid elements Have no independent existence Yet are found everywhere, So also does the Buddha-body Pervade all worlds, Its various physical forms Without abode or origin. 
Just because of activities Do we say the name “living beings”— And there is no action to be found Apart from living beings. 
The nature of action is fundamentally empty and nil, But is that on which beings are based, Everywhere producing all physical forms, And yet coming from nowhere. 
This is the active power of forms, Impossible to conceive: If one comprehends the basis, Therein no object is seen. 
The Buddha-body is also like this: It cannot be conceived; Its various physical forms Appear in all lands in the cosmos. 
The body is not the Buddha, Nor is Buddha a body: Only reality is the body, Permeating all things. 
If one can see the Buddha-body Pure as the nature of reality, Such a one has no doubt Or confusion about the Buddha. 
If one sees all things As in essence like nirvana, This is seeing the Enlightened Ultimately without abode. 
If one cultivates right awareness And clearly sees true awakening, Signless, without discrimination, This is an inheritor of truth. 
Then the enlightening being Forest of Awareness, imbued with the power of Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said in verse, It’s like a painter Spreading the various colors: Delusion grasps different forms But the elements have no distinctions. 
In the elements there’s no form, And no form in the elements; And yet apart from the elements No form can be found. 
In the mind is no painting, In painting there is no mind; Yet not apart from mind Is any painting to be found. 
That mind never stops, Manifesting all forms, Countless, inconceivably many, Unknown to one another. 
Just as a painter Can’t know his own mind Yet paints due to the mind, So is the nature of all things. 
Mind is like an artist, Able to paint the worlds: The five clusters all are born thence; There’s nothing it doesn’t make. 
As is the mind, so is the Buddha; As the Buddha, so living beings: Know that Buddha and mind Are in essence inexhaustible. 
If people know the actions of mind Create all the worlds, They will see the Buddha And understand Buddha’s true nature. 
Mind does not stay in the body, Nor body stay in mind: Yet it’s able to perform Buddha-work Freely, without precedent. 
If people want to really know All Buddhas of all times, They should contemplate the nature of the cosmos: All is but mental construction. 
Then the enlightening being Forest of Knowledge, receiving power from the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said in verse, The grasped cannot be grasped, The seen cannot be seen, The heard cannot be heard: The one mind is inconceivable. 
The finite and the infinite Are both ungraspable; If any want to apprehend them, Ultimately they apprehend nothing. 
To say what should not be said Is self-deception; When one’s own task is not complete, One cannot gladden others. 
Those who wish to laud the Buddha’s Boundless body of wondrous form Could not express it fully Even in countless eons. 
Just as the wish-fulfilling jewel Can manifest all colors, Being colorless yet manifesting color, So are all the Buddhas. 
Also like clear space Is formless and invisible And though it shows all forms None can see space, So it is with the Buddhas; They manifest infinite forms everywhere Yet are not in the province of mental activity So no one is able to see them. 
Though the Buddha’s voice is heard, The sound is not the Buddha; And yet not apart from sound Can the Truly Awake be known. 
Enlightenment has no coming or going; It’s apart from all discriminations: 
How then can one Say he is able to see it? 
The Buddhas have no doctrine: 
It is just in accord with one’s own mind One thinks Buddha expounds such a doctrine. 
Ten Practices Then the Buddhas bestowed on the enlightening being Forest of Virtues unobstructed knowledge, unattached knowledge, uninterrupted knowledge, teacherless knowledge, knowledge without folly, unvarying knowledge, unerring knowledge, immeasurable knowledge, invincible knowledge, unflagging knowledge, and knowledge that cannot be taken away. 
Because the power of this concentration is naturally thus. 
Then the Buddhas each extended their right hands and patted the enlightening being Forest of Virtues on the head, whereupon he rose from concentration and addressed the enlightening beings, saying, “O Buddha Children, the practice of enlightening beings is inconceivable, equal to the space of the cosmos. 
Because enlightening beings cultivate practice in emulation of the Buddhas of past, present, and future. 
Buddha-Children, great enlightening beings have ten kinds of practices, which are expounded by the Buddhas of past, present, and future. 
What are the ten? 
The practice of giving joy; beneficial practice; the practice of nonopposition; the practice of indomitability; the practice of nonconfusion; the practice of good manifestation; the practice of nonattachment; the practice of that which is difficult to attain; the practice of good teachings; the practice of truth. 
“What is the great enlightening being’s practice of giving joy? 
Here the enlightening beings are magnanimous givers, bestowing whatever they have with an equanimous mind, without regret, without hoping for reward, without seeking honor, without coveting material benefits, but only to rescue and safeguard all living beings, to include all living beings in their care, to benefit all living beings, and to emulate the original practice of all Buddhas, recall the original practice of all Buddhas, delight in the original practice of all Buddhas, purify the original practice of all Buddhas, further develop the original practice of all Buddhas, make manifest the original practice of all Buddhas, and expound the original practice of all Buddhas, to cause all sentient beings to be relieved of pain and suffering and attain comfort and happiness. 
“When great enlightening beings cultivate this practice, they cause all living beings joy and delight. 
In any place there is poverty and want, they go there by the power of will to be born noble and wealthy, so that even if every single moment countless beings come to the enlightening beings and say, ‘O benevolent one, we are poor and in need, without sustenance, hungry and weak, worn out and miserable, on the brink of death; please pity us and give us your flesh to eat so that we may live,’ the enlightening beings would immediately give it to them, to gladden and satisfy them. 
Even should countless hundreds of thousands of beings come begging this way, the enlightening beings would not shrink back, but would rather increase even more in kindness and compassion. 
Indeed, because sentient beings all come seeking, the enlightening beings, seeing them, would become more joyful, and think, ‘I have gained a fine boon; these beings are my field of blessings, they are my good friends and benefactors—without my asking them, they come to cause me to enter into the Buddha’s teaching. 
I should now cultivate learning in this way, not controverting the wishes of sentient beings.’ They also form this thought: ‘May all the good that I have done, do, and will do, cause me in the future, in all worlds, among all beings, to receive an immense body, so as to satisfy all starving beings with the flesh of this body, and may I not die so long as even a single tiny creature is still not filled, and may the flesh I cut off be inexhaustible. 
By this virtue may I attain unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment, and experience great nirvana; and may those who eat my flesh also attain perfect enlightenment, attain impartial knowledge, fulfill all Buddha teachings, extensively perform Buddha work until entering extinction without remainder. 
If the heart of even one sentient being is unfulfilled, I will not attain unexcelled perfect enlightenment.’ “Thus do enlightening beings benefit the living, yet without any concept of self or any concept of sentient beings, or any concept of existence, or any concept of life, without various concepts—no concept of personality, no concept of person, no concept of human being, no concept of doer or receiver—they only observe the infinity of the realm of reality and the realm of sentient beings, their emptiness, absence of existents, signlessness, insubstantiality, indeterminacy, nondependence, and noncreation. 
“When they perform this contemplation, they do not see themselves, they do not see anything given, they do not see a receiver, they do not see a field of blessings, they do not see a deed, they do not see any reward, they do not see any result, they do not see a great result, they do not see a small result. 
“Then the enlightening beings observe that all the bodies taken on by living beings in the past, future, and present eventually perish; then they form this thought: 
‘How remarkable it is how foolish and ignorant sentient beings are; within birth and death they receive countless bodies, which are perishable and transient, soon returning to decay and extinction: having already passed away, now passing away, and yet to pass away, they still cannot use the destructible body to seek the indestructible body. 
I should learn all that the Buddhas learn, to realize omniscience, know all truths, and explain to sentient beings the indestructible nature of reality, which is equal in past, present, and future, and which accords with utmost tranquility and serenity, to cause them to permanently attain peace and happiness.’ “This is called the great enlightening beings’ first practice, of giving joy. 
“What is the great enlightening beings’ beneficial practice? 
Here enlightening beings maintain pure self-control, and their minds have no attachment to color or form, sound, fragrance, flavor, or feeling. Also they preach this to sentient beings. 
They do not seek power, social status, wealth, appearance, or dominions. 
They have no attachment to anything, but just firmly uphold pure conduct, thinking, ‘As I maintain pure discipline, I shall surely get rid of all bondage, the torment of craving, oppression, slander, and disturbance, and will attain the impartial truth praised by the Buddhas.’ “When enlightening beings maintain pure discipline in this way, even if countless devils should come to them in a single day, each bringing countless goddesses all well versed in the arts of pleasure, beautiful and alluring, with various amusing things, in order to disturb the enlightening beings’ attention on the Way, the enlightening beings think, ‘These desires are hindrances to the Way and obstruct unexcelled enlightenment.’ Therefore they do not conceive even a single thought of lust; their minds are as pure as Buddha. 
The only exception is in terms of expedient means to teach and transform sentient beings—yet they still do not relinquish the determination for omniscience. 
“Enlightening beings do not afflict a single sentient being in pursuit of their own desires; they would rather die themselves than to do anything which would afflict a single being. 
“After enlightening beings have gotten to see the Buddha, they never arouse a single thought of desire, much less act upon desire. 
“At this point, enlightening beings think, ‘All sentient beings, throughout the long night of ignorance, think of desires, pursue desires, and are attached to desires; their minds are set in their ways and they are addicted to desires, whirling along with them, not having any freedom. I should cause these devils and these goddesses, and all sentient beings, to abide by the unexcelled precepts; once they abide in pure discipline, their minds will never turn back from the direction of universal knowledge, and eventually they will attain unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment, and finally enter complete extinction with no remainder. 
This is the work we ought to do. 
We should follow the Buddhas in cultivating this learning, and having done so, divorce all bad actions and get rid of the ignorance of the idea of self, enter all Buddha-teachings by means of knowledge, and explain them to sentient beings, to rid them of delusion, all the while knowing, however, that there is no delusion apart from sentient beings and there are no sentient beings apart from delusion, that there are no sentient beings within delusion and no delusion within sentient beings, and also that it is not that delusion is sentient beings or that sentient beings are a delusion—delusion is not something inside or outside, and sentient beings are not something inside or outside. 
They know all things are unreal, suddenly arising and suddenly perishing, having no solidity or stability, like dreams, like reflections, like phantoms, like illusions, fooling the ignorant. 
Those who understand in this way will be able to comprehend all actions, to master birth and death as well as nirvana, to realize enlightenment, to save themselves and cause others to gain salvation, to liberate themselves and enable others to gain liberation, to conquer themselves and cause others to be tamed, to become tranquil themselves and enable others to become tranquil, to be secure themselves and enable others to be secure, to be free from defilement themselves and cause others to be free from defilement, to be pure themselves and cause others to be pure, to be dispassionate themselves and cause others to be dispassionate, to be happy themselves and cause others to be happy. 
‘I should follow all the enlightened ones, detach from all worldly actions, fulfill all qualities of buddhahood, abide in supreme equanimity, be impartial toward all beings, clearly understand the objective realm, get rid of all error, cut off all conceptualizations, abandon all attachments, and skillfully engineer emancipation, to ever abide mentally in unexcelled, inexplicable, independent, immutable, measureless, boundless, inexhaustible, formless, most profound wisdom.’ “This is called the great enlightening beings’ second practice, of beneficial action. 
“What is the great enlightening beings’ practice of nonopposition? 
Here enlightening beings always practice tolerance and forbearance, being humble and respectful, not harming self, others, or both; not stealing or causing others to steal, not being attached to themselves, to others, or to both; not seeking fame or profit. 
They only think, ‘I should always expound the Teaching to sentient beings, to cause them to divorce all evils, to cut off greed, anger, folly, pride, hypocrisy, stinginess, jealousy, obsequiousness, and dishonesty, and cause them to always abide peacefully in forbearance and harmony.’ “When enlightening beings achieve this forbearance, even if countless beings should come to them and each being should produce countless mouths and utter countless words—unpleasant words, unwholesome words, displeasing words, undesirable words, words which are not those of the benevolent or the virtuous, words which are not those of wisdom, words which are not in accord with sagacity, words which sages do not approach, detestable words, and unbearable words—even if they abuse and revile the enlightening beings with such speech, and, furthermore, if they all had countless hands, bearing countless cudgels, with which they attacked and injured the enlightening beings, without relenting, for immeasurable eons, should enlightening beings encounter such torture, their hair standing on end, their life about to end, they form this thought: 
‘If my mind is disturbed by this suffering, then I have not mastered myself, I am not self-possessed, I do not understand myself, I am uncultivated, I am not properly stabilized, I am not at peace, I am careless, I give rise to attachments—how can I enable others to attain purity of mind?’ “Then the enlightening beings also think, ‘Since beginningless time I have dwelt in birth and death and experienced its pains and vexations,’ and thus reflecting, they redouble their efforts, purify their minds, and attain joy. 
They skillfully tune and concentrate themselves, and, themselves able to abide in the Buddha-teaching, they also enable sentient beings to attain the same condition. They further reflect, ‘This body is empty and null, it has no self or possessions, it has no reality—it is void by nature, with no duality. 
Neither pain nor pleasure has any existence, because all things are empty. 
I should expound this teaching for people, to enable all sentient beings to do away with their views. 
Therefore, though I meet with suffering today, I should accept it with patience, out of compassion for beings, to benefit beings, to pacify beings, out of pity for beings, to take care of beings and not abandon them, to attain enlightenment myself and also to enable others to attain enlightenment, so that my mind will never regress, and so that I may progress on the wav of Buddhahood.’ “This is called the enlightening beings’ third practice, of nonopposition. 
“What is great enlightening beings’ practice of indomitability? 
Here the enlightening beings cultivate various forms of energy—foremost energy, great energy, excellent energy, outstanding energy, supreme energy, sublime energy, exalted energy, unsurpassed energy, unequalled energy, comprehensive energy. 
They become naturally free from the three poisons of greed, hatred, and delusion, naturally free from pride and conceit, naturally not hypocritical, naturally not stingy or jealous, naturally not deceitful, naturally conscientious. 
Ultimately they do not make any effort that would afflict a single living being. 
They only make efforts to cut off all afflictions, to pull out the roots of all confusion, to get rid of all force of habit, to know all realms of living beings, to know where all beings die and are born, to know the afflictions of all sentient beings, to know the inclinations of all sentient beings, to know the perspectives of all sentient beings, to know the superiority and inferiority of faculties of all sentient beings, to know the mental activities of all sentient beings, to know all realms of phenomena, to know the basic nature of all Buddha qualities, to know the equal nature of all Buddha qualities, to know the equal nature of all time frames, to attain the light of knowledge of all Buddha-teachings, to experience the knowledge of all Buddha-teachings, to know the unique true character of all Buddha-teachings, to know the infinity of all Buddha-teachings, to attain far-reaching decisive knowledge of techniques of all Buddha-teachings, and to attain the knowledge to analyze and expound the expressions and meanings of all Buddha-teachings. 
Once enlightening beings have perfected these practices of energetic effort, if someone should say to them, ‘Can you pass countless eons enduring the pains of uninterrupted hell for the sake of each and every being in countless worlds, cause those beings to each meet countless Buddhas in the world, and through seeing Buddhas attain felicity and finally enter extinction without remainder, after which you yourself attain unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment?’ They would answer I can. 
Then again if someone should say, ‘There are countless oceans—you should drain them drop by drop with a hairtip; there are countless worlds—you should shatter them to atoms, and count each and every drop of the oceans and atoms of the worlds, and for that number of eons endure incessant suffering for the sake of living beings,’ the enlightening beings would not have a moment of regret or resentment on hearing such words—they would only be more joyful, feeling profoundly happy and fortunate that they had attained such a great benefit that they could by their power enable sentient beings to be forever liberated from suffering. 
Enlightening beings, by these means which they employ, enable all beings in all worlds to eventually reach ultimate release without remainder. “This is called the enlightening beings’ practice of indomitability. 
“What is great enlightening beings’ practice of nonconfusion? 
Here enlightening beings perfect right mindfulness, their minds free from distraction and disturbance, firm and imperturbable, consummately pure, immeasurably vast, without any delusion or confusion. 
That is to say, they can remember the explanations of material and immaterial phenomena; they can remember the explanations of the definition of the intrinsic nature of sensation, perception, conditioning, and consciousness, without any confusion in their minds. In the world they die in one place and are born in another without confusion in their minds. They enter the womb and leave the womb without confusion in their minds. 
They arouse the will for enlightenment without confusion in their minds. They attend teachers without confusion in their minds. They earnestly practice the Buddhas’ teachings without confusion in their minds. They notice the doings of demons without confusion in their minds. 
They divorce demonic activity without confusion in their minds. They cultivate enlightening practice for countless eons without confusion in their minds. The enlightening beings, having developed this immeasurable right mindfulness, spend countless eons listening to truthful teachings from enlightened and enlightening guides—profound teachings relating to emptiness, vast teachings relating to activity in the relative world, teachings relating to adornment by virtuous qualities, teachings of all kinds of arrays of the qualities of the cosmos, all interrelated, teachings expounding various bodies of words, phrases, and sentences, teachings of the embellishments of enlightening beings, teachings of the supremacy of the spiritual power and radiance of the Buddhas, teachings of the purity of correct seeking of certain understanding, teachings of nonattachment to any world, teachings which define all worlds, teachings of extremely broad scope, teachings of removing the blinders of ignorance and understanding all beings, teachings of what is common and what is not, teachings of the excellence of enlightening knowledge, teachings of the independence of omniscience. 
“Having heard these teachings, enlightening beings keep them constantly in mind for an incalculable period of time. 
When great enlightening beings cultivate practices over countless eons, they never afflict a single sentient being, which would cause loss of right mindfulness; they do not ruin the right teaching, and do not cut off roots of goodness—their minds are always expanding knowledge. 
Furthermore, these enlightening beings cannot be confused or disturbed by any kind of sound—loud sounds, coarse and garbled sounds, terrifying sounds, pleasing sounds, displeasing sounds, ear-shattering sounds, sense-debilitating sounds. 
When the enlightenings hear such countless good or bad sounds, even though the sounds fill countless worlds, they are never disturbed or distracted for a moment. That is to say, their right mindfulness is undisturbed, their state is undisturbed, their concentration is undisturbed, their entry into emptiness is undisturbed, their practice of enlightening acts is undisturbed, their determination for enlightenment is undisturbed, their recollection of the Buddhas is undisturbed, their contemplation of truth is undisturbed, their knowledge to civilize sentient beings is undisturbed, their knowledge to purify sentient beings is undisturbed, their certain understanding of the meaning of profundity is undisturbed. 
Because they do no evil, they have no obstruction of evil habits; because they do not produce afflictions, they have no obstruction by afflictions; because they do not slight the teaching, they have no barrier to the teaching; because they do not slander and repudiate the truth, they have no obstruction by retribution. 
Even if the aforementioned sounds should each fill countless worlds ceaselessly for countless eons, each able to devastate the faculties, bodies and minds of sentient beings, they still could not damage the minds of these enlightening beings. 
Enlightening beings enter concentration, abide in the teaching of the Sage, and meditate on and investigate all sounds, becoming thoroughly familiar with the characteristics of origin, existence,’ and disappearance of all sounds, and come to know the nature of the origin, existence, and disappearance of all sounds: 
having heard them, they do not give rise to covetousness or aversion, and don’t lose mindfulness—they apprehend their characteristics precisely without being influenced by or attached to them. 
They know all sounds have no existence and are in reality ungraspable, that they have no creator and no origin, that they are equal to nirvana and have no differentiations. 
“Thus do enlightening beings perfect tranquil, peaceful physical, verbal, and mental action, never regressing, till they reach omniscience. 
They skillfully enter all manner of meditative concentrations and know that all concentrations are of the same one essence. 
They comprehend that all things have no bounds and attain true knowledge of all things. They attain profound concentration detached from all sounds. 
They attain countless kinds of concentration. They increasingly develop a boundlessly vast mind of great compassion. 
“At this point enlightening beings attain countless concentrations in a single instant, and, hearing such sounds, are not disturbed—they gradually increase and broaden their concentration. They form this thought: 
I should get all beings to abide peacefully in unsurpassed pure mindfulness, so they may attain nonregression on the way to omniscience, and ultimately attain to nirvana without remainder.’ “This is called the enlightening beings’ fifth practice, leaving confusion behind. 
“What is the great enlightening beings’ practice of good manifestation? 
Here the enlightening beings are pure in thought, word, and deed; they abide in nonacquisition, and demonstrate nonacquisitive thought, word, and deed. 
They know that physical, verbal, and mental actions have no absolute existence. 
Because they are free from falsehood, they are free from bondage. What they demonstrate is without inherent nature and depends on nothing. They abide in mental accord with reality. They know the intrinsic nature of infinite minds. 
They know the inherent nature of all things is ungraspable, formless, exceedingly profound and difficult to penetrate. 
They abide in the absolute state, true thusness, the essence of things; they appear in life by way of expedients, yet have no retribution for actions. Unborn and undying, they abide in the dispassionate, tranquil nature of the realm of nirvana. 
They enter into the truth that is free from discrimination, bondage, and attachment. They enter the true principle of supreme knowledge. They enter the transcendental truth which cannot be understood or known by any worldlings. Such are the characteristics of the enlightening beings’ expedient manifestations of life. 
“These enlightening beings formulate this thought: 
‘The nature of all sentient beings is naturelessness; the nature of all phenomena is uncreated; the form of all lands of formlessness—in all worlds there only exists verbal expression, and verbal expression has no basis in facts. 
Furthermore, facts have no basis in words.’ Thus do enlightening beings understand that all things are void, and all worlds are silent: all the Buddha teachings add nothing—the Buddha teachings are no different from the phenomena of the world, and the phenomena of the world are no different from the Buddha teachings. 
The Buddha teachings and worldly phenomena are neither mixed up nor differentiated. 
Knowing that the nature of elements is equal, entering everywhere into the triple world, never giving up the determination for great enlightenment, never retreating from the will to transform sentient beings, ever expanding and increasing the heart of great compassion, they are a reliance for all living beings. 
“Then enlightening beings also form this thought: ‘If I do not develop and mature sentient beings, who will? 
If I do not pacify and civilize sentient beings, who will? 
If I do not teach and renew sentient beings, who will? 
If I do not awaken sentient beings, who will? 
If I do not purify sentient beings, who will? 
‘If I alone understand this profound teaching, then only I will attain liberation in unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment, while all sentient beings, being blind, will enter perilous paths, bound by afflictions, like people seriously ill constantly suffering pains. 
In the prison of craving and attachment, they are unable to get out by themselves. They will not leave the realms of hells, hungry ghosts, animals, or the netherworld; they cannot extinguish suffering or abandon evil deeds. 
Forever in the darkness of ignorance, they do not see reality. Revolving in birth and death, they have no means of emancipation. 
Living in the eight difficult situations, encrusted by all sorts of defilements, all manner of afflictions cover their minds. Deluded by false views, they do not travel the right path.’ Thus observing sentient beings, enlightening beings think, ‘It would not be proper for me to abandon these sentient beings while they are still undeveloped, immature, and unruly, and myself attain unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment. 
I should first transform these sentient beings, practicing enlightening deeds for unspeakably many eons, first developing the undeveloped, and taming the unruly.’ “When these enlightening beings abide by this practice, if gods, demons, ascetics, priests, or inhabitants of any worlds—cherubim, titans, etc.—should get to see them, or sojourn with them for awhile, and honor and respect them, serve them and give them offerings, or even hear of them, once having crossed their minds these deeds will not be in vain—they shall surely attain perfect enlightenment. 
“This is called the great enlightening beings’ sixth practice, the practice of good manifestation. 
“What is the great enlightening beings’ practice of nonattachment? 
These great enlightening beings, with minds free from attachment, can in every successive instant enter into countless worlds and adorn and purify these countless worlds, their minds free from attachment to anything in these worlds. 
They visit countless Buddhas, pay their respects, wait on them, and present them with offerings of countless flowers, perfumes, garlands, fragrant ointments, powdered incenses, clothes, jewels, banners, parasols, and various other adornments, all without number. 
These offerings are for the sake of the ultimate uncreated truth, for the sake of abiding in the inconceivable truth. 
In every instant they see countless Buddhas; their minds are free from attachment to the Buddha’s places, and they have no attachment to the buddha-lands either. 
They also have no attachment to the distinguishing marks of the Buddhas, and while they see the Buddhas’ auras of light and hear the Buddha’s sermons, yet they have no attachment. 
They also have no attachment to the congregations of the Buddhas and enlightening beings of the worlds of the ten directions. 
“Having heard the Buddhas’ teachings, their minds are joyful, and the power of their will is greatly increased, so that they are able to encompass and carry out the practices of enlightening beings; yet they have no attachments. 
“These enlightening beings, through unspeakably many eons, see untold Buddhas appear in the world; they attend and supply each Buddha for untold eons, never wearying of this. 
Seeing the Buddhas, hearing their teachings, and seeing the magnificent arrays of the assemblies of enlightening beings, they are unattached to any of them. 
And when they see impure worlds, they have no aversion. 
Because these enlightening beings observe according to the Buddha teachings. 
In the teaching of the Buddhas, there is neither defilement nor purity, neither darkness nor light, neither difference nor unity, neither truth nor falsehood, neither security nor danger, no right path and no wrong path. “Thus do enlightening beings enter deeply into the realm of reality, teaching and transforming sentient beings without forming attachments to sentient beings. 
They accept and hold the teaching, yet they do not form attachments to the teaching. 
They arouse the will for enlightenment and abide in the abode of the Buddhas, yet they do not form attachments to the abode of Buddhas. 
Though they speak, their minds have no attachment to speech. 
They enter the various realms of life with minds unattached to those realms. 
They comprehend concentration, can enter and can dwell in concentration, but they have no attachment to concentration. 
Going to visit countless buddha-lands, they may enter, see, or sojourn therein, but their minds have no attachment to buddha-lands, and when they leave they do not miss them. 
“Because great enlightening beings are able to be without attachment in this way, their minds have no barriers to the Buddha teaching. 
They comprehend the enlightenment of Buddhas, they realize the discipline of the teaching, they abide by the right teaching of the Buddhas and cultivate the practices of enlightening beings, they contemplate the enlightening beings’ methods of liberation. 
Their minds are free from attachment to the dwelling places of enlightening beings, and they also have no attachments to the practices of enlightening beings. They clear the way of enlightening beings and receive the prediction of enlightenment which is given to enlightening beings. 
Having received the prediction, they reflect, ‘Sentient beings are foolish and ignorant, without knowledge or vision, without faith or understanding, lacking in intelligent action, greedy and dishonest, covetous and grasping, revolving in the flow of birth and death—they do not seek to see the Buddha, they do not follow enlightened guides, they do not trust the Buddha; they are lost in error, mistakenly entering dangerous paths; they do not respect the Soviereign of the Ten Powers, they do not realize the benevolence of the enlightening beings. They are attached to their dwelling places, and when they hear that all things are empty, their minds are startled and frightened, and they shy away from the true teaching and abide in false teachings; they abandon the level, even path and enter perilous, difficult paths. They reject the ideas of the Buddha and pursue the ideas of demons. 
They are firmly and relentlessly attached to existents’. 
“At this point enlightening beings also think, ‘I should, for the sake of a single sentient being, in each land in the worlds in the ten directions, spend countless eons teaching and developing, and should do the same for all sentient beings, without on this account wearying or giving up.’ “Furthermore, measuring the entire universe with a hairtip, at a single point they pass unspeakably many unspeakable numbers of eons teaching, edifying, and civilizing all beings, and also do likewise at each and every point in the universe. 
Never for a moment do they cling to self or entertain any conception of self or possession. 
At each point they cultivate enlightening practice throughout the eons of the future, not attached to the body, not attached to phenomena, not attached to recollection, not attached to vows, not attached to concentration, not attached to contemplation, not attached to tranquil stabilization, not attached to spheres or objects, not attached to teaching and training sentient beings, and not attached to entering the realm of reality. 
The enlightening beings form this thought: 
‘I should look upon all objective realms as like phantoms, all Buddhas as like reflections, enlightening practices as like dreams, Buddhas’ sermons as like echoes; all worlds are like illusions, because they are upheld by the consequences of actions; differentiated bodies are like apparitions, because they are produced by the power of deeds; all sentient beings are like mind, because they are defiled by various influences; all things are like the limit of reality, because they cannot change.’ “They also form this thought: 
‘I should carry on enlightening practices in all lands, in all worlds throughout space, moment after moment clearly realizing all truths taught by the Buddha, with precise presence of mind, free from attachments.’ “Thus do enlightening beings observe that the body has no self, and they see the Buddha without hindrance. 
In order to transform sentient beings, they expound various teachings, to cause them to have unlimited joy and pure faith in the Buddha’s teaching. 
They rescue all without weariness of mind. 
Because they are unwearied, if there are any sentient beings in any world who are not mature or unruly in any way, they go there and employ expedient methods to transform and liberate them. 
By virtue of great commitment and will they remain secure among those beings, various kinds of speech, deeds, attachments, devices, associations, routines, activities, perspectives, births, and deaths, and teach them, not letting their minds be disturbed or discouraged, and never for a moment forming any thought of attachment. 
Because they have attained nonattachment and independence. Their own benefit and the benefit of others is fulfilled with purity. 
This is called the great enlightening beings’ seventh practice, of nonattachment. 
“What is the great enlightening beings’ practice of that which is difficult to attain? 
Here the enlightening beings perfect roots of goodness which are difficult to attain, invincible roots of goodness, supreme roots of goodness, indestructible roots of goodness, unsurpassable roots of goodness, inconceivable roots of goodness, inexhaustible roots of goodness, independently powered roots of goodness, greatly influential roots of goodness, roots of goodness which are of the same essence as all Buddhas. 
“When these enlightening beings carry out their practice, they attain supreme understanding of the Buddha-teaching, they attain broad understanding of the Buddhas’ enlightenment. 
They never give up the vows of enlightening beings, and for all ages their minds never weary. 
They do not shrink from suffering, and they cannot be moved by any demons. Under the care of all Buddhas, they fully carry out all the difficult undertakings of enlightening beings. In cultivating enlightening practices, they are diligent and energetic, never lazy. They never retreat from the vow of universal salvation. 
“Once the enlightening beings abide in these difficult to accomplish practices, they are able to transmute immeasurable ages of birth and death in every instant, without giving up the great vow of enlightening beings. 
If any sentient beings serve and support them, or even see or hear of them, they all will attain nonregression on the way to unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment. 
“Though the enlightening beings understand that sentient beings are not existent, yet they do not abandon the realms of sentient beings. 
They are like ship captains, not staying on this shore, not staying on the other shore, not staying midway, yet able to ferry sentient beings from this shore over to the other shore, because they are always traveling back and forth. 
In the same way enlightening beings do not stay in birth and death, do not stay in nirvana, and also do not stay in midstream of birth and death, while they are able to deliver sentient beings from this shore to the other shore, where it is safe and secure, without sorrow or trouble. 
And they have no attachment to the numbers of sentient beings—they do not abandon one being for attachment to many beings, and do not abandon many beings for attachment to one being. 
They neither increase nor decrease the realms of sentient beings; they neither exhaust nor perpetuate the realms of sentient beings; they neither discriminate nor bifurcate the realms of sentient beings. 
Enlightening beings enter deeply into the realms of sentient beings as the realm of truth; the realms of sentient beings and the realm of truth are nondual. 
In the nondual there is no increase or decrease, no origination or destruction, no existence or nonexistence, no grasping and no reliance, no attachment and no duality. 
Because enlightening beings realize that all things and the realm of truth are nondual. 
“Thus do enlightening beings, by means of appropriate techniques, enter into the profound realm of truth and abide in formlessness while adorning their bodies with pure forms. 
They understand that things have no intrinsic nature, yet they are able to distinguish the characteristics of all things. They do not grasp sentient beings, yet they are able to know the numbers of sentient beings. 
They are not attached to worlds, yet they appear physically in Buddha-lands. They do not discriminate principles, yet they enter skillfully into the Buddha teachings; they profoundly understand their meanings and principles and extensively expound the verbal teachings. 
They comprehend the dispassionate reality of all things, yet do not cease the path of enlightening. They do not withdraw from enlightening, they always diligently cultivate inexhaustible practice. 
They freely enter the pure realm of reality. 
“It may be likened to drilling wood to produce fire: fires may be unlimited but the fire doesn’t go out. 
In the same way do enlightening beings liberate people without end, yet they remain in the world forever without becoming extinct. 
They neither do nor do not reach an ultimate end; neither do nor do not grasp, neither do nor do not rely, are neither worldlings or Buddhists, neither ordinary people nor realized people. 
“When enlightening beings accomplish this difficult-to-attain state of mind, and cultivate enlightening practice, they do not preach the doctrines of the two vehicles, they do not preach buddhism, they do not talk about the world, they do not expound worldly doctrines, they don’t explain sentient beings, they don’t say there are no sentient beings, they don’t talk about purity or defilement. 
Because enlightening beings know all things have no defilement and no grasping, do not proceed and do not recede. 
“When enlightening beings practice this dispassionate, subtle, extremely deep and all-surpassing teaching, they do not think ‘I am cultivating this practice, have cultivated this practice, will cultivate this practice.’ They are not attached to physical or mental elements, or to sense faculties, sense consciousness, or sense data, or to inner or outer worlds. 
The great vows they undertake, their transcendent ways, and all their methods are without attachments. Because in the realm of truth there are no names corresponding to reality; in the vehicle of listeners and the vehicle of the self-awakened there are no real names; in the vehicle of enlightening beings there are no real names; in perfect enlightenment there are no real names; in the world of ordinary people there are no real names, nor in purity or impurity, in birth and death or nirvana. 
Because all things are nondual, yet none are not dual. 
They are like space, which anywhere in the universe, whether past, present, or future, cannot be apprehended, yet it is not that there is no space. 
Thus do enlightening beings observe all things to be ungraspable, yet not nonexistent. 
They see things as they are, without neglecting their tasks, everywhere demonstrating the practices of enlightening activities; they do not give up their great vows, civilizing sentient beings, turning the wheel of true teaching. 
They do not violate cause and effect and do not deny it, and do not deviate from the impartial truth. 
Equal to the Buddhas of all times, they do not cut off the lineage of buddhahood, they do not violate the character of reality. Entering deeply into the teaching, their expository ability is endless. They hear the teaching without attachment; reaching the profound depths of the teaching, they are able to expound it skillfully, hearts without fear. They do not give up the abode of Buddhas, but they do not violate natural laws; they appear throughout the world, yet are not attached to the world. 
“Thus do enlightening beings achieve the mind of wisdom which is difficult to attain. 
Cultivating various practices, they free sentient beings from the three woeful states of hell, ghosthood, and animality, teaching and enlightening, taming and civilizing, placing them on the Way of the Buddhas of all times, making them unshakable. “Furthermore, they form this thought: ‘Beings in the world are ungrateful and even hostile to one another; with false views and clinging attachments, illusions and delusions, they are ignorant and unwise; having no faith, they follow bad associates, and develop various kinds of perverse cleverness. They are full of various afflictions, like craving and ignorance. 
If people who are grateful, intelligent, wise and knowing filled the world, I would not cultivate the practices of enlightening beings therein. 
I have no attraction or opposition to sentient beings, I seek nothing from them, I do not seek even so much as a single word of praise.’ Cultivating enlightening practices forever and ever, they never have a single thought of doing it for themselves—they only want to liberate all sentient beings, to purify them so that they attain eternal emancipation. 
Because those who would be enlightened guides must be thus—not grasping, not seeking, just practicing the enlightening Way for the sake of beings, to enable them to reach the peaceful, secure other shore and attain complete perfect enlightenment. 
“This is called the great enlightening beings’ eighth practice, that which is difficult to attain. 
“What is the great enlightening beings’ practice of good teachings? 
Here the enlightening beings act as pure, cool reservoirs of truth for the sake of beings of all worlds—celestial and human beings, devils and gods, ascetics and priests, etc. 
Maintaining true teaching, they do not let the seed of buddhahood be cut off. Because they attain the spell of pure light, in teaching and predicting enlightenment their intellectual powers are inexhuastible. 
Because they attain the spell of complete meaning their comprehension of meanings is inexhaustible. 
Because they attain the spell of realization of true principles, their comprehension of principles is inexhaustible. 
Because they attain the spell of explanatory expression, their comprehension of words is inexhaustible. 
Because they attain the spell of nonobstruction of inexhaustible meanings of boundless words and phrases, their unimpeded comprehension is inexhaustible. 
Because they are anointed by the spell of the Buddhas’ coronation, their delightful eloquence is inexhaustible. 
Because they attain the spell of enlightenment without relying on another, their illuminating discourse is inexhaustible. 
Because they attain the spell of adaptive explanation, their adaptive discourse is inexhaustible. 
Because they attain the spell of elucidation and analysis of all kinds of bodies of words, phrases, and sentences, their explanatory eloquence is inexhaustible. 
Because they attain the spell of boundless versatility, their boundless elucidation is inexhaustible. 
“The great compassion of these enlightening beings is strong and steadfast, extending to all creatures. 
Throughout the universe they change their bodies to a golden color and carry out the deeds of Buddhas time and time again; adapting to the faculties, natures, and inclinations of sentient beings, with a universal tongue within one voice they manifest unlimited sounds, teaching as appropriate to the occasion, bringing joy to all. 
Even if there were countless beings in innumerable conditions, all in the same assembly, that assembly so vast it fills untold worlds, and each had innumerable mouths each capable of producing billions of sounds, and each should ask the enlightening beings different questions all at once, the enlightening beings would be able to take on all the questions instantly and reply to them and cause their doubts to be removed. 
As this is true of one assembly, so it is also of countless assemblies. 
“Furthermore, even if every single spot as big as a hairtip should in every successive moment produce unspeakably many unspeakable numbers of congregations, throughout the eons of the future—those eons may be exhausted, but the congregations are infinite—and all of them should every moment ask different questions in different words, enlightening beings could receive them all in a single instant, without fear or timidity, without doubt or error, thinking, ‘Even if all sentient beings come and question me, I will expound the truth to them ceaselessly, endlessly, causing them all to rejoice and dwell in the path of virtue, and also cause them to understand all words and expressions and be able to explain various principles to sentient beings, yet without discrimination in regard to language. 
“Once the enlightening beings abide in the practice of good teachings, they can purify themselves, and also can benefit all sentient beings by appropriate means without attachments, not seeing that there are any sentient beings that attain emancipation. 
“As they do in this universe, so in countless universes do they turn golden, and, fully equipped with the wondrous voice, with no barrier to any truth, perform Buddha work. 
“These enlightening beings develop ten kinds of body: 
the transcendent body which enters into boundless realms, due to annihilating all worldliness; the immanent body which enters into boundless realms, due to birth in all worlds; the unborn body, due to abiding in the impartiality of birthlessness; the undying body, due to all expression of extinction being ungraspable; the nonreal body, due to attainment of accord with reality; the nonfalse body, due to adaptive appearance; the unchanging body, being removed from death in one place and rebirth in another; the nondisintegrating body, the nature of the realm of reality being indestructible; the uniform body, being beyond all manner of speaking, past, present, or future; the formless body, due to ability to observe the characteristics of things. 
“Developing these ten bodies, enlightening beings are a house for all sentient beings, because they raise all roots of goodness; they are saviors for all sentient beings, because they enable them to attain great peace; they are a refuge for all sentient beings, because they act as a great reliance for them; they are guides for all sentient beings, because they enable them to attain unsurpassed emancipation; they are teachers of all sentient beings, because they cause them to enter into the truth; they are lamps for all sentient beings, because they cause them to see clearly the consequences of actions; they are lights for all sentient beings, because they cause the extremely profound wondrous truth to be illuminated; they are a torch for all in all times, because they cause them to clearly understand the truth; they are illumination for all worlds, because they cause them to enter the state of radiant light; they are clarifiers for all realms of being, because they reveal the powers of the enlightened. 
“This is called the great enlightening beings’ ninth practice, of good teachings. 
When enlightening beings abide in this practice, they are a pure cool reservoir of truth for all sentient beings, because they can plumb the source of all the Buddha teachings. 
“What is the great enlightening beings’ practice of truth? 
Here the enlightening beings perfect true speech—they can act in accord with what they say, and can speak according to what they do. 
These enlightening beings study the true words of the Buddhas of all times, they enter the nature of the lineage of the Buddhas of all times, they equal the roots of goodness of the Buddhas of all times, they apprehend the nondual speech of the Buddhas of all times. Learning from the enlightened ones, their knowledge and wisdom is consummate. 
“These enlightening beings develop the knowledge of what is so and what is not so in regard to sentient beings, the knowledge of consequences of past, future, and present actions, the knowledge of sharpness and dullness of all faculties, the knowledge of various realms, the knowledge of various understandings, the knowledge of where all paths lead, the knowledge of defilement or purity and proper or improper timing of all meditations, liberations, and concentrations, the knowledge of past abodes in all worlds, the knowledge of clairvoyance, and the knowledge of the end of all taints—yet they don’t give up carrying out all the practices of enlightening beings. 
Because they want to teach and enlighten all living beings and purify them. 
“The enlightening beings also conceive this overwhelming determination: 
‘If I attain complete perfect enlightenment first without having established all sentient beings on the path of unsurpassed liberation, I would be violating my original vow—that would never do, so I should first cause all sentient beings to attain unexcelled enlightenment and nirvana without remainder, and then after that fulfill buddhahood. 
Why Sentient beings have not asked me to set my mind on enlightenment—I of my own accord act as an unsolicited friend to sentient beings, wishing to first cause all beings to fully develop their good potential and attain omniscience. 
This is why I am supreme—because I am not attached to any world. 
I am highest, because I dwell in the state of unsurpassed self-control. 
I am free from all blindness, because I understand that sentient beings are boundless. 
I am done, because my original vow is accomplished. 
I am versatile, because of the adornment of virtues of enlightening beings. 
I am reliable, because of the acceptance of the Buddhas of all times.’ Because the enlightening beings do not give up their fundamental vow, they gain entry to the adornment of unexcelled knowledge and wisdom. 
They benefit living beings, causing them all to be fulfilled; they attain final consummation of their original vow. Their knowledge has free access to all truths. They cause all sentient beings to attain to purity. 
Instant to instant they travel throughout the worlds of the ten directions, instant to instant visiting countless buddha-lands, instant to instant seeing countless Buddhas and the pure lands the Buddhas adorned. 
They show the independent spiritual power of the Enlightened pervading the space of the cosmos. “These enlightening beings manifest innumerable bodies, entering all worlds without relying on anything. In their bodies they manifest all lands, all beings, all phenomena, and all Buddhas. 
These enlightening beings know the various thoughts, desires, understandings, results of actions, and roots of goodness of all living beings, and appear to them in accordance with their needs, in order to civilize and tame them. They look upon the enlightening beings as like phantoms, all things as like magic tricks, the appearance of Buddhas in the world as like reflections, all worlds as like dreams. 
They attain the inexhaustible treasury of bodies of meanings and expressions. 
They are in command of right mindfulness, and they have certain knowledge of all truths. 
Their wisdom is supreme and they enter into the true character of all concentrations, and abide in the state of nonduality of one essence. 
“Because sentient beings all cling to duality, great enlightening beings abide in great compassion; cultivating this teaching to annihilate afflictions, they attain the ten powers of buddahood and enter the reality realm which is like the net of Indra. 
Accomplishing the unhindered liberation of the enlightened, they are valiants among humans; roaring the lion’s roar, they attain fearlessness, and are able to turn the wheel of the unimpeded pure teaching. 
Attaining liberation of intellect, they know thoroughly all objects in the world. 
Stopping the whirlpool of birth and death, they enter the ocean of wisdom. 
Preserving the right teachings of the Buddhas of past, present, and future for the sake of all sentient beings, they reach the fountainhead of the real character of the ocean of all Buddha teachings. 
“Once enlightening beings dwell in this practice of truth, any beings who associate with them are caused to open up in understanding, be full of joy and completely pure. 
This is called the great enlightening beings’ tenth practice, of truth.” Then, because of the spiritual power of the Buddha, in each of the ten directions as many worlds as atoms in a buddha-land quaked in six ways, moving, moving everywhere, moving equally everywhere, rising, rising everywhere, rising equally everywhere, surging, surging everywhere, surging equally everywhere, shaking, shaking everywhere, shaking equally everywhere, roaring, roaring everywhere, roaring equally everywhere, crashing, crashing everywhere, crashing equally everywhere. It rained beautiful celestial flowers, celestial perfumes and incense, celestial garlands and raiment, celestial jewels and ornaments. 
Heavenly music played and celestial lights shone, conveying the subtle voices of all celestial beings. 
The miracles that appeared when the ten practices were expounded in the Suyama heaven of this world also appeared likewise in all the worlds of the ten directions. 
Also, due to the spiritual power of the Buddha, from each of the ten directions as many enlightening beings as atoms in a hundred thousand buddha-lands came to this world from beyond worlds as numerous as atoms in a hundred thousand buddha-lands; filling the ten directions, they said to the enlightening being Forest of Virtue, “Excellent, O Child of Buddha; you can skillfully expound the practices of enlightening beings. 
We are all similarly named Forest of Virtues and the worlds we live in are all called Banner of Virtue, and the Buddhas of those lands are all named Universal Virtue. 
At our Buddhas’ places this teaching is also expounded—the assembly, words, and principles are all the same, nothing more and nothing less. 
Child of Buddha, we have all come to this assembly through the power of the Buddhas to be witnesses for you. This is also true of all the worlds in the ten directions.” Then the enlightening being Forest of Virtues, by the spiritual power of the Buddha, looked over all the congregations in the ten directions, throughout the cosmos. 
Because he wanted to cause the lineage of Buddhas to continue, to cause the family of enlightening beings to be pure, to cause those who undertake vows not to regress, to cause practitioners to persevere, to cause all peoples in all times to be equal, to contact all the strains of Buddhas of all times, to expound roots of goodness that have been cultivated, to observe and analyze all faculties, inclinations, understandings, afflictions, habits, and mental activities, and to clarify the enlightenment of all Buddhas, said in verse: Wholehearted honor to the Lords of Ten Powers, Undefiled, totally pure, the unobstructed seers; Their realm is profound and far-reaching, beyond compare, They abide in the spacelike Path. 
The supreme among humans in the past, With immeasurable virtue, free from attachments, Foremost in valor, without any peer: Those beyond the dusts travel this Path. 
Now in the lands of the ten directions The ultimate truth is ably explained: Free from all faults, utterly pure, The independent travel this path. 
The future lions among humans Travel everywhere throughout the cosmos; Having evoked the Buddhas’ mind of compassion, The benefactors travel this path. 
The incomparable honored ones of all times Naturally destroy the darkness of ignorance, Equanimous toward all things; Those of great power travel this path. 
They see countless, boundless worlds everywhere, All their beings and conditions, Yet having seen do not discriminate falsely; The impertubable travel this path. 
Understanding everything in the cosmos, Most clear about the ultimate truth, They forever destroy anger, pride, and folly: The virtuous travel this path. 
Accurately distinguishing sentient beings, They enter into the true nature of all phenomena, Spontaneously understanding without relying on others; The spacelike travel this path. 
To all lands throughout space They go and teach, through many examples, What they teach pure and irrefutable; The supreme sages travel this path. 
Throughly stable, unregressing, They accomplish the noble, supreme teaching; Will power inexhaustible, they reach the other shore: Good practitioners travel this path. 
All stages, infinitely boundless, Their vast, most deep and subtle realms, All they know and see, without exception; The lions of philosophy travel this path. Understanding the meanings of all expressions, Crushing all disputes, They are certain of the truth, without a doubt; The great sages travel this path. 
Getting rid of the errors and ills of the world, Giving peace and happiness to all beings, They can be peerless great guides; Those of excellent virtue travel this path. 
They always give impartially to beings, Causing them all to rejoice, Their minds pure, free from all taint; The peerless ones travel this path. 
Their mental actions are pure and well tuned; Divorcing sophistry, they speak without fault. Their magnificent aura’s admired by all; The supreme travel this path. 
Entering truth, reaching the other shore, Abiding in virtue, minds forever at rest, The Buddhas always protect them; Those who extinguish being travel this path. 
Detached from self, free from affliction, Always proclaiming the truth aloud, They reach all lands in the ten directions; The incomparable travel this path. Having fulfilled transcendent generosity. 
Adorned by a hundred marks of blessing, All who see them are joyful; The supremely wise travel this path. 
The state of knowledge, hard to enter, They can abide in by subtle wisdom, Their minds ultimately impertubable; Those firm in practice travel this path. 
Able to enter all realms of being in the cosmos And find the ultimate wherever they enter, Their spiritual powers free and all-embracing; Those illumined by truth travel this path. 
The incomparably great sages Cultivate the nonduality of concentration, Their minds always in equipoise, enjoying tranquility; The all-seers travel this path. 
The interpenetration and distinction Of minute and great lands They know all in their proper spheres; The mountain-kings of knowledge travel this path. 
Their intellects are always clear and clean, Without attachments in the world; Keeping the precepts, they reach the other shore: The pure-minded travel this path. 
Knowledge and wisdom boundless, inexpressible, Pervading the space of the cosmos, They ably learn to abide therein; Those of indestructible wisdom travel this path. 
Their knowledge enters and pervades The realms of all Buddhas of all times, Never for a moment growing tired or wearied: The supreme travel this path. 
Well able to discern the elements of the ten powers, They know where all paths lead; Their actions are unhindered and they are free: Those embodying virtue travel this path. 
All the sentient beings there are In the infinite worlds in the ten directions They will rescue without forsaking: The fearless travel this path. 
Earnestly practicing the Buddha teachings, Their minds ever vigorous and indefatigable, They purify all the worlds: The great dragon kings travel this path. 
Knowing the dissimilarities in beings’ faculties And the countless differences in inclination and understanding, They clearly comprehend all kinds of realms: Those who go everywhere travel this path. 
To infinite lands in the worlds of the ten directions They go and are born, countless times, With never a thought of weariness or disdain: The joyful ones travel this path. 
Radiating nets of countless lights Illuminating all worlds, They enter the nature of reality wherever the light shines: The good-minded travel this path. 
Causing the lands of the ten directions to tremble— Countless billions of trillions, They do not cause the beings to fear: This is the path traveled by benefactors of the world. 
Understanding all principles of language, They are consummately skilled in dialogue, Their brilliant discursive intellect knowing all: This is the path traveled by the fearless. 
They understand the various lands with various orientations, Discerning, thinking, finding the ultimate, Causing all to abide in the state of inexhaustibility: This is the path traveled by those of superior intellect. 
Their virtues are infinitely numerous— They cultivate them all in search of the Buddha way, And reach the other shore of them all: This is the path traveled by the inexhaustible workers. 
The world-transcending philosophers With supreme eloquence roar the lion’s roar, Causing all living beings to reach the other shore; This is the path traveled by the pure-minded. 
They have already been crowned With the supreme teaching of the Buddhas; Their minds always dwell in the truth: The broadminded travel this path. 
Sentient beings have innumerable differences; They comprehend their minds thoroughly, Maintaining with certainty the treasury of Buddha teachings: Those like polar mountains travel this path. 
They are able to reveal countless sounds In each and every word Enabling beings to understand in accord with their kind: The unhindered seers travel this path. 
Their knowledge has impartial access To all rules of language, While they dwell in the realm of real truth; This is the path traveled by those who see the essence. 
Abiding at peace in the deep ocean of truth, Able to verify all actualities They understand the true aspect of signlessness of things: This is the path traveled by those who see the truth. 
They travel to every buddha-land Over countless, boundless eons, Observing and meditating ceaselessly: 
Infinite, countless Buddhas, Their names each different, They clearly see in the space of a point: This is the path traveled by those of pure virtue. 
They see Buddhas in the space of a point, Their number beyond measure or speech, The same true for every phenomenon: The children of Buddhas travel this path. 
Measureless, boundless, countless eons They clearly see in an instant, And know their length has no fixed characteristics: This is the path traveled by the liberated. 
They can cause all who see them to benefit, All planting affinities with the Buddha-teaching— Yet they have no attachment to their deeds: This is the path traveled by the most excellent. 
Meeting Buddhas for billions of eons With never a thought of weariness, The joy in their hearts increases more and more: This is the path traveled by those who don’t see in vain. 
Observing the realms of all beings Over countless, boundless eons, They’ve never seen that a single being exists: This is the path of the steadfast heroes. 
Cultivating boundless stores of virtue and knowledge, They are pure, cool universal reservoirs of virtue Benefiting all beings: The foremost of humans travel this path. 
The various species in the universe, Filling space, uncountable, They know all exist in terms of words: This is the path traveled by lion roarers. 
Able in each individual concentration To enter countless concentrations, They arrive at the recondite depths of the teaching: The expounders of the moon travel this path. 
With the power of acceptance they practice earnestly and reach the other shore, Able to accept the supreme teaching of dispassionate extinction, Their minds equanimous and imperturbable: This is the path traveled by those of boundless knowledge. 
At one seat in one world Their bodies are unmoving, ever tranquil, Yet they manifest their bodies in everything; Those of boundless bodies travel this path. 
Countless, boundless lands They cause to enter at once into one atom, Which is able to contain all unhindered: Those of boundless thought travel this path. 
Comprehending what is so and what is not, They are able to enter the realm of all the ten powers And accomplish the supreme powers of the enlightened: This is the path traveled by the foremost in power. 
Countless, boundless consequences of acts In past, future, and present ages, They always comprehend by knowledge: This is the path traveled by those of consummate understanding. 
Understanding right and wrong timing in the world, They civilize beings according to necessity, In every case adapting to their needs; This is the path traveled by those who comprehend. 
Guarding well their action, speech, and thought, Always making them apply the teaching in practice, They divorce all attachments and conquer all demons; This is the path traveled by the wise. 
Able to skillfully adapt the teachings, And able to enter the impartiality of true thusness, Their eloquent exposition is inexhaustible: 
Having fulfilled the method of mental command, Able to rest in the treasury of nonobstruction, They comprehend all realms of reality: This is the path of those who delve deeply. 
Equal in mind, same in knowledge As all Buddhas of all times, They are of one nature and one character: This is the path of the unimpeded. 
Having removed all veils of ignorance And entered deeply into the ocean of knowledge, They bestow pure eyes on all sentient beings: This is the path of those with eyes. 
Having fulfilled the impartial, nondual practice of spiritual powers Of all the Guides, They attain the independent power of the Enlightened: This is the path of the well-cultivated. 
They travel through all worlds Showering everywhere the boundless rain of wondrous teaching, Causing all to gain certain understanding of the meaning: This is the path of the Clouds of Teaching. 
Able to produce nonregressing pure faith In the Buddhas’ knowledge and liberation, They produce the roots of knowledge and wisdom by faith: This is the path traveled by those who learn well. 
Able to know in a single instant All living beings, without exception, They comprehend the intrinsic nature of beings’ minds: This is the path of those who realize naturelessness. 
To all lands in the cosmos, countless, They can travel by projection, Their bodies most subtle, beyond comparison: This is the path of peerless action. 
Buddha-lands are boundless and countless; There are infinite Buddhas therein: Enlightening beings appear before them all, Attending, providing, engendering respect. 
Enlightening beings can, with a single body, Enter concentration, become poised in stillness, And cause that body to appear as countless bodies Each rising from concentration. 
The abode of enlightening beings is most profound and subtle; Their practices and deeds are free from nonsense, Their minds are pure, always happy, Able to cause all beings joy. 
The differences in faculties and expedients Are clearly apparent to their knowledge, Yet they realize all faculties have no basis: This is the path of the tamers of the intractable. 
Able to expediently distinguish with skill They are versatile masters of all teachings. The worlds of the ten directions are each different: They live therein and perform Buddha work. 
Their faculties are subtle, so are their deeds; They are able to expound the truth broadly to beings: Who would not rejoice on hearing them? 
This is the path traveled by those equal to space. Their eye of knowledge is pure, without peer, They see all things clearly, This knowledge expediently distinguishing them: This is the path traveled by the peerless. 
All inexhaustible great virtues They have cultivated to consummation, To cause all beings to be pure: This is the path traveled by the incomparable. 
Urging all to cultivate the aids to the Path, Causing all to dwell on the ground of method, They liberate beings without number Without ever forming a concept of beings. 
They observe all opportunities and affinities, First protecting others’ minds, making them noncontentious, Showing all sentient beings the place of peace; This is the path traveled by the skillful. 
Perfecting highest, ultimate knowledge, Replete with measureless, boundless knowledge, They are fearless among all groups of people: This is the path of the knowers of means. All worlds and all phenomena They can enter into with freedom; They also enter all congregations And liberate countless beings. In all lands in the ten directions They beat the great drum of truth and awaken the living; As givers of teaching they are unsurpassed: 
This is the path traveled by the unperishing. With one body sitting crosslegged upright They fill countless worlds in the ten directions Yet cause their bodies not to be crowded: 
In one doctrine, one statement, They can explain boundless principles, And no limit to them can be found: 
This is the path traveled by those of boundless knowledge. They learn the Buddhas’ liberations well, Attain Buddha-knowledge without obstruction, Develop fearlessness and become valiants of the world: 
This is the path traveled by the skillful. They know the oceans of worlds in the ten directions And also know the oceans of all buddha-lands, And comprehend the oceans of knowledge and truth; All who see them are filled with joy. 
Sometimes they show entering the womb, sometimes birth, Sometimes the attainment of enlightenment— Thus they cause all worldlings to see: This is the path traveled by the unbounded. In countless billions of lands They manifest themselves entering nirvana But really they don’t give up their vows for extinction: This is the path of the heroic philosophers. 
The indestructible, esoteric unique subtle body Is equal to the Buddhas’, no different, But all sentient beings each see it differently: This is the path of the one true body. 
The real cosmos is all equal, without distinction, Containing infinite, boundless meanings; They enjoy contemplating oneness, minds unmoving: This is the path of knowers of all times. 
In terms of sentient beings and enlightening teachings, Their constructions and empowerments are consummate; Their supporting power is the same as the Buddhas: The supreme upholders of teaching travel this path. 
Their power of psychic travel is unimpeded, like Buddhas’, Their clairvoyance is unhindered and utterly pure, Their auditory faculties, unobstructed, can hear well: This is the path of those with unhindered minds. 
All their spiritual powers are fully complete, All developed according to their knowledge; They know all, without peer: This is the path traveled by the wise. 
Their minds are rightly concentrated, unwavering, Their knowledge is boundlessly vast, They comprehend all realms: This is the path traveled by the all-seers. 
Having already arrived at the shore of all virtue They can deliver beings one after another, Their minds ultimately never wearying: This is the path traveled by the constantly diligent. 
They know and see the teachings Of the Buddhas of all times, And are born in the family of the enlightened: The Buddha-children travel this path. 
They have fully developed adaptive speech And skillfully refute all opposition, And always can proceed toward enlightenment: This is the path of those with boundless wisdom. 
One light illumines boundlessly, Filling all lands in the ten directions, Causing all worlds to gain great brightness: This is the path of the darkness destroyers. 
According to what should be seen and supported They manifest the pure body of the enlightened, Teaching and edifying billions of beings And adorning buddha-lands the same way. 
In order to enable sentient beings to transcend the world They cultivate all the sublime practices; This activity is boundlessly great: 
Even if the body were reproduced to an unspeakable number, Equal to the space of the cosmos, And all should together laud their virtues, They could not finish them in a billion eons. 
Enlightening beings’ virtues have no bounds; They have fulfilled all cultivation: 
Even countless, boundless Buddhas Could not tell of them all in measureless eons, How much less could mundane gods and humans, Listeners and self-illumined ones, Be able in unlimited eons To sing their praises exhaustively. 
Ten Inexhaustible Treasuries “What is the great enlightening being’s treasury of faith? 
The enlightening beings believe all things are empty, they believe all things are signless, they believe all things are wishless, they believe all things are noncreative, they believe all things are without discrimination, they believe all things have no basis, they believe all things cannot be measured, they believe all things have nothing beyond, they believe all things are hard to transcend, they believe all things are uncreated. 
“If enlightening beings are able in this way to engender pure faith in accord with all things, when they hear all Buddha teachings are inconceivable, their minds are not intimidated; when they hear all Buddhas are inconceivable, their minds are not intimidated; when they hear the realms of sentient beings are inconceivable, their minds are not intimidated; when they hear the realm of reality is inconceivable, their minds are not intimidated; when they hear the realm of space is inconceivable, their minds are not intimidated; when they hear the realm of nirvana is inconceivable, they are not intimidated; when they hear the past, present, and future times are inconceivable, their minds are not intimidated; when they hear entry into all eons is inconceivable, their minds are not intimidated. 
The enlightening beings have wholehearted, firm faith in the Buddhas; they know the knowledge and wisdom of the Buddhas are boundless and inexhuastible. 
In each of the countless worlds in the ten directions are innumerable Buddhas who have attained, will attain, or now are attaining unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment, who have appeared, now are appearing, or will appear in the world, who have entered, are now entering, or will enter nirvana—the knowledge and wisdom of those Buddhas neither increase nor decrease, are unborn and imperishable, neither advance nor regress, are not near or far, have neither concern nor indifference. The enlightening beings enter into the Buddhas’ knowledge and wisdom and develop boundless, inexhaustible faith. 
“Once they have attained this faith, their minds do not regress, their minds do not become confused; they cannot be broken down, they have no attachments. They always have a fundamental basis, they follow the sages, they dwell in the house of the enlightened, they maintain the lineage of all Buddhas, they increase the faith and resolution of all enlightening beings, they conform to the virtues of all enlightened ones, they set forth the enlightening techniques of the Buddhas. This is called the treasury of faith of great enlightening beings. 
When enlightening beings abide in this treasury of faith, they can hear and retain all the Buddha teachings, explain them to sentient beings, and cause them all to awaken to understanding. 
“What is the enlightening beings’ treasury of ethics? 
Enlightening beings perfect the ethic of universal benefit, the ethic of not accepting wrong precepts, the ethic of nondwelling, the ethic of no regret or resentment, the ethic of noncontention, the ethic of noninjury, the ethic of nondefilement, the ethic of noncovetousness, the ethic of impeccability, and the ethic of nontransgression of moral precepts. 
“What is the ethic of universal benefit? 
The enlightening beings accept and uphold pure ethics fundamentally for the sake of benefiting all living beings. 
What is the ethic of not accepting false precepts? 
The enlightening beings do not accept or practice precepts of cultists; they only exert themselves naturally in maintaining the impartial, pure precepts of the Buddhas of past, present, and future. 
What is the ethic of nondwelling? 
When the enlightening beings accept and keep ethical precepts, their minds do not dwell in the realm of desire, they don’t dwell in the realm of form, they don’t dwell in the formless realm. 
Because they don’t keep precepts in hopes of being born there in those realms. 
The enlightening beings always abide peacefully in a state of mind free from regret and resentment. 
Because they don’t commit serious wrongdoings, they don’t practice flattery or deception, and they don’t break the pure precepts. 
What is the ethic of noncontention? 
The enlightening beings do not deny what has been previously established, and do not innovate—their minds always follow the precepts which are directed toward nirvana, keeping them without transgression. 
They do not afflict other beings by their keeping of precepts—they keep ethical precepts with the sole desire that all beings be joyful. 
What is the ethic of noninjury? 
The enlightening beings do not harm sentient beings on account of their precepts, or by learning charms, or by making drugs. 
They only keep ethical precepts for the purpose of saving and protecting all living beings. 
What is the ethic of nondefilement? 
The enlightening beings do not cling to extreme or biased views, they do not keep impure precepts: they only contemplate interdependent origination and keep emancipating precepts. 
What is the ethic of noncovetousness? 
The enlightening beings do not display extraordinary signs to make a show of virtue; they only keep ethical precepts for the purpose of fulfilling the way to emancipation. 
What is the ethic of impeccability? 
The enlightening beings do not boast of themselves as upholding precepts, and when they see those who break the precepts they do not scorn or shame them. They only make their minds single and keep the ethical precepts. 
What is the ethic of nontransgression? 
The enlightening beings forever cease killing, stealing, sexual misconduct, lying, two-faced talk, slander, meaningless talk, greed, anger, and false views: they fully accept the precepts of ten kinds of virtuous actions. 
When enlightening beings observe this ethic of nontransgression, they think, ‘Sentient beings’ transgressions of pure morality are all due to delusion. Only a Buddha is able to know why sentient beings become deluded and transgress pure morality. 
I should accomplish supreme enlightenment and extensively explain the truth to sentient beings, to free them from delusion.’ This is called the great enlightening beings’ second treasury, of ethics. 
“What is the great enlightening beings’ treasury of shame? 
The enlightening beings remember the wrongs they committed in the past and conceive shame. That is, they think, ‘Since beginningless past all sentient beings and I have been parents and children, brothers and sisters to each other: being full of greed, hatred, and ignorance, pride, conceit, dishonesty, deception, and all other afflictions, we have therefore harmed each other, plundering, raping, and killing, doing all manner of evil. 
All sentient beings are like this—because of passions and afflictions they do not respect or honor each other, they don’t agree with or obey each other, they don’t defer to each other, they don’t edify or guide each other, they don’t care for each other—they go on killing and injuring each other, being enemies and malefactors to each other. 
Reflecting on myself as well as other sentient beings, we act shamelessly in the past, future, and present, while the Buddhas of past, future, and present see and know it all. Now if I don’t stop this shameless behavior, the Buddhas of all times will also see me. Why do I still not stop such conduct? 
This will never do. 
I should therefore concentrate on eliminating evil and realizing complete perfect enlightenment, to expound the truth for all beings.’ This is called great enlightening beings’ third treasury, of shame. 
“What is the great enlightening beings’ treasury of conscience? 
The enlightening beings are ashamed of their insatiable desires of the past and consequent increase of all afflictions, such as greed, anger, folly, etc., and resolve that they should not act this way anymore. 
Also they think, ‘Sentient beings are unwise; developing afflictions, they do all sorts of bad things. They do not respect or honor each other and develop into enemies and malefactors to each other. They have committed all such evils, and are happy about it, pursuing and approving of them. Blind, having no eye of wisdom, they enter wombs in mother’s bellies and undergo birth, becoming impure corporeal beings, finally to become grey and wrinkled. 
if I now were to still act in these ways, I would be trying to fool the Buddhas. Therefore I should cultivate conscience, quickly attain complete perfect enlightenment, and explain the truth to all beings.’ This is called great enlightening beings’ fourth treasury, of conscience. 
“What is the great enlightening beings’ treasury of learning? 
The enlightening beings know that something exists because something else exists, and that something does not exist because something else does not exist; they know that something comes to be because something else comes to be, and that something passes away because something else passes away; they know what is mundane and what is transmundane, what is compounded and what is uncompounded, what is meaningful and what is pointless. 
“What does it mean that something exists because something else exists? 
It means that when there is ignorance there is conditioning. 
What does it mean that because something does not exist something else does not exist? 
It means that when there is no discriminating consciousness there is no name and form. 
What does it mean that something comes to be because something else comes to be? 
It means that when craving comes to be suffering comes to be. 
What does it mean that something passes away because something else passes away? 
It means that when becoming passes away birth passes away. 
“What are mundane phenomena? 
Material form, sensation, perception, conditioning, and consciousness. 
What are transmundane phenomena? 
Discipline, concentration, wisdom, liberation, and the knowledge and insight of liberation. 
What are compounded things? 
The realm of desire, the realm of form, the formless realm, and the realm of sentient beings. 
What are uncompounded things? 
Space, nirvana, extinction by analysis, extinction because of lack of conditions, and the subsistence of the nature of things, interdependent origination. 
“What are things with meaning? 
The four holy truths, the four fruits of ascesis, the four special knowledges, the four fearlessnesses, the four points of mindfulness, the four right efforts, the four bases of spiritual powers, the five faculties and five powers, the seven branches of enlightenment, and the eightfold path of sages. 
“What are pointless issues? 
Whether the world is finite or infinite, or both, or neither; whether the world is permanent or impermanent, or both, or neither; whether a Buddha exists after nirvana or not, whether a Buddha both does and does not exist or neither does nor does not exist after nirvana; whether oneself and sentient beings exist or not, whether they both do and do not exist, whether they neither do nor do not exist; how many Buddhas attained final nirvana in the past, how many listeners and individual illuminates attain final nirvana, how many Buddhas, listeners, individual illuminates, and sentient beings there are presently existing; what Buddhas appeared first, what listeners and individual illuminates appeared first; what Buddhas will appear last, what listeners and individual illuminates will appear last; where the world came from, where the world will go; how many worlds have come to be, how many worlds have perished, where did the worlds come from, where did the worlds go; what the very beginning of birth and death is, what the very end of birth and death will be—these all are called pointless issues. 
Great enlightening beings form this thought: ‘Sentient beings haven’t much learning in regard to birth and death and are not capable of knowing all these things. I should determine to sustain the treasury of learning, realize unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment, and expound the truth to sentient beings.’ This is called great enlightening beings’ fifth treasury, of learning. 
“What is the great enlightening beings’ treasury of giving? 
The enlightening beings practice ten kinds of giving: partial giving, exhaustive giving, inside giving, outside giving, inside and outside giving, total giving, past giving, future giving, present giving, and ultimate giving. 
“What is enlightening beings’ partial giving? They are benevolent and kind by nature and are very generous. If they receive fine food, they don’t take it all themselves—they want to share it with others, and only then will they eat. The same applies to everything they may receive. 
When they eat, they think. ‘There are countless microorganisms in my body whose life depends on me. If my body is satisfied, so are they. If my body is hungry or in pain, so are they. 
May this food which I now receive enable all beings to be satisfied; I myself eat this in order to distribute it to them, without greed for the taste.’ They also think, ‘Throughout the long night of ignorance I have been attached to this body and want to satisfy it, so I take food and drink. 
Now I bestow this food on living beings, so that I may forever end covetousness and attachment.’ This is called partial giving. “What is enlightening beings’ exhaustive giving? 
They get various kinds of fine food, incense, flowers, clothes, and other necessities of life—if they use them themselves, they can live out their years in comfort; if they give them up and pass them on to others, they will suffer want and die. 
Now I shall again give up my life as I have in the past, so I should do it for the sake of helping sentient beings.’ So they give away all they have, even to the point of ending life. This is called exhaustive giving. “What is enlightening beings’ inside giving? 
When the enlightening beings are young vigorous, and good looking, adorned with scents, flowers, and clothing, and have just received coronation as universal sovereigns, having all the seven treasures of universal monarchs, reigning over the four quarters, if someone should come and say, ‘O great sovereign, know that I am old and feeble, seriously ill, alone and helpless, worn out, not far from death: 
if I were to receive the hands and feet, blood and flesh, head, eyes, bones, and marrow from the king’s body, my life would be saved. Please don’t deliberate further and do not begrudge me this—just look upon me with compassion and give them to me.’ At such a time the enlightening beings would think, ‘This body of mine will in the end surely die, without any benefit. I should take the opportunity to give it away early to save a living being.’ With this thought they give without regret. This is called inside giving. 
When enlightening beings are in full maturity and physical well being, replete with all marks of dignity, adorned with fine flowers and excellent clothing, having been crowned as universal monarchs regining over the four quarters, having all the seven treasures, should someone come and say, ‘I am poor and oppressed by all kinds of miseries; please be so kind and compassionate as to give up your rank to me, so that I may reign and experience the felicities of sovereignty,’ the enlightening beings think, ‘All flourishing and prosperity must inevitably decline and end. 
When it does decline and end, it is no longer possible to benefit sentient beings. 
I should satisfy this person as he requests.’ And having formed this thought, they give up the throne without regret. This is called outside giving. “What is enlightening beings’ inside and outside giving? 
When the enlightening beings are in the position of universal monarch, as explained before, if someone comes and says, ‘You have been in the rank of universal monarch for a long time, and I have never been. 
I am now in my prime, wealthy, in possession of the whole world. 
Now a beggar appears before me; I should, through these perishable things, seek the imperishable truth.’ And so thinking, they abdicate, personally work respectfully as servants, without regret. 
This is called inside and outside giving. “What is the enlightening beings’ total giving? 
The enlightening beings are in the rank of universal monarchs, as described before, and countless poor people come and say, ‘The fame of the monarch is heard throughout the world, and we have come here because of your reputation. 
We each have requests which we hope you will compassionately fulfill.’ Then those poor people variously ask the monarch for the land, for his wife and children, for his hands and feet, blood, flesh, heart, lungs, head, eyes, marrow, and brains. 
At such a time, the enlightening beings think, ‘All who love must eventually part, with no benefit to sentient beings. 
Now I want to give up all clinging, and fulfill the wishes of sentient beings with these things which I must in any case eventually lose’. Having thus reflected, they give all, without regret or resentment, and without looking down on sentient beings. This is called total giving. “What is the enlightening beings’ past giving? 
The enlightening beings, having heard of the accomplishments and virtues of the Buddhas and enlightening beings of the past, are not attached to them, realizing they are not existent. They do not create discrimination, do not covet, crave, or seek them. 
They depend on nothing. They see things as like dreams, without solidity. They do not conceive of roots of goodness as existent, and they do not rely on them; however, they fulfill the teachings of Buddhas and expound them in order to teach and edify grasping, clinging sentient beings. 
Also they contemplate all things of the past, searching them out everywhere to find they cannot be apprehended. 
Having reflected thus, they ultimately relinquish all things of the past. This is called past giving. “What is enlightening beings’ future giving? 
When enlightening beings hear of the practices of Buddhas of the future, they realize they are not existent; they do not grasp their characteristics, they do not particularly delight in going to be born in the Buddhas’ lands, they do not indulge, do not cling, and yet do not disdain them; they do not dedicate virtues there, yet they do not withdraw from virtue on their account—they always cultivate practice diligently, never giving up, just wanting to include sentient beings in those realms, explain the truth to them, and cause them to master the qualities of buddhahood. 
And yet these qualities have no locus, yet are not without location; they are not inside or outside, not near or far. 
They also think that since things are not existent they cannot but be relinquished. This is called future giving. “What is enlightening beings’ present giving? 
When the enlightening beings hear of the virtues of all the beings of various heavenly states, of Buddhist disciples and individual illuminates, their minds are not confused or absorbed, not concentrated or scattered: they only observe all actions as like dreams, unreal—they have no craving or attachment, but in order to cause sentient beings to divorce evil dispositions, they practice the enlightening path without discrimination, fulfill the Buddha teachings, and expound them. This is called present giving. “What is enlightening beings’ ultimate giving? 
If innumerable sentient beings, some lacking eyes, some lacking ears, some lacking noses or tongues, or hands or feet, should come and say to the enlightening beings, ‘We are unfortunate, physically handicapped—please be so kind as to give up your organs so as to make us complete,’ the enlightening beings, hearing this, immediately give them; even if because of this they should be physically handicapped for incalculable eons, they would never have a single throught of regret. 
They just observe this body from its first conception, its various organs an unclean little mass of cells, which is born, ages, gets sick, and dies. 
They also contemplate this body as having no true reality, being shameless, lacking in sagacity, foul and unclean, held up by bones and joints, covered with blood and flesh, with nine apertures constantly flowing, despised by people. Having thus contemplated, they do not conceive a single thought of attachment. 
They also reflect that this body is fragile and unstable and not to be clung to, that it should be given to satisfy the wishes of others, and that this deed will guide all sentient beings and cause them to be unattached to body or mind, enabling them to develop the pure body of knowledge. 
This is called ultimate giving. This is the enlightening beings’ sixth treasury, of generosity. 
“What is the great enlightening beings’ treasury of wisdom? 
The enlightening beings know form as it really is, know the assemblage of form as it really is, know the extinction of form as it really is, know the path to extinction of form as it really is; they know sensation, perception, conditioning, and consciousness as they really are, know the assemblage of sensation, perception, conditioning, and consciousness as it really is, know the extinction of sensation, perception, conditioning, and consciousness as it really is, and know the path to extinction of sensation, perception, conditioning, and consciousness as it really is. 
They know ignorance as it really is, know the accumulation of ignorance as it really is, know the extinction of ignorance as it really is, know the path to extinction of ignorance as it really is. 
They know craving as it really is, they know the accumulation of craving as it really is, they know the extinction of craving as it really is, they know the path to the extinction of craving as it really is. 
They know Buddhist discipleship as it really is, they know the principles of discipleship as they really are, they know the development of discipleship as it really is, they know the nirvana of Buddhist disciples as it really is. 
They know individual enlightenment as it really is, they know the principles of individual enlightenment as they really are, they know the development of individual enlightenment as it really is, they know the nirvana of individual illuminates as it really is. 
They know enlightening beings as they really are, they know the principles of enlightening beings as they really are, they know the development of enlightening beings as it really is, they know the nirvana of enlightening beings as it really is. 
“In what way do they know these things? 
They know that actions resulting from past deeds, productions of causes and conditions, are all unreal and empty, are not self, are not substantial—there is not a single thing that can be established. Wishing to cause sentient beings to know their true nature, they explain it extensively for them. 
What do they explain to them? 
They explain that all things cannot be destroyed What things cannot be destroyed? 
Material form cannot be destroyed, sensation, perception, conditioning, and consciousness cannot be destroyed; ignorance cannot be destroyed; the principles of discipleship, self-enlightenment, and universal enlightenment cannot be destroyed. 
Because all things are uncreated, have no creator, have no explanation and no location, are unborn and unoriginated, not given and not taken, have no motion and no function. 
“Enlightening beings developing such a measureless treasury of wisdom, understand all things by a minimum of devices, spontaneously comprehending them clearly and not depending on another for enlightenment. 
“This inexhaustible treasury of wisdom is said to be inexhaustible because it has ten kinds of inexhaustibility: 
because the skills of learned enlightening beings are inexhaustible; because association with wise people is inexhaustible; because appropriate analysis of expressions and meanings is inexhaustible; because entry into the profound realm of reality is inexhaustible; because adornment with uniform knowledge is inexhaustible; because indefatigably accumulating all virtues is inexhaustible; because entering the gates of all concentration formulae is inexhaustible; because ability to distinguish the sounds of languages of all sentient beings is inexhaustible; because the ability to cut off the doubt and confusion of all sentient beings is inexhaustible; because manifesting all spiritual powers of Buddhas for all sentient beings to teach and civilize them and cause them to practice the teaching without interruption is inexhaustible. 
“This is called the great enlightening beings’ seventh treasury, of wisdom: 
those who abide in this treasury attain inexhaustible knowledge and wisdom, and are able to enlighten all sentient beings.” “What is great enlightening beings’ inexhaustible treasury of recollection? 
The enlightening beings cast off ignorance and confusion and attain full mindfulness. They remember one lifetime, two lifetimes, even ten lifetimes, a hundred, a thousand, a hundred thousand, countless hundreds of thousands of lifetimes in the past, their ages of formation, ages of decay, and ages of both formation and decay. And not just one age of formation, not just one age of decay, not just one age of formation and decay—a hundred ages, a thousand ages, a hundred thousand trillion ages, even up to countless, measureless, boundless, incomparable, uncountable, incalculable, unthinkable, immeasurable, inexplicable, unspeakably unspeakable numbers of Buddhas’ names. 
They remember the appearance in the world and forecasting of one Buddha up to an unspeakably unspeakable number of Buddhas. 
They remember the emergence in the world and discourses of one up to an unspeakably unspeakable number of Buddhas—as they remember the discourses, so also they remember the recapitulative verses, predictions, poems, stories, extemporaneous expositions, tales of past events, tales of past lives, extensive and universal teachings, miracles, metaphors, and analytic philosophy of the Buddhas. 
They remember one assembly, up to an unspeakably unspeakable number of assemblies. They remember the exposition of one teaching, up to an unspeakably unspeakable number of teachings. 
They remember the various natures of one faculty, up the various natures of an unspeakably unspeakable number of faculties. They remember the innumerable various natures of one up to an unspeakably unspeakable number of faculties. 
They remember the various natures of one affliction, up to the various natures of an unspeakably unspeakable number of afflictions. 
They remember the various natures of one up to an unspeakably unspeakable number of afflictions. 
This recollection is of ten kinds: dispassionate, serene recollection; pure, clear recollection; unmuddled recollection; thoroughly lucid recollection; recollection apart from defilement; recollection apart from various defilements; untainted recollection; radiant recollection; pleasant recollection; unhindered recollection. 
“When enlightening beings dwell in this recollection, no one from any world can disturb them, no different philosophies or arguments can change or move them. Their roots of goodness from the past are all purified. They are not influenced by or attached to mundane things. Demons and outsiders cannot harm them. 
This is called the great enlightening beings’ eighth treasury, of recollection. 
“What is great enlightening beings’ treasury of preservation? 
The enlightening beings preserve the discourses of the Buddhas, their expressions, meanings, and principles, without forgetting or losing them, for one lifetime, up to an unspeakably unspeakable number of lifetimes. 
They hold the name of one Buddha up to an unspeakably unspeakable number of Buddhas. 
They preserve the reckoning of one age up to an unspeakably unspeakable number of ages. 
They preserve the predictions of one Buddha up to an unspeakably unspeakable number of Buddhas. 
They preserve one scripture, up to an unspeakably unspeakable number of scriptures. 
They hold one assembly, up to an unspeakably unspeakable number of assemblies. 
They preserve the explanation of one doctrine, up to the explanations of an unspeakably unspeakable number of doctrines. 
They keep in mind the countless various natures of one up to an unspeakably unspeakable number of faculties. 
They keep in mind the countless various natures of one, up to an unspeakably unspeakable number of afflictions. 
They keep in mind the countless various natures of one, up to an unspeakably unspeakable number of concentrations. 
This is in the realm of Buddhas and can only be completely comprehended by a Buddha. This is called the great enlightening beings’ ninth treasury, of preservation. 
“What is great enlightening beings’ treasury of elocution? 
The enlightening beings have profound knowledge and wisdom and know reality. They extensively explain all things for sentient beings without contradicting the scriptures of all the Buddhas. They explain one doctrine, up to an unspeakably unspeakable number of doctrines. 
They explain one Buddha-name, up to an unspeakably unspeakable number of Buddha-names. 
In this way they explain one world, one Buddha’s predictions, one scripture, one assembly, one teaching, countless various natures of one faculty, countless various natures of one affliction, countless various natures of one concentration, up to an unspeakably unspeakable number of all of these. 
They may speak for a day, for a fortnight, for a month, for a century, for a millennium, a hundred millennia, an eon, a hundred eons, a thousand eons, a hundred thousand eons, a hundred thousand billion trillion eons, or for countless, innumerable eons, up to unspeakably unspeakable numbers of eons—the number of eons might be exhausted, but the meanings and principles in a single sentence or phrase can hardly be exhausted. 
Because the enlightening beings have developed these ten inexhaustible treasuries, and can comprehend all things; the method of concentration formulae is obvious to them, containing incalculable millions of concentration spells. 
Once they have attained mental command of this concentration formula, they can extensively explain things to sentient beings by the light of truth. 
When they preach, with a universal tongue they produce marvelous sounds which fill all worlds in the ten directions, satisfying all according to their faculties and natures, so that their minds are happy and freed from the entangling taints of all afflictions. 
“The intellectual and interpretative powers of the enlightening beings, able to enter into all linguistic expression, spoken and written, causes all sentient beings to continue the lineage of Buddhas. Their purity of mind is continuous, and they expound the truth endlessly by the light of the teaching, without becoming weary. 
Because these enlightening beings have developed boundless bodies as extensive as space, pervading the cosmos. 
“This is called the enlightening beings’ tenth treasury, of elocution. 
This treasury is inexhaustible, unbroken, uninterrupted, unchanging, unhindered, never receding. It is extremely deep, and indeed bottomless. It is hard to enter. It goes into the doors of all the Buddha teachings. 
“These ten inexhaustible treasuries have ten kinds of inexhaustibility which enable enlightening beings to ultimately achieve unexcelled enlightenment. 
What are they? 
They benefit all sentient beings; they skillfully dedicate their original vows; they have no end throughout all time; throughout the realm of space all become enlightened, their minds unbounded; their dedication involves striving but they are not attached; the phenomena in the realm of an instant of thought are infinite; the mind of great vows never changes; they skillfully take in all concentration formulae; they are guarded by all the Buddhas; they comprehend all things are like phantoms. 
These are the ten inexhaustible things which can enable deeds in all worlds to attain the ultimate inexhaustible great treasuries.” Ascent to the Palace of the Tushita Heaven At that time the Buddha, again by spiritual power, went to the palace adorned by all exquisite jewels in the Tushita heaven of satisfaction and happiness, yet without leaving the foot of the enlightenment tree and the palace of the Suyama heaven on the peak of Mt. 
Sumeru. The celestial king of the Tushita heaven, seeing from afar the Buddha’s advent, set up a jewel mine lion seat in the palace; that lion throne was made of a collection of celestial jewels obtained from roots of goodness cultivated in the past, made manifest by the spiritual powers of all Buddhas, born of countless hundreds of thousands of millions of billions of roots of goodness, created by the pure teachings of all enlightened ones, adorned by the power of infinite virtue. 
Resulting from pure actions, it was indestructible, endlessly delightful to all beholders. Its transcendental qualities were not influenced by the world. Though all sentient beings come to gaze on it, none could exhaustively fathom its glories. 
There were a hundred trillion tiers all around it, with a hundred trillion gold webs, a hundred trillion flower curtains, a hundred trillion jewel curtains, a hundred trillion garland curtains, and a hundred trillion incense curtains hung above it. Garlands of flowers hung down, their scent perfuming everywhere. 
A hundred trillion canopies of flowers, a hundred trillion canopies of garlands, and a hundred trillion canopies of jewels were held by various celestial beings arrayed in rows on all four sides. 
A hundred trillion precious robes were spread on it. 
A hundred trillion balconies radiantly adorned it, with a hundred trillion nets of pearls and a hundred trillion nets of jewels covering above, while a hundred trillion nets of necklaces hung down on all four sides. 
A hundred trillion nets of ornaments, a hundred trillion nets of canopies, a hundred trillion nets of robes, and a hundred trillion nets of jewel tapestries were hung above. 
A hundred trillion nets of jewel lotuses in full bloom with glorious light, a hundred trillion nets of incense with exquisite fragrance delighting everyone, a hundred trillion curtains of jewel chimes moving gently producing harmonious elegant sounds, a hundred trillion curtains of precious sandalwood, its fragrance perfuming the air, a hundred trillion curtains of precious flowers in full bloom, a hundred trillion curtains of raiment of various subtle hues, rare in the world, a hundred trillion curtains showing enlightening beings, a hundred trillion multicolored curtains, a hundred trillion gold curtains, a hundred trillion lapis lazuli curtains, and a hundred trillion curtains of various jewels, were all hung above. 
A hundred trillion curtains of all jewels, adorned by huge wish-fulfilling gems, and a hundred trillion flowers of exquisite jewels surrounded in glorious arrays. 
A hundred trillion reflecting hangings, of superb beauty, were placed at intervals. A hundred trillion garlands of jewels and a hundred trillion garlands of fragrances hung down on all four sides. 
A hundred trillion celestial fragrant resins perfumed everywhere. 
A hundred trillion ornaments of celestial decorations, a hundred trillion ornaments of jewel flowers, a hundred trillion ornaments of jewels from the finest mines, a hundred trillion ornaments of wish-fulfilling jewels, and a hundred trillion ornaments of wish-fulfilling pearls from the ocean, adorned the body of the throne. A hundred trillion embroidered tapestries of exquisite jewels trailed down like streamers. 
A hundred trillion cosmic nets of diamonds, a hundred trillion wish-fulfilling jewels, and a hundred trillion beautiful gold treasure troves were placed at intervals as embellishments. 
A hundred trillion luminous jewels and a hundred trillion sapphires blazing with light and a hundred trillion indestructible celestial gems formed the windows: 
a hundred trillion jewels of pure qualities, giving forth sublime colors, and a hundred trillion jewels from pure beautiful mines formed the doorways. 
A hundred trillion crescent jewels, finest in the world, a hundred trillion mind-king wish-fulfilling jewels, a hundred trillion rose gold jewels, a hundred trillion jewels from pure troves, and a hundred trillion jewels symbolic of sovereignty, all radiating light, covered the top. 
A hundred trillion jewels set in pure silver and a hundred trillion jewels emblematic of the polar mountain adorned its lotus blossom bank. 
A hundred trillion pearl ornaments, a hundred trillion lapis lazuli ornaments, a hundred trillion ruby ornaments, a hundred trillion wish-fulfilling jewel ornaments, a hundred trillion ornaments of jewel lights, a hundred trillion ornaments of jewels of various mines, a hundred trillion red pearls, extremely pleasing to the sight, a hundred trillion ornaments of jewels from treasuries of boundless colors and forms, a hundred trillion ornaments of incomparable jewels of extreme purity, and a hundred trillion ornaments of jewels of superlative brilliance were hung all around as adornments. 
A hundred trillion unusually beautiful decorations made of jewels, a hundred trillion jewels in the exquisite forms of celestial beings, a hundred trillion subtle perfumes from the ten directions, a hundred trillion black sandalwood incenses, a hundred trillion fragrances from inconceivable realms, a hundred trillion most excellent scents, and a hundred trillion extremely pleasing incenses all emitted fragrant airs, perfuming the ten directions. 
A hundred trillion special incenses were scattered in all ten directions; a hundred trillion scents of pure light perfumed sentient beings; a hundred trillion incenses of boundless various colors perfumed all the buddha-lands, never fading away; a hundred trillion perfumes, a hundred trillion scents, a hundred trillion burning incenses perfumed everything. 
A hundred trillion aloe perfumes from lotus blossom banks producing great sound, a hundred trillion wafting fragrances with the power to transform the minds of sentient beings, and a hundred trillion perfumes with the power to enlighten pervaded everywhere, causing all the senses of those who noticed them to become dispassionate and tranquil. 
There were also a hundred trillion various arrays of peerless perfumes, kings among fragrances. 
There rained a hundred trillion clouds of celestial flowers, a hundred trillion clouds of celestial perfumes, a hundred trillion clouds of heavenly incense powders, a hundred trillion clouds of celestial blue lotuses, a hundred trillion clouds of celestial red lotuses, a hundred trillion clouds of heavenly white lotuses, a hundred trillion clouds of heavenly mandarava flowers, a hundred trillion clouds of all kinds of celestial flowers, a hundred trillion clouds of celestial garments, a hundred trillion clouds of jewels, a hundred trillion clouds of celestial canopies, a hundred trillion clouds of celestial banners, a hundred trillion clouds of celestial crowns, a hundred trillion clouds of celestial ornaments, a hundred trillion clouds of celestial garlands, a hundred trillion clouds of necklaces of heavenly jewels, a hundred trillion clouds of celestial sandalwood incense, and a hundred trillion clouds of celestial aloe incense. 
There were set up a hundred trillion jewel banners, there were hung a hundred trillion jewel pennants, there were draped a hundred trillion jewel streamers, there were lit a hundred trillion incense braziers, there were spread a hundred trillion jewel garlands, there were held a hundred trillion jewel fans, there were taken up a hundred trillion gold whisks, there were draped a hundred trillion nets of jewel chimes producing exquisite sounds when stirred by the breeze. 
A hundred trillion jewel balustrades surrounded the throne, a hundred trillion jewel palm trees were arrayed in rows. A hundred trillion windows framed with gorgeous gems made magnificent adornments. 
A hundred trillion jewel trees provided shade all around. 
A hundred trillion jewel turrets adorned north to south and east to west. A hundred trillion jeweled doorways were draped with garlands. 
A hundred trillion golden chimes produced sublime music. 
A hundred trillion ornaments in the form of auspicious symbols were draped in splendid arrays. 
There were a hundred trillion jewel talismans able to get rid of all evils, a hundred trillion gold treasuries woven of golden thread, a hundred trillion jewel umbrellas with handles of precious elements held in rows, and a hundred trillion nets of all kinds of precious ornaments arrayed at intervals. 
A hundred trillion luminous jewels radiated various kinds of light; a hundred trillion light beams illumined everywhere. 
There were a hundred trillion sun-treasury orbs and a hundred trillion moon-treasury orbs, all made of collections of jewels of infinite colors. A hundred trillion fragrant flames shone with crystal clear light. 
A hundred trillion banks of lotuses burst into glorious bloom. 
A hundred trillion nets of jewels, a hundred trillion nets of flowers, and a hundred trillion nets of incenses covered above. 
A hundred trillion jewel robes, a hundred trillion sapphire robes, a hundred trillion celestial yellow robes, a hundred trillion celestial red robes, a hundred trillion celestial robes of unusual colors, a hundred trillion extraordinary celestial robes of various precious substances, a hundred trillion various perfumed robes, a hundred trillion robes made of all precious substances, and a hundred trillion pure white robes, were all carefully spread, delightful to all observers. 
A hundred trillion banners of celestial chimes and a hundred trillion banners of golden mesh produced subtle tones. 
There were a hundred trillion banners of heavenly embroideries, containing all colors. A hundred trillion fragrant banners were draped with webs of perfume. 
A hundred trillion flower banners showered all kinds of flowers. 
A hundred trillion banners of raiment trailed exquisite robes. There were a hundred trillion celestial jewel banners, studded with all sorts of gems, a hundred trillion celestial ornament banners, decorated with all manner of embellishments, a hundred trillion celestial garland banners, garlands of various kinds of flowers arrayed on four sides, a hundred trillion celestial canopy banners, with jewel bells harmoniously ringing, pleasing all hearers. 
There were a hundred trillion celestial conches producing wonderful sounds, a hundred trillion celestial bass drums producing great booms, a hundred trillion celestial pipes producing subtle sounds, a hundred trillion celestial drums producing loud beautiful sounds, a hundred trillion orchestras playing all at once, a hundred trillion independent celestial musicians producing sublime sounds filling all buddha-lands, a hundred trillion celestial magical music sounding like echoes, responding to all things, a hundred trillion celestial drums producing wonderful sounds when struck, a hundred trillion kinds of miraculous celestial music which produced spontaneous harmony, and a hundred trillion various celestial assemblies producing wonderful music extinguishing all afflictions. 
A hundred trillion pleasing sounds sang praises of giving offerings; a hundred trillion far-reaching sounds sang praises of service; a hundred trillion extremely deep sounds sang praises of practical application; a hundred trillion sounds of myriad subtleties sang praises of the fruits of the Buddhas’ deeds; a hundred trillion delicate sounds sang praises of principles in accord with reality; a hundred trillion unimpeded sounds of truth sang praises of Buddha’s past practices; a hundred trillion pure sounds sang praises of past offerings to the Buddhas; a hundred trillion sounds of teachings sang praises of the supreme fearlessness of the Buddhas; a hundred trillion infinite sounds sang praises of the infinity of enlightening beings’ virtues; a hundred trillion sounds of the stages of enlightening beings sang praises of revealing the practices appropriate to all the stages of enlightening; a hundred trillion uninterrupted sounds sang praises of the endlessness of the Buddha’s virtues; a hundred trillion conformative sounds sang praises of practices by which Buddha is seen; a hundred trillion sounds of extremely profound teaching sang praises of principles corresponding to unhindered knowledge of all things. 
A hundred trillion great sounds filled all buddhalands; a hundred trillion sounds of unimpeded purity caused all to rejoice in accord with their inclinations; a hundred trillion sounds of nondwelling in the triple world caused all hearers to enter deeply into the nature of reality; a hundred trillion sounds of joy caused the minds of all hearers to be unobstructed, with deep faith and respect; a hundred trillion sounds of the realm of buddhahood revealed the meanings of all things; a hundred trillion sounds of concentration formulae expounded the distinctions of all doctrines, definitively comprehending the esoteric treasury of the Enlightened Ones; a hundred trillion sounds of all truths, gentle and pleasant, harmonized all the music. 
There were a hundred trillion newly inspired enlightening beings who, as soon as they saw this throne, doubly increased their determination for omniscience; a hundred trillion enlightening beings preparing the ground, their minds pure and joyful; a hundred trillion practicing enlightening beings, their understanding pure and clear; a hundred trillion nobly born enlightening beings, abiding in supreme zeal; a hundred trillion enlightening beings equipped with skill in means, activating the great vehicle; a hundred trillion enlightening beings in the abode of right mindfulness, diligently cultivating the path of all enlightening beings; a hundred trillion nonregressing enlightening beings, purifying all stages of enlightenment; a hundred trillion enlightening beings of youthful nature, attaining the light of concentration of all enlightening beings; a hundred trillion prince of teaching enlightening beings, entering the inconceivable sphere of all Buddhas; a hundred trillion coronated enlightening beings, able to manifest the ten powers of infinite enlightened ones; a hundred trillion enlightening beings with mastery of spiritual powers; a hundred trillion enlightening beings with pure understanding; a hundred trillion enlightening beings with determined minds; a hundred trillion enlightening beings with profound, unbreakable faith; a hundred trillion enlightening beings expounding the meanings of the teachings, causing knowledge to be sure; a hundred trillion enlightening beings with undisturbed correct recollection; a hundred trillion enlightening beings of certain knowledge; a hundred trillion enlightening beings with the power to retain what they hear, holding all the Buddha teachings; a hundred trillion enlightening beings producing infinitely vast great awareness and understanding; a hundred trillion enlightening beings abiding in the faculty of faith; a hundred trillion enlightening beings who had attained transcendent self-control and fully kept all the moral precepts; a hundred trillion enlightening beings who had attained transcendent generosity and were able to give everything; a hundred trillion enlightening beings who had attained transcendent forbearance whose minds did not wander and who were able to accept all the Buddha teachings; a hundred trillion enlightening beings who had attained transcendent vigor and were capable of carrying out infinite efforts for emancipation; a hundred trillion enlightening beings who had attained transcendent meditation and were imbued with the shining light of infinite meditations; a hundred trillion enlightening beings who had attained transcendent wisdom, the light of their wisdom able to illumine everywhere; a hundred trillion enlightening beings who had perfected great vows, all pure; a hundred trillion enlightening beings who had attained the lamp of knowledge, clearly illumining the teachings; a hundred trillion enlightening beings illuminated by the light of truth of the Buddhas of the ten directions; a hundred trillion enlightening beings expounding the way to get rid of folly throughout the ten directions; a hundred trillion enlightening beings who entered the fields of all Buddhas; a hundred trillion enlightening beings whose body of reality reached all buddha-lands; a hundred trillion enlightening beings who had attained the voice of Buddhas and were capable of enlightening many; a hundred trillion enlightening beings who had attained the means of producing all knowledge; a hundred trillion enlightening beings who had accomplished all aspects of the teaching; a hundred trillion enlightening beings who had attained true knowledge, like jewel banners, able to make plain all Buddha teachings; and a hundred trillion enlightening beings able to fully reveal the realm of enlightenment. 
A hundred trillion celestial kings of the various heavens prostrated themselves reverently; a hundred trillion naga kings gazed fixedly; a hundred trillion yaksha kings joined their palms above their heads; a hundred trillion gandharva kings developed pure minds of faith; a hundred trillion titan kings cut off their pride; a hundred trillion garuda kings held streamers in their mouths; a hundred trillion kinnara kings danced joyfully; a hundred trillion mahoraga kings gazed with delight; a hundred trillion world leaders bowed with respect; a hundred trillion kings of the heavens of thirty-three celestial realms gazed unblinking; a hundred trillion kings of the Suyama heavens joyfully sang praises; a hundred trillion kings of Tushita heavens prostrated their bodies; a hundred trillion kings of the heavens of enjoyment of emanations bowed their heads to the ground in respect; a hundred trillion kings of the heavens of command of others’ emanations joined their palms reverently; a hundred trillion kings of the Brahma heavens watched single-mindedly; a hundred trillion celestial kings of great power reverently made offerings; a hundred trillion enlightening beings sang eulogies aloud; a hundred trillion goddesses single-mindedly made offerings; a hundred trillion deities with the same aspirations danced with joy; a hundred trillion deities who had lived in the same place in antiquity sang hymns of praise with beautiful voices; a hundred trillion Brahma-body deities prostrated themselves in respect; a hundred trillion Brahma-assistant deities joined their palms at their crowns; a hundred trillion Brahma-group deities circled around as guardian attendants; a hundred trillion great Brahma deities sang eulogies of infinite virtues; a hundred trillion deities of the heavens of light threw themselves on the ground; a hundred trillion deities of the heavens of little light sang eulogies of the difficulty of meeting with an age when a Buddha is in the world; a hundred trillion deities of the heavens of infinite light bowed to the Buddha from afar; a hundred trillion deities of the heavens of light-sound sang of the rarity of getting to see a Buddha; a hundred trillion deities of the heavens of purity came here along with their mansions; a hundred trillion deities of the heavens of minor purity bowed their heads with pure hearts; a hundred trillion deities of the heavens of infinite purity descended, wishing to see the Buddha; a hundred trillion deities of the heavens of universal purity approached with reverence and respect and made offerings; a hundred trillion deities of the heavens of vastness reflected on past roots of goodness; a hundred trillion deities of the heavens of minor vastness contemplated the rarity of the enlightened; a hundred trillion deities of the heavens of infinite vastness, with sure respect, initiated all good actions; a hundred trillion deities of the heavens of vast results bowed reverently; a hundred trillion deities of the heavens of no troubles bowed respectfully, their faith firm and enduring; a hundred trillion deities of the heavens of no heat joined their palms and remembranced the Buddha tirelessly; a hundred trillion deities of the heavens of good sight bowed their heads to the ground; a hundred trillion deities of the heavens of good manifestation meditated constantly on honoring and serving the Buddhas; a hundred trillion deities of the heaven of the ultimate of form bowed reverently. 
A hundred trillion deities of various heavens sang praises with great joy; a hundred trillion deities each carefully considered and made adornments; a hundred trillion enlightening deities guarded the Buddha’s throne, ceaselessly embellishing it; a hundred trillion flower-bearing enlightening beings showered all kinds of flowers; a hundred trillion incense-bearing enlightening beings showered all kinds of fragrances; a hundred trillion garland-bearing enlightening beings showered all kinds of garlands; a hundred trillion elightening beings bearing powdered incense showered all kinds of powdered incenses; a hundred trillion perfume-bearing enlightening beings showered all kinds of perfumes; a hundred trillion raiment-bearing enlightening beings showered all kinds of raiment; a hundred trillion parasol-bearing enlightening beings showered all kinds of parasols; a hundred trillion banner-bearing deities showered all kinds of banners; a hundred trillion pennant-bearing enlightening beings showered all kinds of pennants; a hundred trillion gem-bearing enlightening beings showered all kinds of jewels; a hundred trillion ornament-bearing enlightening beings showered all kinds of ornaments. 
A hundred trillion godlings came forth from their celestial palaces to the site of the throne; a hundred trillion godlings with pure faithful minds came with their palaces; a hundred trillion nobly born godlings supported the throne with their bodies; a hundred trillion consecrated godlings held the throne with their whole bodies. 
A hundred trillion meditating enlightening beings contemplated respectfully; a hundred trillion nobly born enlightening beings gave rise to purity of mind; a hundred trillion enlightening beings became joyful and blissful in all senses; a hundred trillion enlightening beings’ profound minds of faith were purified; a hundred trillion enlightening beings’ faith and resolve were purified; a hundred trillion enlightening beings’ actions were purified; a hundred trillion enlightening beings were enabled to take on birth freely; a hundred trillion enlightening beings glowed with the light of truth; a hundred trillion enlightening beings consummated the stages of enlightenment; a hundred trillion enlightening beings became well able to teach and influence all sentient beings. 
Born of a hundred trillion roots of goodness, protected by a hundred trillion Buddhas, perfected by a hundred trillion virtues, purified by a hundred trillion sublime aspirations, beautified by a hundred trillion great vows, produced by a hundred trillion good actions, stabilized by a hundred trillion virtuous qualities, made manifest by a hundred trillion spiritual powers, developed by a hundred trillion meritorious achievements, eulogized for a hundred trillion praiseworthy qualities—as in the world the king of the Tushita heaven reverently set up a throne like this for the Enlightened One, so did the kings of the Tushita heavens in all worlds likewise set up such thrones, with such adornments, with such ceremonies, with such faith, with such purity of mind, with such delight, with such joy, with such respect, with such appreciation of rarity, with such dancing, with such yearning—all were the same. 
Then the king of the Tushita heaven, having set up the throne for the Enlightened One, respectfully greeted the Buddha together with countless godlings of the Tushita heaven; with pure hearts they showered clouds of flowers of innumerable colors, clouds of incenses of inconceivable colors, clouds of garlands of various colors, vast clouds of pure sandalwood, clouds of innumerable various parasols, clouds of fine celestial raiment, clouds of boundless beautiful jewels, clouds of celestial ornaments, clouds of innumerable incenses of all kinds, and clouds of all kinds of sandalwood and aloe. 
When the godlings each produced these clouds from their bodies, a hundred trillion incalculable numbers of godlings of the Tushita heaven, as well as the other godlings in the assembly, were overjoyed and bowed reverently. 
Countless goddesses danced with joyful anticipation, gazing at the Enlightened One. 
In the Tushita palace a host of unspeakably many enlightening beings hovered in the air, and with diligence and single-mindedness produced offerings surpassing all the heavens and presented them to the Buddha, bowing respectfully, while countless forms of music played all at once. At this point, because of the great spiritual power of the Buddha, because of the effluence of past roots of goodness, and because of his inconceivable mystic powers, all the gods and goddesses in the Tushita palace saw the Buddha from afar as though he were right before them. They all had the same thoughts: 
“The appearance of an Enlightened One in the world is rarely encountered—now we are getting to see an omniscient one, who has unimpeded true awareness of all things.” Thus thinking, thus observing, together with the other groups they all welcomed the Buddha, each heaping celestial robes with all kinds of flowers, fragrances, jewels, ornaments, heavenly sandalwood and aloe incense, celestial jewel incenses, flowers of all heavenly fragrances, and mandarava flowers from all the heavens, and spread them as offerings to the Buddha. 
Hundreds of trillions of infinities of Tushita deities hovered in the air; all considering the Buddha the realm of wisdom and knowledge, they burnt all kinds of incenses, producing aromatic clouds, adorning the sky. 
Also, thinking of the Buddha with joy, they showered clouds of celestial flowers, adorning the sky. 
Also, thinking of the Buddha with respect, they showered clouds of celestial canopies, adorning the sky. 
Also, desirous of making offerings to the Buddha, they scattered clouds of all kinds of celestial garlands, adorning the sky. 
Also, engendering resolute faith in the Buddha, they cast countless nets of gold through the sky, with chimes of all kinds of jewels continuously producing beautiful tones. 
Also, considering the Buddha the supreme field of blessings, they adorned the sky with countless drapes and showered clouds of all kinds of jewelry endlessly. 
Also, conceiving profound faith in the Buddha, they adorned the sky with countless celestial mansions, playing all manner of celestial music, producing subtle, melodious tones. 
Also, considering how rare it is to meet a Buddha, they adorned the sky with clouds of celestial raiment of all kinds of colors, showering various incomparably beautiful robes. 
Also, their hearts leaping with boundless joy at the Buddha, they adorned the sky with countless celestial jewel crowns, raining countless celestial crowns forming great clouds. 
Also, conceiving great joy in regarding the Buddha, they adorned the sky with countless jewels of various colors, ceaselessly raining clouds of all kinds of jewelry. 
Also, thinking of the Buddha as a magnificent miraculous appearance, they brought celestial sandalwood incenses of innumerable various colors and reverently scattered them before the Buddha. 
Also, their hearts leaping with joy in regarding the Buddha, they followed the Buddha holding countless precious celestial robes of various colors and spread them on the roads as offerings to the Buddha. 
Also, regarding the Buddha with purity of mind, they greeted the Buddha carrying countless banners of celestial jewels of various colors. 
Also, conceiving supreme joy at the thought of the Buddha, they brought countless celestial adornments of various colors to present to the Buddha. 
Also, engendering unbreakable faith in the Buddha, they brought countless garlands of celestial jewels to present to the Buddha. 
Also, incomparably joyful at the thought of the Buddha, they brought countless pennants of celestial jewels of various colors to offer to the Buddha. 
A hundred trillion infinities of celestial beings, with tamed, tranquil minds free from indulgence, brought countless celestial musical instruments of various forms producing sublime tones to present to the Buddha. 
A hundred trillion infinities of enlightening beings already living in the palace of the Tushita heaven, with offerings surpassing those of all the gods, produced by the teaching transcending the worlds of desire, form, and formlessness, produced by infinitely broad knowledge, developed by steadfast pure faith, produced by action free from afflictions, produced by the all-pervading unobstructed mind, produced by the profound principle of adaptable methodology, produced by inconceivable roots of goodness, perfected by countless displays of skill in means, revealed by the will to make offerings to the Buddha, stamped by the teaching of noncreation, made gifts of these offerings to the Buddha. 
They presented to the Buddha canopies of all precious substances born in the transcendent ways, drapes of all kinds of flowers born of pure understanding of the realm of all Buddhas, all kinds of garments born of acceptance of the nonorigination of things, all kinds of nets of chimes born of the unimpeded mind entering into the state of indestructibility, all kinds of solid fragrance born of the mind understanding all things are like apparitions, beautiful thrones of myriad precious substances of all Buddhas, born of the mind omnipresent at the thrones of Buddhas in all realms of enlightenment, banners of all jewels, born of the mind tirelessly make offerings to the Buddhas, palaces of all jewels, dwelt in by the Buddhas, born of the joyful mind that understands that all things are like dreams, clouds of lotus blossoms of all jewels, born of roots of goodness without attachment and uncreated roots of goodness, clouds of all solid incenses, clouds of boundless flowers of all colors, clouds of exquisite raiment of all various colors, clouds of infinite pure sandalwood incenses, clouds of precious canopies with all kinds of embellishments, clouds of all burning incenses, clouds of all kinds of beautiful garlands, clouds of all kinds of pure decorations, all filling the cosmos, going beyond all the heavens. 
Those enlightening beings each produced from their bodies unspeakable hundreds of trillions of infinities of enlightening beings, filling the space of the cosmos, their minds all equal to the Buddhas of all times; by means of development from the delusion-free teaching and strengthening by the power of infinite enlightened ones, they revealed to sentient beings the path of peace; equipped with unspeakably many meaningful expressions, they entered into the seeds of all concentration formulae containing infinite teachings, and produced inexhaustible treasuries of intellectual powers; their minds without fear, they conceived great joy, and with unspeakable infinities of points of truthful praise they tirelessly eulogized the Enlightened One. 
Then all the celestial beings and all the enlightening beings saw the Buddha, the perfectly enlightened one, the inconceivable hero of humanity, his bodies infinite, uncountable, manifesting inconceivably many different varieties of mystical transfigurations, causing the minds of countless sentient beings to be full of joy, pervading all universes throughout space, adorned with the embellishments of buddhahood, causing all sentient beings to abide in roots of goodness, displaying infinite spiritual powers of the Buddhas, beyond all manners of speaking, admired and respected by all great enlightening beings, causing them all to rejoice in accord with what they need to be taught, abiding in the immense body of the Buddhas, all virtues and roots of goodness purified, most excellent in appearance, not to be outshone by anyone. 
The sphere of the Buddha’s knowledge was inexhaustible, born of incomparable concentration. 
His body was boundless, omnipresent in the bodies of all sentient beings. He caused great joy to infinite beings. He caused the lineage of omniscient ones to continue unbroken. 
Dwelling in the ultimate abode of the Buddhas, born in the family of the Buddhas of past, present, and future, he caused the faith of countless sentient beings to be purified, and caused the knowledge and wisdom of all enlightening beings to be perfected. All his senses were joyful. 
The clouds of his teaching covered all universes in space, teaching and taming without omission, fulfilling all sentient beings according to their mentalities, causing them to abide in nondiscriminatory knowledge. 
He was beyond all sentient beings. Having attained omniscience, he radiated a great light. 
Causing his roots of goodness of past ages to be clearly manifest, he inspired great determination in everyone and caused all sentient beings to abide in the indestructible knowledge of universal good. 
Abiding everywhere in all lands of sentient beings, born of the nonregressing true teaching, he dwelt in the totally impartial realm of reality. Clearly understanding what was appropriate to the minds of sentient beings, he manifested unspeakably many different buddha-bodies, beyond the power of worldly speech to extol, able to cause all to always think of the Buddha, filling the cosmos, liberating vast numbers of living beings. 
According to the aid they required, he bestowed the teaching on them, causing them to be pacified and their faith to be pure, manifesting inconceivable physical forms. 
Regarding all living beings impartially, his mind had no attachments. He dwelt in the abode of nonobstruction and had attained the ten powers of buddhahood without impediment. 
His mind was always quiet and stable, never distracted or disturbed. 
Abiding in omniscience, he was able to express all kinds of truths. Able to enter completely into the boundless ocean of knowledge, he produced infinite treasuries of virtue and wisdom. 
With the sun of enlightenment he constantly illumined the entire cosmos. 
In accord with the power of his original vows, he was always manifest, never disappearing, always dwelling in the realm of reality, abiding in the abode of Buddhas, without change. He had no attachment to self or to possessions. He dwelt in the transmundane state and was not affected by mundane things. In all worlds he set up the banner of knowledge and wisdom, his knowledge vast and great, transcending the world, with no attachments. 
He rescued sentient beings from the mire, placing them on the highest ground of wisdom. All his blessings and virtues benefited sentient beings yet were never exhausted. He was fully aware of the knowledge and wisdom of all enlightening beings, their faith and direction certain, sure to attain enlightenment. 
By great compassion he manifested infinite adornments of the buddha-body. With a wondrous voice he expounded infinite teachings, satisfying sentient beings according to their mentalities. 
In the past, future, and present, his mind was always pure. He caused all sentient beings to be unattached to objects. 
He constantly forecast the enlightenment of all the enlightening beings, causing them to enter the family of Buddhas to be born in the house of Buddhas, and attain the coronation of Buddhas. 
Able to live in all buddha-lands in the cosmos, he knew the minds of all sentient beings. All his virtues were unworldly and pure. He did not dwell in birth and death, yet appeared throughout the world, like a reflection. 
He illumined the whole cosmos by the moon of knowledge and realized that everything is ungraspable. 
By his wisdom he was constantly aware that all worlds are like illusions, like reflections, like dreams, like magic tricks, that all have mind as their inherent nature. 
Abiding in this way, he manifested buddha-bodies in accord with the dissimilarities of the actions and consequences of sentient beings, the distinctions in their mental inclinations, and the individual differences in their faculties. 
The Enlightened One was always relating to countless sentient beings, explaining to them that everything in the world derives from conditional, interdependent origination. He knew that the signs of all things are signless, this being their sole characteristic, the basis of wisdom. 
He wanted to cause all sentient beings to detach from all signs, forms, and characteristics. He showed clearly all natures and characteristics of the world, thus traversing the world; to reveal to them unexcelled enlightenment, desiring to rescue all sentient beings, he appeared in the world and showed the way of the enlightened. He caused them to perceive the features of the body of the enlightened one, to concentrate on them and meditate on them, to diligently cultivate and develop themselves to annihilate mundane afflictions, cultivate enlightening practice with unwavering minds, and attain fulfillment of all aspects of the Great Vehicle, attaining the rewards of the Buddhas. 
He was able to observe the roots of goodness of sentient beings, and did not allow the results of their pure deeds to die out. His knowledge was clear and complete entering into all times, forever detached from all mundane discrimination. 
He radiated networks of light beams, fully illuminating all worlds in the ten directions. Those who saw him never tired of beholding the sublime refinements of his physical form. 
By means of great virtue, knowledge, wisdom, and spiritual power, he produced all kinds of enlightening practices. The spheres of his senses were free and complete, round and full. 
He did Buddha-work, and when he finished doing it he disappeared. He was able to show the path of all knowledge of past, present, and future. For the enlightening beings he showered a rain of innumerable concentration formulae, causing them to develop great rapture, to take them up, hold them, and practice them, and perfect the virtues of all Buddhas, in their full glory, with boundless wonderful forms, to adorn their beings. He saw everything in all worlds, and was forever rid of all obstruction. 
He had attained the pure true meaning of all verities. 
He had attained mastery of virtuous qualities, and was a great king of truth, like the sun illumining everywhere. Being a field of blessings for the world, he had great dignity, influence, and virtue. He manifested emanation bodies in all worlds, radiating the light of wisdom, causing all to be enlightened. Wanting to cause all sentient beings to know the boundless virtues possessed by the Buddha, he took the turban of nonobstruction, tied it on his head, and assumed the rank of Budhahood. 
Adapting to the world, he guided by means of expedient methods, comforting beings with the hand of wisdom. As a great physician, he skillfully cured all sickness, able to go to all the countless lands in all worlds, without rest. His clear, pure eye of wisdom was free from all obstructions, able to clearly see all. 
Evil-doing sentient beings he tamed in various ways, causing them to enter the Path, skillfully seizing appropriate opportunities to civilize and teach them, never ceasing. 
If sentient beings developed equanimous, impartial minds, he would then show them the consequences of impartial deeds. In accord with their inclinations and in accord with their actions and results thereof, he manifested various spiritual powers of the buddha-body for them, to expound the truth and enlighten them, that they may attain the knowledge and wisdom of the teaching, and that their minds be joyful and their senses ecstatic, that they see innumerable Buddhas, develop profound faith, and produce roots of goodness, never regressing. 
All sentient beings, in accord with their involvement and entrapment by actions, sleep forever in birth-and-death; the Enlightened One, appearing in the world, can awaken them all, comfort their minds, and cause them to be without anxiety or fear. Any who see him he causes to realize independent knowledge of truth. With knowledge and skill in means he comprehends the objective world. His embellishing marks and adornments cannot be overshadowed. 
His mountain of wisdom and talons of teaching are all purified. Sometimes he manifests as an enlightening being, sometimes he appears as a Buddha, causing all sentient beings to arrive at the realm of sorrowlessness. Adorned by countless virtues, developed by practical action, he appears in the world. The adornment and purity of all Buddhas are accomplished by the works of omniscience. 
Always keeping his original vow, he does not abandon the world, being a steadfast benefactor of sentient beings. His supreme pure light makes itself visible to all sentient beings. By means of spiritual power, the Buddha always follows the sentient beings of the six realms of mundane existence, boundless and countless, never abandoning them. If there are any who have planted similar roots of goodness in the past, he causes them all to be purified, yet without giving up his original vow with regard to all sentient beings of the six paths of mundane existence. 
He deceives no one, appropriately dealing with them in virtuous ways, causing them to practice pure acts and break up demonic conflicts. From the realm of nonobstruction he produces great power. Nothing blocks his supreme treasury of light. 
He constantly illumines all sentient beings with great light, causing them all to be fulfilled in accordance with their aspirations. Beyond all enmity, he is the highest field of blessings, relied upon by all sentient beings; if any give anything, he causes them to be pure, and to receive boundless blessings from doing a little bit of good. He causes all to be able to enter the stage of inexhaustible knowledge. He is the pure-minded master, planting roots of goodness for all sentient beings. 
Thus believing, thus observing, thus entering the depths of knowledge, thus sporting in the ocean of virtues, thus arriving at spacelike wisdom, thus cognizing sentient beings’ field of blessings, thus contemplating with presence of mind, thus observing the deeds, marks and embellishments of Buddha, thus observing the Buddha appearing throughout the world, thus observing the Buddha’s mystical power, the great congregation at that time saw each pore of the Buddha’s body emit a hundred trillion infinities of light beams, each beam of light having countless hues, countless purities, countless radiances, causing countless beings to watch, countless beings to rejoice, countless beings to be happy, countless beings to grow in faith, countless beings’ aspiration to be pure, countless beings’ senses to be pure and cool, and causing countless beings to develop respect and honor. 
Then the great assembly all saw the Buddha’s body emit a hundred trillion infinities of inconceivable great lights, each light with inconceivably many hues and inconceivable many beams illumining inconceivably many realms of phenomena, by the Buddha’s spiritual power producing great subtle sound conveying infinites of eulogies in words transcending all worlds, perfected by transmundane virtues. 
He also manifested hundreds of trillions of quadrillions of inconceivable numbers of subtle adornments, which could never be fully described even in a hundred trillion quadrillion inconceivable number of eons, all of them produced by the inexhaustible spiritual power of the Buddha. He also manifested unspeakably many enlightened ones arising in the world and leading sentient beings into the door of wisdom to understand the most profound truth. 
He also manifested the docetic metamorphoses of the enlightened ones throughout the space of the cosmos, causing all worldly beings to be impartial and purified. All of this sprung from the unhindered omniscience in which the Buddha dwelt. 
It was also born of the inconceivable superlative virtues which the Buddha cultivated. He also manifested a hundred trillion quadrillion inconceivable numbers of beautiful jewel light flames, originating from the good roots of his ancient great vows. 
He did so because he had presented offerings to and served countless enlightened ones, because he had cultivated pure practices without slacking, because his omniscient mind, without impediment, produced roots of virtue, in order to reveal the universality of the powers of the enlightened, to cut off the doubts of all sentient beings, to cause all of them to be able to see the enlightened one, to cause infinite sentient beings to abide in virtue, to show the enlightened one’s spiritual powers cannot be outshone, to cause all sentient beings to be able to enter into the ocean of the ultimate, to cause the enlightening beings of all buddha-lands to assemble, and because he wanted to reveal the inconceivable teachings of the Buddha. 
Then the Enlightened One, his great compassion covering all, showed the adornments of omniscience, wanting to cause the sentient beings in innumerable worlds who had no faith to have faith, to cause those with faith to develop, to cause the developed to become pure, to cause the pure to become mature, to cause the mature to conquer their minds and contemplate the profound truth, be filled with the boundless light of knowledge and wisdom, develop an immeasurably broad mind, an omniscient mind, never regressing, not going against the essential nature of things, not fearing ultimate reality, to realize genuine truth, fulfill all transcendent practices, purify all transmundane virtues, like Universally Good, attain the freedom of buddhahood, leave the realm of demons and enter the realm of Buddhas, comprehend the profound teaching and attain inconceivable knowledge, never regressing from the vows of universal salvation, to always see the Buddhas, never abandoning them, to perfect experiential knowledge, realize infinite truths, be filled with the boundless power of the treasury of virtue, develop a joyous mind, enter the realm where there is no doubt, divorce evil and be pure, see things unperturbed due to omniscience, gain entry to the congregations of all enlightening beings, and always be born in the family of the enlightened ones of past, present, and future. 
These adornments manifested by the Buddha were all made by roots of goodness accumulated in the past, for the purpose of harmonizing and civilizing all sentient beings, to reveal the great powerful virtue of the enlightened, to light up the treasury of unobstructed knowledge and wisdom, to show the extreme radiance of the boundless supreme virtues of the enlightened, to show the inconceivable great spiritual displays of the enlightened, to manifest the buddha-body in all realms of being by means of spiritual powers, to show the boundlessness of the mystic powers and magical transfigurations of the enlightened, to fulfill all his original aspirations, to show that the dauntless knowledge and wisdom of the enlightened can go everywhere, to become the king of truth free in all ways, to produce all avenues of knowledge, to manifest the purity of the body of the enlightened, and also to reveal the supreme splendor of his body, to manifest the realization of the equal state of the Buddhas of all times, to reveal the pure treasury of roots of goodness, to manifest the most sublime form, to which nothing in the world may be likened, to show the characteristics of full command of the ten powers, to cause beholders never to tire, to be the sun of the world, illumining past, present, and future. 
All the virtuous qualities of the sovereign king of truth were manifested by roots of goodness of the past; even if all enlightening beings were to eulogize and tell of them throughout all time, they never would be exhaustively told. 
Then the king of the Tushita heaven, having prepared all the offerings for the Buddha, together with countless deities of the Tushita heaven, joined his palms in a gesture of respect toward the Buddha and said, “Welcome, World Honored One; welcome, Felicitous One; welcome, Enlightened One, Worthy, Truly Awakened One! 
Please look upon us with compassion and sojourn in this place.” Then the World Honored One, adorning himself with the adornments of Buddhahood, replete with magnificent virtues, in order to gladden all beings, in order that all enlightening beings develop profound understanding, so that all the celestial beings of the Tushita heaven increase in determination, so that the king of the Tushita heaven never tires of generosity and service, so that countless beings focus their attention on the Buddha and become inspired to seek enlightenment, so that countless types of beings see the endlessness of the Buddha’s roots of goodness, blessings, and virtues, so that they always be able to arouse pure faith, so that, seeing a Buddha, they serve without seeking anything, so that all of their aspirations be pure, so that they diligently amass roots of goodness without flagging, and so that they would vow to seek omniscience, the Buddha accepted the invitation of the celestial king and entered the palace adorned by all jewels. 
Just as in this world, the same thing transpired in all worlds in the ten directions. 
At that point the hall adorned by all jewels naturally had wonderfully fine decorations, surpassing all the heavens, and atop the decorations were nets of all jewels covering all over, showering clouds of all the finest gems all over, showering clouds of all kinds of ornaments, clouds of all kinds of precious raiment, clouds of all kinds of sandalwood incenses, clouds of all kinds of solid fragrances, clouds of canopies adorned by all jewels, and clouds of bunches of inconceivably many flowers, producing everywhere inconceivable music praising the Enlightened One’s knowledge of all means of liberation, all in accord with the sublime truth. 
All these offerings were beyond those of the celestial beings. 
Then in the Tushita palace rich music and singing continued ceaselessly. By the spiritual power of the Buddha, the mind of the king of Tushita was made imperturbable; his past roots of goodness all reached complete fulfillment, his good qualities became more firm and stable, he increased in pure faith, he aroused great vigor, conceived great joy, purified profound aspiration, made the determination for enlightenment, and placed his unwavering attention on the teaching, keeping it firmly in mind. 
Then the king of the Tushita heaven, empowered by the Buddha, recalled the roots of goodness he had planted with past Buddhas and said in verse, There once was a Buddha, Unobstructed Moon, Most auspicious among the auspicious; He once entered this hall of adornment, Therefore this place is most auspicious. 
There once was a Buddha called Broad Knowledge, Most auspicious among the auspicious; He once entered this golden hall, Therefore this place is most auspicious. 
There once was a Buddha called Universal Eye, Most auspicious among the auspicious; He once entered this hall of adornment, Therefore this place is most auspicious. 
There once was a Buddha called Coral, Most auspicious among the auspicious; He once entered this jewel mine hall, Therefore this place is most auspicious. 
There once was a Buddha, Lion of Philosophy, Most auspicious among the auspicious; He once entered this mountain king hall, Therefore this place is most auspicious. 
There once was a Buddha called Sunlight, Most auspicious among the auspicious; He once entered this hall of flowers. Therefore this place is most auspicious. 
There once was a Buddha called Boundless Light, Most auspicious among the auspicious; He once entered this tree-adorned hall, Therefore this place is most auspicious. 
There once was a Buddha called Banner of Truth, Most auspicious among the auspicious; He once entered this jewel palace hall, Therefore this place is most auspcious. 
There once was a Buddha called Lamp of Knowledge, Most auspicious among the auspicious; He once entered this fragrant mountain hall, Therefore this place is most auspicious. 
There once was a Buddha called Light of Virtue, Most auspicious among the auspicious; He once entered this crystal hall, Therefore this place is most auspicious. 
As in this world the king of the Tushita heaven, by the power of the Buddha, eulogized Buddhas of the past, so also did the kings of the Tushita heavens in all worlds praise the virtues of Buddhas. 
Then the World Honored One sat crosslegged on the jewel treasury lion throne in the hall adorned by all jewels. His body of reality was pure, his inconceivable action was free. He was in the same realm as all Buddhas of all times, abiding in omniscience, entering into the same one essence with all the Buddhas. His enlightened eye was perfectly clear, and he saw all things without hindrance. 
He had great mystic powers, coursing everywhere throughout the cosmos unceasingly. 
He had great occult powers, able to go anywhere there might be beings who could be taught. 
His body was adorned with the unobstructed embellishments of all Buddhas. 
He was well aware of appropriate timing in expounding teachings to people. 
Unspeakably many enlightening beings came from various lands in other regions and assembled; the congregation was pure, their reality-body nondual; they rested on nothing, and were freely able to perform the actions of Buddhas. 
When the Buddha had sat on this throne, in the hall there spontaneously appeared countless adornments surpassing all the offerings of the celestials. 
That is, flower garlands, robes, perfumes, incense, jeweled parasols, banners, pennants, music, and singing. 
Each of these was uncountable. 
With great reverence and respect these were offered to the Buddha. The same thing took place in all the Tushita heavens in the ten directions. 
Eulogies in the Tushita Palace When those enlightening beings arrived at the Buddha’s spot, they prostrated themselves before the Buddha; then, by the Buddha’s mystic power he magically produced lion seats of masses of beautiful jewels covered with nets of jewels all around, and the hosts of enlightening beings, according to the direction from which they had come, sat on those seats, Their bodies all emanated countless beams of pure light. 
This boundless light all came from the enlightening beings’ pure mind-jewels, their great vows which were free from all evils. 
They revealed the pure phenomena of the powers of all Buddhas. 
By the power of the impartial vision of all enlightening beings they were able to universally save all sentient beings. 
Those enlightening beings had all already perfected innumerable virtues: 
for example, they traveled to all buddha-lands without hindrance; they saw the pure body of reality which rests on nothing; with the body of knowledge they manifested countless bodies going everywhere in the ten directions to serve the Buddhas; they entered into the Buddhas’ innumerable, boundless, inconceivable powers; they dwelt in the medium of omniscience; by the light of knowledge they comprehended all things; they had attained fearlessness in all respects; they taught wherever they were, their powers of elucidation forever inexhaustible; with great knowledge and wisdom they opened the gate of concentration spells; with the eye of wisdom they entered the profound realm of truth; the realm of their knowledge was boundless and ultimately pure, like space itself. 
As in the palace of the Tushita heaven in this world the hosts of enlightening beings gathered like this, the same thing transpired in all the Tushita heavens in the ten directions; the names of the enlightening beings who gathered, the names of their countries, and the Buddhas there were all the same. 
Then the World Honored One emanated countless beams of light from the wheel marks on his knees, illuminating the entire space of the cosmos in the ten directions. The enlightening beings in all worlds all saw this miraculous display of the Buddha, and the enlightening beings here saw the miraculous displays of all the Buddhas in other worlds. 
These enlightening beings had all similarly planted roots of goodness in the distant past along with Vairocana Buddha, cultivating enlightening practice; they all had awakened to and entered the free, extremely profound liberation of the Buddhas, and had attained the undifferentiated cosmic body, entering all lands without dwelling anywhere. 
They saw countless Buddhas and went to serve them all. 
In a single mental instant they traversed the cosmos, freely and without hindrance. 
Innumerable Buddhas always guarded them mindfully, sharing their power with them. 
They reached the ultimate, supreme other shore; by pure mindfulness they continually dwelt in highest awareness; in every moment of thought they continually entered into the realm of omniscience; they put the small in the large and the large in the small, free in all ways, with no obstruction whatsoever. 
They had already attained the buddha-body and dwelt in the same abode as the Buddhas; they had attained omniscience and produced their bodies from omniscience. 
They were able to enter the spheres of action of all enlightened ones. They opened up innumerable gates of knowledge and wisdom. 
They reached the other shore of indestructible great knowledge, attained adamantine concentration, and cut off all doubts and confusion. 
They had attained the autonomous spiritual powers of Buddhas, teaching and taming countless numbers of sentient beings in the lands of the ten directions. 
Though they had no attachments to any categories or phenomena, they were were able to learn and develop ultimate skill in use of doctrines and to establish all teachings conducive to enlightenment. 
Hosts of enlightening beings with such infinite treasuries of all inexhaustible pure virtues of past, present, and future all came and assembled at the Buddha’s place; the same thing occurred at the places of all the Buddhas revealed by the light. 
Then the enlightening being Diamond Banner, empowered by the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said in verse, The Buddha does not appear in the world And has no extinction either: By the power of his great original vow He demonstrates his freedom. 
This truth is inconceivable— It is not in the sphere of mind: When knowledge reaches the other shore One then sees the realm of the Buddhas. 
The physical body is not the Buddha, Neither is the audible voice: Yet not apart from form and sound Can Buddha’s mystic power be perceived. 
Those of little knowledge cannot know The true realm of the Buddhas; After long cultivation of purifying action Will one be able to comprehend. 
The Truly Awake comes from nowhere And also goes nowhere: The pure, refined physical body Appears through spiritual power. 
Manifesting the body of an enlightened one In innumerable worlds, Widely expounding the subtle teachings, His mind has no attachments. 
His knowledge, being boundless, Comprehends all things; Entering everywhere in the universe, He manifests autonomous powers. 
Sentient beings and all phenomena He comprehends unhindered; Everywhere manifesting physical forms, He is omnipresent in all lands. 
If you want to see omniscience And soon attain highest awareness, You should, with pure clear mind, Cultivate enlightening practice. 
If any see such mystic powers Of the Enlightened One, They should serve the Supreme Honored One And not give rise to doubt. 
Then the enlightening being Banner of Steadfastness, empowered by the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said in verse, The Enlightened One is incomparable, Most profound, inexplicable, Beyond all manner of speech, Pure as space itself. 
Behold the Human Lion’s Autonomous mystic power, Beyond discrimination, Yet causing distinct perceptions. 
In order to expound The profound and subtle teaching The Guide, for this reason, Manifests this peerless body. 
This is great knowledge, The realm of all the Buddhas; If any want to know, Let them approach the Enlightened. 
With mental action always pure, Making offerings to the Buddhas With never any weariness, One can enter the Buddha Way. 
Filled with endless virtues, Steadfast in the will for enlightenment, Thereby the net of doubt is removed And one gazes tirelessly on the Buddha. 
By comprehending all things Does one become a true child of Buddha: Such a person can know The Buddhas’ autonomous power. 
As explained by those of vast knowledge, Will is the root of the teachings; One must develop supreme aspiration, Determined to seek highest awakening. 
If any respect the Buddha And want to requite the Buddha’s grace, They will never leave The abode of all the Buddhas. 
How can intelligent people Who’ve seen and heard the Buddha Not carry out pure vows And tread the path the Buddha traversed? 
Then Banner of Bravery, empowered by the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said in verse, Just as a clear eye Can see colors due to the sun, So too can a pure heart See the Enlightened by Buddha’s power. 
As by the power of effort One can plumb the depths of the sea, So too can the power of knowledge See innumerable Buddhas. 
As in a fertile, watered field Whatever’s planted will grow, So does the ground of a pure mind Produce enlightened qualities. 
As a man who’s found a jewel mine Is forever freed from poverty, An enlightening being finding the Buddha teaching Is free from defilement, pure in mind. 
Just as a true panacea Can eliminate all toxins, Buddha’s teaching too is like this: It annihilates all afflictions. 
Truly genuine teachers Are praised by the enlightened: Through their spiritual power We get to hear the Buddha teachings. 
Even if for countless cons One gave precious things to Buddha, If one doesn’t know the real nature of Buddha This is not called giving. 
Infinite physical characteristics Adorn the Buddha’s body; Yet it is not in physical form That the Buddha can be seen. 
The Enlightened One, Truly Awake, Is peaceful, never moving, Yet can manifest his body Throughout all worlds in the ten directions. 
Just as space itself Is unborn and unperishing, So is the truth of the Buddhas Ultimately birthless and deathless. 
Then Banner of Light, empowered by the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said in verse, In the human and celestial realms In all the worlds there are They see everywhere the Enlightened One’s Body of pure wondrous form. 
Just as the power of one mind Can produce various minds, So can one buddha-body Manifest all Buddhas everywhere. 
Enlightenment is nondual And also has no marks: Yet in the realm of duality He manifests a glorified body. 
Comprehending the nature of things is empty, Their origination like apparitions, His realm of action’s inexhaustible: 
Thus does the Guide appear. Pure is the reality-body Of all Buddhas of all times; They manifest sublime physical forms Wherever and however people need to be taught. 
The enlightened do not think “I’ll produce such a body”: They manifest spontaneously Without discriminating. 
The realm of reality is undifferentiated And also has no basis: And yet in the world It manifests countless bodies. 
The Buddha’s bodies are not emanations And yet not other than emanations: In the reality where there are no emanations He appears to have emanated forms. 
True awareness cannot be measured, The reality-realm’s equal to space; Profound, vast, without bound or bottom, Utterly beyond the power of speech. The Enlightened One has mastered The road leading everywhere: 
Through the myriad lands of the cosmos He goes without obstruction. 
Then Banner of Knowledge, empowered by the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said in verse, If one can believe and accept Omniscience without obstruction, And practice enlightening ways, One’s mind will be immeasurable. 
In all lands Buddha manifests countless bodies, Yet the bodies stay in no place, And he dwells not in the real. 
Each one of the Enlightened Manifest bodies by spiritual powers: Even in unthinkable eons They never could be fully counted. 
The number of all living beings Of all times may be known, But the number of Buddhas’ manifestations Cannot ever be found. 
Sometimes they show one or two, Up to countless bodies— Appearing everywhere, in all lands, Yet really with no duality. 
Just as the clear full moon Appears in all bodies of water And while the reflections are numberless The real moon is not two, So does the one of unimpeded knowledge With perfect true enlightenment Universally appear in all lands: Yet the Buddha-body is nondual. 
It is not one, and yet not two, And also not immeasurable: According to the needs of the taught Do countless bodies appear. 
The buddha-body is not past And also not future: In a single instant he appears to be born, To become enlightened, and pass away. 
As forms produced by magic Have no birth and no origination, So too is the buddha-body thus— Appearing without any birth. 
Then Jewel Banner, empowered by the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said in verse, The buddha-body is infinite Yet can manifest finite bodies: According to what needs to be seen Does the Guide appropriately appear. 
The buddha-body has no location, Yet fills all places; Like space, it’s boundless: Such is its inconceivability. 
It is not in the province of mental function, And mind does not arise therein: In the realm of the Buddhas Ultimately there’s no birth or death. 
Like what is seen by clouded eyes Is neither internal nor external, So also, you should know, Is the worlds’ vision of the Buddhas. 
In order to benefit living beings Do the Enlightened Ones appear in the world: Sentient beings see them as coming forth, But in reality there is no such thing. 
A Buddha cannot be seen In terms of a land, or day or night, Nor indeed can one be seen In terms of years, months, or moments. 
Sentient beings say Buddha was enlightened on a certain day; But enlightenment in reality Is not bound to time. The Enlightened are beyond discrimination: 
Not of the world, they transcend all accounts— All Guides of past, present, and future Appear in this way. 
Just as the pure orb of the sun Doesn’t conjoin with the dark night, Yet we speak of such and such a day and night, So is the principle of the Buddhas; Though the ages of past, present, and future Do not conjoin with the Enlightened, Yet we speak of the Buddhas of past, present, and future: 
Such is the principle of the Guides. Then Banner of Energy, empowered by the Buddha, looked over ten directions and said in verse, All the Guides’ Bodies are the same, as are their meanings; Throughout the lands of the ten directions They appear variously according to needs. 
Observe the Honored Sage: His activity is most unique; He fills the entire cosmos And everything that’s in it. 
The buddha-body is not within And also not outside: It manifests by spiritual power; Such is the teaching of the Guide. 
According to deeds accumulated in former times By the various species of living beings, Such various different bodies Appear, each one dissimilar. 
Thus the bodies of the Buddhas Are infinite, uncountable: Except for the great enlightened one No one can conceive of them. 
Just as the self, being inconceivable, Cannot be grasped by mentation, So too the inconceivability of Buddhas Is not manifested by mentation. 
Just as all things Originate due to multiple conditions, So also does seeing Buddha Necessarily depend on many good works. 
Just as the wish-fulfilling jewel Can satisfy beings’ hearts, So can the teachings of the Buddhas Completely fulfill all aspirations. 
In infinite lands The Guides appear in the world; In accord with the power of their vows They respond in every place. 
Then Banner of Purification, empowered by the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said in verse, The light of great knowledge of the Enlightened Universally purifies all worlds; Once the worlds are purified, He reveals the enlightening teachings. 
Even if people want to see Buddhas as numerous as sentient beings, The Buddha responds to their wishes— Yet really comes from nowhere. 
With Buddha as the object, Concentrating continuously, One can see Buddhas As many as thoughts. 
Carrying out pure ways, Fulfilling virtues, One can concentrate unremittingly On omniscience. 
The Guides expound teachings To beings in accord with their needs; Wherever any can be taught He manifests the supreme incarnation. 
The bodies of Buddha and the worlds’ beings Are all without self: Realizing this, he attains true awakening And also explains it to others. 
All the Human Lions, With boundless powers of freedom, Manifest bodies equal to thoughts, Those bodies each being different. 
As are the bodies of the beings of the worlds, So too are the bodies of Buddhas: When one really knows their inherent nature, That is called Buddhahood. 
The Enlightened see and know all, Clearly comprehending all things: Buddhahood and enlightenment Are both ungraspable. 
The Guide has no coming or going And also no place of abode: Departing from all delusions Is called true perfect enlightenment. 
Then Constellation Banner, empowered by the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said in verse, The Realizer of Thusness, without dwelling anywhere, Abides in all lands, Going to all lands, Seen in all places. 
Buddha manifests all bodies According to sentient beings’ minds, Attaining the Way, teaching the truth, And finally passing utterly away. 
The Buddhas are inconceivable: Who can conceive of the Buddhas? 
Who can see the Truly Awake? Who can manifest the Supreme? 
All things are thus, And so are the states of the Buddhas; There’s not a single thing in thusness That has birth or death. 
Sentient beings erroneously discriminate: “This is Buddha,” “this is the world.” For one realizing the true nature of things There’s no Buddha and no world. 
The Realizer of Thusness appears before all Causing sentient beings to believe and rejoice. But the essence of Buddha is ungraspable, And they are not seeing anything either. 
If one can, in the world, Depart from all attachments, With unimpeded mind, joyful, One will awaken to the truth. 
That manifested by spiritual power Is what is called Buddha: Though one search in all times, past, present, or future, It has no existence at all. 
If one can know in this way The mind and all things, One will know and see all And soon become enlightened. 
In words are expressed The powers of Buddhas; But true enlightenment transcends words, Though it be provisionally explained by words. 
Then Banner of Truth, empowered by the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said in verse, It’s better to always experience All the pains of the world Than to be apart from the Buddha And not see Buddha’s mystic powers. 
If there are any sentient beings Who have not yet set their minds on enlightenment, If they once hear the name of Buddha They’ll surely attain enlightenment. 
People with knowledge and wisdom, Once they set their minds on enlightenment, Will surely become supreme Buddhas: Have no doubt of that. 
The mystic power of the enlightened Is rarely encountered even in countless ages; If you engender a single thought of faith You’ll soon ascend to the highest path. 
Even if in every instant You give offerings to countless Buddhas, If you don’t know the real truth This is not to be called offering. 
If you hear such a teaching, The Buddhas are born from this; Though you experience countless pains You’ll not quit enlightening practices. 
Once having heard of great knowledge, The state entered by the Buddhas, Everywhere in the universe You’ll become a guide of all times. 
Though one pass the whole future Traveling to all buddha-lands, If one doesn’t seek this wondrous truth One will never become enlightened. 
Sentient beings, from beginningless past, Have long revolved in birth and death; They do not know the real truth, So Buddhas come forth in the world. 
Truths cannot be destroyed, And no one can destroy them: The great light of mystic power Is revealed throughout the world. 
Ten Dedications “Child of Buddha, you should receive the spiritual power of the Buddha and expound this teaching, to gain the protection of the Buddhas, to dwell in the house of the Buddhas, to increase transcendental virtues, to attain the light of concentration, to enter the unobstructed state of the Buddha, to illumine the realm of reality with great light, to assemble faultless pure ways, to abide in the realm of great knowledge, to attain the unimpeded light of truth.” Then the Buddhas bestowed on Diamond Banner boundless knowledge and wisdom, unhalting, unimpeded eloquence, skill in distinguishing expressions and meanings, unhindered light of the teaching, the equal body of wisdom of the enlightened, a pure voice with infinite distinct tones, the inconceivable concentration of enlightening beings’ skillful observation, the knowledge of dedication of indestructible foundations of all goodness, consummate skill in analytic observation of all things, and uninterrupted power of elucidation to explain all things in all places. 
Because of the power of the virtue of entry into this absorption. 
Then the Buddhas each patted the enlightening being Diamond Banner on the head with their right hands, after which Diamond Banner rose from absorption and declared to the enlightening beings, “Children of Buddhas, great enlightening beings have inconceivable great vows, filling the cosmos, able to save all sentient beings. 
That is, to learn and practice the dedications of all Buddhas of past, present, and future. 
How many kinds of dedication have the great enlightening beings? 
Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of dedication, which are expounded by the Buddhas of past, present, and future. 
What are they? 
Dedication to saving all sentient beings without any mental image of sentient beings. 
Indestructible dedication. 
Dedication equal to all Buddhas. 
Dedication reaching all places. 
Dedication of inexhaustible treasuries of virtue. 
Dedication causing all roots of goodness to endure. 
Dedication equally adapting to all sentient beings. 
Dedication with the character of true thusness. 
Unattached, unbound, liberated dedication. 
Boundless dedication equal to the cosmos. 
These are the ten kinds of dedication of great enlightening beings, which the past, future, and present Buddhas have, will, and do expound. 
“What is the great enlightening beings’ dedication to saving all sentient beings? 
Here the enlightening beings practice transcendent giving, purify transcendent discipline, cultivate transcendent forbearance, arouse transcendent energy, enter transcendent meditation, abide in transcendent wisdom, great compassion, great kindness, great joy, and great equanimity. 
Cultivating boundless roots of goodness such as these, they form this thought: 
‘May these roots of goodness universally benefit all sentient beings, causing them to be purified, to reach the ultimate, and to forever leave the innumerable pains and afflictions of the realms of hells, ghosts, and animals, and so on.’ When the great enlightening beings plant these roots of goodness, they dedicate their own roots of goodness thus: ‘I should be a hostel for all sentient beings, to let them escape from all painful things. 
I should be a protector for all sentient beings, to let them all be liberated from all afflictions. 
I should be a refuge for all sentient beings, to free them from all fears. 
I should be a goal for all sentient beings, to cause them to reach universal knowledge. 
I should make a resting place for all sentient beings, to enable them to find a place of peace and security. 
I should be a light for all sentient beings, to enable them to attain the light of knowledge to annihilate the darkness of ignorance. 
I should be a torch for all sentient beings, to destroy all darkness of nescience. 
I should be a lamp for all sentient beings, to cause them to abide in the realm of ultimate purity. 
I should be a guide for all sentient beings, to lead them into the truth. 
I should be a great leader for all sentient beings, to give them great knowledge.’ Enlightening beings dedicate all foundations of goodness in this way, to equally benefit all sentient beings and ultimately cause them all to attain universal knowledge. 
“The enlightening beings’ protection of and dedication to those who are not their relatives or friends are equal to those for their relatives and friends. 
Because enlightening beings enter the equal nature of all things, they do not conceive a single thought of not being relatives or friends. 
Even if there be sentient beings who have malicious or hostile intentions toward the enlightening beings, still the enlightening beings also regard them with the eye of compassion and are never angered. 
They are good friends to all sentient beings, explaining the right teaching for them, so that they may learn and practice it. 
Just as the ocean cannot be changed or destroyed by all poisons, so too are enlightening beings—the various oppressive afflictions of all the ignorant, the unwise, the ungrateful, the wrathful, those poisoned by covetousness, the arrogant and conceited, the mentally blind and deaf, those who do not know what is good, and other such evil sentient beings, cannot disturb the enlightening beings. 
“Just as the sun, appearing in the world, is not concealed because those who are born blind do not see it, and is not hidden by the obstruction of such things as mirages, eclipses, trees, high mountains, deep ravines, dust, mist, smoke, or clouds, and is not concealed by the change of seasons, so also are the enlightening beings—they have great virtues, their minds are deep and broad, they observe with true mindfulness, without boredom; because they want ultimate virtue and knowledge their minds aspire to the supreme truth; the light of truth illumines everywhere and they perceive the meanings of everything. 
Their knowledge freely commands all avenues of teaching, and in order to benefit all sentient beings they always practice virtuous ways, never mistakenly conceiving the idea of abandoning sentient beings. 
The enlightening beings just array themselves with the armor of great vows of enlightening beings, saving sentient beings without ever retreating; they do not withdraw from enlightening activity and abandon the path of enlightenment just because sentient beings are ungrateful, they do not get sick of sentient beings just because ignoramuses altogether give up all the foundations of goodness which accord with reality, or because they repeatedly commit excesses and evils which are hard to bear. 
Just as the sun does not appear in the world for just one thing, so too the enlightening beings do not cultivate roots of goodness and dedicate them to complete perfect enlightenment just for the sake of one sentient being—it is in order to save and safeguard all sentient beings everywhere that they cultivate roots of goodness and dedicate them to unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment. 
In the same way, it is not to purify just one buddha-land, not because of belief in just one Buddha, not just to see one Buddha, not just to comprehend one doctrine, that they initiate the determination for great knowledge and dedicate it to unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment—it is to purify all buddha-lands, out of faith in all Buddhas, to serve all Buddhas, to understand all Buddha teachings, that they initiate great vows, cultivate the foundations of goodness, and dedicate them to unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment. 
“Enlightening beings, focusing on all the Buddha teachings, develop a broad mind and great determination, a determination never to retreat, and through measureless eons cultivate and collect rare, hard to obtain mental jewels, all equal to those of all Buddhas. 
Thus observing the bases of goodness, enlightening beings’ mind of faith is pure, their great compassion is firm and enduring; they truly and genuinely dedicate them to sentient beings with a most profound intent, a joyful mind, a pure mind, a mind conquering all, a gentle mind, a kind, compassionate mind, a mind of pity and sympathy, with the intention to protect, to benefit, and to give peace and happiness to all sentient beings—they do this sincerely and in reality, not just in words. 
“When great enlightening beings dedicate roots of goodness, they think in these terms: ‘By my roots of goodness may all creatures, all sentient beings, be purified, may they be filled with virtues which cannot be ruined and are inexhaustible. May they always gain respect. May they have right mindfulness and unfailing recollection. 
May they be replete with immeasurable knowledge. 
May all virtues of physical, verbal, and mental action fully adorn them.’ They also think, ‘By these roots of goodness I’ll cause all sentient beings to serve all Buddhas, to their unfailing benefit. 
I’ll cause their pure faith to be indestructible; I’ll cause them to hear the true teaching, cut off all doubt and confusion, remember the teaching without forgetting it and practice in accord with the teaching. 
I will cause them to develop respect for the Enlightened, to act with purity, to rest securely on innumerable great foundations of goodness, to be forever free of poverty, to be fully equipped with the seven kinds of wealth—faith, self-control, shame, conscience, learning, generosity, and wisdom—to always learn from the Buddhas, to perfect innumerable supreme roots of goodness, to attain impartial understanding, to abide in omniscience, to look upon all sentient beings equally with unobstructed eyes, to adorn their bodies with all marks of greatness, without any flaws, to have pure, beautiful voices replete with all fine qualities, to have control over their senses, to accomplish the ten powers, to be filled with good will, to dwell or depend on nothing, to cause all sentient beings to attain the enjoyments of buddhahood, attain infinite spiritual stations, and abide in the abode of Buddhas. 
“When enlightening beings see sentient beings doing all sorts of bad things and suffering all sorts of misery and pain, and being hindered by this from seeing the Buddha, hearing the teaching, and recognizing the community, the enlightening beings think, ‘I should, in those states of woe, take on the various miseries in place of the sentient beings, to liberate them.’ When enlightening beings suffer pain in this way, they become even more determined—they do not give up or run away, are not shocked or frightened, are not discouraged or intimidated, and are unwearied. 
Because according to their vows they are determined to carry all sentient beings to liberation. 
‘All sentient beings are in the realm of the pains and troubles of birth, old age, sickness, and death, revolving in repeated routines according to the force of their acts, ignorant, with erroneous views, bereft of qualities of goodness—I should save them and enable them to attain emancipation.’ “Also, sentient beings are wrapped up in the web of attachments, covered by the shroud of ignorance, clinging to all existents, pursuing them unceasingly, entering the cage of suffering, acting like maniacs, totally void of virtue or knowledge, always doubtful and confused; they do not perceive the place of peace, they do not know the path of emancipation, they revolve in birth and death without rest, always submerged in the mire of suffering. 
Enlightening beings, seeing this, conceive great compassion and desire to help them, wanting to enable sentient beings to all attain liberation; to this end they dedicate all their virtues, dedicating them with a great, magnanimous heart, in conformity with the dedication practiced by the enlightening beings of all times, in accord with dedication as explained in the scriptures, praying that all sentient beings be thoroughly purified and ultimately accomplish knowledge of all means of liberation. 
They also think, ‘What I practice is in order to enable sentient beings to all become supreme sovereigns of knowledge; I am not seeking liberation for myself, but only to serve all sentient beings, to cause them to all attain the omniscient mind, to cross over the flow of birth and death, and be freed from all suffering.’ “They also form this thought: 
‘I should accept all sufferings for the sake of all sentient beings, and enable them to escape from the abyss of immeasurable woes of birth and death. 
I should accept all suffering for the sake of all sentient beings in all worlds, in all states of misery, forever and ever, and still always cultivate foundations of goodness for the sake of all beings. 
I would rather take all this suffering on myself than to allow sentient beings to fall into hell. 
I should be a hostage in those perilous places—hells, animal realms, the nether world, etc.—as a ransom to rescue all sentient beings in states of woe and enable them to gain liberation.’ “They also form this thought: ‘I vow to protect all sentient beings and never abandon them. What I say is sincerely true, without falsehood. 
Because I have set my mind on enlightenment in order to liberate all sentient beings; I do not seek the unexcelled Way for my own sake. 
Also I do not cultivate enlightening practice in search of pleasure or enjoyment. 
Because mundane pleasures are all suffering, the realm of maniacs, craved by ignorant people but scorned by Buddhas; all misery arises from them. 
The anger, fighting, mutual defamation, and other such evils of the realms of hells, ghosts, animals, and the nether world are all caused by greedy attachment to objects of desire. 
By addiction to desire one becomes estranged from the Buddhas and hindered from birth in heaven, to say nothing of unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment.’ Observing thus how worldlings, because of greed for a little taste of what they desire, experience immeasurable suffering, enlightening beings after all do not seek unexcelled enlightenment and cultivate enlightening practice for the sake of those pleasures of the senses; it is only to bring peace and comfort to all sentient beings that they set their minds on enlightenment and practice to fulfill their great vows to cut sentient beings’ halter of miseries and enable them to attain liberation. 
‘I should dedicate roots of goodness in this way to enable all sentient beings to attain ultimate bliss, beneficial bliss, the bliss of nonreception, the bliss of dispassionate tranquility, the bliss of nondependence, the bliss of imperturbability, immeasurable bliss, the bliss of not rejecting birth and death yet not regressing from nirvana, undying bliss, and the bliss of universal knowledge.’ “They also think, ‘I should be for all sentient beings as a charioteer, as a leader, holding the torch of great knowledge and showing the way to safety and peace, freeing them from danger, using appropriate means to inform them of the truth; and also, in the ocean of birth and death, be as a skillful ship’s captain who knows all, to deliver sentient beings to the other shore.’ “In this way do great enlightening beings dedicate all their basic virtues—that is, they save all sentient beings by employing means appropriate to the situation to cause them to emerge from birth and death, serve and provide for all the Buddhas, attain unhindered, omniscient knowledge, abandon all maniacs and bad associates, approach all enlightening beings and good associates, annihilate all error and wrongdoing, perfect pure behavior, and fulfill the great practical vows and innumerable virtues of enlightening beings. 
“When great enlightening beings have properly dedicated their roots of goodness, they form this thought: ‘Many suns do not appear because of the multitude of sentient beings in the four continents—only one sun appears, yet it can shine on all sentient beings. 
Also, sentient beings do not know the day and night, or travel, or see, or carry out their work by the light of their own bodies—the accomplishment of these things all depends on the emergence of the sun; yet the sun is only one, not two.’ In the same way, great enlightening beings, cultivating and amassing roots of goodness, thinking as they dedicate them, ‘Sentient beings cannot save themselves—how can they save others? 
Only I alone have this unique determination,’ they cultivate and amass roots of goodness and dedicate them in this way—that is to liberate all sentient beings, to illumine all sentient beings, to guide all sentient beings, to enlighten all sentient beings, to watch over and attend to all sentient beings, to take care of all sentient beings, to perfect all sentient beings, to gladden all sentient beings, to bring happiness to all sentient beings, and to cause all sentient beings to become freed from doubt. 
“Great enlightening beings also think, ‘I should be like the sun, shining universally on all without seeking thanks or reward, able to take care of all sentient beings even if they are bad, never giving up my vows on this account, not abandoning all sentient beings because one sentient being is evil, just diligently practicing the dedication of roots of goodness to cause all sentient beings to attain peace and ease. 
Even if my roots of goodness be few, I embrace all sentient beings and make a great dedication with a joyful heart. 
If one has roots of goodness but does not desire to benefit all sentient beings, that’s not called dedication. 
When every single root of goodness is directed toward all sentient beings, that is called dedication.’ “They cultivate dedication to place sentient beings in the true nature of things where there is no attachment, dedication seeing that the intrinsic nature of sentient beings doesn’t move or change, dedication without depending on or grasping dedication, dedication without attachment to the appearances of roots of goodness, dedication without false ideas about the essential nature of consequences of actions, dedication without attachment to the characteristics of the five clusters of material and mental existence, dedication without destroying the characteristics of the five clusters, dedication without grasping action, dedication without seeking reward, dedication without attachment to causality, dedication without imagining what is produced by causality, dedication without attachment to reputation, without attachment to location, dedication without attachment to unreal things, dedication without attachment to images of sentient beings, the world, or mind, dedication without creating delusions of mind, delusions of concepts, or delusions of views, dedication without attachment to verbal expression, dedication observing the real true nature of all things, dedication observing the aspects in which all sentient beings are equal, dedication stamping all roots of goodness with the seal of the realm of truth, dedication observing all things dispassionately; they understand that all things have no propagation and that roots of goodness are also thus; they observe that things are nondual, unborn, and unperishing, and that so is dedication. 
“Dedicating such roots of goodness, they cultivate and practice pure methods of curing spiritual ills. 
All of their roots of goodness are in accord with transcendental principles, but they do not conceive of them dualistically: 
it is not in their deeds that they cultivate omniscience, yet it is not apart from deeds that they are dedicated to omniscience; omniscience is not identical to action, but omniscience is not attained apart from action either. 
Because their action is pure as light, the consequences are also pure as light; because the consequences are pure as light, omniscience is also pure as light. 
Detached from all confusions and thoughts of self and possession, they know perfectly in this way and skillfully dedicate all roots of goodness. 
“When enlightening beings practice dedication in this way, liberating sentient beings ceaselessly, they do not dwell on appearances; but though they know that in all things there is no action and no consequence, yet they can skillfully produce all deeds and consequences, without opposition or contention. 
When enlightening beings practice dedication in this way, they are free from all faults and are praised by all Buddhas. 
This is called the great enlightening beings’ first dedication, saving all sentient beings without any image or concept of sentient beings.” Then the enlightening being Diamond Banner looked over all the assemblies in the ten directions, throughout the cosmos; entering into the meanings and expressions of the profundities, cultivating supreme action with a boundless mind, covering all beings with great compassion, maintaining the lineage of the enlightened ones of past, present, and future, entering the treasury of virtuous qualities of all Buddhas, producing the verity body of all Buddhas, able to discern the mentalities of all sentient beings, knowing the roots of goodness he had planted were ripe, while abiding in the reality body he manifested pure physical embodiment for them and, empowered by the Buddha, said in verse, Cultivating the Way over inconceivable eons, Vigor firm, mind unobstructed, Always seeking the virtuous qualities of Buddhas To benefit living beings, The peerless tamers of the world Thoroughly purify their minds; Determining to save all conscious creatures, They can enter well into the treasury of dedication. 
Their courageous power of energy complete, Their knowledge clear, their minds pure, They rescue all beings everywhere, Their minds enduring, unperturbed. 
Their hearts can rest peacefully, without compare; Their minds are ever pure and full of joy. Earnestly striving thus for the sake of the living, They are like earth, accepting all. 
They do not seek pleasure for themselves: They only want to rescue sentient beings; Thus developing a heart of great compassion, They quickly gain entry to the unhindered state. 
They are able to accept all beings In all worlds in the ten directions; They stabilize their minds to save those beings, This way cultivating the dedications. 
They practice generosity most gladly And preserve pure conduct, without transgression; Their intrepid, vigorous mind unstirred, They dedicate this to enlightened omniscience. 
Their mind is boundlessly broad, Their forbearance is stable, unshakable; Their meditation is most profound, always illumining, Their wisdom’s inconceivably subtle. 
In all worlds in the ten directions They fully cultivate pure practices: All these virtues they dedicate To the peace and happiness of all conscious beings. 
The great heroes diligently practice good works, Measureless, boundless, uncountable: All these they use to benefit sentient beings And cause them to abide in inconceivable supreme knowledge. 
To act for the benefit of all sentient beings They spend inconceivably many eons in hells; This they do without wearying or shrinking back, Always practicing dedication with courage and decision. 
They do not seek form, sound, smell or taste, And they do not seek nice feelings: It is just to liberate all living beings That they always seek supreme knowledge. 
Their knowledge and wisdom are pure as space, They pratice boundless enlightening acts; The practical methods the Buddhas carry out Those people always practice and learn. 
The great heroes, traveling through all worlds, Are able to give peace and safety to all beings, Causing all to rejoice, Tirelessly cultivating enlightening practice. 
Destroying all mental poisons, Contemplating and cultivating highest knowledge, They do not seek comfort for themselves: They only wish that sentient beings be freed from pain. These people’s dedication is ultimate— Their hearts are always pure and free from poison: 
Entrusted by the Buddhas of all times, They dwell in the citadel of the loftiest teaching. 
They’re never attached to forms Or to sensations, perceptions, habits, or consciousness; Their minds have forever transcended existence, While all their virtues they dedicate to others. 
All the sentient beings seen by the Buddhas They take into their care, without exception, Vowing to enable them all to be liberated; For them do they strive, with great joy. 
Truly mindful, free from ignorance, they’re always calm, And all their deeds are totally pure. 
Those enlightening beings, while in the world, Are not attached to any internal or external phenomena; Like the wind traveling unhindered through the sky Is the function of the great beings’ mind. 
Their physical actions are all pure, All their speech is without error; Their minds always take refuge in the Buddha, And they can please all the Buddhas. 
In the infinite worlds of the ten directions, Wherever there are Buddhas, they go; There, seeing the lords of great compassion, They all gaze with reverent respect. 
Their minds are always pure and faultless, Entering all worlds without fear; Already in the Enlightened Ones’ unexcelled Path, They act as great reservoirs of truth for all beings. 
Diligently observing and examining all phenomena, They contemplate existence and nonexistence accordingly: Thus they pursue the truth And gain entry to the most profound realm of noncontention. 
With this they cultivate the steadfast Way Which no sentient beings can break down; Well able to comprehend the nature of all things, They have no attachments in any world. 
Thus they are dedicated to reaching the other shore, Enabling all beings to be free from defilements; Forever rid of all dependency, They enter the realm of ultimate independence. 
In the languages of all sentient beings In accord with the differences in their types, Enlightening beings can distinctly explain While their minds are unattached and unhindered. 
Thus do enlightening beings practice dedication: Unspeakably many are their virtues and their methods; They earn the praise of all the Buddhas In all worlds of the ten directions. 
“What is the indestructible dedication of great enlightening beings? 
These great enlightening beings attain indestructible faith in the Enlightened Ones of past, future, and present, because they serve all Buddhas. 
They attain indestructible faith in enlightening beings, even those who have just resolved on the search for omniscience for the first time, because they vow to tirelessly cultivate all foundations of goodness of enlightening beings. 
They attain indestructible faith in all the Buddha qualities, because they conceive profound aspiration. 
They attain indestructible faith in all Buddha teachings, because they abide by them and maintain them. 
They attain indestructible faith in all sentient beings, because they look upon them impartially with the eye of compassion and dedicate roots of goodness to their universal benefit. 
They attain indestructible faith in all pure ways, because everywhere they amass boundless roots of goodness. 
They attain indestructible faith in the path of dedication of enlightening beings, because they fulfill their noble aspirations. 
They attain indestructible faith in all teachers of the ways of enlightening beings, because they think of the enlightening beings as Buddhas. 
They attain indestructible faith in the spiritual powers of all Buddhas, because they deeply believe in the inconceivability of the Buddhas. 
They attain indestructible faith in the practice of skill in expedient means exercised by all enlightening beings, because they include countless various realms of activity. 
“When great enlightening beings abide in indestructible faith, they plant roots of goodness, innumerable and boundless, in various realms, such as those of Buddhas, enlightening beings, disciples of Buddhas, individual illuminates, of Buddhist doctrines, and of sentient beings, causing the determination for enlightenment to grow more and more. 
Their kindness and compassion broad and great, they observe impartially. 
They accord with and practice the deeds of the Buddhas, embracing all pure foundations of goodness. 
Entering the truth, they assemble virtuous practices, carry out great works of charity, and cultivate meritorious qualities, looking upon the past, present, and future as equal. 
“Great enlightening beings dedicate such virtues to omniscience, aspiring to always see the Buddhas. 
They associate with good companions and live among enlightening beings. 
Constantly keeping their minds on omniscience, they accept and hold the Buddhist teachings, conscientiously protecting them, and educate and develop all sentient beings, their minds always dedicated to the path of emancipation from the world. 
They provide for and serve all teachers of truth. Understanding the principles of the teachings, they retain them in memory; they cultivate and practice great vows, causing them all to be fulfilled. 
“Thus do enlightening beings amass roots of goodness, accomplish roots of goodness, develop roots of goodness, contemplate roots of goodness, concentrate on roots of goodness, analyze roots of goodness, delight in roots of goodness, cultivate roots of goodness, and abide in roots of goodness. 
“Once enlightening beings have amassed various roots of goodness in this way, they cultivate the practices of enlightening beings by means of the results of these roots of goodness. 
In every successive moment they see innumerable Buddhas, and serve and provide for them in accordance with their needs. 
They provide innumerable jewels, flowers, garlands, garments, parasols, banners, pennants, adornments, servants, beautified places, perfumes, powdered incenses, mixed scents, burning incenses, profound faith, aspiration, pure minds, respect, praise, honor, jeweled seats, flower seats, incense seats, seats of garlands, sandalwood seats, cloth seats, diamond seats, crystal seats, precious streamer seats, jewel-colored seats, bejeweled parks, flowered parks, perfumed parks, parks hung with garlands, parks spread with robes, jewel-studded parks, parks decorated with streamers of all jewels, parks with trees of all precious substances, parks with balustrades of all precious substances, parks covered with nets of chimes of all jewels, palaces with all precious substances, palaces with all kinds of flowers, palaces with all kinds of incenses, palaces with all kinds of garlands, palaces of all kinds of sandalwood, palaces with stores of all kinds of aromatic resins, palaces of all kinds of diamonds, palaces of all kinds of crystals, all extraordinarily fine, surpassing those of the heavens; innumerable trees of mixed jewels, trees of various fragrances, trees of precious raiment, trees of music, trees of fascinating jewels, trees of gem-studded streamers, trees of precious rings, trees adorned with banners, pennants, and canopies with the fragrances of all flowers—such trees, with luxuriant foliage interreflecting, adorn the palaces; the palaces also are adorned with countless lattices, windows, doors, balconies, crescents, and drapes, countless nets of gold covering them, countless perfumes wafting throughout them scenting everything, and countless robes spread on the ground. 
“Enlightening beings reverently present these offerings with pure-minded respect to all Buddhas for countless, incalculable eons, never retreating, never ceasing; and after each Buddha dies they also respectfully make similar offerings to all their relics, in order to induce all sentient beings to develop pure faith, to embody all foundations of goodness, to be freed from all suffering, to have broad understanding, to be arrayed with great adornments, to be arrayed with infinite adornments, to consummate all their undertakings, to know how rare it is to meet a Buddha in the world, to fulfill the immeasurable power of the enlightened, to adorn and make offerings to the tombs and shrines of Buddhas, and to maintain the teachings of all Buddhas. 
“Their offerings to living Buddhas and to their relics after death could never be fully told of even in an incalculable period of time. 
Such cultivation and accumulation of immeasurable virtue is all to develop and mature sentient beings, without retreating, without ceasing, without wearying, without clinging, free from all mental images, without stopping anywhere, forever beyond all dependence, detached from self and anything pertaining to a self. 
They seal all aspects of their activities with the stamp of truth, realize the birthlessness of things, abide in the abode of buddhahood, and observe the nature of birthlessness definitively marking all objects. 
In the care of the Buddhas, they set their minds on dedication—dedication in accord with the essential nature of things, dedication entering into the uncreated truth yet perfecting created expedient methods, dedication of techniques discarding attachments to concepts of phenomena, dedication abiding in countless enlightening skills, dedication forever departing from all realms of existence, dedication of expedient application of practices without sticking to forms, dedication embracing all foundations of goodness, great dedication purifying the acts of all enlightening beings, dedication rousing the will for enlightenment, dedication living with all bases of goodness, dedication fulfilling supreme faith. 
“When enlightening beings dedicate such roots of goodness, though they go along with birth and death they are not changed: 
they seek omniscience without ever retreating; while being in the various realms of existence, their minds are undisturbed; they are able to liberate all sentient beings; they are not stained by compounded things; they do not lose unimpeded knowledge; their fulfillment of causes and conditions of enlightening beings’ practices and stages is inexhaustible; worldly things cannot change or move them; they fulfill the pure ways of transcendence; they are able to accomplish all knowledge and power. 
Thus do enlightening beings get rid of the darkness of ignorance and folly, develop the will for enlightenment and reveal its light, increase pure ways, dedicated to the supreme Way, fulfilling all its practices. 
“With clear, pure intellect they are able to skillfully analyze and comprehend all things as appearing according to the mind; they know deeds are like illusions, results of deeds are like paintings, all activities are like magic tricks, things born of causes and conditions are all like echoes, and the practices of enlightening beings are all like reflections. 
They produce the clear, pure eye of reality, seeing the vast realm of the uncreated; realizing their null essence, they understand the nonduality of things and discover the true aspect of things. 
They fulfill the practices of enlightening beings without attachment to any forms. 
They are able to carry out all commonplace acts without ever abandoning pure principles and practices. 
Free from all attachments, they remain unattached in action. 
“Thus do enlightening beings think flexibly, without confusion or delusion, without contradicting facts, without destroying active causes, dedicating as is appropriate, with clear perception of real truth. 
They know the inherent nature of things, yet by the power of skill in means they accomplish results of action and reach the other shore. With knowledge and wisdom they examine all things and attain knowledge of spiritual faculties. 
The virtues of their deeds are carried out without striving, in accordance with their free will. 
“Enlightening beings dedicate roots of goodness in this way because they want to liberate all sentient beings, keep the lineage of Buddhas unbroken, be forever rid of demonic activity, and see omniscience. Their boundless aspiration is never discarded; they detach from mundane objects and cut off all mixup and defilement. 
They also wish for sentient beings to attain pure knowledge, enter deeply into the techniques of liberation, depart from the state of birth and death, attain the bases of virtues of buddhahood, forever end all delusive activities, stamp all actions with the seal of equanimity, determine to enter knowledge of all ways of liberation, and accomplish all transmundane qualities. 
This, O Child of Buddha, is called enlightening beings’ second dedication, indestructible dedication. 
“When enlightening beings abide in this dedication, they get to see all the countless Buddhas and master innumerable pure, sublime teachings. 
They attain impartiality toward all sentient beings, and have no doubt about anything. 
Strengthened by the spiritual power of all Buddhas, they overcome all demons and forever get rid of their influence. They achieve noble birth and fulfill the will for enlightenment. 
Attaining unhindered knowledge, they can expound the meanings of all doctrines without relying on another for understanding. 
They are able, following the power of imagination, to enter all lands; illumining sentient beings everywhere, they cause them all to become purified. 
Great enlightening beings, by the power of this indestructible dedication, embody all foundations of goodness and dedicate them in this way.” Then Diamond Banner, spiritually empowered by Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said in verse, Enlightening beings, having attained indestructible will, Carry out all good works; Therefore they’re able to make the Buddhas rejoice: Those who are wise dedicate this. 
Making offerings to infinite Buddhas, Giving charity, with self-control, they subdue their senses, Out of desire to benefit all sentient beings, To cause them all to be purified. 
All sorts of beautiful, fragrant flowers, Innumerable different splendid robes, Jeweled canopies and adornments, They present to all the Buddhas. 
Thus do they make offerings to Buddhas For countless, unthinkable eons; Reverent, respectful, always rejoicing, They never have a thought of weariness. 
They concentrate their thought on the Buddhas, The Great Bright Lamps of all worlds: All the Enlightened Ones of the ten directions Appear before them, as though face to face. 
For inconceivably infinite eons They give in all ways, their minds never weary: For hundreds of millions of eons They practice good principles in the same way. 
After the Buddhas become extinct, They make offerings to their relics, tirelessly: With various fine adornments for each They set up inconceivably many shrines. 
Built in incomparably excellent forms, Adorned with jewels and gold, The shrines are magnificent, big as mountains, Their number countless billions. 
Enlightening beings cultivate and build up virtues Vast, extensive, incomparably supreme; Understanding they’re essentially not existent, In this way they dedicate them all with certainty. 
Observing all things with supreme knowledge, There’s not a single thing that’s born; Thus do they provisionally cultivate dedication, Virtue infinite, inexhaustible. 
By this means they purify the mind, Equal to all the Buddhas— This power of skill in means is inexhaustible; Therefore felicitous results have no limit. 
Initiating the will for unsurpassed enlightenment, Without depending on anything in the world, They go to all worlds in the ten directions And are not hindered by anything at all. 
All Buddhas appear in the world Because they want to guide beings’ minds; They examine the true natures of their minds And discover they ultimately cannot be found. 
All phenomena, without exception, Are included in thusness, with no essential nature; Dedicating with this pure eye They open the prison of birth and death in the world. 
Though they purify all existences, Yet they do not have a notion of existences; They know the nature of existents has no existence And purify the joyful mind. 
They depend on nothing in one buddha-land, Or in any buddha-lands, And they are not attached to conditioned things, Knowing their phenomenality has no basis. 
Hereby they cultivate omniscience; Hereby highest knowledge adorns them; Hereby the Buddhas all rejoice; This is enlightening beings’ work of dedication. 
Enlightening beings focus their minds on the Buddhas, Their supreme knowledge, wisdom, and means. Like Buddhas, they depend on nothing at all: May we accomplish these virtues. 
Concentrating on saving all, They cause them to abandon evil deeds; Thus benefiting sentient beings, They contemplate attentively without abandoning them. 
Abiding in the state of knowledge and guarding the teaching, They do not take nirvana by other vehicles— They only vow to attain the Buddhas’ unexcelled Way; This is the dedication of enlightening beings. 
They do not grasp the fabricated unrealities Spoken of by sentient beings, But though they do not rely on speech Still they don’t cling to wordlessness. 
All the enlightened ones in the ten directions Comprehend all things without exception; But though they know all things are empty, void, They don’t produce a notion of voidness. 
With one adornment they adorn all Yet don’t discriminate phenomena— They enlighten all living beings: All is without inherent nature, without objectivity. 
“What is great enlightening beings’ dedication equal to all Buddhas? 
Here the enlightening beings follow and cultivate the path of dedication of the Buddhas of the past, future, and present. 
When they practice and learn the path of dedication in this way, when they perceive any objects of sense, whether pleasant or unpleasant, they do not conceive like or dislike—their minds are free, without faults, broad, pure, joyful, blissful, free from all sorrows and troubles. 
Their minds are flexible, their senses are pure and cool. 
“When great enlightening beings gain such peace and bliss, they become even more determined, dedicating their determination to the Buddhas, with these thoughts: ‘With the roots of goodness I am now planting I vow to cause the bliss of the Buddhas to increase more and more—that is, the bliss of the inconceivable abode of Buddhas, the bliss of the peerless concentration of Buddhas, the bliss of unlimited compassion, the bliss of liberation of all Buddhas, the bliss of vast, ultimate, immeasurable power, the bliss of tranquility detached from all cognition, the bliss of abiding in the state of nonobstruction, always rightly concentrated, the bliss of carrying out the practice of nondualism without change.’ “Once the great enlightening beings have dedicated their roots of goodness to the Buddhas, they also dedicate these virtues to the enlightening beings: 
that is, to cause those who have not fulfilled their vows to fulfill them, to cause those whose minds are not yet pure to attain purity, to cause those who have not fulfilled the ways of transcendence to fulfill them, to settle them in the indestructible will for enlightenment, that they not regress on the way to omniscience, not give up great effort, preserve all the foundations of goodness of the gates of enlightenment, and be able to cause sentient beings to give up conceit, set their minds on enlightenment, fulfill their aspirations, abide in the abode of all enlightening beings, attain the clear, sharp senses of enlightening beings, cultivate roots of goodness, and realize omniscience. 
“Having thus dedicated their roots of goodness to enlightening beings, the great enlightening beings then dedicate them to all sentient beings, wishing that the roots of goodness of all sentient beings, even the slightest—even seeing a Buddha, hearing teaching, or respecting holy mendicants, for but the time of a fingersnap—all be free from obstruction, that they reflect on the completeness of Buddhas, on the techniques of the teaching, and on the nobility and importance of the community, that they not be separated from vision of the Buddha, that their minds become pure, that they attain the qualities of buddhahood, build up immeasurable virtue, purify spiritual powers, give up doubts about the truth and live according to the teaching. As they make such dedication to sentient beings, they also make such dedication for the Buddhist disciples and the individual illuminates. 
“Also they pray that all sentient beings forever leave all miserable places like hells, ghosthood, and animality, the nether world, and so on, that they further develop the supreme will for enlightenment, concentrate their minds on the earnest search for knowledge of all means of liberation, never repudiate the true teaching of the Buddhas, attain the peace of the Buddhas, be pure in body and mind, and realize omniscience. 
“The foundations of goodness of great enlightening beings are all correctly initiated, built up, and developed by great vows, causing them all to expand and to be completely fulfilled. 
“When great enlightening beings live at home with spouses and children, they never for a moment give up the determination for enlightenment; with correct mindfulness they meditate on the realm of all knowledge, liberating themselves and others, enabling them to reach the ultimate. Using appropriate means they transform the members of their own households, causing them to enter the knowledge of enlightening beings and causing them to develop to maturity and attain liberation. Though they live together, their minds have no attachments. 
By their basic great great compassion they remain in home life, and because of their kindness they harmonize with their spouses and children, with no hindrance to the pure Way of enlightening beings. 
“Though great enlightening beings be in home life and work at various occupations, they never for a moment give up the will for omniscience; that is, whether they are dressing, eating, taking medicine, washing, looking around, walking, standing still, sitting, reclining, speaking, thinking, asleep or awake, whatever they are doing their minds always dedicate it to the path of omniscience. They concentrate and contemplate unremittingly, because they want to aid all sentient beings and settle them in enlightenment; with immeasurable great vows they embody countless great roots of goodness, diligently cultivating virtues to save everyone. They forever divorce arrogance and indulgence and proceed surely toward the state of omniscience, never conceiving any intention of turning to another path. 
Always contemplating the enlightenment of all Buddhas, they forever abandon all impure ways. Cultivating practice of what all enlightening beings learn, they encounter no obstruction on the path of omniscience and stand on the ground of knowledge. They are devoted to recitation and learning, and collect roots of goodness by means of immeasurable knowledge. Their minds have no affection for any mundane realm, nor are they obsessed with what they practice. 
‘I should cause these creatures to leave the realm of animality, to be helped and comforted and ultimately be liberated, having forever crossed over the ocean of suffering, eternally annihilating painful sensations, forever removing suffering physical and mental elements, eternally cutting off painful feeling, accumulation of pain, painful actions, the causes of pain, the root of suffering, and painful situations. 
May these sentient beings all be able to leave these behind.’ Thus do enlightening beings focus their thoughts on all sentient beings; with their roots of goodness in the forefront, they dedicate them to knowledge of ways of liberation for all beings. 
“When enlightening beings first engender the determination for enlightenment, they include all sentient beings, cultivating the foundations of goodness and dedicating them to causing all sentient beings to leave the plain of birth and death forever, to attain the unhindered bliss of the enlightened, emerge from the ocean of afflictions, practice the path of the Buddha teachings, to fill everywhere with kindness, to have vast powers of compassion, cause all to attain pure bliss, preserve foundations of goodness, draw near to the qualities of Buddhahood, leave the realms of demons and enter the realm of Buddhas, to cut off the seeds of mundanity and plant the seeds of enlightenment, to abide in the truth which is equal in all times. “Enlightening beings dedicate all the roots of goodness they have collected, will collect, and are collecting in this way, and form this thought: 
‘As the Buddhas and enlightening beings of the past have practiced—respectfully serving all enlightened ones, liberating sentient beings so that they be forever emancipated, diligently cultivating and practicing all roots of goodness and dedicating them all without attachment, without depending on form, without attachment to sensation, without erroneous conceptions, without creating fixed patterns, without grasping consciousness, detached from the senses, not dwelling on things of the world, delighting in transcendence, knowing that all things are empty as space, come from nowhere, are unborn and not perishing, and have no true reality; having no attachments, they avoided all discriminatory views, were imperturbable and unaffected by anything, never lost awareness or calm, abiding in reality without form, detached from all appearances, all being one; thus they entered deeply into the nature of all things, always happily practiced all-sided virtues, and saw the congregation of all Buddhas—just as all those enlightened ones of the past dedicated roots of goodness in this way, I, too, should practice dedication in this way, understand these principles, actualize these principles, and, based on these principles determine to learn and act, not violating the specifics of the teachings, knowing that what is practiced is like illusions, like shadows, like the moon’s image in the water, like reflections in a mirror, manifested by the combination of causes and conditions, proceeding thus up to the ultimate stage of enlightenment.’ “Great enlightening beings also form this thought: 
‘Just as the Buddhas of the past, when cultivating enlightening practice, dedicated roots of goodness in this way, and so do and will the Buddhas of the present and future, so too should I arouse my will and dedicate roots of goodness like those Buddhas—with foremost dedication, excellent dedication, supreme dedication, superior dedication, unexcelled dedication, peerless dedication, unequalled dedication, incomparable dedication, honorable dedication, sublime dedication, impartial dedication, straightforward dedication, virtuous dedication, far-reaching dedication, good dedication, pure dedication, dedication free from evil, dedication not going wrong.’ “Once enlightening beings have dedicated roots of goodness in this way, they accomplish pure action of body, speech, and mind, and abide in the abode of enlightening beings without any faults. Practicing good works, they get rid of evils of action and speech. 
Their minds are without flaw or defilement; they cultivate omniscience, abide in an immeasurably broad mind, and know all phenomena create nothing. They abide in transmundane states and are not influenced by things of the world. They analyze and comprehend innumerable actions and fully develop skill in means of dedication, extirpating the root of grasping and attachment forever. 
This is the great enlightening beings’ third dedication, dedication equal to all Buddhas. 
“When great enlightening beings abide in this dedication, they enter deeply into the acts of all the enlightened ones, proceed toward the supremely wonderful qualities of the enlightened, enter into the profound realm of pure knowledge, do not depart from the works of enlightening beings, are able to distinguish skillful, subtle means of liberation, enter the profound realm of truth, know well the process of practice of enlightening beings, enter the family of the Buddhas, and with skill in means analyze and comprehend all things. 
Though they appear physically, born in the world, yet their minds have no attachment to things of the world.” Then the enlightening being Diamond Banner, spiritually empowered by the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said in verse, Those great enlightening beings Practice the ways of dedication of past Buddhas, And also cultivate the practices Of all the Guides of future and present. 
They attain peace and ease in all realms, Praised by all the enlightened ones; Their expansive light and pure eyes They dedicate all to the great Brilliant Sages. 
Blissful are the bodies of enlightening beings, And so are all their senses; Such immeasurable, supremely wonderful bliss They all dedicate to the Supreme. 
All the good ways in the world And those the Buddhas have accomplished, All they foster, excepting none, Whereby they joyfully benefit the living. Their joys in the world are infinite: 
These they dedicate to sentient beings, Vowing to cause them all to be filled With the bliss of the Human Lion. 
The various raptures known and perceived By the Buddhas of all lands They vow to foster in sentient beings And become great lamps lighting the world. 
The supremely refined pleasure of enlightening beings They dedicate to all sentient beings: Though they are dedicated to the benefit of the living, Yet they have no attachment to dedication. 
Enlightening beings, practicing this dedication, Produce a mind of infinite compassion; The virtues of dedication practiced by the Buddhas They vow to cultivate and fulfill the same way. 
The subtle bliss of the vehicle of omniscience Such as attained by the Supreme, As well as the infinite bliss of enlightening practice Carried out while they’re in the world, The bliss of peace while appearing to be in the world, The bliss of tranquility, always guarding the senses, All they dedicate to sentient beings To cause all to develop unexcelled knowledge. 
Their work is not physical, verbal, or mental, Yet doesn’t exist apart from this; They just destroy ignorance by expedient means And thus develop supreme knowledge. 
The deeds practiced by enlightening beings Build up immeasurable excellent virtues; Following the Enlightened, born in the family of Buddhas, Dispassionate and calm, they dedicate aright. 
They take care of all beings there are In all worlds of the ten directions, Dedicating all roots of goodness to them, Vowing to fill them with the bliss of peace. 
They do not seek benefit for themselves; They want to cause all to be at ease. They have never entertained arbitrary conceptions: They only observe all things to be empty and selfless. 
To all the true children of Buddhas Seen by the innumerable Supreme Ones in the ten directions They dedicate all roots of goodness, Vowing to hasten their ultimate enlightenment. 
The conscious creatures in all worlds They embrace impartially, without exception; With the good works they do themselves They cause those beings to soon become Buddhas. 
The countless, boundless great vows Expounded by the unexcelled Guides Vow that all Buddha-children become pure And fulfill all their aspirations. 
Observing all worlds in the ten directions, Donating all their virtues to them, They vow to cause them all to be wonderfully adorned: Thus do enlightening beings practice dedication. 
Their minds do not weigh dualistic things; They only constantly realize the nonduality of things. In all things, whether dual or nondual, They ultimately have no attachments. 
All the worlds in the ten directions Are sentient beings’ conceptualizations; Not apprehending anything in conception or nonconception, Thus are conceptions understood. 
The enlightening beings’ bodies are purified, So their minds are pure, without blemish: Their speech being already pure and faultless, Know that their minds are pure, without attachment. 
Single-mindedly they think of the past Buddhas And also of the Guides of the future, As well as the Honored Ones of the present: They study the teachings they all expound. 
All enlightened ones of past, present, and future Have clear penetrating knowledge, their minds unobstructed; Because they want to help sentient beings They dedicate myriad works to enlightenment. 
Those of foremost wisdom, vast wisdom, Wisdom free from falsehood, without delusion, Impartial, true wisdom, pure wisdom, And supreme wisdom, explain this way. 
“What is the great enlightening beings’ dedication reaching all places? 
Here when the enlightening beings cultivate all roots of goodness, they think, ‘May the power of virtue of these roots of good reach all places, just as reality extends everywhere without exception, reaching all things, all worlds, all living beings, all lands, all phenomena, all space, all time, all that is compounded and uncompounded, all speech and sound; may these roots of goodness in the same way reach the abodes of all enlightened ones, and be as offerings to all those Buddhas, the past Buddhas whose vows are all fulfilled, the future Buddhas, fully adorned, and the present Buddhas, their lands, sites of enlightenment, and congregations, filling all realms throughout the entirety of space. 
I aspire, by virtue of the power of faith, by virtue of great knowledge without obstruction, by virtue of dedication of all roots of goodness, to present offerings like those of the celestials, filling infinite worlds.’ “Great enlightening beings also form this thought: 
‘The Buddhas pervade all realms in space, the worlds of all the unspeakably many world systems in the ten directions produced by various actions—unspeakably many buddha-lands, buddha-spheres, all kinds of worlds, infinite worlds, worlds without boundaries, rotating worlds, sideways worlds, worlds facing upward and downward—in all worlds, such as these, they manifest a span of life and display various spiritual powers and demonstrations. 
There are enlightening beings there who by the power of resolution appear as Buddhas in all worlds for the sake of sentient beings who can be taught; with the knowledge of where all paths lead, they reveal everywhere the boundless freedom and spiritual power of the enlightened, the body of reality extending everywhere without distinction, equally entering all realms of phenomena and principles, the body of inherent buddhahood neither born nor perishing, yet by skillful expedients appearing throughout the world, because of realizing the true nature of things, transcending all, because of attainment of nonregressing power, because of birth among the people of vast power of unobstructed vision of the enlightened.’ “Great enlightening beings, by all the roots of goodness that they plant, vow to make offerings to all such Buddhas, with myriad beautiful flowers, myriad wonderful incenses, garlands, parasols, banners, pennants, clothing, lamps, and all other articles of adornment, and to do the same to effigies, tombs, and shrines of Buddhas. 
Their roots of goodness they dedicate in this way, with unconfused dedication, single-minded dedication, autonomous dedication, respectful dedication, unshakable dedication, nonobsessive dedication, independent dedication, dedication without the mentality of worldly people, dedication without haste or struggle, dedication with a tranquil mind. 
“They also think, ‘Throughout the space of the cosmos, in all ages, past, future, and present, the Buddhas, the World Honored Ones, attain omniscience and become enlightened; with innumerable different names, at various times, they manifest attainment of true awakening, all abiding for a span of life, throughout the future, each adorning themselves with the adornments of the realm of reality, their sites of enlightenment and congregations pervading the cosmos; in all lands they appear according to the time and perform the work of buddhahood. 
To all these Buddhas I dedicate roots of goodness; I vow to offer respectfully countless canopies of fragrance, banners of fragrance, pennants of fragrance, drapes of fragrance, nets of fragrance, statues of fragrance, lights of fragrance, flames of fragrance, clouds of fragrance, thrones of fragrance, parks of fragrance, shelters of fragrance, worlds of fragrance, mountains of fragrance, seas of fragrance, rivers of fragrance, trees of fragrance, robes of fragrance, lotus blossoms of fragrance, palaces of fragrance, flowers of fragrance; infinite canopies of flowers, and so on, up to infinite palaces of flowers; boundless canopies of garlands, and so on, up to boundless palaces of garlands; incomparably many canopies of powdered incense, and so on, up to incomparably many palaces of powdered incense; uncountable canopies of perfume, and so on, up to uncountable palaces of perfume; incalculable canopies of raiment, and so on, up to incalculable palaces of raiment; inconceivable numbers of canopies of jewels, and so on, up to inconceivable numbers of palaces of jewels; immeasurable numbers of canopies of lamps, and so on, up to immeasurable numbers of palaces of lamps; unspeakable numbers of canopies of ornaments, and so on, up to unspeakable numbers of palaces of ornaments; unspeakably unspeakable numbers of canopies, banners, pennants, drapes, nets, statues, lights, flames, clouds, seats, parks, shelters, lands, mountains, seas, rivers, trees, robes, lotus blossoms, and palaces, all made of jewel crystals, all unspeakably unspeakable in number: 
in each of these objects are countless balustrades, palaces, bowers, doors, crescents, defensive barriers, windows, pure jewels, and ornaments—all such offerings I present to those Buddhas, aspiring to cause all worlds to become purified and all sentient beings to attain emancipation, abide in the stage of the ten powers and attain unhindered understanding of truth; to cause all sentient beings to be fully endowed with bases of goodness, to gain complete self-mastery, to have minds as infinite as space, going to all fields without going anywhere, entering all lands, passing on good ways, always able to see Buddhas, planting roots of goodness, accomplishing the great vehicle, not clinging to anything, replete with virtue, establishing innumerable practices, entering into all the boundless realms of reality, developing the spiritual faculties of the Buddhas, and attaining the omniscient knowledge of the enlightened ones. 
Just as selflessness includes all things, so also may my roots of goodness include all the Buddhas by making offerings to them all; include all truths by understanding them without hindrance; include all enlightening beings by ultimately having the same roots of goodness; include all practices of enlightening beings by fulfillment through the power of my original vows; include all enlightening beings’ understandings of things by comprehending all things without obstruction; include all the great spiritual powers of the Buddhas by perfecting innumerable roots of goodness; include all the powers and fearlessnesses of the Buddhas by developing immeasurable will and fulfilling them all; include all the enlightening beings’ methods of meditation, powers of elucidation, and concentration formulae by being able to illumine and comprehend nonduality; include the Buddhas’ skill in means by manifesting the great spiritual powers of the enlightened; include all the past, present, and future Buddhas’ birth in the world, attainment of enlightenment, turning the wheel of true teaching, taming sentient beings, and entering final decease, by respectfully presenting offerings to all of them everywhere; include all worlds of the ten directions by adorning and purifying buddha-lands to the ultimate degree; include all ages by appearing therein and cultivating enlightening practice unceasingly; include all realms of being by appearing to be born therein; include all realms of sentient beings by fulfilling the practice of the Universally Good enlightening being; include all delusive habit energy by using appropriate means to clean it all away; include the innumerable differences in faculties of sentient beings by knowing them all; include the understandings and inclinations of all sentient beings by causing them to get rid of confusion and defilement and attain purity; include all activities that edify sentient beings by appearing in forms appropriate to their needs; include all ways of adaptively responding to sentient beings by entering into all realms of sentient beings; and include the essence of knowledge of all enlightened ones by preserving the teachings of the Buddhas.’ “When great enlightening beings dedicate roots of goodness in this way, they use the absence of object of attainment as a means: 
they do not distinguish consequences in actions, they do not distinguish actions in consequences; though they have no discrimination, they enter all realms of phenomena and principles; though they have no striving, yet they always abide in roots of goodness; though they initiate nothing, yet they diligently practice excellent principles. 
They do not believe in things, yet can enter deeply into them; they do not consider things as existent, yet they know and see them all. Creation and noncreation are both ungraspable. 
They know that by nature all things are never independent. Though they see all things, yet they are not seeing anything; they know everything without knowing anything. 
“Thus do enlightening beings comprehend the objective world, knowing that all things are based on causes and conditions. They see the reality-body of all Buddhas and arrive at the untainted ultimate reality of all things. They understand all worlds are like magical apparitions. 
They clearly realize that sentient beings are only one phenomenon and do not have two natures. 
They do not give up the realm of action: with skill in expedient means they show the uncreated in the midst of the realm of compounded things, without destroying the characteristics of compounded things; they show compounded things in the midst of the realm of the uncompounded, without distinguishing marks of the uncompounded. 
Thus enlightening beings always observe all things as ultimately null and void. They develop all pure roots of goodness and arouse the will to save and protect sentient beings. 
Their knowledge clearly realizes the ocean of all truths. They always gladly cultivate practice to get rid of ignorance and folly. 
They have already fully accomplished transmundane virtues, and they no longer practice worldly ways. 
They have attained the pure eye of knowledge, stripped of the blinders of ignorance, and with skill in means they practice the path of dedication. 
“Great enlightening beings, dedicating roots of goodness in this way, accord with the will of all the Buddhas, beautify and purify all buddha-lands, teach, edify, and mature all sentient beings, fully accept and maintain all principles of the Buddhas, become supreme fields of blessings for all sentient beings, become wise guides for all caravans, become pure suns for all worlds. 
Each of their roots of goodness fills the cosmos, able to rescue and safeguard all sentient beings and cause them to be filled with pure virtuous qualities. 
“When the great enlightening beings practice dedication in this way, they are able to preserve the lineage of all Buddhas, to develop all sentient beings to maturity, to beautify and purify all lands, to avoid spoiling all works, to thoroughly understand all things, to impartially observe the nonduality of all things, to go to all lands in the ten directions, to comprehend the ultimate reality apart from desire, to achieve pure faith, and to have clear, sharp faculties. 
“This is great enlightening beings’ fourth dedication, dedication reaching all places. 
When great enlightening beings abide in this dedication, they achieve physical action reaching all places, being able to appear responsively in all worlds; they achieve verbal action reaching all places, expounding the truth in all places; they achieve mental action reaching all places, accepting and holding the truth explained by all Buddhas; they attain the power of psychic travel reaching everywhere, going in response to beings’ minds; they attain recollective and explanatory powers reaching all places, able to please beings according to their mentalities; they gain entry into the realm of reality reaching all places, able to enter all worlds in a single pore; they attain entry into bodies reaching all places, able to enter the bodies of all beings in the body of one being; they attain universal perception of the ages reaching all places, in each age always seeing all the Buddhas; they attain instantaneous universal perception reaching all places, moment to moment seeing all the Buddhas appear before them. 
When great enlightening beings attain dedication reaching all places, they are able to dedicate roots of goodness in this way.” Then the enlightening being Diamond Banner, empowered by the Buddhas, looked over the ten directions and said, To all internal and external worlds Enlightening beings have no attachments at all, Yet do not abandon works beneficial to sentient beings: The great ones cultivate this kind of knowledge. 
In all lands in the ten directions They do not depend or dwell on anything; They do not grasp things, such as livelihood, And do not arbitrarily create distinctions. 
They deal with all sentient beings In all worlds in the ten directions; Observing their essential nature has no existence, They practice dedication reaching everywhere. 
Dealing with all compounded and uncompounded things, They do not entertain errant thoughts about them, Or in regard to anything in the world: The Lamps that Illumine the World are aware in this way. 
The works carried out by enlightening beings Are different in superior, middling, and lower grades; In all of them they dedicate roots of goodness To all the Buddhas of the ten directions. 
Enlightening beings, by dedication, reach transcendence, Accomplishing what they learn from the Buddhas; They always think well based on subtle knowledge And embody the best of human qualities. 
Their pure roots of goodness they universally dedicate To help the deluded, never abandoning them: They enable all sentient beings to become Unexcelled lamps that illumine the world. 
They never conceptualize sentient beings Nor think of things with false imagination; Though in the world, they have no attachments, Yet also do not abandon conscious creatures. 
Enlightening beings always enjoy tranquil nullity By following which they attain the realm of nirvana; Yet they do not abandon the realm of sentient beings: They have attained such subtle knowledge. Enlightening beings do not conceptualize actions And do not grasp their results: 
All worlds are born from conditions— Things cannot be seen apart from causality. 
Deeply entering such realms, They do not create vain discriminations therein: The tamers of all sentient beings Herein understand skilled dedication. 
“What is great enlightening beings’ dedication of inexhaustible treasuries of virtue? 
Here they dedicate the roots of goodness produced by repentance and removal of hindrances caused by past actions, the roots of goodness produced by paying respect to all Buddhas, the roots of goodness produced by requesting all Buddhas to teach, the roots of goodness produced by listening to Buddhas’ teaching, diligently practicing it, and realizing the vast realm of the inconceivable, the roots of goodness produced by rejoicing at the virtues of all Buddhas and all sentient beings of the past, future, and present, the roots of goodness of all Buddhas, the roots of goodness achieved by the dilligent practice of infinite enlightening beings, the roots of goodness produced by enlightening beings knowing of and rejoicing in the Buddhas of all times attaining true enlightenment, teaching the truth, and taming sentient beings, the roots of goodness in rejoicing at the Buddhas of all times cultivating enlightening practice from their first inspiration, attaining supreme true awakening, finally appearing to enter ultimate extinction, and, after their extinction, the true teaching remaining in the world until passing away; thus enlightening beings think of the inexplicable realm of the Buddhas as well as their own realm and the unhindered realm of enlightenment—such tremendous, innumerable different roots of goodness, all they accumulate, all they believe in, all they rejoice in, all they fulfill, all they accomplish, all they practice, all they attain, all they are aware of, all they embody, all they develop, they dedicate to adorn all the buddha-lands, like the realm of action of all the Buddhas in all worlds in boundless eons of the past—that is, incalculable, innumerable systems of buddha-worlds, known to the knowledge of Buddhas, perceived by enlightening beings, sensed by the great mind, issuing from and drawn forth by pure actions adorning buddha-fields, arising in response to sentient beings, created by the sublime practices of the enlightening being Universally Good, in which all the Buddhas become enlightened and manifest various autonomous spiritual powers—and like the purely adorned buddha-lands which will be attained upon enlightenment by the Buddhas throughout the future, pervading the cosmos, boundless, borderless, endless, infinite, all born of the knowledge of the Buddhas, adorned by innumerable beautiful treasures—ornaments of all fragrances, all flowers, all raiment, all treasuries of worthy qualities, all powers of Buddhas, and the embellishments of all buddha-lands; the capitals of the enlightened ones, inhabited by inconceivable pure communities of people with existing affinity through similar practices who will attain true enlightenment in the future, developed by all the Buddhas, imperceptible to the world, visible only to the pure eyes of enlightening beings. 
These enlightening beings have great powers and have planted roots of goodness in the past; knowing all things are like phantoms and illusions, they cultivate the pure deeds of enlightening beings, entering absorption in inconceivable freedom, and with skill in means can perform the work of Buddhas, emanate the light of Buddhas and illumine the world everywhere without limit. 
All the Buddhas of the present also adorn worlds in this way, with boundless forms, lights, and colors, all made by virtues: 
innumerable fragrances, innumerable jewels, innumerable trees, innumerable ornaments, innumerable palaces, innumerable sounds, associates in accord with affinities from the past, manifesting adornments of all worthy qualities, without end—adornments of all fragrances, garlands, powdered incenses, jewels, pennants, multicolored streamers of precious silk, balustrades of jewels, countless ornaments of gold nets, rivers, clouds and rain, and music, innumerable such embellishments adorning the buddha-lands in all worlds throughout space, created by various deeds, known to the Buddhas and told of by the Buddhas: 
that is, buddha-lands of adornments, buddha-lands of purity, buddha-lands of equanimity, buddha-lands of subtle refinements, buddha-lands of magnificent virtue, buddha-lands of immensity, buddha-lands of peace and bliss, buddha-lands of indestructibility, buddha-lands of inexhaustibility, buddha-lands of infinity, buddha-lands of imperturbability, buddha-lands of fearlessness, buddha-lands of light, buddha-lands free from opposition, buddha-lands of delight, buddha-lands of all-illumining brightness, buddha-lands of splendor, buddha-lands of refined beauty, buddha-lands of wonderful skill, preeminent, excellent, extraordinary, supreme, absolutely supreme, surpassing, unexcelled, peerless, incomparable, indescribable buddha-lands. 
To emulate these adornments of all the buddha-lands of past, future, and present, the great enlightening beings willingly dedicate their own roots of goodness to adorn a world in the same way, with the pure adornments of the lands of all Buddhas of past, future, and present, to produce, purify, gather, manifest, array, and maintain all adornments like those of the lands of all Buddhas, and to do the same for all worlds throughout the space of the cosmos, that they be replete with the various adornments of the lands of the Buddhas of all times. 
“Great enlightening beings also dedicate roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all the buddha-lands I cultivate be filled with great enlightening beings who are truly genuine, with comprehensive knowledge, able to distinguish all worlds and sentient beings, to enter deeply into the realm of reality as well as the realm of space, who cast off folly and perfect the recollection of the Buddhas, recollection of the truth of the teaching, recollection of the infinity of the community, omnipresent everywhere, and who also remember equanimity, their sun of truth full and round, their light of knowledge illumining everywhere, seeing without obstruction, born from nonacquisition, producing all aspects of Buddhahood, possessed of myriad supreme roots of goodness, engendering the determination of unexcelled enlightenment, abiding in the powers of Buddhas, heading for omniscience, destroying the works of demons, purifying the realm of sentient beings, entering deeply into the essential nature of things, forever getting rid of delusion, bringing all roots of goodness and great vows to fruition—may such enlightening beings fill those lands, born in such places, having such virtues, always performing the work of buddhahood, attaining the pure light of complete enlightenment, possessed of knowledge of the realm of reality, manifesting the power of spiritual faculties, filling all realms with one body, attaining great knowledge and wisdom, entering the sphere of omniscience, able to distinguish infinite, boundless expressions and meanings of realms of phenomena and principles, having no attachments in any land, yet able to appear in all buddha-lands, their minds like space, not relying on anything, yet able to distinguish all realms of phenomena and principles, able to enter and emerge from inconceivable profound concentrations, intent on omniscience, dwelling in the buddha-fields, attaining the power of buddhahood, expounding countless truths without fear, conforming to the roots of goodness of Buddhas of all times, totally illumining the cosmos of truth of all enlightened ones, able to accept and hold all Buddhas’ teachings, knowing countless ways of speaking, able to enunciate inconceivably many different sounds, entering the unsurpassed stage of freedom of the Buddhas, traveling throughout all worlds in the ten directions without hindrance, practicing noncontention and nonreliance, not falsely discriminating anything, cultivating, practicing, and enlarging the determination for enlightenment, attaining knowledge of skill in means, of expression and meanings, able to explain and expound them step-by-step. 
I vow to cause such enlightening beings to adorn those lands, distributed throughout, living in peace and accord, well cultivated, extremely well cultivated, pure, extremely pure, calm and serene. 
May there be, in each and every region of one buddha-land infinitely many such great enlightening beings filling it, and may all buddha-lands throughout space, throughout the cosmos, all be filled with great enlightening beings in the same way.’ “Great enlightening beings expediently dedicate all roots of goodness to all buddha-lands, to all enlightening beings, to all Buddhas, to the enlightenment of all Buddhas, to all great vows, to all essential ways of emancipation, to purifying all realms of sentient beings, to always seeing the Buddhas appear in all worlds, to always seeing the life of the enlightened ones as infinite, and to always seeing the Buddhas pervading the cosmos turning the unimpeded, nonregressing wheel of teaching. 
“When great enlightening beings dedicate roots of goodness in this way, because they enter all buddha-lands, all buddha-lands are purified; because they reach all realms of sentient beings, all enlightening beings are purified; because they will the appearance of Buddhas in all buddha-lands, in all buddha-lands in all universes the embodiments of the enlightened transcendentally manifest. 
“By means of such peerless dedication great enlightening beings proceed toward omniscience, their minds broad and vast as space, without any limitations; entering inconceivability, they know all actions and the resulting consequences are null, so their minds are always equanimous. 
Having no bounds, they are able to enter all realms of reality. “When great enlightening beings practice dedication in this way, they do not conceive of self or possessions, do not conceive of Buddha or Buddha teaching, do not conceive of lands or adornment, do not conceive of sentient beings or civilization, do not conceive of action or results of action; they do not cling to thought or what is produced by thought, they do not deny cause and effect, they do not grasp things, they do not grasp principles, they do not say birth and death has mentation, they do not say nirvana is eternal tranquility, they do not say the enlightened realize buddhahood—there is not the slightest thing that coexists with reality. 
“When great enlightening beings practice dedication in this way, they give all roots of goodness over to sentient beings, to assure their development of maturation, teaching and edifying them impartially, without mental images, without objectification, without assessment, without falsehood, avoiding all vain discrimination and conceptual clinging. 
“Once great enlightening beings have made this dedication, they attain inexhaustible roots of goodness: 
that is, they attain inexhaustible roots of goodness because they keep all enlightening beings in mind; they attain inexhaustible roots of goodness because they purify the buddha-lands; they attain inexhaustible roots of goodness because they purify all realms of sentient beings; they attain inexhaustible roots of goodness because they delve deeply into the realm of reality; they attain inexhaustible roots of goodness because they cultivate immeasurable minds equal to the realm of space; they attain inexhaustible roots of goodness because they profoundly understand the realm of all Buddhas; they attain inexhaustible roots of goodness because they diligently cultivate the work of enlightening beings; they attain inexhaustible roots of goodness because they comprehend the past, present, and future. 
“When great enlightening beings dedicate all roots of goodness in this way, they understand that all realms of sentient beings have no sentient beings; they understand that all things have no life; they know that all things have no creator; they realize all things have no personality; they comprehend that all things have no conflict; they see that all things come from conditions and have no abode; they know all things have no basis; they know all lands have no location; they observe that enlightening beings’ practices also have no locus; they see that all objects have no existence. 
“When great enlightening beings practice such dedication, their eyes ultimately never see impure buddha-lands, nor do they see sentient beings of differing characteristics; there is not the slightest thing entered by knowledge, nor the slightest knowledge entering things. 
They understand the body of the Enlightened is not like empty space, because it is perfected by all virtues and infinite sublime qualities, and because in all places it causes sentient beings to accumulate a sufficiency of roots of goodness. 
“These great enlightening beings moment to moment attain unspeakably unspeakable numbers of stages of the ten powers, are filled with all virtues, fully develop pure roots of goodness, and are fields of blessings for all sentient beings. 
These great enlightening beings develop treasuries of virtues like wish-fulfilling jewels, obtaining all comforts as needed, able to adorn all lands wherever they go, purifying untold numbers of sentient beings wherever they go, because of embracing virtue, cultivating and mastering the practices. 
“When great enlightening beings practice dedication in this way, they cultivate the practices of all enlightening beings, their virtues are extraordinary, their appearance is incomparable, their spiritual force and radiance surpass all worldlings, so that demons and demonic people cannot look upon them. 
Their roots of goodness are complete, their great vows are accomplished, their minds ever broadening, equal to the omniscient. In a single moment of attention they can pervade innumerable buddha-lands. 
The power of their knowledge is immeasurable, and they have arrived at the sphere of all Buddhas. 
They have profound faith in all Buddhas, and abide in boundless knowledge, the power of their will for enlightenment as vast as the cosmos, as ultimate as space. 
“When great enlightening beings abide in this dedication, they attain ten inexhaustible treasuries: 
they attain an inexhaustible treasury of seeing Buddhas, because in a single pore they see countless Buddhas appearing in the world; they attain an inexhaustible treasury of entry into truth, because by the power of Buddha-knowledge they see all things in one truth; they attain an inexhaustible treasury of memory, because they retain the teachings expounded by all Buddhas without forgetting any; they attain an inexhaustible treasury of certain wisdom, because they know the secret techniques in the teachings expounded by all Buddhas; they attain an inexhaustible treasury of understanding meaning and intent, because they know the distinctions of principles of the teachings; they attain an inexhaustible treasury of boundless realization, because they comprehend all things of all times by means of spacelike knowledge; they attain an inexhaustible treasury of felicitous virtues, because they satisfy the wishes of all sentient beings without end; they attain an inexhaustible treasury of intrepid knowledge and awareness, because they are able to remove and destroy all sentient beings’ blinders of ignorance and folly; they attain an inexhaustible treasury of definitive powers of elucidation, because they expound the impartial teaching of all Buddhas so that all sentient beings understand; they attain an inexhaustible treasury of the ten powers and four fearlessnesses, because they fulfill all practices of enlightening beings, wrap their heads in the turban of nondefilement, and arrive at an unobstructed omniscience. 
When great enlightening beings dedicate all roots of goodness, they attain these ten inexhaustible treasuries.” Then the enlightening being Diamond Banner looked over the ten directions and said in verse, Enlightening beings perfect profound mental power, Attaining mastery of all the teachings; The blessings of their petitions and appreciation They dedicate by unimpeded means. 
The enlightened ones of past, present, and future Beautify buddha-lands throughout the cosmos: Enlightening beings, fulfilling all virtues, Dedicate them to purify lands the same way. 
The teachings of Buddhas of all times Enlightening beings ponder carefully, Taking them all into their minds, Thereby adorning the buddha-lands. 
Be the virtues of all buddha-lands extolled Throughout all eons of past, present, and future, The eons of all time may be exhausted But the virtues of buddha-lands have no end. 
All such buddha-lands Do enlightening beings see: Therewith is adorned one buddha-land And all buddha-lands, this way. 
There are Buddha-children whose minds are pure, All born by transformation from the enlightening teaching, With all virtues adorning their minds, Who fill all buddha-lands. 
Those enlightening beings all are endowed With bodies adorned with infinite signs of greatness; With powers of clarification their teaching fills the world, Inexhaustible as the ocean. 
Enlightening beings sojourn in many concentrations And have fulfilled all necessary practices; Their minds are pure beyond compare And their light illumines all worlds. 
Thus are all buddha-lands Filled with such enlightening beings: They’ve never thought of the listeners’ vehicle Or sought the individual illuminates’ way. 
Thus are enlightening beings pure of heart, Dedicating virtues to all living beings, Wanting to cause all to become truly enlightened And fully know the Buddha’s truths. 
All demons and enemies in the ten directions The enlightening beings’ awesome power subdues; Their intrepid knowledge and wisdom are invincible As they practice with certainty the ultimate way. 
Due to enlightening beings’ great will power Their dedications cannot be hindered; They enter the inexhaustible treasury of virtue Which is forever endless, throughout all time. 
Enlightening beings observe all conditioned things And understand their nature is not independent; Thus knowing the nature of things is like this They don’t wrongly grasp acts or results. 
There are no things with form, nor formless things; Nor are there concepts of being or nonbeing; Existence and nonexistence—neither exist; They realize all are ungraspable. 
All things are born of causes and conditions— Their essential nature is neither existent or nonexistent; And in causes and conditions, what they produce They ultimately have no attachments at all. 
Of what all sentient beings say They ultimately don’t grasp anything; They know names and signs are all mentation And clearly understand things are identityless. 
As the nature of sentient beings is fundamentally null, So do they know all things are null; All things in past, present, and future, Lands and deeds—all are equal. Such knowledge do they dedicate, Virtous action born according to their understanding: 
The signs of these virtues too they understand thus, That there’s nothing to grasp therein. 
Thus their mind of dedication’s unsullied; Never calculating the nature of things, Comprehending their nature is not a nature, They do not dwell in the world yet do not leave it. 
The good works which they do They dedicate to all living beings, Not failing to realize their true nature, Abandoning discrimination. 
All the false views there are They abandon entirely; Free from inflaming afflictions, always cool, They abide in the unobstructed state of liberation. Enlightening beings do not destroy anything Or annihilate the nature of things: 
They understand all things are like echoes And have no attachment to them at all. 
They know all sentient beings of all times Come from combinations of causes and conditions: They also know their inclinations and habits And never annihilate anything. 
They realize the nature of actions is not action And yet do not contradict the characteristics of things, And they do not destroy the results of deeds, But explain the nature of things as conditional. 
They understand sentient beings have no birth And there are no sentient beings to transmigrate: There are no real sentient beings to speak to, But according to conventional norms they provisionally teach. 
“What is great enlightening beings’ dedication causing all roots of goodness to endure? 
Here the enlightening beings may be rulers of great nations, their virtue extending to all, their fame shaking the world; their enemies all submit to them, and their commands are all based on correct principles. They hold a single canopy that gives shade to all quarters, and travel everywhere as leaders of the land, unobstructed wherever they turn, tying on the turban of nondefilement. They are sovereign masters of the law, and all who see them submit. They do not torture or punish people, yet all obey, moved by their virtue. 
“Enlightening beings, abiding in such sovereign virtues, have a great retinue; they cannot be undermined, they are rid of all faults. 
No one ever tires of seeing them; adorned with felicitous virtues, their marks of greatness and embellishments are fully developed. Their bodies and limbs are well proportioned, and they have robust, healthy, ideal human bodies. 
Their great strength is consummate and they cannot be constrained or overcome by anyone. 
They attain pure action and are free from all barriers caused by actions. “They fully practice all giving; sometimes they give food and drink, sometimes they give delicacies, sometimes they give conveyances, or clothing, or flower garlands, or incenses and perfumes, beds, seats, houses, lamps, medicines, precious vessels, jeweled carriages, trained elephants and horses, all magnificently adorned—they give all these gladly. If any come and ask for their throne, or canopies or parasols, banners, pennants, treasures, or other adornments, or the jeweled crowns on their heads, or the radiant jewels in their topknots, or even the rank of ruler itself, they begrudge nothing. 
If they see sentient beings in prison, they give up their treasures, their spouses, children, retinue, and even their own bodies, to rescue them and free them. 
If they see prisoners about to be executed, they give up their bodies in exchange for those prisoners’ lives. 
Then again, if they see anyone come begging from them, begging for even their flesh or hair, they gladly give them ungrudgingly; their eyes, ears, noses, tongues, teeth, heads, hands, feet, blood, flesh, bones, marrow, internal organs, skin, fingers, toes, and nails, all they give with a joyful heart. 
“In their quest for teachings they have never heard they would hurl themselves into pits of fire. In order to preserve the true teaching of the Buddhas they would endure all kinds of pain. 
If they see sentient beings physically harming others, they kindly rescue them and cause them to give up wrongdoing. 
“If they see Buddhas attain supreme enlightenment, they praise them, causing everyone to hear and know of them. 
They may donate land and provide for and attend to them. 
They may give their own bodies to those who ask, or they may give them to the Buddhas. 
Because of their quest for the truth they are extremely joyful; they provide service and support for sentient beings. They might give up their kingship, their cities, towns, villages, palaces, gardens and groves, spouses, children, and retinues, fulfilling all requests. Sometimes they give away all necessities of life to establish great assemblies of giving, from which none are prohibited, and provide for the needs of all the sentient beings who come—all kinds of fields of blessings—whether they come from afar or nearby, whether they are intelligent or stupid, no matter what they look like, whether they are male or female, whether human or nonhuman, their mental patterns different, their requirements each different; the enlightening give to all to satisfy everyone. “When enlightening beings give in this way, they develop a mind of good control, with which they practice dedication: 
controlling the body well, controlling sensation, conception, action, and consciousness well, controlling sovereignty well, controlling followers well, controlling means of subsistence well, controlling generous giving well, they accordingly cause all roots of goodness to be firm and enduring. 
“Whatever great enlightening beings give, their charity being boundless, they dedicate those roots of goodness in this way: when they give fine food to sentient beings, their minds are pure and have no covetousness or attachment to what they give, nor do they begrudge anything; they practice giving fully, praying that all sentient beings gain the food of knowledge and wisdom, their minds unobstructed, comprehending the nature of food and having no greed or attachment, only enjoying the food of truth and the food of emancipation, filled with knowledge and wisdom, firmly abiding by the truth, embodying roots of goodness, with the body of reality and the body of knowledge traveling in purity; taking pity on sentient beings, to be fields of blessing they appear to take solid food. This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of good roots when they give food. “When great enlightening beings give something to drink, they dedicate these roots of goodness in this way: 
This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when they give things to drink. 
“Great enlightening beings give various flavors—pungent, sour, salty, bland, as well as sweet, various flavors, rich, able to cause the body’s elements to be settled and harmonious, the skin and body well developed, the energy strong, the heart clear and pure and always joyful; not causing vomiting when eaten, making the senses clear and sharp, the internal organs fully developed and impervious to poison and disease, without distress, forever attaining comfort. 
‘May all sentient beings gain the supreme flavor of ambrosia; may all sentient beings obtain the flavor of the knowledge of truth, and comprehend the function of all flavors; may all sentient beings obtain the flavor of infinite truths, know the realm of reality, and abide at peace in the great citadel of truth in ultimate reality; may all sentient beings produce great clouds of teachings throughout the cosmos, shower the rain of truth everywhere, teach, edify, and civilize all sentient beings; may all sentient beings gain the flavor of supreme knowledge, that the unexcelled joy of truth fill their minds and bodies; may all sentient beings obtain all the excellent flavors of nonattachment, and not be addicted to mundane tastes, but always diligently cultivate and practice all aspects of buddhahood; may all sentient beings gain the flavor of one truth and realize that all Buddha teachings are without difference; may all sentient beings gain the flavor of supreme victory and ride on omniscience, never turning back; may all sentient beings gain the flavor of entry into the truth of the nondifference of all Buddhas, and be able to distinguish all faculties; may all sentient beings attain increase of the savor of the teaching and always be able to fulfill the Buddhas’ teaching of nonobstruction.’ This is the great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving flavorings, to cause all sentient beings to cultivate virtue and all be fully endowed with the body of unobstructed knowledge. 
“When great enlightening beings give conveyances, they dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: ‘May all sentient beings gain the vehicle of complete omniscience, and ride in the Great Vehicle, the indestructible vehicle, the supreme vehicle, the highest vehicle, the swift vehicle, the vehicle of great power, the vehicle replete with virtue, the vehicle leaving mundanity, the vehicle that produces the innumerable enlightening beings.’ This is the great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving conveyances. 
“When great enlightening beings give clothing, they dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: ‘May all sentient beings gain the raiment of shame and conscience wherewith to cover their bodies; may they give up the erroneous practice of heretics who expose their bodies; may their color be lustrous and their skin fine and soft; may they attain the foremost bliss of the Buddhas, and attain the most pure comprehensive knowledge of ways of liberation.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving clothing. 
“Great enlightening beings are constantly giving out various fine flowers—flowers of subtle fragrance, flowers of various colors, innumerable extraordinary flowers, beautiful flowers, delightful flowers, flowers of all seasons, celestial flowers, flowers of the human world, highly prized flowers, extremely fragrant and delightful flowers—innumerable such fine flowers they offer to living Buddhas and to the shrines of extinct Buddhas, to those who expound the teaching, to mendicants, to all enlightening beings, to good teachers, to Buddhist disciples, to self-enlightened ones, to parents, relatives, even themselves, as well as to all the poor and destitute. 
When they give, they dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings attain the flowers of concentration of the Buddhas, able to cause all the teachings to bloom; may all sentient beings become as pleasing and endlessly delightful to all they meet, as the Buddhas are; may all sentient beings be satisfied by what they see, and be free from disturbance and agitation; may all sentient beings fully carry out far-reaching pure works; may all sentient beings always remember good associates, their minds unchanging; may all sentient beings be like all-curing medicine, able to remove the toxins of all afflictions; may all sentient beings fulfill great vows and all get to be rulers of unexcelled knowledge; may all sentient beings, with the light of the sun of knowledge and wisdom, destroy the darkness of ignorance and folly; may all sentient beings’ pure moon of enlightenment wax full; may all sentient beings enter the land of great treasures, meet true knowers, and fully develop all roots of goodness.’ This is the great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving flowers, to cause sentient beings to all attain pure, unobstructed knowledge. 
“When great enlightening beings give garlands, they dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: ‘May all sentient beings be a pleasure for all people to behold, so that all who see them admire them, all who see them feel friendly toward them, all who see them like them, all who see them look up to them, all who see them are relieved of anxiety, all who see them become joyful, all who see them give up evil, all who see them may always approach the Buddhas, and all who see them are purified and attain omniscience.’ This is the great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving garlands. 
“When great enlightening beings give incense, they dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: ‘May all sentient beings be filled with the fragrance of morality, and attain to the standards of not being heedless, not being impure, not being defiled, having nothing to regret, becoming free from bondage, being unfrenzied, nontransgression, nonextremism, emancipation from the world, and the transcendent ways of enlightening beings. May all sentient beings, by these precepts, all accomplish the body of morality of all Buddhas.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving incense, in order to cause sentient beings all to be able to complete the body of unobstructed morality. 
“When great enlightening beings give perfumes, they dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: ‘May all sentient beings be perfumed with the fragrance of generosity, able to give whatever they have. 
May all sentient beings be perfumed with the fragrance of morality, attaining the ultimately pure morality of the enlightened. 
May all sentient beings be perfumed with the fragrance of tolerance, giving up all harmful intentions. 
May all sentient beings be perfumed with the fragrance of energy, always wearing the armor of heroic effort of the great vehicle. 
May all sentient beings be perfumed with the fragrance of concentration, abiding peacefully in the concentration in which the Buddhas appear to them. 
May all sentient beings be perfumed with the fragrance of wisdom, in a single moment becoming sovereigns of unexcelled knowledge. 
May all sentient beings be perfumed with the fragrance of truth, attaining fearlessness in the highest teaching. 
May all sentient beings be perfumed with the fragrance of virtue, developing all knowledge of great merit and virtue. 
May all sentient beings be perfumed with the fragrance of enlightenment, attain the ten powers of buddhahood, and reach the other shore. 
May all sentient beings be perfumed with the sublime fragrance of pure ways and forever annihilate all bad qualities.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving perfumes. “When great enlightening beings give couches, they dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings obtain celestial couches and realize great knowledge and wisdom; may all sentient beings obtain the couch of sages, give up the mentality of ordinary men and abide in the aspiration for enlightenment; may all sentient beings obtain the couch of peace and happiness, forever parting from all the pains and afflictions of birth and death; may all sentient beings obtain the couch of the ultimate and get to see the autonomous spiritual powers of the Buddhas; may all sentient beings obtain the couch of equanimity, and always cultivate all good ways; may all sentient beings obtain the couch of supremacy and fulfill pure action which has no peer in the world; may all sentient beings obtain the couch of tranquility, realize the truth and reach ultimate reality; may all sentient beings obtain the couch of purity, and cultivate the Buddha’s sphere of pure knowledge; may all sentient beings obtain the couch of security and have the constant protection of good teachers; may all sentient beings obtain the couch of lions and lie on their right sides the way Buddhas do.’ This is the great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving couches. 
“When great enlightening beings give rooms and shelters, they dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings gain peaceful residence in pure buddha-lands and diligently cultivate all virtues, abide peacefully in the realm of profound concentration and give up all attachment to dwelling places, realize all dwelling places have no existence, detach from all worlds, abide in omniscience, take in the abodes of all Buddhas, live in the abode of peace and comfort of the ultimate path, always rest on supremely pure roots of goodness, and never leave the unexcelled abode of the Buddhas.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving shelters, because they wish to benefit all sentient beings and think of how to help them out according to their needs. 
“When great enlightening beings give places to live, they dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: ‘May all sentient beings obtain what is really good for them, that their minds be happy and at peace; may all sentient beings live according to the Buddha, according to great knowledge, according to good teachers, according to what is most worthy of respect, according to good actions, according to great kindness, according to great compassion, according to the six ways of transcendence, according to the great determination for enlightenment, and according to the path of all enlightening beings.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving places to live, because they want to cause everyone’s virtue, ultimate state, knowledge, path, principles, morality, aspirations, faith, vows, and all qualities of spiritual faculties, to be pure. 
“When great enlightening beings give lamps—butter lamps, oil lamps, jewel lamps, crystal lamps, lacquer lamps, fire lamps, aloe lamps, sandalwood lamps, lamps of all fragrances, lamps with lights of infinite colors—when they give innumerable such lamps, in order to benefit all sentient beings, to include all sentient beings, they dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings attain infinite light and illumine the true teachings of all Buddhas; may all sentient beings attain pure light, and clearly perceive the most subtle and minute forms in the world; may all sentient beings attain unclouded light, and realize that the realms of sentient beings are empty, without existence; may all sentient beings attain boundless light, so their bodies emit subtle radiance illumining everything; may all sentient beings attain all-illuminating light, and their minds never retreat from the teachings of the Buddhas; may all sentient beings attain the pure light of Buddhas, appearing in all lands; may all sentient beings attain unobstructed light, one light illumining everything in the cosmos; may all sentient beings attain uninterrupted light, illuminating the buddha-lands, the light unbroken; may all sentient beings attain the light of the banner of knowledge, illumining the world; may all sentient beings attain light of infinite colors, shining on all fields and manifesting spiritual powers.’ Thus enlightening beings, when they give lamps, wishing to benefit all sentient beings, to give peace and happiness to all sentient beings, follow all sentient beings by these roots of goodness, embrace all sentient beings by these roots of goodness, distribute to all sentient beings these roots of goodness, treat all sentient beings kindly by these roots of goodness, satisfy all sentient beings by these roots of goodness, take care of all sentient beings by these roots of goodness, rescue all sentient beings by these roots of goodness, focus their minds on sentient beings by these roots of goodness, equally benefit all sentient beings by these roots of goodness, and observe all sentient beings by these roots of goodness. 
This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving lamps. They dedicate thus without hindrance, causing sentient beings to dwell on roots of goodness. “When enlightening beings give medicines, they dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings attain ultimate emancipation from all shrouds and bonds; may all sentient beings forever be rid of the body of sickness and attain the body of the enlightened; may all sentient beings become great medicines themselves, annihilating the sickness of all that is not good; may all sentient beings perfect the medicine that relieves all illness and abide securely in the enlightening beings’ stage of nonregression; may all sentient beings develop the medicines of enlightenment and be able to extract the poison arrows of all afflictions; may all sentient beings draw near to worthies and sages, annihilate afflictions, and cultivate pure practices; may all sentient beings become great physicians, forever eliminating all illnesses and not letting them recur; may all sentient beings be indestructible trees of medicine, able to cure all sentient beings; may all sentient beings attain the light of omniscience and remove the myriad arrows of sickness; may all sentient beings know how to formulate worldly medicines, to cure the illnesses there.’ When great enlightening beings give medicines, they dedicate the roots of goodness in this way to cause all sentient beings to be forever free from sicknesses, to be ultimately at ease, to be ultimately pure, to be free from illusion like the Buddha, to remove the arrows of all sicknesses, to attain an inexhaustible, healthy body, to attain an indestructible body, to attain a strong body, to attain the complete comfort of Buddhahood, which cannot be taken away, and to attain the independent, strong body of all Buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings are able to generously give all kinds of vessels—gold vessels filled with jewels, silver vessels filled with jewels, lapis lazuli vessels filled with various precious substances, glass vessels filled with innumerable jewel ornaments, mother-of-pearl vessels filled with red pearls, agate vessels filled with coral, white jade vessels filled with myriad delicacies, sandalwood vessels filled with celestial raiment, diamond vessels filled with myriad sublime fragrances—countless precious vessels of all kinds, filled with innumerable various treasures; they give them to Buddhas, because they believe the Buddhas’ field of blessings is inconceivable; they give to enlightening beings, because they know that wise teachers are hard to find; they give to holy mendicants, to cause the Buddha teachings to remain in the world; they give to disciples of Buddhas and to individual illuminates, because they have pure faith in the sages; they give to their parents, out of respect; they give to their teachers and predecessors, that they may always teach, to induce the cultivation of virtues in accord with the injunctions of the sages; they give to the lowly, poor, and destitute, because they regard all sentient beings equally with the loving eye of great benevolence and compassion; they give out of devotion to fulfillment of the transcendent generosity of all enlightening beings of past, present, and future; they give everything to everyone, because they never reject sentient beings. 
When they give in this way, they have no attachment to the gift or the receiver. 
“When great enlightening beings give various precious vessels filled with innumerable precious things like this, they dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings become vessels equal to the boundless receptacle of space, with vast recollective power able to absorb and retain all worldly and transmundane scriptures, without forgetting anything; may all sentient beings become vessels of purity, able to understand the extremely profound true teaching of the Buddhas; may all sentient beings become vessels of unexcelled jewels, able to receive and hold the teachings of Buddhas of all times; may all sentient beings become vast vessels of teaching of the enlightened, with indestructible faith taking in the methods of enlightenment of the Buddhas of all times; may all sentient beings become vessels adorned by supreme treasures, abiding in the most powerful will for enlightenment; may all sentient beings become vessels which are receptacles of virtue, developing pure faith in the infinite knowledge and wisdom of the enlightened; may all sentient beings become the vessel of approach and entry into omniscience and ultimately attain the unhindered liberation of the enlightened; may all sentient beings become vessels of enlightening practices throughout the future, able to cause sentient beings to all abide securely in the power of omniscience; may all sentient beings become vessels of the supreme qualities of the family of Buddhas of all times, able to receive and retain what is said by the Buddhas in their sublime voices; may all sentient beings become vessels containing the congregations and enlightenment scenes of all Buddhas of all worlds throughout the space of the cosmos, becoming great human beings, leaders in praising the Buddhas and requesting them to turn the wheel of true teaching.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving vessels, because they want to cause all sentient beings to be able to complete the vessel of the practice and vows of the Universally Good enlightening being. 
“Great enlightening beings give various chariots, adorned with jewels, to the Buddhas, to enlightening beings, teachers, worthy companions, disciples of Buddhas and individual illuminates, and innumerable various such fields of blessings, including the poor and destitute. 
Of these people, some come from afar, some come from nearby; some come because they have heard of the enlightening beings, some come because of affinities with the enlightening beings, some come because they have heard of the vow of generosity which the enlightening beings made in the past, some come at the request of the enlightening beings themselves. 
At such a time, the enlightening beings may give jeweled chariots or gold chariots, all beautifully adorned, covered with nets of chimes, with precious streamers trailing; they may give chariots of the finest lapis lazuli, decorated with countless rareties; they may give silver chariots, covered with golden nets, drawn by swift horses; they may give chariots adorned with countless mixed jewels, covered with jewel nets, drawn by elephants; they may give sandalwood chariots, with wheels of sublime jewels, canopies of mixed jewels, with lion seats of jewels set out in fine arrays with a hundred thousand girls sitting in rows thereon, the carts driven by a hundred thousand strong men; or they may give chariots of clear crystal, decorated with mixtures of gems, filled with beautiful women, covered with jeweled curtains, with banners and pennants on the sides; they may give chariots of stores of agate, embellished with all precious substances, perfumed with various fragrances, adorned with all kinds of beautiful flowers, with a hundred thousand girls holding jewel ornaments, the carts pulled by steeds equally well-trained, able to travel over dangerous places with ease; or they may give chariots of solid perfume, with wheels of precious substances, with massive, beautiful adornments, covered with jeweled drapes, trailing jewelled nets, the insides spread with various precious robes, emitting fine, pure, pleasing fragrances, attended by countless celestials as they move along, providing all kinds of precious substances from time to time; they may present chariots of luminous jewels, the beautiful hues of the various jewels thoroughly translucent, covered with nets of many wonderful jewels, with ornaments of mixed jewels hanging down on all sides, sprinkled with powdered incense, fragrant and clean inside and out, with charming men and women riding on them. 
“When great enlightening beings present such chariots of myriad beautiful gems to Buddhas, they dedicate the roots of goodness thus: 
‘May all sentient beings be able to make offerings to the highest field of blessings, give to Buddhas with deep faith, and attain infinite rewards; may all sentient beings turn their whole minds to the Buddha, and always meet infinite pure fields of blessings; may all sentient beings begrudge nothing to the Buddhas, and fully perfect the mind of great relinquishment; may all sentient beings practice giving to the Buddhas, give up the aspirations of the two lesser vehicles, and attain the unobstructed liberation and omniscient knowledge of the Buddhas; may all sentient beings practice endless giving to the Buddhas and enter the knowledge and wisdom of Buddhas, with infinite virtues; may all sentient beings enter the supreme knowledge of Buddhas and be able to become sovereigns of pure, unexcelled knowledge; may all sentient beings attain the Buddhas’ spiritual faculty of reaching everywhere without obstruction, and go wherever they wish freely; may all sentient beings enter deeply into the Great Vehicle, attain immeasurable knowledge, and be stabilized therein, imperturbable; may all sentient beings be able to bring forth ways to omniscience and become supreme fields of blessings for humans and celestials; may all sentient beings have no antagonism toward the Buddhas, diligently plant roots of goodness, and happily seek enlightened knowledge; may all sentient beings spontaneously be able to go to all buddha-fields, going throughout the cosmos in a single instant, without tiring; may all sentient beings attain the free spiritual faculties of enlightening beings, distribute their bodies throughout space, approach and make offerings to all Buddhas; may all sentient beings attain the incomparable body, going everywhere in the ten directions, without wearying; may all sentient beings attain a vast body flying swiftly wherever they want to go, never flagging; may all sentient beings attain the ultimate power of freedom of all Buddhas, in a single instant manifesting the Buddhas’ spiritual powers and mystic displays throughout space; may all sentient beings cultivate peaceful, blissful practice, following the path of all enlightening beings; may all sentient beings attain speed in action, and consummate the knowledge and spiritual abilities of the ten powers; may all sentient beings enter all lands in the cosmos, annulling the boundaries so they are equal and without distinction; may all sentient beings carry out the practice of universal goodness and wisdom, never retreating, reach the other shore, and attain omniscience; may all sentient beings climb into the vehicle of peerless knowledge and, following the nature of things, see the truth as it really is.’ This is the great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when presenting precious chariots to all Buddhas of the present or to the memorial shrines of Buddhas after they have passed away; this is to cause sentient beings to gain the unobstructed vehicle of ultimate emancipation of the enlightened. 
“When great enlightening beings give precious chariots to good teachers such as enlightening beings, they dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings always remember the teachings of the wise and concentrate diligently on preserving them so they may not be lost; may all sentient beings share the same benefits as good teachers, all-inclusive, and have the same roots of goodness; may all sentient beings draw near to good teachers, respect and provide for them, giving up all they have to please them; may all sentient beings develop good aspirations and follow good associates, never leaving them; may all sentient beings always get to meet good teachers, wholeheartedly attend to them, and not oppose their instructions; may all sentient beings like good teachers and never reject them, so there is no alienation, no mixup, and no error; may all sentient beings be able to give themselves to good teachers, following their instructions without opposition; may all sentient beings be accepted by good teachers, cultivate great compassion, and depart from all evils; may all sentient beings follow good teachers and listen to the truths spoken by the Buddhas; may all sentient beings have the same roots of goodness as the teachers, with pure results of action, and practice the same vows as the enlightening beings, ultimately accomplishing the ten powers; may all sentient beings be able to accept and apply the methods of good teachers, and reach the realms of all concentrations, knowledge, wisdom, and spiritual powers; may all sentient beings be able to accept and hold all right teachings, put them into practice, and reach the other shore; may all sentient beings ride in the Great Vehicle, without any hindrance or obstruction, and ultimately complete the path of omniscience; may all sentient beings manage to climb into the vehicle of all knowledge and reach the abode of peace, without ever turning back; may all sentient beings know how to act according to reality, and attain the ultimate of all the Buddha-teachings they hear, never forgetting; may all sentient beings be accepted by the Buddhas and attain unhindered knowledge of ultimate truth; may all sentient beings attain autonomous spiritual powers which never fade away, and be able to go wherever they want to in a single thought; may all sentient beings come and go freely, widely teaching and guiding, causing others to abide in the Great Vehicle; may all sentient beings’ acts be fruitful, borne by the vehicle of knowledge to the stage of the ultimate; may all sentient beings gain the vehicle of nonobstruction and reach all places by unimpeded knowledge.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving various chariots and cars to good teachers; it is to cause sentient beings to be filled with virtues equal to the Buddhas and enlightening beings. 
“When great enlightening beings give precious chariots to mendicants, they engender the will to practice all giving, the will to comprehend thoroughly by knowledge, the will to purify virtuous qualities, the mind which accords with relinquishment, the thought that true Buddhist mendicants are hard to meet, a mind of deep faith in the religious community, and the will to uphold right teaching. 
They abide in supreme aspiration, to an unprecedented degree. 
They hold great assemblies of giving, producing immeasurably great merit, with profound faith in the Buddha’s teaching which cannot be undermined. 
They dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings enter comprehensively into the Buddha-teachings and keep them in mind; may all sentient beings leave the state of ordinary ignorant people and enter the realm of sages; may all sentient beings quickly enter the ranks of the sages and be able to use the Buddha-teachings to awaken and guide step-by-step; may all sentient beings be respected and trusted by all the world; may all sentient beings enter into the equality of all things and know that the inherent nature of things is nondual; may all sentient beings be born from the realm of enlightened knowledge and be surrounded by docile harmonious people; may all sentient beings abide by the methods for removing defilement, getting rid of the stains of all afflictions; may all sentient beings be able to form a supreme religious community, leave the state of ordinary people and enter the congregation of worthies and sages; may all sentient beings diligently practice good principles, attain unhindered knowledge, and be endowed with sagelike qualities; may all sentient beings attain wisdom, not be attached to the past, present, or future, and be free as kings among the masses; may all sentient beings ride the vehicle of knowledge and wisdom and turn the wheel of right teaching; may all sentient beings be endowed with spiritual faculties and be able to go to innumerable worlds in a single thought; may all sentient beings ride the body of space, their knowledge unobstructed in any world; may all sentient beings enter all congregations of Buddhas throughout cosmic space, and accomplish the foremost practices of transcendence; may all sentient beings attain physical lightness and comfort and extraordinary knowledge and wisdom, and be able to enter all buddha-fields; may all sentient beings attain unbounded skillful power of psychic travel, manifesting their bodies in all lands; may all sentient beings attain a body which relies on nothing at all, appearing everywhere like a reflection, by spiritual faculties; may all sentient beings attain inconceivable autonomous spiritual powers, whereby they appear before those who may be taught, to edify and civilize them; may all sentient beings attain unhindered means of entry into the reality realm, in a single thought traveling throughout all lands in the ten directions.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving precious chariots to mendicants; it is to cause sentient beings to all ride the vehicle of pure, unsurpassed knowledge, and in all worlds turn the unobstructed wheel of knowledge of truth. 
“When great enlightening beings give precious chariots to Buddhist disciples and individual illuminates, they engender these frames of mind: consciousness of fields of blessings; honor and respect; consciousness of oceans of virtues; consciousness of ability to produce virtue and wisdom; consciousness of birth from the power of the virtues of the enlightened; consciousness of myriad eons of cultivation; consciousness of ability to cultivate enlightening practices over innumberable eons; consciousness of escape from the bondage of all delusion; consciousness of destruction of all demons; consciousness of the light of wisdom illumining the unexcelled truth. 
The roots of goodness in this giving of chariots they dedicate in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings be supreme fields of blessings, believed in by the world, fulfilling unexcelled transcendent generosity; may all sentient beings give up useless talk, always enjoy solitude, and have no second thoughts; may all sentient beings become most excellent pure fields of blessings, taking in all sentient beings and inducing them to cultivate acts which produce felicity; may all sentient beings become fonts of wisdom and be able to bestow on living beings immeasurable, innumerable rewards of roots of goodness; may all sentient beings persist in unhindered action, fully developing a pure, excellent field of blessings; may all sentient beings abide in non-contention, realizing that all things do nothing and have essencelessness for their essence; may all sentient beings always get to be near the supreme field of blessings, fully cultivating immeasurable virtues; may all sentient beings be able to manifest immeasurable spiritual powers and include all conscious beings in a pure field of blessings; may all sentient beings be endowed with a field of blessings of inexhaustible virtues, able to bestow on beings the ten powers of the enlightened, the fruit of the foremost vehicle; may all sentient beings become fruitful, genuine fields of blessings, and develop the inexhaustible collection of blessings of all knowledge; may all sentient beings attain the way to extinguish wrongdoing, and be able to receive and hold the expressions and meanings of Buddhas’ teachings which they have never heard; may all sentient beings always diligently listen to and absorb all Buddha-teachings, and understand everything they hear, so that it is not in vain; may all sentient beings hear the principles of the Buddhas, comprehend their ultimate import, and be able to expound them according to what they have learned; may all sentient beings believe and practice the instructions of the enlightened, and forever give up all the false views of erroneous philosophies; may all sentient beings always see worthies and sages and develop all the most excellent foundations of goodness; may all sentient beings always trust people who act wisely, and associate with and respect the sages; may all sentient beings, hearing the names of Buddhas, not let it go to waste, but all get to see with their eyes those they have heard of; may all sentient beings analyze and know well the right doctrines of the Buddhas, and be able to protect those who hold the Buddha-teaching; may all sentient beings always enjoy listening to all Buddha-teachings, absorb and hold them, read and recite them, expound upon them, illumine them, and comprehend them; may all sentient beings believe and understand the true virtues of the Buddha’s teachings, and give whatever they have in respectful offerings.’ This is the dedication of roots of goodness of great enlightening beings when giving various chariots and cars to disciples of Buddhas or individual illuminates, to cause all sentient beings to attain fulfillment of pure, supreme knowledge and spiritual powers, to cultivate practice diligently, and attain omniscience, power, and fearlessness. 
“When great enlightening beings give precious chariots to fields of blessings including the poor, the destitute, and the orphaned, they joyfully and tirelessly give whatever is needed, and even apologize to those people, ‘I should have gone to offer you provisions, rather than trouble you to come so far and wear yourself out.’ Then they bow and kneel before them, ask about their health, and give them whatever they need. 
Sometimes they give crystal chariots with the finest women in the land; sometimes they give gilded chariots with women prized in society; sometimes they give lapis lazuli chariots with dancing girls; sometimes they give chariots of various extraordinary jewels with maidens like goddesses; sometimes they give chariots adorned with innumerable jewels, with bejewelled women, gentle and bright, eloquent and intelligent; sometimes they give sandalwood chariots to ride; sometimes they give crystal chariots with bejewelled women in them, incomparably beautiful, dressed in sumptuous robes, a delight to all who see; sometimes they give agate chariots, with crown princes riding in them; sometimes they give chariots of aromatic resins with all their sons and daughters in them; sometimes they give chariots adorned with all precious substances, with their relatives and good friends, so hard to give up, riding in them. 
“Great enlightening beings respectfully give innumerable such precious chariots when they are asked for, to satisfy all wishes and make people happy and content. 
They dedicate these roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings ride the universal vehicle, which rolls unimpeded and never turns back, to reach inconceivable trees of enlightenment; may all sentient beings ride the vehicle of knowledge of the great teaching, based on pure causes, and cultivate enlightening practice throughout the future, never turning back; may all sentient beings ride the vehicle of the nonexistence of all things, forever part from all conceptual clinging, and always practice the path of omniscience; may all sentient beings ride the vehicle of truthfulness and honesty, without flattery or deception, and go to all buddha-fields freely, without hindrance; may all sentient beings follow and abide by the vehicle of omniscience, pleasing each other with the principles of buddhahood; may all sentient beings all ride the vehicle of pure practices of enlightening beings and fulfill all the ways of emancipation and the bliss of concentration of enlightening beings; may all sentient beings ride a vehicle of four wheels—that is, living in a good land, staying with good people, building up excellent virtues, and making great vows—hereby fulfilling the pure religious practice of all enlightening beings; may all sentient beings obtain the vehicle of the light of truth illumining everywhere throughout the ten directions, and cultivate the power of knowledge of all enlightened ones; may all sentient beings ride the vehicle of Buddha-teaching, and arrive at the other shore of all things; may all sentient beings ride the vehicle of the inconceivable teaching of myriad felicitous virtues, and show the right path of peace and serenity throughout the ten directions; may all sentient beings ride the vehicle of great generosity, sloughing off the dirt of stinginess; may all sentient beings ride the vehicle of pure morality, maintaining pure precepts as boundless as the cosmos; may all sentient beings ride the vehicle of forbearance, and always be free of the pollution of anger toward sentient beings; may all sentient beings ride the nonregressing vehicle of great diligence, steadfastly cultivate excellent practices, and proceed on the path of enlightenment; may all sentient beings ride the vehicle of meditation concentration, quickly reach the site of enlightenment, and realize enlightened knowledge; may all sentient beings ride the vehicle of wisdom and skill in means, and emanate bodies filling the realms of the Buddhas in all universes; may all sentient beings ride the vehicle of mastery of the teaching, develop fearlessness, and constantly distribute to all people teachings of methods to attain omniscience; may all sentient beings ride the vehicle of knowledge without attachment and be able to enter everywhere in the ten directions into the real nature of things, and not be disturbed by anything; may all sentient beings ride the vehicle of the teachings of all Buddhas, appearing to be born in all lands throughout the ten directions, without losing the path of the Great Vehicle; may all sentient beings ride the vehicle of the supreme treasury of omniscience, and fulfill the practices and vows of the Universally Good enlightening being, without growing weary of it.’ This is the great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving precious chariots to fields of blessings, including the poor and the orphaned, to cause sentient beings to have immeasurable knowledge, to be joyful and buoyant, and to all ultimately attain the vehicle of universal knowledge. 
“Great enlightening beings give prize elephants, which are docile, physically complete and in their prime years, with six tusks, pure and clean, lotuslike mouths red in color, bodies pure white, like mountains of snow; they are ornamented with golden banners, covered with nets of jewels, with various exquisite gems adorning their trunks; all find endless delight in looking at them; they can walk thousands of miles without tiring. 
Also, enlightening beings give trained prize horses with all the characteristics of celestial steeds, with moonlike discs of exquisite jewels as luminous ornaments, covered with nets of gold bells, stepping evenly and straight so that the riders are comfortable, going wherever wished as fast as the wind, traveling freely and unimpeded throughout the four continents. 
Enlightening beings give these prize elephants and horses to their parents, teachers, and to poor, suffering beings; their hearts are broad and without regret or grudge, only increasing in joy and feeling more and more compassion and pity as they cultivate the virtues of enlightening beings and purify the enlightening mind. 
They dedicate these roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings abide in the vehicle of harmony and docility and increase in all the virtuous qualities characteristic of enlightening beings; may all sentient beings attain the vehicle of liberative skills and be able to produce all enlightening teachings as necessary; may all sentient beings obtain the vehicle of resolute faith, universally illumining the power of unhindered knowledge of the enlightened; may all sentient beings attain the vehicle of inspiration, and be able to conceive all great vows; may all sentient beings fulfill the impartial vehicle of the ways of transcendence, and completely fulfill all impartial roots of goodness; may all sentient beings perfect the vehicle of treasures, bearing the unexcelled treasure of knowledge of all verities of Buddhahood; may all sentient beings perfect the vehicle of adornment by the practices of enlightening beings, causing the flowers of the meditations of enlightening beings to bloom; may all sentient beings obtain the vehicle of unbounded swiftness, purifying the enlightening mind and earnestly contemplating for countless eons, comprehending all things; may all sentient beings perfect the great vehicle of supreme self-mastery, with skill in means fulfilling the stages of enlightening beings; may all sentient beings perfect the highest, broadest, sturdiest Great Vehicle, able to carry all sentient beings to the state of all-knowledge.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving elephants and horses, to cause sentient beings to all ride the vehicle of unobstructed knowledge, the vehicle to perfect completion and arrival at Buddhahood. 
“When great enlightening beings give seats or lion thrones to sit on, those seats are high and wide and extremely beautiful, with lapis lazuli legs, spread with soft, supple raiment made of gold thread, arrayed with jeweled banners, perfumed with various delicate fragrances, decorated with ornaments of innumerable various jewels, covered overhead with golden nets and jewel chimes rustling in the breeze and producing exquisite sounds, magnificently embellished all around with adornments of myriad unusual designs, looked up to by all people, occupied only by crowned monarchs proclaiming the law respectfully followed by all states. Those monarchs are also adorned with beautiful jewels—luminous jewels, sapphires, giant sapphires, jewel crystals from the finest mines, bright and clear as the sun, pure and cool as the moon; surrounding in profusion, like myriad stars, are ornaments of supreme beauty, incomparable jewels of the sea, solid banner-like treasures of the sea, with extraordinary patterns and unusual appearances; their heads are crowned with turbans of finest gold and pure jewels, they receive the rank of coronation, reign over the continent Jambu, endowed with immeasurable charismatic power, making kindness principal, conquering all those who are hostile and inimical, obeyed wherever their commands reach. 
Great enlightening beings, becoming such monarchs, then give such jewel-adorned thrones to Buddhas, the foremost fields of blessings, and to enlightening beings, genuine teachers, wise and holy mendicants, preachers of the teaching, parents, relatives, Buddhist disciples and individual illuminates, as well as those setting out on the vehicle of enlightening beings, and also to monuments of Buddhas, and to all the poor and destitute, the orphaned and homeless—they give everything according to need. 
These roots of goodness they dedicate in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings sit on the seat of enlightenment and thoroughly awaken to the truth realized by all Buddhas; may all sentient beings sit on the seat of freedom and attain independence of things, which even diamond mountains could not break, and be able to smash and conquer all the hordes of delusions; may all sentient beings gain the Buddha’s lion throne of freedom, looked up to by all beings; may all sentient beings obtain chairs adorned with unspeakably unspeakable numbers of various exquisite jewels, become masters of the teachings, and guide sentient beings; may all sentient beings attain the throne which is supreme in all worlds, adorned by extensive great foundations of goodness; may all sentient beings obtain seats which pervade unspeakably unspeakable numbers of worlds, such as could not be fully eulogized in immeasurable eons; may all sentient beings obtain the seat of profound mystic virtues, and their bodies fill all universes; may all sentient beings obtain seats of inconceivable numbers of all kinds of jewels, and extensively carry out the giving of teaching to whatever sentient beings are considered in their past vows; may all sentient beings obtain seats of refined subtlety and manifest the spiritual powers of untold Buddhas; may all sentient beings obtain seats of all jewels, of all incenses, of all flowers, of all robes, of all garlands, of all crystals, and so on—seats of inconceivably many various precious things, seats of innumerable worlds, pure seats of the adornments of all worlds, seats of all diamonds, and manifest the powers and freedom of Buddhas, and fulfill most perfect enlightenment.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving seats of precious things, to cause sentient beings to obtain the seat of great enlightenment beyond the world and spontaneously become aware of the truths realized by all Buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings give various precious canopies, these canopies extraordinary, used by nobles, adorned with various great jewels, most excellent among billions of fine canopies, with supports made of all precious substances, covered with fine meshes, with golden bells on jeweled strings hanging down all around and draped with crystal necklaces making elegant sounds in harmony with the stirring of the breeze, all decorated with treasuries of pearls and jades, filled with innumerable various rareties, scented with sandalwood and aloe, fully embellished with infinite precious substances like radiantly pure gold: 
such canopies they give with pure hearts to Buddhas, or to monuments of Buddhas after their extinction, or, for the sake of the teaching, they give them to enlightening beings, good teachers, famous ministers of the teaching; or they give them to parents, or to mendicants, or to all the Buddhist teachings, or to various sentient beings as fields of blessings, or to religious leaders or venerable adepts, or those who have just set their minds on enlightenment, and to all the poor, destitute, orphaned, and homeless—to all who seek, they give. 
These roots of goodness they dedicate in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings cultivate foundations of goodness whereby to cover their bodies, and always be protected by the Buddhas; may all sentient beings make virtue and wisdom their canopies and forever part from all the afflictions of the world; may all sentient beings shade themselves with virtues and get rid of the dust and dirt and searing afflictions of the world; may all sentient beings attain a treasury of knowledge and wisdom, causing everyone to always enjoy seeing them; may all sentient beings shade themselves with the pure way of dispassionate tranquility, and all attain the indestructible state of Buddhahood; may all sentient beings shield their bodies with good and ultimately attain the pure body of reality of the Buddhas; may all sentient beings become universal canopies and cover the whole world with the knowledge of the ten powers; may all sentient beings attain sublime wisdom, transcending the world, free from attachments; may all sentient beings gain the canopy of worthiness, become superlative fields of blessings, and receive all offerings; may all sentient beings obtain the supreme canopy, attain unsurpassed knowledge, and naturally realize enlightenment.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving canopies, umbrellas, and parasols, to cause all sentient beings to obtain the canopy of freedom and be able to uphold all good ways; to cause all sentient beings to be able to cover all fields and lands in all realms in space, and manifest the free spiritual powers of the Buddhas, without regressing; to cause all sentient beings to be able to adorn all worlds in the ten directions with one canopy, and offer it to the Buddha; to cause all sentient beings to offer beautiful banners, pennants, and jeweled canopies to all the enlightened ones; to cause all sentient beings to obtain a canopy of universal adornment and cover the lands of all the Buddhas; may all sentient beings obtain a vast canopy to cover sentient beings everywhere and cause them all to engender faith in the Buddha; to cause all sentient beings to offer innumerable canopies of wonderful precious adornments to one Buddha, and to do the same for innumerable Buddhas; to cause all sentient beings to attain the high, wide canopy of the enlightenment of Buddhas, covering all the enlightened ones; to cause all sentient beings to obtain canopies adorned with all jewels, canopies adorned with all jewelry, canopies adorned with all solid perfumes, canopies with pure adornments of various jewels, canopies with pure adornments of innumerable jewels, immense canopies with adornments of pure jewels, covered with jewel nets, hung with jewel bells waving in the breeze producing sublime sounds, covering the bodies of the Buddhas in all worlds in the space of the cosmos; to cause all sentient beings to obtain canopies adorned with unhindered, unimpeded knowledge, covering all the enlightened ones; also because they want to cause all sentient beings to attain the highest knowledge and wisdom; and because they want to cause all sentient beings to attain the adornment of the virtues of buddhahood; because they want to cause all sentient beings to attain the immeasurable, boundless treasures of the free mind; because they want to cause all sentient beings to be filled with the independent knowledge of all truths; because they want to cause all sentient beings to cover all with virtues; because they want to cause all sentient beings to perfect the canopy of supreme knowledge; because they want to cause all sentient beings to perfect the all-covering canopy of the ten powers; because they want to cause all sentient beings to be able to cover all buddha-fields in the cosmos; because they want to cause all sentient beings to be masters of all the enlightening teachings; because they want to cause all sentient beings to attain the free mind of great mystic power; because they want to cause all sentient beings to attain vast knowledge permanently; because they want to cause all sentient beings to attain immeasurable ultimate virtues, covering all; because they want to cause all sentient beings to cover their minds with virtuous qualities; because they want to cause all sentient beings to shield all living creatures with an impartial mind; because they want to cause all sentient beings to attain skillful means of dedication; because they want to cause all sentient beings to attain pure minds of supreme aspiration; because they want to cause all sentient beings to attain pure wills with good intentions; and because they want to cause all sentient beings to attain great dedication covering all living beings. 
“Great enlightening beings may give various splendid banners and pennants, their poles made of various jewels, pennants made of precious silk, banners of various mixed colors and patterns, draped with jeweled nets, shining colors filling everywhere, jewel bells gently stirring, ringing in harmony, with rare jewels shaped like the half moon and gold more radiant than the sun placed atop each banner, decorated with various wonderful things caused to appear by results of actions in various worlds—such marvelous banners and pennants, uncountable millions of billions of them, their radiance joining and highlighting each other, the light pure, covering the ground, filling all buddha-lands in the realms in space in ten directions, the great enlightening beings, with pure-hearted faith give to Buddhas currently existing, or to their monuments after death, or to the treasury of the teaching, or to the religious community, or to enlightening beings, or to Buddhist disciples, or to self-enlightened beings, or to good teachers, or to Buddhist disciples, or to self-enlightened ones, or to the masses, or to particular people—to all who come seeking they give, and dedicate these roots of goodness in this way; ‘May all sentient beings be able to set up banners of virtue on all foundations of goodness, so that they cannot be destroyed; may all sentient beings set up the banner of mastery of all the teachings, respecting, admiring, and diligently preserving them; may all sentient beings write down the true teachings on precious silk, preserving the treasury of teachings of Buddhas and enlightening beings; may all sentient beings set up high, outstanding banners, and light the lamp of wisdom, illuminating all the world; may all sentient beings set up the banner of steadfastness and be able to destroy all delusive actions and manias; may all sentient beings set up the banner of the power of knowledge, which no delusion can damage; may all sentient beings attain the banner of great knowledge and wisdom, destroying all the flags of worldly pride; may all sentient beings gain the banner of great light of the sun of knowledge, and illumine the whole realm of reality with the light of the sun of knowledge; may all sentient beings be endowed with banners adorned with innumerable jewels, filling all worlds in the ten directions, and offer them to the Buddhas; may all sentient beings obtain the banner of realization of thusness, and destroy all the erroneous views of misleading paths.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving banners and pennants, to cause all sentient beings to attain the pure paths of the banner of the extremely profound, lofty, and wide-ranging practices of enlightening beings, and the banner of the action of spiritual powers of enlightening beings. 
“Great enlightening beings open up storehouses of myriad treasures and hundreds of billions of trillions of fine, rare jewels to all the countless sentient beings, giving whatever they wish unbegrudgingly. 
They dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings always see the treasure of the Buddha, give up folly and cultivate right mindfulness; may all sentient beings be fully endowed with the light of the treasure of the Teaching and preserve the treasury of teachings of all Buddhas; may all sentient beings be able to support the entire treasure of the community, tirelessly providing for its needs; may all sentient beings attain the highest treasure of mind, omniscience, and may their pure aspiration for enlightenment never recede; may all sentient beings attain the treasure of knowledge, entering into all things without doubt or confusion; may all sentient beings be endowed with the treasure of virtuous qualities of enlightening beings, reveal and expound immeasurable knowledge; may all sentient beings attain a treasure of immeasurable sublime qualities, cultivate and attain the knowledge of the ten powers of true awareness; may all sentient beings attain the treasure of the sixteen knowledges of refined meditation, and ultimately fulfill broad, great knowledge and wisdom; may all sentient beings develop the treasure of the supreme field of blessings, and awaken to the unexcelled knowledge and wisdom of the enlightened; may all sentient beings become masters of the most excellent treasure, and expound all truths with inexhaustible discernment.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving treasures, to cause all sentient beings to obtain the jewel of complete, supreme knowledge, the treasure of the unobstructed pure eye of the enlightened. 
“Great enlightening beings may give various beautiful decorations—decorations for all bodies, causing the body to be beautiful and pleasing to all. 
Great enlightening beings regard all creatures in the world equally, like an only child, and want to cause them all to have adornments purifying their bodies, to attain supreme peace and comfort, to attain the bliss of enlightened knowledge, abide by the Buddha-teachings and benefit living beings. With innumerable, various exquisite jewel ornaments such as these they diligently practice giving, and when they are giving they dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings develop unexcelled, wonderful adornments and adorn humans and celestials with pure virtue and knowledge; may all sentient beings attain features of pure adornment, adorning themselves with pure felicitous virtues; may all sentient beings attain features of most sublime adornment, and array themselves with all marks of virtue; may all sentient beings attain features of unconfused adornments, adorning themselves with all marks of Buddhahood; may all sentient beings attain the features of adornment by good, pure speech, endowed with all kinds of unlimited intellectual powers; may all sentient beings attain the features of adornment by voices with all good qualities, their voices pure and clear, pleasing to all who hear; may all sentient beings attain the feature of adornment by the delightful speech of the Buddhas, causing living beings to hear the teaching, rejoice in it, and cultivate pure practice; may all sentient beings attain the features of adornment of mind, entering deep meditative concentration and seeing the Buddhas; may all sentient beings attain the features of adornment by total mental command, illumining the true teachings of all Buddhas; may all sentient beings attain the features of adornment by wisdom and knowledge, adorning their minds with the wisdom and knowledge of buddhahood.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when generously giving all kinds of ornaments, to cause sentient beings to be endowed with the adornments of the complete fulfillment of all the innumerable qualities of Buddhas, complete virtue and knowledge, and to forever shed all conceit and self-indulgence. 
“Great enlightening beings give to all sentient beings the jeweled crowns and topknot jewels they received when crowned as independent kings, without regret in their hearts, always cultivating themselves diligently to be generous donors, learning the wisdom of giving, developing the faculty of relinquishment; with knowledge and skill in means, their minds broad and magnanimous, they give to all, and dedicate those roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings be crowned by the Buddha-teachings and achieve universal knowledge; may all sentient beings attain the foremost knowledge and reach the other shore; may all sentient beings save living beings with the treasure of sublime knowledge and cause them all to fulfill the summit of virtue; may all sentient beings attain completion of the precious crown of knowledge and wisdom and be worthy of the honor of the world; may all sentient beings’ heads be graced with the crown of knowledge and become autonomous monarchs and masters of the law; may all sentient beings tie the clear jewel of knowledge to their heads, invisible to all worldlings; may all sentient beings be worthy of the obeisance of the world, perfect the peak of wisdom, and illumine the Buddha-teachings; may all sentient beings be crowned with the crown adorned by the ten powers, filled with the purity of the ocean of jewels of knowledge and wisdom; may all sentient beings reach the summit of the great stages of enlightenment, attain omniscience, fulfill the ten powers, and destroy the bands of maniacs at the peak of the realm of desire; may all sentient beings manage to attain the highest summit of sovereignty, and attain the peak of radiance of omniscience, which cannot be outshone.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving jeweled crowns, to cause sentient beings to attain the realm of utmost purity of supreme knowledge, and the crown of jewels of wisdom. 
“When great enlightening beings see sentient beings in prisons or dungeons, dark and dim, shackled and chained, unable to rise or sit in comfort, assailed by myriad pains, without relatives or friends, without refuge or salvation, naked, hungry, emaciated, suffering unbearable torture, the enlightening beings, having seen this, give what they have, all their wealth, their spouses, children, and households, and even their own bodies, to rescue those creatures in prison, like the enlightening being Great Compassion and the enlightening being King of Wondrous Eyes did; and, having rescued them, they give them whatever they need, relieving their suffering, enabling them to gain peace and comfort—after that, they give them the supreme treasure of the teaching, cause them to give up indulgence, firmly establish roots of goodness, and not shrink away or withdraw from the Buddhist teaching. 
When great enlightening beings rescue sentient beings from prison, they dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings be ultimately liberated from the bonds of covetousness and craving; may all sentient beings cut off the stream of birth and death and climb up onto the shore of wisdom; may all sentient beings do away with ignorance and folly, develop knowledge and wisdom, and shed the fetters of afflictions; may all sentient beings destroy the bonds of the worlds of desire, form, and formlessness, attain universal knowledge and be ultimately emancipated; may all sentient beings forever cut off all the bonds of afflictions and reach the other shore of knowledge and wisdom, the ground of nonobstruction, where there are no afflictions; may all sentient beings be free from stirring thoughts, musing, and vain discrimination, and enter the realm of equanimous, imperturbable knowledge; may all sentient beings shed the bonds of desires, forever leaving behind all mundane cravings, and have no attachments in the worlds of desire, form, or formlessness; may all sentient beings attain supreme aspiration and always have the Buddhas teach them; may all sentient beings attain liberated minds, with no attachments and no bondage, broad and vast as the cosmos, comprehensive as space; may all sentient beings attain the spiritual powers of enlightening beings, taming sentient beings in all worlds, causing them to detach from the mundane and abide in the Great Vehicle.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when saving sentient beings suffering in prison, to enable sentient beings to enter the realm of knowledge and wisdom of the enlightened. 
“Great enlightening beings, seeing prisoners bound hand and foot, suffering all sorts of pain, beaten and oppressed by their jailers, on the brink of death, having given up all earthly comforts, forever parted from their relatives and friends, laid out on butchering blocks to be dismembered, or impaled on wooden stakes, or doused with oil and set afire, the enlightening beings, having seen them oppressed by such tortures, give up their own bodies to take their places, as did the enlightening beings Invincible, King of Most Excellent Action, and other great enlightening beings who gave up their own lives to spare others, bearing cruel suffering in their stead. 
At that time the enlightening beings say to the wardens, ‘I wish to give up my body in exchange for their lives. You may apply those tortures to me. Just as you are doing to those people, you may do what you want, even more, to me—I will endure even incalculable times as much, so that they may be freed. 
If I see them about to be killed and do not give up my life to redeem them from their misery, then I cannot be said to be dwelling in the mind of an enlightening being. Because I have made the determination for omniscient enlightenment for the purpose of saving all beings.’ “When great enlightening beings give up their own lives to save sentient beings, they dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings attain endless, ultimate life and be forever free from disaster, oppression, and affliction; may all sentient beings stay with the Buddhas, receive universal knowledge, fulfill the ten powers, and receive the prediction of enlightenment; may all sentient beings rescue conscious beings everywhere, cause them to be free from fear and to forever leave the states of woe; may all sentient beings attain total life and enter the realm of undying knowledge; may all sentient beings be forever free from hostility and enmity, have no calamities, and always be in the care of Buddhas and good teachers; may all sentient beings abandon all weapons and instruments of evil and suffering, and practice all kinds of pure, good action; may all sentient beings be free from all fears and crush the armies of demons at the tree of enlightenment; may all sentient beings be free from terrors, their hearts pure and fearless in regard to the highest teaching, and be able to make the supreme lion’s roar; may all sentient beings attain unobstructed lionic knowledge and wisdom and cultivate right action in all worlds; may all sentient beings reach the realm of fearlessness and always attend to the salvation and protection of suffering sentient beings.’ This is great enlightening beings; dedication of roots of goodness when giving up their own lives to save prisoners about to be executed, to cause sentient beings to be free from the pains of birth and death and to attain the sublime bliss of the enlightened. 
“Great enlightening beings give the knot of flesh on their heads to beggars as did the enlightening beings Jewel Topknot King, Supremely Wonderful Body, and countless others. 
At such a time, seeing a beggar come, the enlightening beings’ hearts fill with joy and they say, ‘If you need a flesh topknot, take it from me—mine is the best in the land.’ And when they say this, their minds are undisturbed, they do not think of other actions; they relinquish the world and seek dispassionate serenity; ultimately pure, diligent, straightforward, they are bent on omniscience. 
They then take a sharp knife and cut off the topknot of flesh on their heads; with their right knee kneeling on the ground, they join their palms and give their topknots away with a concentrated mind, thinking of the practices of all Buddhas and enlightening beings of the past, present, and future, conceiving great joy, increasing in determination. 
Intellectually they skillfully analyze and understand phenomena, and do not grasp pain, knowing that the sense of pain has no signs and no origin, that all sensations occur relatively and none are permanent. 
Therefore they develop great blissful faith that they should practice great relinquishment like all enlightening beings of past, future, and present, seeking universal knowledge without retreating, without relying on others’ teaching or the power of a teacher. 
“When great enlightening beings carry out this giving, they dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings attain the invisible crown and develop the pagodalike topknot of enlightening beings; may all sentient beings have hair like the Buddha, and be able to extinguish all afflictions of sentient beings; may all sentient beings have glossy hair, thick hair, hair which doesn’t grow on the forehead; may all sentient beings have hair like the Buddha and forever be free from all afflictions and binding habits; may all sentient beings have radiant hair, shining with light that illumines all worlds in the ten directions; may all sentient beings have undisturbed hair, clean like the Buddha’s; may all sentient beings develop the pagodalike hair of the saint, so that for all who see it it is like seeing the Buddha’s hair; may all sentient beings have hair like the Buddha, without stain, without attachment, forever rid of all obscuring dust and dirt.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving their flesh topknots, to cause sentient beings to be dispassionate and serene of mind, fulfill all concentration formulae, and consummate the enlightened one’s knowledge of all ways of liberation and its ten powers. 
“Great enlightening beings give their eyes to those who come and ask for them, just as the enlightening beings Gladdening Practice, Moonlight King, and countless others gave theirs. When great enlightening beings give their eyes, they arouse a pure mind to give eyes; they arouse the mind of the eye of pure knowledge, arouse a mind resting on the light of truth; arouse the mind witnessing the unexcelled Buddha Way; awaken a mind dedicated to great knowledge; awaken a mind to give with equanimity equal to the enlightening beings of past, present, and future; awaken the unobstructed eye; arouse a mind of indestructible pure faith; arouse a mind of joyful acceptance in regard to those who ask. 
To consummate all spiritual powers, to produce the enlightened eye, to increase and broaden the great determination for enlightenment, to cultivate great compassion, and to master the senses, they set their minds on these things. 
“When great enlightening beings give eyes, they conceive great love for those who ask, and establish charity for them, increasing the power of the teaching, giving up mundane emotional views and indulgence, cutting off the bonds of desire, cultivating enlightenment, and obligingly satisfying their requests with unperturbed minds, always in accord with the practice of nondualistic equanimity. 
These roots of goodness they dedicate thus: 
‘May all sentient beings attain the supreme eye and guide everyone; may all sentient beings attain the unobstructed eye and open up the treasury of universal knowledge; may all sentient beings attain the pure physical eye, its light perceptively penetrating, impossible to block; may all sentient beings attain the pure celestial eye, seeing the births and deaths and fruits of actions of all sentient beings; may all sentient beings attain the pure objective eye and be able to enter the realm of those who realize thusness; may all sentient beings attain the eye of wisdom and abandon all conceptual grasping and attachment; may all sentient beings be endowed with the Buddha-eye, capable of total awareness and understanding of all things; may all sentient beings perfect the universal eye, comprehending all realms without hindrance; may all sentient beings attain the pure, unclouded eye, realizing the realm of sentient beings is empty and has no existence; may all sentient beings be fully endowed with the pure unobstructed eye and all be able to consummate the ten powers of the enlightened.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving eyes, to cause all sentient beings to attain the pure eye of universal knowledge. 
“Great enlightening beings are able to give ears and noses to those who ask, as did King of Superlative Action, Invincible, and countless other enlightening beings. When they give, they hand them over personally to those who ask, single-mindedly cultivating the deeds of enlightening beings, endowed with the seed nature of buddhahood, born in the house of the enlightened. Recollecting the acts of giving practiced by the enlightening beings, they constantly strive to activate the pure faculties of enlightenment of Buddhas, their virtues and wisdom. Observing all realms of existence, they see that not one thing endures. 
They aspire to always be able to see the Buddhas and enlightening beings. They recollect all Buddha-teachings according to the situation. 
They know the body is illusory, empty, void of existence, with nothing to cling to. Thus when enlightening beings give away ears and noses, their minds are always dispassionate and peaceful; they have tamed their senses. They save sentient beings from the dangers of perversity and evil, develop all knowledge and virtues, enter the ocean of great generosity, comprehend the meanings of the teachings, fully cultivate the ways they point out, acting in accord with knowledge and wisdom, attaining mastery of truth, and substitute an indestructible body for the perishable body. 
“When great enlightening beings give ears, they dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings attain unobstructed ears and hear all sounds speaking the truth; may all sentient beings attain unblocked ears and be able to understand all sounds; may all sentient beings attain the ears of the enlightened and perceive all without hindrance; may all sentient beings attain pure ears, not producing false discriminations based on the medium of hearing; may all sentient beings attain ears without deafness, causing ignorant consciousness not to arise; may all sentient beings attain ears pervading the cosmos and know the voices of teachings of all Buddhas; may all sentient beings attain unobstructed ears and realize all ways of nonobstruction; may all sentient beings attain indestructible ears, that no one be able to break down the discourses of good teachers; may all sentient beings attain all-hearing ears, far-reaching and pure, supreme of all ears; may all sentient beings be endowed with the celestial ear and the enlightened ear.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving ears, to cause all sentient beings to attain pure ears. 
“When great enlightening beings give noses, they dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings attain high, straight noses, refined noses, well-formed noses, beautiful noses, pleasing noses, pure noses, docile noses, outstanding noses, enemy-conquering noses, the noses of the enlightened; may all sentient beings attain faces free from anger, faces of all truths, faces of nonobstruction, faces good to see, docile faces, pure clean faces, impeccable faces, round full faces like the Buddha, faces pervading all places, faces of immeasurable beauty.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving noses, to cause sentient beings to ultimately gain entry into the teachings of all Buddhas, to cause sentient beings to ultimately absorb the teachings of all Buddhas, to cause sentient beings to ultimately comprehend the teachings of the Buddhas, to cause sentient beings to ultimately abide by the teachings of the Buddhas, to cause sentient beings to ultimately always see the Buddha, to cause all sentient beings to attain realization of the principles of Buddha, to cause sentient beings to ultimately develop indestructible minds, to cause sentient beings to adorn all buddha-lands, to cause sentient beings to all attain the body of great power of the enlightened ones. 
This is the dedication of roots of goodness of enlightening beings when giving ears and noses. 
“Great enlightening beings, abiding securely in the state of indestructible freedom, are able to give teeth to sentient beings, as did Flower Teeth King, Six Tusk Elephant King, and other enlightening beings of antiquity. When great enlightening beings give teeth, their minds are pure, to a degree rarely found: that is, they give with an inexhaustible mind, give with a mind of great faith, give with a mind at every step attaining immeasurable detachment, give with a mind in control of the senses, give with a mind relinquishing all, give with a mind aspiring to universal knowledge, give with a mind to comfort sentient beings, give with great generosity, ultimate generosity, superb generosity, supreme generosity, give with a mind to relinquish their own physical necessities without resentment. 
“At this time, the enlightening beings dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings have sharp, white teeth, becoming supreme reliquaries, receiving the offerings of humans and celestials; may all sentient beings have even teeth, like those of the Buddha, without any gaps; may all sentient beings have well-controlled minds and skillfully carry out the transcendental practices of enlightening beings; may the mouths of all sentient beings be pure and clean, their teeth bright white, showing clearly; may all sentient beings have teeth with memorable adornments, their mouths pure and clean, with no foul appearance; may all sentient beings have a full set of teeth, always producing various rare, exquisite fragrances; may all sentient beings have well-controlled intellects and their teeth be clean and bright, like white lotuses, forming gammadion patterns; may all sentient beings’ mouths and lips be fresh and clean, their teeth clean and white, shining with innumerable lights illuminating everywhere; may all sentient beings’ teeth be fine and sharp, so there are no whole grains left in their food when they eat and they have no attachment to taste and become excellent fields of blessings; may all sentient beings always radiate light from between their teeth, giving enlightening beings the foremost prediction of enlightenment.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving teeth, to cause sentient beings to be endowed with omniscience, their knowledge of all things clear and pure. 
“If people come to great enlightening beings asking for their tongues, they compassionately speak kind and gentle words to them, as did Handsome King, Unregressing, and countless other enlightening beings of ancient times. 
When great enlightening beings are born in the various realms of existence, when countless sentient beings come to them asking for their tongues, they place those people on lion seats, and, with minds free from anger, malice, and resentment, with minds of great power, minds born of the essence of Buddhas, minds abiding in the abode of enlightening beings, minds never polluted or disturbed, minds abiding in great power, minds with no attachment to the body, and minds with no attachment to words, they kneel on the ground, open their mouths, show their tongue to the beggars, and say to them with kind and gentle words, ‘This body of mine is all yours—you may take my tongue and use it as you will, to fulfill your wishes.’ “At that time, the enlightening beings dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings attain the universal tongue and be able to expound all principles of speech and language; may all sentient beings attain tongues that can cover their faces, and may their speech be nondual and all true to reality; may all sentient beings attain a tongue that covers all buddha-lands, demonstrating the autonomous spiritual powers of Buddhas; may all sentient beings have soft, thin tongues, always tasting fine, pure flavors; may all sentient beings have eloquent tongues, able to cut through the net of doubts of all beings; may all sentient beings have luminous tongues, able to radiate countless billions of light beams; may all sentient beings attain tongues of definite certainty, inexhaustibly explaining all things with discernment; may all sentient beings attain masterful tongues, able to unlock all essential mysteries, causing all to accept and believe what they say; may all sentient beings attain tongues of universal fluency, able to enter into the ocean of all languages; may all sentient beings attain tongues capable of explaining all aspects of the teachings, thoroughly attaining ultimate perfection of knowledge of words and speech.’ This is enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving tongues, to cause sentient beings to all attain complete unobstructed knowledge. 
“Enlightening beings give their heads to those who come ask for them, as did Supreme Knowledge, Great Light, and other great enlightening beings. 
The giving that the great enlightening beings practice is because they want to develop the head of supreme knowledge comprehending all truths, because they want to develop the head realizing great enlightenment and saving sentient beings, because they want to have the supreme head seeing all things, because they want to attain the head of pure knowledge which sees truly, because they want to develop the head of nonobstruction, free from hindrance, because they want to realize the head attaining the highest states, because they seek the head of knowledge supreme in the world, because they want to develop the head of pure wisdom, the crown of which cannot be seen by any in the realms of desire, form, or formlessness, because they want to attain the head of sovereignty of knowledge appearing throughout the ten directions, and because they want to fulfill the head of freedom which cannot be broken by anything at all. 
“Great enlightening beings, abiding by this practice and diligently applying it, then, because they have already entered the family of the Buddhas, emulate the giving practiced by the Buddhas. Conceiving pure faith in the Buddhas, they develop and mature roots of goodness, and cause those in need to all be happily satisfied. 
Their own minds are pure and joyful beyond measure; with pure faith and understanding they clearly illumine the Buddha teachings, activate the will for enlightenment, and abide in equanimity and resignation. All their senses are blissful; their virtous qualities grow and develop and they give rise to good aspirations, and always like to practice magnanimous giving. “At that time the enlightening beings dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings attain the head of the enlightened, and attain the invisible crown, which none anywhere can surpass, the supreme head in all buddha-fields, hair curling to the right, radiant, clean, lustrous, adorned with gammadions, a wonder of the world; may they be endowed with the head of Buddhas, the head of consummate knowledge, the foremost head in the world, and be heads of completeness, of purity, and of comprehensive knowledge sitting on the site of enlightenment.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving their heads away, to enable sentient beings to attain the highest truth and achieve unexcelled great wisdom. 
“Great enlightening beings give their hands and feet to sentient beings, like Always Diligent, Sorrowless King, and countless other enlightening beings and others gave their hands and feet in various places of birth in all realms of existence. Using faith for hands, they initiate beneficial works, coming and going, reaching everywhere, diligently practicing the true teaching, aspiring to attain jewel-producing hands, giving their hands, fulfilling the path of enlightening beings without doing anything in vain. They always extend their hands to obtain great wisdom, and walk peacefully as they go, bold and fearless. By the power of pure faith they fulfill diligent effort, to destroy unwholesome states and to perfect enlightenment. 
“When great enlightening beings give in this way, they open the gate of pure teaching with hearts of immeasurable magnanimity, enter the ocean of Buddhahood, perfect the hand of giving, and provide for all in the ten directions. With the power of will they maintain the path of universal knowledge, and abide in the mind ultimately free of impurity, the body of reality, and the body of knowledge, endless and incorruptible. They cannot be shaken by any delusive influences; following good teachers, they make their minds firm and stable, and cultivate the practice of transcendence by giving, same as all enlightening beings. “When great enlightening beings give their hands and feet, seeking omniscience for the sake of all sentient beings, they dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings be endowed with spiritual powers, and all attain jewel-producing hands, and, having attained jewel-producing hands, respect each other as fields of blessings and give each other all kinds of jewels, and also give myriad jewels to Buddhas, producing clouds of wonderful jewels covering all buddha-lands.’ They cause sentient beings to be kind to each other and not harm each other. 
They roam the buddha-fields, secure in fearlessness, naturally endowed with ultimate spiritual powers. They also cause all to attain hands producing jewels, hands producing flowers, hands producing clothing, hands producing canopies, hands producing garlands, hands producing incense, hands producing ornaments, boundless hands, immeasurable hands, universal hands, and, having attained these hands, to always diligently travel to all buddha-lands by means of spiritual power. 
They can touch all buddha-worlds with one hand, and hold all sentient beings with the hand of freedom. 
They attain hands of sublime features, emanating immeasurable light. They can cover all sentient beings with a single hand. 
They attain hands like the Buddha, with webbed fingers and copper fingernails. 
At this time the enlightening beings cover all sentient beings with the hand of great vows, praying that all sentient beings set their minds on always gladly seeking unexcelled enlightenment, producing the ocean of all virtues, rejoicing when they see people come begging, never tiring of them, entering the ocean of buddhahood, with the same roots of goodness as the Buddha. 
This is enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving hands and feet. “Great enlightening beings wound themselves and draw blood to give to sentient beings like Principled Action, Benevolent King, and countless other enlightening beings in various realms of existence. 
When they give blood, they arouse a mind to achieve omniscience, a mind of longing for great enlightenment, a mind of pleasure in cultivating the practices of enlightening beings, a mind not to grasp painful sensations, a mind of gladness to see beggars, a mind not averse to beggars, a mind directed toward the path of all enlightening beings, a mind to preserve the equanimity of all enlightening beings, a mind to increase and broaden the benevolent giving of enlightening beings, an unregressing mind, an unremitting mind, a mind free from self-love. 
The roots of goodness they dedicate in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings attain fulfillment of the body of reality and the body of knowledge; may all sentient beings attain an adamantine, indefatigable body; may all sentient beings attain an indestructible body that nothing can injure; may all sentient beings attain a phantom-like body, appearing throughout the world without limit; may all sentient beings attain a delightful body, clean, beautiful, strong and healthy; may all sentient beings attain a body born of the realm of reality, same as the enlightened, depending on nothing; may all sentient beings attain a body like the radiance of beautiful jewels, which no worldly people can outshine; may all sentient beings attain a body which is a treasury of knowledge, and realize freedom in the realm of immortality; may all sentient beings attain a body of an ocean of jewels, which is unfailingly beneficial to all who see it; may all sentient beings attain the body of space, which none of the troubles of the world can affect.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness, with the mind of the Great Vehicle, a pure mind, a broad mind, a joyful mind, a happy mind, an enraptured mind, a mind in control, a peaceful mind, an unpolluted mind, when giving blood from their bodies. 
“When great enlightening beings see people come and ask for their bodies’ marrow and flesh, they are joyful and speak gently to them, telling them to take their bodies’ marrow and flesh as they wish, just as Benefactor, All-Giving King, and innumerable other enlightening beings gave their marrow and flesh in various circumstances in various realms of being. When they give to those who ask, their joy is great, their generosity grows; they cultivate roots of goodness the same as all enlightening beings, depart from the dust and dirt of the world, and attain profound determination. 
They give their bodies to all, their minds inexhaustible; endowed with immeasurable great roots of goodness, they embody the treasures of all virtues. According with the principles of enlightening beings, they tirelessly put them into practice, their minds always delighting in the virtues of giving. They give all without regret, clearly observing that all things come from conditions and have no substance; they have no greed for the act of giving or for the rewards of giving, and give impartially to whomever they meet. 
“When great enlightening beings give in this way, all the Buddhas appear to them, because they think of them as parents and receive their protection; all sentient beings appear to them, because they cause all to live in peace by the pure teaching; all worlds appear to them, because they adorn and purify all buddha-lands; all living beings appear to them, because they serve all with great compassion; all Buddha qualities appear to them, because they like to observe the ten powers of the enlightened ones; all enlightening beings of the past, present, and future appear to them, because they share the same complete roots of goodness; all fearlessnesses appear to them, because they are able to make the supreme lion roar; all the past, present, and future appear to them, because they have attained knowledge of equality observing all; all worlds appear to them, because they initiate great, far-reaching vows to cultivate enlightenment throughout the future; the tireless practices of enlightening beings all appear to them, because they develop infinite great aspirations. 
“When great enlightening beings give marrow and flesh, they dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings attain the indestructible body; may all sentient beings attain the enduring mystic body, which never diminishes; may all sentient beings attain mentally produced bodies, adorned and pure like the Buddha’s body; may all sentient beings attain bodies adorned with all marks of merit and signs of greatness; may all sentient beings attain bodies beautifully adorned with all kinds of embellishments, endowed with the ten powers, indestructible; may all sentient beings attain the body of those who realize thusness, ultimately pure, impossible to delimit or measure; may all sentient beings attain the body of firmness and stability, which no demons or enemies can injure; may all sentient beings attain the body of oneness, and be one with the Buddhas of all times; may all sentient beings attain the unobstructed body, pervading space with the pure body of reality; may all sentient beings attain the body of the matrix of enlightenment, able to contain all worlds.’ This is the dedication of roots of goodness of enlightening beings giving marrow and flesh, seeking universal knowledge, to cause all sentient beings to attain the ultimately pure infinite body of those who realize thusness. 
“Great enlightening beings give their hearts to those who come and ask for them, as did No Regret, Unobstructed King, and countless other great enlightening beings. 
When they give their own hearts to beggars, they cultivate the mind of free giving, develop the mind of total giving, learn the mind of carrying out transcedent giving, perfect the mind of transcendent giving, cultivate the mind of giving of all enlightening beings, the inexhaustible mind relinquishing all, the mind accustomed to giving all, the mind taking on all enlightening beings, practice of giving, the mind correctly mindful of the manifestation of all Buddhas, the mind presenting gifts to all who come and ask, without end. 
“When great enlightening beings give in this way, their minds are pure: in order to liberate all sentient beings, in order to attain the realm of enlightenment with the ten powers, in order to cultivate practice in accord with their great vows, because they want to abide in peace in the path of enlightening beings, because they want to develop omniscience, and because they do not give up their original vows, they dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings attain diamond treasury hearts, which all diamond mountains cannot break; may all sentient beings attain diamond-realm hearts, adorned with the mystic gammadion; may they attain unshakable hearts, attain hearts that cannot be frightened; may they attain ever inexhaustible hearts benefiting the world; may they attain hearts that are treasuries of knowledge and wisdom, marked by great courage; may they attain hearts marked by firm strength; may they attain hearts as infinite as the ocean of living beings; may they attain hearts which nothing can spoil; may they attain hearts destroying all delusive activities and armies of demons; may they attain fearless hearts; may they attain hearts of great spiritual force; may they attain hearts of constant energy; may they attain hearts of great courage; may they attain hearts that cannot be shocked; may they attain hearts with indestructible armor; may they attain the supreme hearts of enlightening beings; may they attain hearts full of the light of enlightenment into the Buddha teachings; may they attain hearts sitting under the tree of enlightenment, abiding by the true teachings of all Buddhas, divorcing all illusions and attaining omniscience; may they attain hearts accomplished in the ten powers.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving their hearts, to cause all sentient beings to be unstained by the world and to be endowed with the ten-powered mind of the enlightened. 
“If anyone comes to great enlightening beings asking for their internal organs, they give all, like Good Giver, Demon-Conquering Sovereign, and countless other great enlightening beings. When practicing this giving, they are glad to see people come begging and look upon them lovingly; in the quest for enlightenment they give as they are asked, without any regret in their hearts. They observe that this body has no permanence or stability, and reflect that they should give this body away and get an indestructible body. They also are mindful that this body will eventually decay, disgusting to all who see, and will be eaten by animals, that this body is impermanent, eventually to be abandoned and eaten by others, without awareness or cognition. 
When enlightening beings make these observations, they know that the body is transient and the height of impurity; understanding the teaching, they become very joyful. 
With a respectful mind, they see those who come ask of them as good friends who have come to protect them, and generously give them whatever they ask, substituting the enduring body for the unstable one. 
“When great enlightening beings give in this way, they dedicate all the roots of goodness, that all sentient beings may attain the body of the treasury of knowledge, inwardly and outwardly pure; that all sentient beings may attain the body of the treasury of virtue, able to preserve the vow for omniscience; that all sentient beings may attain a supremely wonderful body, inwardly full of sublime fragrance, outwardly radiating light; that all sentient beings may attain a body without a protruding belly, upper and lower body straight, limbs and joints well coordinated; that all sentient beings may attain the body of knowledge and wisdom, filled with joy, enriched and nourished by the savor of the Buddha teaching; that all sentient beings attain an inexhaustible body and cultivate peaceful abiding in the most profound nature of truth; that all sentient beings may attain the body of the pure treasury of concentration spell formulae, and elucidate all truths with marvelous eloquence; that all sentient beings may attain the body of purity, body and mind both inwardly and outwardly clean; that all sentient beings may attain the body of practice of deep contemplation with knowledge of realization of thusness, filled with wisdom, showering the rain of truth; that all sentient beings may attain a body that is inwardly tranquil while outwardly being a supreme representation of knowledge for sentient beings, emanating great light universally illuminating everything. 
This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving internal organs, to cause sentient beings to be inwardly and outwardly pure and to all achieve stability in unobstructed knowledge. “Great enlightening beings give those who ask for them their limbs, joints, and bones, like Treasury of Truth, King of Light, and innumerable other great enlightening beings. When they give their limbs, joints, and bones, upon seeing people come begging, they give rise to love, joy, pure faith, peace of mind, courage, kindness, an unobstructed mind, a pure mind, a mind to give whatever they are asked. 
When the great enlightening beings give their limbs and bones, they dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings attain phantomlike bodies, and receive bone, flesh, and blood bodies no more; may all sentient beings attain indestructible, invincible bodies; may all sentient beings attain the body of reality, replete with all knowledge, born in the realm where there are no bounds, no attachments, no fetters, may all sentient beings attain the body of powers of knowledge, all faculties complete, fully developed, uninterrupted and incorruptible; may all sentient beings attain the body of the power of truth, with independent power of knowledge reaching the other shore; may all sentient beings attain a healthy, enduring body, upright and true, never decaying; may all sentient beings attain a body able to respond to needs, to teach and civilize all beings; may all sentient beings attain a body perfumed by wisdom, with the great strength of limb of the mighty; may all sentient beings attain a permanent, enduring body, forever free from all fatigue, may all sentient beings attain a stable body of great strength, able to fulfill the great power of energy and effort; may all sentient beings attain the equally omnipresent body of reality and abide in the realm of immeasurable supreme knowledge; may all sentient beings attain the body of the power of virtue, beneficial to all who see it, removed from all evil; may all sentient beings attain an independent body, which rests on nothing, and all be endowed with nonreliant, unattached knowledge, may all sentient beings attain a body under the protection of the Buddhas; may all sentient beings attain a body beneficial to all living beings, able to enter into all realms of existence; may all sentient beings attain a body of universal manifestation, able to reflect all the Buddha teachings; may all sentient beings attain a body endowed with vigor, concentrating on and diligently cultivating the practice of the knowledge of the Great Vehicle; may all sentient beings attain a pure body free from pride and conceit, their knowledge always stable and not shaken by anything; may all sentient beings attain a body of firm action, accomplishing the work of universal knowledge of the Great Vehicle; may all sentient beings attain a body of firm action, accomplishing the work of universal knowledge of the Great Vehicle; may all sentient beings attain a body in the house of Buddhas, forever leaving all mundane birth and death.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving limbs and bones, to cause all sentient beings to attain omniscience and be eternally pure. 
“When great enlightening beings see people come to them with knives and ask for their skin, their hearts become joyful, their senses delighted, just like someone who has been done a great favor; they welcome them, invite them in, set out a seat for them, and bow to them respectfully, thinking, ‘These seekers are most rare; they come seeking aid from me, working to fulfill my vow for omniscience.’ Joyfully, with a mild countenance, they say to them, ‘This body of mine I relinquish entirely—take as much of my skin as you need,’ just like Treasury of Purity, Golden-sided Deer King, and countless other great enlightening beings of the past. 
At that time, the enlightening beings dedicate these roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings have fine skin, like that of the Buddha, its color pure and clear, so that people never tire of seeing it; may all sentient beings have unbreakable skin, like diamond, which nothing can break; may all sentient beings have golden skin, like the finest real gold, pure and clear; may all sentient beings have clear, lustrous skin, endowed with the softness and purity of the ascetic, characteristic of the Buddha; may all sentient beings attain skin of the finest color, inherently pure, its color and features incomparable; may all sentient beings develop the pure-colored skin of Buddha, adorned with the marks and embellishments of greatness; may all sentient beings have skin of exquisite color, radiating great light, illuminating everything; may all sentient beings have skin like luminous mesh, like the lofty banner of the world, radiating unspeakably many spheres of light; may all sentient beings have lustrous skin, its color and features all pure.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving their skin, to cause all sentient beings to reach all pure adorned buddha-fields and be endowed with the great virtues of Buddha. 
At that time the countenance of the enlightening beings is peaceful and happy, their minds are stable and healthy, without any delusion. 
Riding the Great Vehicle, they do not seek satisfaction of sensual desires, nor do they prize name and fame; they only conceive the great determination of enlightening beings, getting rid of all defilements of greed and jealousy, turning wholeheartedly to the supremely wonderful teaching of the enlightened ones. 
“When great enlightening beings give in this way, they concentrate the roots of goodness and dedicate them thus: 
‘May all sentient beings have slender, long fingers, no different from Buddha; may all sentient beings have fingers of even circumference, the upper and lower parts in proportion; may all sentient beings have fingers with ruddy copper nails, the nails rounded and shiny; may all sentient beings have the fingers of the omniscient supreme human, able to hold all truths, may all sentient beings have fingers with the refinements of Buddhas’ fingers, and be adorned with the ten powers; may all sentient beings have the fingers of a great human, slender and even; may all sentient beings have fingers marked with lotus gammadions, adorned with marks and embellishments resulting from the working of the ten powers; may all sentient beings have fingers that are mines of light, radiating great light beams illumining unspeakably many buddha-worlds; may all sentient beings have well-proportioned fingers, adorned with the characteristics of Buddhas’ fingers.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness in giving fingers and toes, to cause all sentient beings to attain purity of mind. 
“When great enlightening beings are seeking the teaching, if someone says, ‘If you can give me your fingernails, I’ll give you the teaching,’ the enlightening beings reply, ‘Just give me the teaching, and you may take and use my fingernails as you wish,’ as did Sovereign King Seeking Truth, Inexhaustible, and countless other great enlightening beings. 
In their search for the true teaching, and because of their desire to expound the true teaching for the benefit of sentient beings, to cause all of them to be fulfilled, they give their fingernails away to those who ask for them. 
At that time the enlightening beings dedicate these roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings have the ruddy copper nails that are a mark of the Buddha; may all sentient beings have glossy nails, adorned with embellishments; may all sentient beings have shiny clean nails, clear as mirrors, finest of all; may all sentient beings have the nails of the omniscient, and be endowed with the marks of great human beings; may all sentient beings have peerless nails, not defiled by or attached to any world; may all sentient beings have nails with marvelous adornments, with light illumining all worlds; may all sentient beings have unbreakable nails, pure, clean, and complete; may all sentient beings have nails marked by entry into the techniques of all Buddha-teachings, vast knowledge and wisdom thoroughly pure; may all sentient beings have well-formed nails, the fruit of enlightening actions, all sublimely pure; may all sentient beings have the nails of the great omniscient guide, radiating treasuries of beautiful lights of infinite hues.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving their nails in their quest for the teaching, to cause sentient beings to be endowed with the unobstructed power of nails of omniscience of all Buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings seek the treasury of Buddha teachings with reverence and respect, considering it difficult to find. If someone who can expound it comes to them and says, ‘If you can throw yourself into a pit of fire seventy feet deep I will give you the teaching,’ the enlightening beings, hearing this, jump for joy and reflect, ‘I would stay forever even in miserable places like uninterrupted hell and experience immeasurable suffering for the sake of the truth; how much the more readily would I jump into the fire of the human world to hear the teaching. 
How wonderful it is that the true teaching is so easy to obtain; without suffering the infinite tortures of hell one gets to hear it merely by entering a pit of fire. 
Just explain to me and I’ll go into the pit of fire,’ and like the enlightening beings King in Quest of the Good Teaching and Adamantine Meditation, they enter the pit of fire in quest of the teaching. “At this time, the enlightening beings dedicate these roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings abide in the teaching of universal knowledge, the abode of Buddhas, and never regress or retreat from unexcelled enlightenment; may all sentient beings be free from all perils and experience the peace and ease of buddhahood; may all sentient beings attain fearless minds and be free from all terrors; may all sentient beings always gladly seek truth, full of joy and bliss, adorned by the teachings; may all sentient beings leave the courses of evil and extinguish the raging fires of the three poisons; may all sentient beings always be in peace and happiness, full of the supremely refined pleasures of the enlightened; may all sentient beings attain the mind of enlightening beings and forever part from the fires of craving, anger, and delusion; may all sentient beings attain the pleasures of concentration of enlightening beings and see the Buddhas everywhere, their minds full of joy; may all sentient beings skillfully explain the true teaching, ultimately never forgetting its principles; may all sentient beings have the sublime bliss of spiritual powers of enlightening beings and ultimately abide in knowledge of all ways of enlightenment.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when plunging into a pit of fire in quest of the true teaching, for the purpose of causing sentient beings to give up hindering actions and all attain the full endowment of the fire of wisdom. 
“When great enlightening beings, in quest of the true teaching, analyze and expound the path of enlightening beings, point out the road of enlightenment, proceed toward highest knowledge, diligently cultivate the ten powers, extend the mind of universal knowledge, attain the state of unobstructed knowledge, purify sentient beings, abide in the sphere of action of enlightening beings, earnestly cultivate great knowledge, and preserve complete enlightenment, they experience immeasurable suffering and tribulation, as did Seeker of the Good Teaching, Brave King, and countless other great enlightening beings. 
To save even the most evil people, who repudiate the truth, are shrouded by evil deeds, are in the grip of delusion, the enlightening beings, for the sake of the truth, accept for those people all the torments they should suffer. 
These roots of goodness they dedicate in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings be forever freed from all suffering and oppression, and attain peace and happiness, freedom and spiritual power; may all sentient beings be forever free from all miseries, and attain all happiness; may all sentient beings annihilate the body of accumulated suffering, attain the body of illumination, and always experience ease and bliss; may all sentient beings escape from the prison of suffering and perfect wise action; may all sentient beings see the path of peace and depart from all evil courses; may all sentient beings attain the joy and bliss of truth and forever end all misery; may all sentient beings extirpate all suffering, love one another, and have no malevolence; may all sentient beings attain the bliss of the Buddhas and leave the pains of birth and death; may all sentient beings attain pure, peerless peace and ease, impervious to all pains and vexations; may all sentient beings attain all supreme bliss, ultimately filled with the unobstructed bliss of buddha-hood.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when accepting suffering for the sake of the truth, because they want to rescue all beings and bring them to safety, free them from peril and difficulty and cause them to live in the realm of omniscient, unhindered liberation. 
“When great enlightening beings occupy the rank of ruler and seek true teaching, they consider even one sentence, one word, one phrase, one doctrine hard to obtain, and will give up everything within the seas, near or far—land, cities, towns, populace, storehouses, gardens, ponds, houses, forests, flowers, produce, including all rare and precious things, palaces, bowers, spouses, children, retinues, even rulership—they are able to give up all, seeking that which endures while in the midst of the transient; because they want to benefit all living beings, they earnestly seek the Buddhas’ path of unhindered liberation and ultimately pure universal knowledge, as did Great Moral Force, King of Supreme Virtue, and countless other great enlightening beings. 
They diligently seek true teaching, even a little bit; for every one word they prostrate themselves on the ground. Properly meditating on the teachings of all Buddhas of past, present, and future, they devotedly practice them, never greedy for fame or fortune. They abandon the independent rulership of all worldly realms to seek autonomous mastery of truth. 
They have no attachment to worldly pleasures, and nourish their minds with transmundane teachings, forever leaving behind all idle speculations and inanities of the world, abiding in the truth of the Buddhas, which is free from inanity. 
“At that time, enlightening beings dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings always gladly give generously, relinquishing everything; may all sentient beings be able to give up whatever they have without regret; may all sentient beings always seek the truth without begrudging their lives or sustenance; may all sentient beings gain the benefit of the teaching and be able to stop everyone’s doubts and confusion; may all sentient beings be able to give up their lives and sovereignty in quest of the Buddha teaching, cultivating highest enlightenment with great determination; may all sentient beings honor and respect the true teaching with ever profound aspiration, not begrudging their bodily lives; may all sentient beings preserve the most difficult-to-find Buddha teaching, always practicing it diligently; may all sentient beings attain the Buddhas’ light of enlightenment, accomplishing the practice of enlightenment, awakening without relying on another for understanding; may all sentient beings always be able to analyze all Buddha teachings, pull out the arrow of doubt, and attain peace of mind.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving up their countries and cities in quest of the true teaching, in order to cause sentient beings’ knowledge and insight to be complete, and always to be able to remain in the path of peace. 
“Great enlightening beings, becoming monarchs of great countries, masters of the law, promulgate commands to eliminate work involving killing: in all cities, towns, and villages, all butchery and slaughtering is prohibited—to all creatures, legless, two-legged, four-legged, or many-legged, they give freedom from fear and aggression. Extensively cultivating the practices of all enlightening beings, they treat beings with humanity and kindness, not acting in aggressive or harmful ways. They conceive the wonderful, precious will to give peace to sentient beings, and establish profound determination for buddhahood; always abiding themselves by the three kinds of pure precepts, they also induce sentient beings to do the same. 
“Great enlightening beings, causing sentient beings to abide by the five precepts and forever stop occupational killing, dedicate these roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings awaken the determination for enlightenment, be filled with knowledge and wisdom, and preserve everlasting life; may sentient beings live for immeasurable ages, make offerings to all Buddhas, with reverence and respect diligently cultivating to increase the lifespan even more; may all sentient beings fully practice the method of removing old age and death, so that calamities and poisons cannot threaten their lives; may all sentient beings fully develop bodies free from illness and affliction, so they may live as long as they wish; may all sentient beings attain inexhaustible life, and abide by the practice of enlightening forever and ever, teaching and taming all sentient beings; may all sentient beings be doors of life, wherein the good foundations of the ten powers grow; may all sentient beings be replete with roots of goodness, attain unlimited life, and fulfill great vows; may all sentient beings see all the Buddhas and serve them, and live indefinitely, cultivating and building up roots of goodness; may all sentient beings learn well what there is to learn from the enlightened, attain the joy of the way of sages and infinite life; may all sentient beings attain a permanent life-root, neither aging nor becoming ill, progress with vigor and courage to enter the knowledge and wisdom of buddhahood.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when abiding by the three bodies of pure precepts and forever stopping slaughter, to cause sentient beings to attain the complete ten-powered knowledge of Buddhas. 
“When great enlightening beings see people cruelly castrating domestic animals, making their bodies incomplete and causing them pain, they are moved to compassion and save the animals out of pity, and order all the people in the land to stop this practice. 
The enlightening beings then say to those people, ‘Why do you do such an evil thing? 
I have a treasury full of all kinds of conveniences which I will give to you according to your needs. What you are doing is wrong and I urge you not to do it. This occupation of yours is not right or reasonable—even if you gain something, what is the use? To harm others for your own profit after all isn’t right. 
All bad actions like this are not praised by the enlightened.’ And having spoken thus, they give them all their goods, and also explain the sublime teaching to them with fine words to gladden them: that is, they point out to them the way to peace and serenity, causing them to believe and accept, to do away with what is not good, to practice pure deeds, to be kind to one another and not to harm each other. Those people hearing this, forever give up evil. “At that time, the enlightening beings dedicate these roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings be physically complete; may all sentient beings be courageous and cultivate pure religious practices, may all sentient beings have brave, bold strength, always be leaders, and abide in unobstructed knowledge, never retreating; may all sentient beings forever abandon craving and have no attachments; may all sentient beings develop rectitude and intelligence, and their knowledge increase, worthy of the praise of the Buddhas; may all sentient beings be endowed with the strength of great people and always be able to cultivate the roots of goodness of the ten powers; may all sentient beings never be emasculated, always cultivating rare qualities of virtue and knowledge; may all sentient beings have no attachment or ties to sensual desires, attain mental liberation, detach from the mundane and abide in enlightening practice; may all sentient beings become people of supreme knowledge and wisdom, trusted and obeyed by all; may all sentient beings fully possess the great knowledge and wisdom of enlightening beings, soon to become Buddhas.’ This is enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when prohibiting all castration, to cause sentient beings to have healthy bodies, and all be able to protect good human beings, to be born in the families of worthies and sages, full of intelligence, always cultivating healthy practices, with healthy capabilities, endowed with the healthy seed of enlightenment, the true teaching, courage, vigor, wisdom, and purity of genuine humans. 
“If great enlightening beings see a Buddha appear in the world and expound the true teaching, they announce to all in a loud voice, ‘A Buddha has appeared in the world! 
A Buddha has appeared in the world!’ This is to cause sentient beings to hear the name of Buddha and give up all pride and inanity. 
They also exhort and lead them to hasten to see the Buddha, to remember the Buddha, to resort to the Buddha, to concentrate on the Buddha, to contemplate the Buddha, to laud the Buddha; also they extensively explain to them how rare it is to meet a Buddha, who appears but once in a quadrillion eons. 
Due to this, sentient beings get to see the Buddha, give rise to pure faith, dance for joy, and respectfully attend the Buddha. 
Also, from the Buddha they hear the names of many Buddhas and go on to meet countless Buddhas, plant roots of goodness, cultivate and develop them. 
“Then, countless quadrillions of sentient beings, because of seeing the Buddha, all attain purity and ultimate pacification. 
Those sentient beings think of the enlightening beings as most excellent friends and benefactors, as due to the enlightening beings they achieve enlightened qualities and distribute the roots of goodness they have planted over countless eons throughout the world, thus performing Buddha-work. 
“When great enlightening beings teach sentient beings and induce them to see Buddha, they dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings go to see Buddhas of their own accord, without being urged to do so, and may they serve, provide for, and gladden them all; may all sentient beings always enjoy seeing Buddhas, without any feeling of rejection; may all sentient beings always diligently cultivate vast knowledge, absorbing and retaining the treasury of all Buddha teachings; may all sentient beings understand all Buddha teachings they hear and cultivate enlightening practice for immeasurable eons; may all sentient beings abide in right mindfulness, and always see the Buddhas’ emergence with the eye of knowledge; may all sentient beings not think of different occupations, but always think of seeing Buddha and diligently cultivate the ten powers; may all sentient beings always see Buddhas in all places, comprehending that the realization of thusness pervades the realm of space; may all sentient beings become equipped with the free body of buddhahood, realizing enlightenment and expounding the truth throughout the ten directions; may all sentient beings meet good teachers, always hear the Buddha teachings, and attain unbreakable faith in the Buddhas; may all sentient beings be able to eulogize the emergence of Buddhas, and cause those who see them to attain universal purity.’ This is enlightening beings’ dedication of the roots of goodness of praising Buddhas’ appearance in the world, to cause sentient beings to see all Buddhas, provide for and serve them, and attain ultimate purity in the highest teaching. 
“Great enlightening beings give away land—they may give it to Buddhas, building retreats, or they may give it to enlightening beings and teachers, to use as they wish, or they may give it to mendicant groups for a place of abode, or they may give it to their parents, or to other people, to Buddhist disciples, to individual illuminates, to various fields of blessings, including the poor, orphaned, homeless, and others. 
They give whatever is wished, to fulfill their needs. 
They may build Buddhas’ mausoleums, and provide all necessary articles for such places, so they may be used as wished, without fear or hesitation. 
“Whenever great enlightening beings give land, they dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings fully realize the pure stage of universal knowledge and arrive at the consummation of the practices of Universal Good; may all sentient beings attain the stage of total mental command and receive and hold all Buddha teachings with right recollection; may all sentient beings attain sustaining power and be able to preserve all Buddha teachings; may all sentient beings attain a mind like the earth, with intentions ever pure and free from evil thoughts toward sentient beings; may all sentient beings maintain the lineage of Buddhas, accomplishing the processes of the stages of enlightening beings, without interruption; may all sentient beings become abodes of safety for all, causing all to be harmonized and pacified and to abide in the path of purity; may all sentient beings benefit the world the same as enlightened ones, causing all to diligently cultivate themselves and abide securely in the power of buddhahood; may all sentient beings be liked by all the world and cause everyone to abide in the highest happiness of Buddhahood; may all sentient beings attain skill in means of liberation and abide in the power and fearlessness of buddhahood; may all sentient beings attain knowledge like the earth and freely practice all Buddha teachings.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving land, to cause sentient beings to all attain ultimate consummation of the pure state of all enlightened ones. 
“Great enlightening beings give servants as offerings to all Buddhas and enlightening beings, genuine teachers; or they may give them to the religious community, or to their parents, honorable fields of blessings, or again they may give them to sentient beings suffering from illness, to fulfill their needs and preserve their lives, or they may give them to the poor and helpless and all others without attendants, or they may give countless servants from time to time to look after the shrines and mausoleums of Buddhas or to transcribe the true teachings of the Buddhas. 
Those servants are all intelligent and highly skilled, naturally obedient, always diligent and never lazy, with honest minds, peaceful and happy minds, altruistic minds, humane and benevolent minds, respectful minds, minds free from resentment and hostility, able to adjust to the customs of those for whom they work, able to be of benefit to everyone. Also, from the influences of the enlightening beings’ pure conduct, they have talent and artistry, and are masters of crafts and mathematics. They are skilled in service and able to please. 
“At that time, the enlightening beings dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings attain docile minds, cultivating roots of goodness with all Buddhas; may all sentient beings obediently provide offerings to all Buddhas and be able to hear and absorb what the Buddhas teach; may all sentient beings be accepted by the Buddhas, always observe the enlightened ones, without any other thought; may all sentient beings not spoil the seed of buddhahood, diligently cultivating all roots of goodness in accord with the Buddhas; may all sentient beings always diligently provide for all Buddhas, not wasting any time; may all sentient beings hold the sublime doctrines of the Buddhas, their words pure, traveling without fear; may all sentient beings always be happy to see Buddhas, never tiring, not begrudging their lives to the Buddhas; may all sentient beings get to see the Buddhas, their minds without indulgence or attachment, free from worldly dependence; may all sentient beings only take refuge in Buddha and forever leave all false resorts; may all sentient beings follow the Buddha-way, their minds always blissfully contemplating the supreme Buddha teaching.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving servants, to cause sentient beings to get rid of defilement, clear the ground of buddhahood, and be able to manifest the free body of the enlightened. 
“Great enlightening beings give their bodies to those who come ask for them; when they give, they engender a humble mind, a mind like the earth, a mind enduring all suffering without changing or wavering, a mind to serve sentient beings tirelessly, a mind regarding all sentient beings like a benevolent mother, turning over all their virtues to them, a mind of forgiveness for the various impositions and aggressions of ignorant evil beings, and rest on the foundations of goodness, diligently performing service. 
‘May all sentient beings never lack what they need, cultivate the practices of enlightening beings unremittingly, not give up the just rewards of all enlightening beings, remain on the path traveled by enlightening beings, comprehend the equal real nature of enlightening beings, get to be of the number of the family of Buddhas, abide by truthful speech, sustain enlightening practice, cause all worldlings to be able to clarify the Buddha-teaching, deeply believe in it, and realize the ultimate consummation of the teaching, and cause sentient beings to produce pure, excellent roots of goodness, abide in great virtue, and fulfill universal knowledge. 
Also with these roots of goodness I will cause all sentient beings to always get to attend all Buddhas, to understand all their teachings, to bear the teachings, reading and reciting them, never forgetting them or letting them be lost or scattered, their minds well subdued. Those who are not self-controlled I will tame, training them with the methods of stillness and serenity. 
I will cause sentient beings, in the presence of the Buddhas, to persevere in these things. 
Also, by these roots of goodness I will cause all sentient beings to be the foremost monument, worthy of receiving the various offerings of the world. 
I will cause all sentient beings to become supreme fields of blessings, attain Buddha knowledge, and enlighten everyone. 
I will cause all sentient beings to become the best of recipients, able to benefit all living beings. 
I will cause all sentient beings to become the best of benefactors, able to foster the endowment of all roots of goodness. 
I will cause all sentient beings to become the finest receivers of gifts, able to cause the givers to obtain infinite rewards. 
I will cause all sentient beings to attain emancipation from the realms of desire, form, and formlessness. 
I will cause all sentient beings to become the foremost of leaders, able to show the world the path that accords with truth. 
I will cause all sentient beings to attain marvelous total mental command, fully holding all the true teachings of the Buddhas. 
I will cause all sentient beings to attain realization of the infinite primary cosmos of reality, and fulfill the true path unobstructed as space.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving their own bodies, to cause all sentient beings to attain the body of infinite knowledge of the sanctified ones. “Great enlightening beings are joyful when they hear the teaching; they conceive pure faith, and are able to offer their own bodies to the Buddha, raptly believing in the treasure of the unexcelled teaching. They think of the Buddhas as their parents, and read and recite, absorb and hold the teachings of the path of nonobstruction, entering into all the gates of countless teachings, jewels of wisdom, roots of goodness. Their minds always think of infinite Buddhas. 
They enter the sphere of buddhahood and attain to deep comprehension of its principles. 
They are able, with the subtle, mysterious pure voice of the enlightened, to produce clouds of Buddha teachings and shower rain of Buddha teachings. Bravely and freely they are able to analytically explain the supreme state of the omniscient. 
Fully consummating the vehicle of all-knowledge, they fulfill all potentials with immeasurable hundreds of thousands of millions of great teachings. 
“When great enlightening beings hear such teachings from Buddhas, their joy knows no bounds; they abide firmly by the truth, cut off their own doubt and confusion, and also cause others’ doubts to be removed as well. Their minds are always light and happy, full of virtuous qualities, replete with roots of goodness. Their attention is continuous, helping sentient beings without their minds ever being exhausted. They attain supreme knowledge and become treasuries of diamonds. 
They associate closely with Buddhas and purify buddha-fields, always diligently attend all the enlightened ones. 
At that time the enlightening beings dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings attain a fully developed, most excellent body, in the care of all Buddhas; may all sentient beings always be near the Buddhas, abide with the Buddhas, and always gaze upon them, never leaving; may all sentient beings attain a pure indestructible body, endowed with all virtue and knowledge; may all sentient beings always diligently serve all Buddhas, and carry out the ultimate pure practice of nonassumption; may all sentient beings attain the egoless body, divorced from self and possession; may all sentient beings be able to distribute their bodies throughout the lands of the ten directions, like reflections appearing, without coming or going; may all sentient beings attain the body of freedom, going everywhere in the ten directions without self or reception; may all sentient beings attain the buddha-body, born in the home of the unexcelled embodiment of the realization of thusness; may all sentient beings attain the great power of forbearance of the body of power of truth, which none can break down; may all sentient beings attain the incomparable body and realize the pure body of reality of the enlightened; may all sentient beings develop the body of transmundane virtues, born in the pure realm of reality where nothing is obtained.’ This is the dedication of roots of goodness of enlightening beings when offering their bodies to Buddhas, to cause sentient beings to dwell forever in the house of the Buddhas of past, present, and future. 
“Great enlightening beings give their bodies to all sentient beings, because they want to cause them to develop roots of goodness, and to remember and think of roots of goodness. 
Great enlightening beings wish their bodies to be great bright lamps able to illumine all sentient beings, to be means of life supporting all beings, to be treasuries of wonderful teaching able to sustain all living beings, to be pure light to awaken all sentient beings, to be lights of the world causing all sentient beings to always see, to be causes and conditions of roots of goodness causing sentient beings to always get the opportunity to meet them, to be genuine teachers causing all sentient beings to receive instruction and guidance, to be even paths on which all sentient beings may tread, to be unexcelled, complete comfort enabling all sentient beings to be freed from suffering and be purified, to be clear suns universally and impartially benefiting the world. 
At that time enlightening beings dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings always associate with the Buddhas and enter the realm of Buddha knowledge; may all sentient beings attain adaptable knowledge and abide in unexcelled awareness; may all sentient beings always be in the assemblies of Buddhas and their minds be well tuned; may all sentient beings always comport themselves with the dignity of Buddhas; may all sentient beings attain nirvana and profoundly understand the meaning of the teaching; may all sentient beings be complete in knowledge and conduct and be born in the house of the Buddhas; may all sentient beings give up ignorant craving and abide in the aspiration of buddhahood; may all sentient beings develop excellent roots of goodness and sit at the tree of enlightenment; may all sentient beings slay the brigands that are the afflictions and get rid of these enemies; may all sentient beings fully preserve all Buddha teachings.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving their bodies to all sentient beings, because they want to benefit all sentient beings and cause them to reach the realm of supreme peace. 
“Great enlightening beings personally attend the Buddhas, wanting to requite their great benevolence, thinking of them as like parents. 
They have deep faith in the Buddhas, and preserve enlightenment, abiding by the principles of the Buddhas, detaching from mundane conceptions. Born in the house of the enlightened, they follow the Buddhas, leaving the realm of delusion. They arrive at the sphere of action of all Buddhas and become vessels of the teachings of all Buddhas. 
At that time the enlightening beings dedicate these roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings attain pure minds and adorn themselves with the jewel of universal knowledge; may all sentient beings abide in good self-control and avoid all bad actions; may all sentient beings gain indestructible, steadfast retinues, able to absorb the true teaching of the Buddhas; may all sentient beings become students of Buddhas and reach the enlightening beings’ stage of coronation; may all sentient beings always be in the keeping of the Buddhas and forever give up whatever is not good; may all sentient beings follow the Buddhas and practice the supreme principle of enlightening beings; may all sentient beings enter the sphere of Buddhas and receive the prediction of omniscience; may all sentient beings be thoroughly equal to the Buddhas and master all the Buddha teachings; may all sentient beings be in the care of the Buddhas and always be able to practice acting without grasping or attachment; may all sentient beings become the foremost attendants of the Buddhas, and in the company of the Buddhas cultivate the practice of knowledge and wisdom.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when attending Buddhas, because they want to actually realize the enlightenment of the Buddhas, because they want to save all sentient beings, because they want to transcend all in the triple world, because they want to perfect nonmalevolence, because they want to attain immeasurably great enlightenment, because they want to develop knowledge illuminating the Buddha teachings, because they want to always receive acceptance by the Buddhas, because they want to gain the protection of the Buddhas, because they want to truly understand all Buddha teachings, because they want to develop roots of goodness equal to those of the Buddhas of all times, and because they want to fully develop an unembittered mind and realize the teachings of all Buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings give up their countries, able to relinquish all things, including kingship; their minds attain freedom from all worldly concerns, and they have no ties, no bonds, no obsessions or attachments. 
They avoid evil deeds and work for the benefit of sentient beings without attachment to the results of their deeds. 
They do not take pleasure in worldly things, and are no longer attached to or eager for any realm of existence. 
Though they live in the world, they do not set their hearts on it. 
They do not cling to material, mental, or sense phenomena, and their minds do not rest on anything internal or external. 
They never forget the practices of enlightening beings, and never abandon the wise; keeping the far-reaching practical commitments of enlightening beings, they always gladly serve all good companions. 
“At such times, the enlightening beings dedicate these roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings become monarchs of truth, masters of truth, and reach the other shore; may all sentient beings become monarchs of the Buddha teaching and destroy their enemies, the afflictions; may all sentient beings dwell in the sovereignty of buddhahood, attain enlightened knowledge, and expound the Buddha teachings; may all sentient beings live in the realm of buddhahood and be able to turn the wheel of the teaching of unexcelled freedom; may all sentient beings be born in the house of the enlightened ones, master the teachings, and preserve the family of Buddhas forever; may all sentient beings reveal innumerable true teachings of the king of truth, perfecting boundless great enlightening beings; may all sentient beings abide in the pure realm of reality, become monarchs of the great truth, and manifest the emergence of Buddhas, continuing unbroken; may all sentient beings be monarchs of knowledge and wisdom in all worlds, edifying and guiding living beings without ever abandoning them; may all sentient beings be donors of truth to all sentient beings in all worlds throughout the space of the cosmos, enabling them all to abide in the Great Vehicle; may all sentient beings manage to become monarchs replete with myriad virtues, with roots of goodness equal to those of the Buddhas of past, present, and future.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving away kingship, because they want to cause all sentient beings to ultimately live in peace. 
“When great enlightening beings see people come asking for the magnificent buildings of the royal capital as well as the revenues from customs duties collected at the borders, they give it all ungrudgingly, wholeheartedly turning toward enlightenment, making great vows, abiding in great benevolence, practicing great compassion, their minds joyfully intent on helping sentient beings. By great knowledge they understand the profound truth and abide in the equal real nature of Buddhas. They practice giving because they are determined to find omniscience, because they have profound longing for freedom, because they seek realization of independent knowledge, because they purify all virtues, because they abide in steadfast great knowledge, because they extensively gather all kinds of roots of goodness, because they carry out the undertakings of all the Buddha teachings, because they spontaneously awaken to the principle of great knowledge, because they abide in enlightenment without regressing, because they cultivate the practical vows of all enlightening beings, and because they thoroughly consummate knowledge of methods of enlightenment. “These roots of goodness they dedicate in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings be able to purify infinite lands and present them to the Buddhas to live in; may all sentient beings always enjoy living in forests, silent, peaceful, undisturbed; may all sentient beings not dwell in capitals or cities, their hearts delighting in peace and quiet, forever attaining ultimate serenity; may all sentient beings be forever unattached to any world and always gladly avoid all mundane talk; may all sentient beings attain hearts free from covetousness, giving whatever they have without regret; may all sentient beings attain emancipated minds, giving up occupation with business; may all sentient beings be free from miserliness and always practice generous giving; may all sentient beings have unattached minds, transcending the events of home life; may all sentient beings attain freedom from suffering and eliminate all fear of calamity; may all sentient beings purify all worlds in the ten directions and present them to the Buddhas.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving away royal capitals, to cause sentient beings to all be able to purify the buddha-fields. 
“Great enlightening beings’ ladies-in-waiting are all beautiful and talented, witty and graceful, skilled in conversation, dancing, and singing, adorned with various clothes, flowers, and perfumes, endlessly delightful to all who see them: 
such precious women, countless numbers of them, are all born of the good deeds of enlightening beings, free to do as they will, yet impeccably respectful and agreeable—all of them the enlightening beings give to those who ask for them, without longing for them, without missing them, without obsession with them, without attachment to them, without clinging to them, without craving for them, without thinking about them, without pursuing them, without attachment to their appearance, without lust for them. 
“At such a time the enlightening beings contemplate the roots of goodness and dedicate them to enabling all sentient beings to attain emancipation, to attain the joy of the Buddha teachings, to attain the enduring in the midst of the unenduring, to attain the incorruptible mind of adamantine knowledge, to enter the site of Buddha’s enlightenment, to reach the other shore, to attain the supremely enlightened mind, to be able to comprehend all things, to produce all roots of goodness, to enter the house of the Buddhas of all times. 
“Great enlightening beings, abiding by this principle, are born in the house of the enlightened, develop the pure, supreme causal basis of the Buddhas, produce the supreme path of universal knowledge, enter deeply into the far-reaching work of knowledge of enlightening beings, and get rid of all worldly defilements and afflictions. 
They expound the wondrous teaching to sentient beings, skillfully arranging it, causing them to cultivate pure practices, always endeavoring to embody all roots of goodness. 
“At such a time the enlightening beings dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings always attain a retinue of innumerable concentrations, the supreme concentration of enlightening beings, continuing uninterrupted; may all sentient beings always delight in seeing Buddha and enter absorption in the adornments of Buddhas; may all sentient beings accomplish the inconceivable concentration of enlightening beings, sporting freely in immeasurable spiritual powers; may all sentient beings enter concentration in accord with truth and attain incorruptible minds; may all sentient beings thoroughly attain the most profound concentration of enlightening beings, and realize freedom in all meditations and concentrations; may all sentient beings attain liberated minds and accomplish the group of all concentration states; may all sentient beings attain skill in all kinds of concentration, able to take in all aspects of concentration; may all sentient beings attain concentration of supreme knowledge, able to learn and practice the various methods of concentration; may all sentient beings attain unobstructed concentration and enter into deep meditation concentration, never regressing or losing it; may all sentient beings attain unattached concentration, their minds always sensing truly and not grasping duality.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving away their retinues, because they want to cause all sentient beings to gain indestructible pure retinues, because they want to cause all sentient beings to gain retinues of enlightening beings, because they want to cause all sentient beings to be able to fulfill the powers of omniscience, because they want to cause all sentient beings to realize supreme wisdom, because they want to cause all sentient beings to have amenable retinues, because they want to cause all sentient beings to attain the pure reality-body of the enlightened, because they want to cause all sentient beings to attain orderly, reasonable powers of elucidation and skillfully expound the inexhaustible treasury of the Buddha’s teachings, because they want to cause all sentient beings to forever relinquish all conventional mundane virtues and equally cultivate pure transmundane virtues, because they want to cause all sentient beings’ purifying work to be complete, and develop all pure qualities, and because they want to cause all Buddha teachings to be evident to all sentient beings, universally purified by the light of truth. 
“Great enlightening beings can give away their beloved spouses and children, as did the Loving Prince, Adornment Manifesting King, and countless other great enlightening beings. At such a time, the enlightening beings mount the mind of all-knowledge, carry out total giving, and purely cultivate the path of giving of enlightening beings, their minds clear and without regret. 
They give up what they prize in quest of omniscience, to cause sentient beings to have profound, pure aspirations, accomplish the practice of enlightenment, observe the path of enlightening beings, reflect on the enlightenment of the Buddhas, and abide in the family of Buddhas. 
“When great enlightening beings have developed such a giving mind, they determine to seek the body of buddhahood; they observe their own bodies to be bound to everything and unable to be independent. 
Still, they help all sentient beings with their own bodies, like continents of treasure, giving all, causing the unfulfilled to be fulfilled. 
Thus do enlightening beings care for sentient beings, wishing to cause their own bodies to be the best of monuments, to cause all to become joyful. 
They want to create an egalitarian, equanimous attitude in the world. 
They want to be reservoirs of pure coolness for sentient beings. 
They want to give all peace and happiness to sentient beings. 
They want to be great donors to sentient beings. They are capable of such magnificent commitments because their knowledge is free and they know the practices carried out by enlightening beings. 
Proceeding toward omniscience, they vow to become supremely wise fields of blessings. 
They care for all sentient beings and always follow and protect them, while being able to accomplish their own salvation. Their light of knowledge and wisdom illumines the whole world. They always conscientiously remember the generosity of enlightening beings and always raptly contemplate the sphere of realization of thusness. 
“Great enlightening beings dedicate the roots of virtue collected by giving away spouses and children with unbound, unattached, liberated minds in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings, abiding in the enlightenment of Buddhahood, produce phantom bodies pervading the cosmos, turning the wheel of teaching that never turns back; may all sentient beings attain the body of nonattachment and go to all buddha-fields by the power of will; may all sentient beings give up the mind of love and hate and sever the knot of greed and anger; may all sentient beings be children of the Buddhas, following the course of the Buddhas; may all sentient beings steadfastly think of the Buddhas as themselves; may all sentient beings always be children of Buddha, born by transformation from the teaching; may all sentient beings reach the ultimate and accomplish the independent knowledge and wisdom of the enlightened; may all sentient beings realize the enlightenment of buddhahood and be forever free of afflictions; may all sentient beings be able to fully expound the way to enlightenment, always blissfully practicing the giving of the unsurpassed teaching; may all sentient beings attain a rightly concentrated mind, their concentration unbroken by any objects; may all sentient beings sit at the tree of enlightenment, attain supreme true awakening, and teach innumerable good men and women born by transformation from the teaching.’ This is enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving spouses and children, to cause sentient beings to all realize the unattached knowledge of unhindered liberation. 
“Great enlightening beings give houses and furniture to any who ask for them, practicing the principle of generosity, having no attachments to home, leaving behind all thoughts of home life, fed up with family business, having no craving or taste for comforts and conveniences. 
Their minds are without ties or attachments; they know the household is fragile, and they disdain it, having no craving for it at all, only wanting to leave home and cultivate the practices of enlightening beings, adorning themselves with the enlightening teachings and qualities of buddhahood. 
They give up all without regret, always praised by the Buddhas, generously giving whatever they have—houses, goods—wherever they are, without attachment in their minds. 
When they see beggars come they are joyful, and the enlightening beings dedicate these roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings be liberated from the ties of householding, enter homelessness, and cultivate religious practice in Buddhism; may all sentient beings get rid of the taint of miserliness and gladly give all, their minds never shrinking back; may all sentient beings forever detach from householding, have few desires, be content, not storing anything; may all sentient beings leave the home of conventional society and live in the home of the enlightened; may all sentient beings be free from clinging to home and family, and though they live at home have no attachment in their minds; may all sentient beings be skillful teachers and guides, expounding enlightened wisdom without leaving lay life; may all sentient beings, while physically living at home, mentally always live in accord with Buddha-knowledge; may all sentient beings, while in the state of lay home life, dwell in the state of buddhahood and cause infinite sentient beings to develop joyful minds.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving houses, to cause sentient beings to accomplish the various practical vows and spiritual powers and knowledge of enlightening beings. 
“Great enlightening beings give all kinds of gardens, groves, terraces, and pleasant parks, with this thought: 
‘I should make a fine grove for all sentient beings; I should show all sentient beings the pleasure of the teaching; I should give all sentient beings joy; I should show all sentient beings boundless enjoyment; I should open the gate of the teaching of purity for all sentient beings; I should cause all sentient beings’ minds to swell with joy; I should cause all beings to attain complete enlightenment; I should cause all beings to fulfill the great vow; I should be like a benevolent father to all sentient beings; I should cause all sentient beings to observe with knowledge and wisdom; I should give all beings the necessities of life; I should be like a loving mother to all sentient beings, nurturing all roots of goodness and great aspirations.’ “When great enlightening beings cultivate roots of goodness like this, they do not detest evil sentient beings and do not make the mistake of thinking to reject them; even if all the beings in the world are ingrates, they never have any hatred or resentment, and never give a thought to revenge—they only want to annihilate their innumerable sufferings and afflictions. 
In all worlds their minds are like space, unaffected and unattached; everywhere they observe the true character of all things. 
They take the great vow to extinguish the suffering of sentient beings, never wearying of or abandoning the determination of the Great Vehicle. 
Annihilating all views, they cultivate the impartial practice and vows of enlightening beings. 
“Great enlightening beings, having contemplated in this way, unify all their roots of goodness and dedicate them all in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings richly produce innumerable good qualities moment to moment, and develop minds like supreme gardens and groves; may all sentient beings attain imperturbability, see all Buddhas, and make them happy; may all sentient beings enjoy the garden of truth and attain to sublime enjoyment of the gardens of the buddha-lands; may all sentient beings attain pure minds and always see the garden of psychic powers of the enlightened ones; may all sentient beings attain the playful enjoyment of buddhahood, always sporting in the realm of wisdom; may all sentient beings attain the pleasure of carefree roaming, traveling to the assemblies at enlightenment sites in buddha-fields everywhere; may all sentient beings accomplish the liberated roaming of enlightening beings and carry out the practices of enlightening beings throughout the future without ever tiring of it; may all sentient beings see all Buddhas filling the cosmos, develop vastly broad minds, and abide in the groves of buddhahood; may all sentient beings be able to go to all buddha-fields and give offerings to the buddhas in each and every field; may all sentient beings attain hearts of good desires, purifying and adorning all buddha-fields.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when giving away all gardens, groves, and terraces. 
“Great enlightening beings perform countless great charitable works, all pure, approved by the Buddhas, never injuring a single sentient being, causing all sentient beings to avoid all evils, to purify their action, speech, and thought, and to achieve wisdom. 
They clear countless spheres of purity and pile up therein countless fine things to support life; activating the most rarely attained spirit of enlightenment, they practice unlimited giving, causing sentient beings to abide in the path of purity, good in the beginning, the middle, and the end, and to engender pure faith. 
They gladden countless sentient beings according to their hearts’ desires; with great benevolence and compassion they bring all to safety. 
They serve and provide for the Buddhas of the past, present, and future. 
Because they want to develop the seed of Buddhahood, they practice giving without regret in their hearts, increasing the development of the faculty of faith, fulfilling superlative conduct, moment to moment progressing to transcendence. 
“At such times the enlightening beings dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings develop the mind of the Great Vehicle and be able to accomplish the giving of the Great Vehicle; may all sentient beings be able to carry out giving to the masses, total giving, good giving, supreme giving, unexcelled giving, most unsurpassable giving, incomparable giving, giving transcending all worlds, giving praised by all the Buddhas; may all sentient beings become the best of donors, rescuing sentient beings from the various conditions of misery and enabling them to enter the path of unobstructed knowledge, cultivating impartial vows, roots of goodness in accord with truth, attaining nondiscrimination, realizing inherent knowledge; may all sentient beings abide securely in the dispassionate, serene knowledge of meditation concentrations, enter the undying path, consummate knowledge of all spiritual powers, persevere bravely to fulfill the enlightened qualities adorning all the stages and reach the other shore, never turning back; may all sentient beings set up great charities without ever wearying, providing for and helping sentient beings unceasingly, consummating the unexcelled knowledge of all means of liberation; may all sentient beings always diligently plant all roots of goodness, and reach the other shore of myriad virtues; may all sentient beings always be praised by the Buddhas and be great donors in the world, replete with virtues, filling the cosmos, illumining the ten directions, giving unexcelled happiness; may all sentient beings establish great charities, widely gathering roots of goodness, equally including all sentient beings, and arrive at the other shore; may all sentient beings accomplish supreme giving, causing sentient beings everywhere to abide in the foremost vehicle; may all sentient beings give at appropriate times, forever avoid improper timing, and consummate great giving; may all sentient beings accomplish good giving and reach the other shore of great giving of the Buddhas; may all sentient beings ultimately always carry on magnificent giving, considering all Buddhas their teachers, able to approach them all and make great offerings; may all sentient beings abide in pure giving, gathering infinite virtues, equal to the cosmos, and reach the other shore; may all sentient beings be great donors in all worlds, vowing to liberate all creatures and live in the realm of the enlightened.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness when establishing great charities, to cause sentient beings to practice supreme giving, giving to consummate buddhahood, giving to perfect goodness, incorruptible giving, giving of offerings to Buddhas, giving without resentment, giving to save sentient beings, giving to attain omniscience, giving to always see the Buddhas, giving with great perseverence, great giving to perfect the virtues of all enlightening beings and the knowledge and wisdom of buddhahood. 
“Great enlightening beings give all necessities of life unbegrudgingly, without seeking reward, without hoping for worldly prosperity or happiness. 
They rid the mind of errant thought, and meditate well on the truth, because they want to benefit all sentient beings and clearly perceive the true nature of all things. 
According to the various different needs of sentient beings, they prepare innumerable things to support life, the embellishments of which are all fine and beautiful. 
They carry out unbounded giving, total giving, and giving of everything internal and external. When they carry out this giving, they increase their power of determination, gain great virtue, perfect the jewel of mind, and are ever able to safeguard all sentient beings, causing them all to develop the most excellent aspirations, yet with never a thought of seeking reward. 
Their roots of goodness are equal to those of the Buddhas of past, present, and future, and by them they all fulfill the knowledge of all means of liberation. 
“Great enlightening beings dedicate all the roots of goodness in this giving to sentient beings, that all sentient beings may be purified and master themselves; that all sentient beings may extinguish afflictions and purify all buddha-fields; that all sentient beings, with a pure mind, may pervade the cosmos in a single moment of thought; that all sentient beings may fill the cosmos of space with knowledge; that all sentient beings attain universal knowledge, enter everywhere in the three realms of desire, form, and formlessness, and tame sentient beings, at all times turning the irreversible wheel of the pure teaching; that all sentient beings may be endowed with omniscience and be able to manifest the techniques of spiritual powers to benefit sentient beings; that all sentient beings be able to awaken to complete enlightenment and forever ceaselessly expound the true teaching in all regions, causing all beings to get to hear and know of it; that all sentient beings may cultivate the practices of enlightening beings for countless eons and manage to fulfill them all; that all sentient beings may cultivate the practices of enlightening beings in all worlds that may be accounted or spoken of, be they defiled or pure worlds, small or large, gross or subtle, inverted or upright, uniformly or variously adorned, extending throughout them all; that all sentient beings may in every passing moment perform the work of Buddhas of past, present, and future, teaching and transforming sentient beings and turning them toward universal knowledge. 
“Great enlightening beings provide sentient beings with everything they need, in order to cause the Buddha-teaching to continue unbroken. 
With great compassion they save all sentient beings. Abiding stably in great benevolence, they cultivate the practices of enlightening beings. 
They never violate the teachings of the Buddha; with skill in means, they practice whatever is good, not letting the lineage of Buddhas die out. 
They give whatever is required, without being troubled; they give all with never a regret, being always earnestly dedicated to the path of universal knowledge. “At such times, the various forms and species of living creatures from the lands of the ten directions, various fields of blessings, all come and gather around the enlightening beings, making various requests of them: the enlightening beings, seeing them, receive them all, their hearts becoming joyful, like seeing good friends; with great compassion and mercy they want to satisfy their wishes. 
Their generosity increases unceasingly, and without weariness; they fulfill their requests, satisfying them according to their needs, freeing them from the miseries of destitution. Then the seekers are very happy and spread the voice of praise of the virtue of the enlightening beings, so that their good repute becomes widespread and everyone comes to them. 
The joy of the enlightening beings upon seeing them has no measure—even if one experienced the pleasures of Indra, king of gods, for a trillion quadrillion eons, experienced the pleasures of the Suyama heaven for countless eons, experienced the pleasures of the Tushita heaven for immeasurable eons, experienced the pleasures of the heaven of good emanations for boundless eons, experienced the pleasures of the heaven of free enjoyment of others’ emanations for incomparable eons, experienced the pleasures of the Brahma kings for uncountable eons, experienced the three thousand royal pleasures of world monarchs for unaccountable eons, experienced the pleasures of the heaven of universal purity for unthinkable eons, and experienced the pleasures of the heaven of pure abodes for unspeakably many eons, none of it could equal the joy and delight of great enlightening beings upon seeing the needy come to them. 
They are happy and ebullient, their faith grows, their aspiration is pure, their faculties are harmoniously tuned, their resolution is fully developed, and they progress toward complete enlightenment. 
“The great enlightening beings dedicate these roots of goodness to the welfare of all sentient beings, to the peace and happiness of all sentient beings, to the true benefit of all sentient beings, to the purification of all sentient beings, to induce all sentient beings to seek enlightenment, to cause all sentient beings to attain equality, to cause all sentient beings to attain intelligent, benevolent minds, to cause all sentient beings to enter the Great Vehicle, to cause all sentient beings to attain wisdom, and to cause all sentient beings to fulfill the practical undertakings of the Universally Good enlightening being, fulfill the vehicle of the ten powers, and actually realize true awakening. “When great enlightening beings dedicate roots of goodness this way, they are liberated in word, thought, and deed; they have no attachments or bonds, no concept of sentient beings, no concept of a life, no concept of a personality, no concept of a person, no concept of a youth, no concept of one born, no concept of an agent, no concept of a receiver, no concept of existence, no concept of nonexistence, no concept of present life or afterlife, no concept of dying here and being born there, no concept of permanence, no concept of impermanence, no concept of the three realms of existence, no concept of the nonexistence of the three realms; they are not perceiving, nor are they not perceiving. 
Thus, they are not practicing dedication bound, not practicing dedication liberated from bonds, not practicing dedication by action, not practicing dedication by the results of action, not practicing dedication with discrimination, not practicing dedication indiscriminately, not practicing dedication thinking, not practicing dedication after thought, not practicing dedication with mind, not practicing dedication mindlessly. 
“When great enlightening beings practice dedication in this way, they do not cling to inside or outside, subject or object, cause or effect, right or wrong, thought or nonthought, from the birth of form, the passing away of form, or to sensation, perception, patterning, or consciousness, or to the birth or passing away of sensation, perception, patterning, or consciousness. 
If great enlightening beings are able to not be bound by these things, then they are not bound by form or by the birth or passing away of form; they are not bound by sensation, perception, patterning, or consciousness, or by the birth or passing away of sensation, perception, patterning, or consciousness. 
If they are able to not be bound by these things, then they also are not released from these things. 
Because there does not exist the slightest thing being born, already born, or to be born—there is nothing that can be apprehended, nothing that can be clung to. All things are inherently like this—they have no intrinsic nature of their own: they are intrinsically incompatible with any characterization, neither one nor two, not many and not infinite, not small or large, not narrow or broad, not deep or shallow, not nullity and not concepts, not so and not not so, not truth and not not truth, not substantial and not insubstantial, not existent and not nonexistent. 
Enlightening beings thus see things as not things, while in terms of speech they follow convention in defining what are not things as things: 
they do not cut off the paths of action and do not give up enlightening practices; they seek omniscience without ever turning back. They know that all conditions of action are like dreams, that sounds and voices are like echoes, that sentient beings are like shadows, that all things are like phantoms—yet they do not deny the power of the action of causes and conditions; they know that the function of actions is far-reaching. They understand that all things do nothing, and traverse the path of nondoing without ever giving it up. 
“These great enlightening beings abide in universal knowledge, dedicating all, whether positive or negative, to omniscience—they practice dedication in all places without ever retreating. 
In what senses, by what meanings, is it called dedication? 
It is called dedication because of having crossed over the world forever and arrived at the other shore. 
It is called dedication because of crossing over the path of speech and arriving at the other shore. 
It is called dedication because of leaving behind all sorts of concepts and reaching the other shore. 
It is called dedication because of having forever ended the idea of corporeality and arrived at the other shore. 
It is called dedication because of having left dependency behind forever and reached the other shore. 
It is called dedication because of having ended contrivance forever and reached the other shore. 
It is called dedication because of having left all states of existence forever and arrived at the other shore. 
It is called dedication because of having abandoned all grasping forever and arrived at the other shore. 
It is called dedication because of having left all worldly things forever and arrived at the other shore. 
“When great enlightening beings practice dedication in this way, then they are living in accord with the Buddha, in accord with the Truth, in accord with knowledge, in accord with enlightenment, in accord with its meaning, in accord with its sphere, in accord with its practice, in accord with reality, and in accord with purity. 
When great enlightening beings practice dedication in this way, then they comprehend all things; then they serve all Buddhas; there is not a single Buddha they do not attend, not a single thing they do not offer; there is not a single thing that can be destroyed, not a single thing that can be turned away from, not a single thing that can be clung to, not a single thing that can be avoided. They do not see anything at all, internal or external, that has any disintegration or violates causality. They are replete with the power of the teaching, and never cease. 
“This is the sixth of the great enlightening beings’ dedications, following up and making permanent all roots of goodness, causing them to endure. 
When great enlightening beings abide in this dedication, they are always in the care of the Buddhas; they firmly endure, unregressing, and enter the profound essence of things, cultivating universal knowledge. 
They accord with the meaning of the Teaching, accord with the nature of things, accord with all enduring roots of goodness, accord with all completely fulfilled great vows, and fully embody the truth which accords with perdurance, which cannot be broken by even the adamant. 
In the midst of all things they attain independence.” Then the enlightening being Diamond Banner, surveying the ten directions, looking over the assembled masses, and viewing the cosmos, entered into the most profound meaning of verbal expression, cultivated an immeasurably broad mind, covered the whole world with the mind of great compassion, developed the mind of the family of Buddhas of past, future, and present, entered into the virtues of all Buddhas, perfected the body of independent powers of the Buddhas, observed the mental inclinations of sentient beings, and, according to their roots of goodness that could be developed and matured, manifested physical bodies to them based on the body of the essence of things. Imbued with spiritual power from the Buddha, he said in verse, Enlightening beings appear physically as monarchs In the highest worldly ranks, Their virtues and glory surpassing all, Providing benefit for all living creatures. 
Their minds are pure, without attachment; They are masters of the world, respected by all. They promulgate true teaching to educate people, And cause sentient beings everywhere to attain peace. 
Manifesting birth among the noble, rising to monarchy, They always carry on the teaching according to the truth. Benevolent by nature, free from cruelty, All in the ten directions look up to them and obey them. 
Their knowledge and discernment always clear, Their capacities are fully complete. As rulers and leaders they are followed by all; They crush the armies of demons and annihilate them. 
They hold fast to pure morality, without transgression; With firm determination they forbear, unshakably. They vow to forever clear away anger from the mind And always gladly practice the teachings of Buddha. 
Food and drink, perfumes and garlands, as well as clothes, Vehicles, chairs, cushions, and lamps— Enlightening beings give these to people to help them, And give innumerable other kinds of things as well. 
They practice giving to be of aid, Causing them to open their hearts. In regard to the Supreme as well as others Their minds are pure and full of joy. 
Enlightening beings provide for all, Able to give up everything they have, internal and external, Unfailingly causing their minds to be forever pure And never to be narrow or mean. 
They may give their heads or eyes Or give their hands or feet, Skin, flesh, bones, marrow, and so on— All they give up unbegrudgingly. 
Enlightening beings, on the throne of royalty, Of the most noble of tribes, Open their mouths and put forth their tongues to give living beings, Their hearts joyful, without sorrow or attachment. 
The virtues of giving their tongues They dedicate to all sentient beings, Praying that based on this excellent cause All may attain the universal tongue of the enlightened. 
They may give their spouses and children, or their royal rank, Or give themselves to be servants; Their minds are pure and always joyful, Thus they have no remorse or regret. 
They give whatever is required, Aiding according to the time, unwearied; All they have they can disburse So that all seekers be satisfied. 
They give their bodies to hear the teaching And practice austerities seeking enlightenment; And for the sake of the living they give up all, Seeking unexcelled knowledge without turning back. 
By the true teaching heard from the Buddhas They give up their bodies to be servants, Because they want to save all living beings; They develop a mind of infinite joy. 
They see the World-Honored Guide Can bring widespread weal with kindness; Then they dance with joy And absorb the savor of the profound teaching of enlightenment. 
Whatever roots of goodness enlightening beings have They dedicate all to sentient beings; They rescue all without exception, Forever liberating them, so they’re eternally at peace. 
Enlightening beings’ retinues Are attractive, talented, eloquent and intelligent, Adorned with all manner of embellishments— Flower garlands, clothes, and perfumes: 
These retinues, rare as they are, Enlightening beings are able to give away, Wholeheartedly seeking true enlightenment to liberate beings, Never for a moment giving up this determination. 
Enlightening beings thus think clearly And fully carry out various great works, Dedicating all to conscious beings Without developing a grasping mind. 
Enlightening beings give up their royal ranks As well as their land and cities, Palaces, bowers, gardens, and groves, Servants and attendants, all ungrudgingly. 
Over countless millions of eons They travel everywhere giving, Whereby they teach and lead living beings, Causing them to ascend to the unexcelled shore. 
Countless species, each different, Come and gather from all worlds; Seeing them, enlightening beings are joyful And satisfy them according to need. 
Like the dedication of the Buddhas of all times Enlightening beings perform similar works; The course of the Human Taming Lords They emulate to reach the other shore. 
Enlightening beings examine all things: Who can comprehend these things? What is comprehension, what is comprehended? Thus their giving dwells nowhere. 
The adaptive knowledge of enlightening beings’ dedication, The expedient methods of enlightening beings’ dedication, The true meaning of enlightening beings’ dedication: They have no attachment to those things. 
Their minds do not conceptualize actions arbitrarily, And they are not obsessed with results of action; They know the nature of enlightenment comes from conditions, And enter the profound realm of reality, without opposition. 
They do not have action in their bodies, Nor does it dwell in the mind. By wisdom they realize there’s no essence to action, Yet due to causality action’s not lost. 
Their minds do not wrongly grasp things of the past, Nor crave for things of the future, Nor dwell on aught in the present: They know the three times are all void. 
Enlightening beings have already reached the other shore of form And of sensation, perception, patternings, and consciousness; They go beyond the flow of birth and death in the world, Their minds humble and always pure. 
They clearly analyze the five clusters, eighteen elements, Twelve sense media, and their own bodies, Looking for enlightenment in each: Their essential nature cannot be grasped. 
They do not cling to appearances of permanence in things, Nor cling to the appearance of annihilation: The nature of things is neither existent nor nonexistent, While the process of the principle of action ultimately never ends. 
They do not dwell on anything at all, Do not see “sentient beings” or “enlightenment”: Throughout all lands in all times They ultimately find they cannot be found. If one can see things in this way, One will accord with the understanding of the Buddhas; Though one seek their essence, it cannot be found, Yet enlightening beings’ practices are not in vain. 
Enlightening beings understand things exist due to conditions, And they do not deviate from the paths they should travel. 
They clarify and explain the marks of all actions, Wanting to purify all sentient beings. 
This is the path traversed by the wise, Taught by all the enlightened ones; Following it reflectively, entering the true meaning, One will naturally awaken and become enlightened. Phenomena have no birth or extinction, And they have no coming or going; Not dying here and reborn there— Such people understand the Buddha teachings. 
Comprehending the true nature of things, Yet not conceptualizing the nature of things, Knowing things have no essence and no discrimination— Such people can enter the Buddha’s knowledge. The nature of things is in all places, All sentient beings and all lands, In all times, past, present, and future, Yet has no apprehensible form. 
That which the Buddhas all realize Is all-inclusive, omitting naught. Though they explain all things in all times, All these things are not existent. As the nature of things pervades everywhere, So does the dedication of enlightening beings: Thus dedicated to sentient beings, They never retreat from the world. 
“What is great enlightening beings’ dedication equally adapting and according to all sentient beings? 
The enlightening beings accord with whatever roots of goodness they have accumulated—small roots of goodness, great roots of goodness, extensive roots of goodness, manifold roots of goodness, measureless roots of goodness, various roots of goodness, roots of goodness as numerous as atoms, incalculable roots of goodness, boundless roots of goodness, inconceivable roots of goodness, immeasurable roots of goodness, roots of goodness of the sphere of buddhahood, roots of goodness of the sphere of the teaching, roots of goodness of the sphere of the religious community, roots of goodness of the sphere of teachers, roots of goodness of the spheres of all sentient beings, roots of goodness of the sphere of skill in means, roots of goodness of the sphere of cultivation of good states of mind, internal roots of goodness, external roots of goodness, roots of goodness of the sphere of boundless aids to the fostering of enlightenment, roots of goodness of diligently cultivating universal relinquishment, roots of goodness of establishing supreme determination and ultimately keeping pure precepts, roots of goodness of equanimously enduring all, roots of goodness of constant, unregressing perseverence, roots of goodness of entering innumerable concentrations by great skill in means, roots of goodness of skillful analysis by knowledge and wisdom, roots of goodness of knowing the differences in mental patterns of all sentient beings, roots of goodness of universally protecting and nurturing all worlds. 
“Great enlightening beings cultivate and live by these roots of goodness, entering into them, absorbing them, accumulating them, fully developing them; their awareness and understanding clear, they demonstrate and put them into action. 
Then they attain forbearance, close the doors of the courses of misery, skillfully embody roots of goodness, bear themselves with complete dignity, get rid of delusion, and fulfill correct action. 
They are capable of being vessels of the Buddha teaching, and can be fertile fields of blessings and virtue for sentient beings. 
In the care of the Buddhas, they develop the roots of goodness of buddhahood, live by the vows of Buddhas, and carry out the works of the Buddhas. Their minds attain freedom equal to the Buddhas of past, present, and future; they proceed to the site of Buddhas’ enlightenment, plunge into the power of the Enlightened, and are endowed with the marks of Buddhas. 
Transcending all worlds, they do not desire birth in a heaven, do not covet wealth and pleasure, and do not cling to activities. Dedicating all roots of goodness, they are mines of virtue for sentient beings. Abiding in the ultimate path, they envelop all. 
They remove sentient beings from the paths of delusion and cause them to live by all good principles. They reach all realms, uninterrupted and inexhaustible, opening the gates of omniscient enlightenment, setting up the banner of knowledge, clarifying the Great Path, able to show it to all worldlings, causing them to get rid of impurity. 
Their minds well trained, they are born in the house of the enlightened and purify their buddha-nature. Replete with virtuous qualities, they are great fields of blessings; a refuge for the world, they firmly stabilize sentient beings, purifying them all, diligently cultivating all roots of goodness. 
“When great enlightening beings cultivate roots of goodness by the power of pure determination for enlightenment, they think in these terms: ‘These roots of goodness are accumulated by the aspiration for enlightenment, thought of by the aspiration for enlightenment, initiated by the aspiration for enlightenment, willed by the aspiration for enlightenment, caused to grow by the aspiration for enlightenment: they are all due to pity for all sentient beings; they are for the quest for knowledge of all ways of liberation; they are all for the sake of accomplishing the ten powers of the enlightened.’ While they thus reflect, their roots of goodness develop further, never regressing. 
“Great enlightening beings also form this thought: ‘May I practice the deeds of enlightening beings forever by these roots of goodness, giving them all to sentient beings, dedicating them all to all sentient beings, including all, excepting none. May they cause countless worlds to be filled with treasures, countless worlds to be filled with raiment, countless worlds to be filled with fine fragrances, countless worlds to be filled with adornments, countless worlds to be filled with infinite jewels, countless worlds to be filled with exquisite flowers, countless worlds to be filled with fine flavorings, countless worlds to be filled with goods, countless worlds to be filled with chairs covered with jeweled screens and spread with fine fabrics, countless worlds to be filled with jeweled crowns variously adorned—even if one person should be forever coming seeking, I would give these things unceasingly; and as for one, so would I do for all sentient beings.’ “When great enlightening beings give in this way, they have no mind of falsehood or artifice, no mind of seeking or expectation, no desire for name and fame, no regret, no irritating afflictions in their minds; they only develop a mind solely intent on the path of universal knowledge, a mind to give away everything, a mind of pity for sentient beings, a mind to teach and perfect, a mind to cause all to abide in the mind of omniscient knowledge. 
Great enlightening beings dedicate the roots of goodness in this way, forever carrying out generous giving. 
“Great enlightening beings also form this thought: 
‘For the sake of even one sentient being I would like to cause countless worlds to be filled with prize tame elephants, with gold banners, covered with gold mesh, adorned with all kinds of jewels, to use as gifts; I would cause countless worlds to be filled with prize horses, adorned with all kinds of precious ornaments, to use as gifts; I would cause countless worlds to be filled with female musicians capable of playing all sorts of beautiful music, to use for giving; I would cause countless worlds to be filled with my own body, arousing the will for enlightenment, to use for giving; I would cause countless worlds to be filled with my own head, developing a nonindulgent mind, to use for giving; I would cause countless worlds to be filled with my own eyes to use for giving; I would cause countless worlds to be filled with my body’s blood, flesh, bones and marrow, without feeling any attachment, to use for giving; I would cause countless worlds to be filled with the rank of sovereign to use for giving; I would cause countless worlds to be filled with servants, to use for giving.’ Great enlightening beings give various such things to one sentient being, abiding in a magnanimous, totally generous state of mind; and as to one, so do they give to all sentient beings in the whole realm of sentient beings. 
“Great enlightening beings perform the acts of enlightening beings throughout the future in one world, giving such things to one and all, satisfying everyone; and as they do in one world, so also do they do in all worlds in space throughout the cosmos. 
They cover all with great compassion, unremittingly, extending sympathy and mercy to all, providing them with what they need. 
They do not let conditions stop their practice of giving, and never grow weary of it, even for a moment. 
“When great enlightening beings give in this way, they give rise to these frames of mind: 
an unattached mind, an unfettered mind, a liberated mind, a mind of great strength, an extremely profound mind, a well-concentrated mind, a nonclinging mind, a nonsubjective mind, a well-controlled mind, an undistracted mind, a mind without arbitrary conceptions, a mind endowed with all kinds of precious essences, a mind not seeking reward, a mind comprehending all things, a mind abiding in great dedication, a mind skillfully determining meanings, a mind to cause all sentient beings to abide in unexcelled knowledge, a mind producing the great light of truth, a mind entering omniscient knowledge. 
“In every moment of thought great enlightening beings dedicate the roots of goodness they have gathered in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings have abundant wealth and lack nothing; may all sentient beings develop inexhaustible stores of great virtues; may all sentient beings fully experience all peace and happiness; may all sentient beings develop and extend the work of great enlightening beings; may all sentient beings fulfill infinite supreme qualities; may all sentient beings gain the vehicle of universal knowledge, which never rolls back; may all sentient beings see all the Buddhas of the ten directions; may all sentient beings be forever rid of the dust and dirt of confusions and delusions of the world; may all sentient beings attain pure, impartial minds; may all sentient beings be free from difficulties and attain omniscience.’ “When great enlightening beings practice dedication in this way, they are inspired with joy: 
it is to cause all sentient beings to gain well-being and peace; to cause all sentient beings to attain impartial minds; to cause all sentient beings to live with a mind capable of relinquishment; to cause all sentient beings to live with an all-giving mind; to cause all sentient beings to live with a joyfully giving mind; to cause all beings to live with a mind to give to bring eternal freedom from destitution; to cause all sentient beings to live with a mind to give all goods and treasures; to cause all sentient beings to live with a mind of universal giving, immeasurable giving, total giving; to cause all sentient beings to live with a mind to unending giving; to cause all sentient beings to live with a mind giving away all without regret or affliction; to cause all sentient beings to live with a mind to give away all things to support life; to cause all sentient beings to live with a mind to appropriate giving; to cause all sentient beings to live with a mind to inclusive giving; to cause all sentient beings to live with a mind of extensive, great giving; to cause all sentient beings to live with a mind to give away unlimited adornments as offerings; to cause all sentient beings to live with a mind of giving without attachment; to cause all sentient beings to live with a mind of equanimous, impartial giving; to cause all sentient beings to live with a mind of giving with extremely great adamantine strength; to cause all sentient beings to live with a mind giving like the light of the sun; to cause all sentient beings to live with a giving mind embracing the wisdom of the enlightened; to cause all sentient beings to be fully accompanied by roots of goodness; to cause all sentient beings to always be in the presence of roots of goodness, knowledge, and wisdom; to cause all sentient beings to attain the fullness of incorruptible pure minds; to cause all sentient beings to develop the most pure roots of goodness; to cause all sentient beings to wake up from the stupefaction of afflictions; to cause all sentient beings to annihilate all doubt and confusion; to cause all sentient beings to attain the pure virtues of equanimous knowledge; to cause all sentient beings’ virtuous qualities to be fully developed and immune to deterioration or corruption; to cause all sentient beings to have pure, imperturbable concentration; to cause all sentient beings to abide in indestructible omniscience; to cause all sentient beings to fully accomplish the functions of innumerable enlightening beings’ pure spiritual powers; to cause all sentient beings to accumulate roots of goodness free from attachment; to cause all sentient beings to think of all Buddhas of past, present, and future with pure minds; to cause all sentient beings to produce superlative pure roots of goodness; to cause all sentient beings to eliminate all hindrances to enlightenment produced by the action of demons; to cause all sentient beings to be fully endowed with unobstructed, pure, equal virtuous qualities; to cause all sentient beings to open wide the doors of all roots of goodness and be able to fully develop pure virtues; to cause all sentient beings to always recollect the Buddhas with a broad mind, never slacking or giving up; to cause all sentient beings to always approach the Buddhas and diligently attend them; to cause all sentient beings to have immeasurable minds, broad and great minds, most excellent minds, thoroughly pure; to cause all sentient beings to develop minds of pure impartial generosity; to cause all sentient beings to keep the Buddhas’ precepts equally and purely; to cause all sentient beings to attain great transcendent forbearance; to cause all sentient beings to have transcendent energy, never becoming lazy; to cause all sentient beings to abide in immeasurable concentration and be able to awaken all kinds of spiritual knowledge; to cause all sentient beings to attain transcendent wisdom knowing all phenomena have no inherent nature; to cause all sentient beings to fulfill the infinite pure realm of truth; to cause all sentient beings to fully develop the pure roots of goodness of all mystic powers; to cause all sentient beings to abide in the practice of impartiality, build up good qualities, and perfect them all; to cause all sentient beings to be able to comprehensively enter the spheres of all Buddhas; to cause all sentient beings to be universally pure in thought, word, and deed; to cause the results of all sentient beings’ good works to be universally pure; to cause all sentient beings’ understanding of all things to be universally pure; to cause all sentient beings’ realization of true meaning to be universally pure; to cause all sentient beings’ cultivation of excellent practices to be universally pure; to cause all sentient beings to fulfill the great vows of all enlightening beings with universal purity; to cause all sentient beings to fulfill all roots of goodness based on unity of being and to dedicate them to the production of the vehicle of universal knowledge, perfecting them in every way; to cause all sentient beings to realize all virtues and knowledge with universal purity; to cause all sentient beings to fully develop vision of all Buddhas without attachment; to cause all sentient beings to be endowed with Buddhas’ marks and embellishments, their adornments of virtue fully complete; to cause all sentient beings to fully develop clear speech, thoroughly trustworthy, adorned with a hundred thousand qualities, replete with the unhindered subtle voice of the Buddhas; to cause all sentient beings to attain unobstructed, equanimous minds adorned by the ten powers; to cause all sentient beings to attain the inexhaustible light of truth of all Buddhas, with all powers of elucidation fully developed; to cause all sentient beings to manage the Lion’s Roar of the unexcelled fearless hero among humans; to cause all sentient beings to attain universal knowledge and turn the wheel of teaching which never rolls back; to cause all sentient beings to have full comprehension of all the teachings and to reveal and expound them; to cause all sentient beings to cultivate pure ways appropriate to the times, fully developing them; to cause all sentient beings to equally and purely perfect the unexcelled treasures of teachings of the Guide; to cause all sentient beings to fully perfect individual adornments, innumerable adornments, great adornments, the adornments of all Buddhas; to cause all sentient beings to equally penetrate all objects in all times, reaching them all; to cause all sentient beings to be able to go to all buddha-fields, listen to and absorb the true teachings; to cause all sentient beings’ wisdom and altruism to be honored by the world, equal to the Buddhas’; to cause all sentient beings to know all things comprehensively by means of universal knowledge; to cause all sentient beings to carry out the practice of unshakability and realize the fruit of nonobstruction, consummating these in every way; to cause all sentient beings’ roots of goodness to evolve into spiritual powers, able to know the faculties of all living beings; to cause all sentient beings to attain nondiscriminatory, impartial knowledge, universally pure in regard to unity; to cause all sentient beings not to deviate from truth and to be endowed with all roots of goodness; to cause all sentient beings to clearly comprehend all the autonomous spiritual powers of enlightening beings; to cause all sentient beings to attain the inexhaustible virtues of all Buddhas, completely equal whether in terms of virtue or knowledge; to cause all sentient beings to arouse the determination for enlightenment and to understand perfectly the equality and unity of all things; to cause all sentient beings to comprehend the truth and become the highest fields of blessings for the world; to cause all sentient beings to develop impartial pure compassion and be fields of great power for all donors; to cause all sentient beings to be foremost in steadfastness, so that nothing can break them down; to cause all sentient beings to be beneficial to all who see them, and to be invincible; to cause all sentient beings to be well able to comprehend all true principles and attain fearlessness; to cause all sentient beings to radiate a single light which illumines all worlds in the ten directions; to cause all sentient beings to cultivate all the enlightening beings’ vigorous practices without shrinking back; to cause all sentient beings to fulfill all practical vows by means of one practical vow; to cause all sentient beings to make all hearers attain understanding by means of one sublime voice; to cause all sentient beings to be able to fully develop the pure mind of all enlightening beings; to cause all sentient beings to get the opportunity to meet good teachers and serve them all; to cause all sentient beings to unremittingly cultivate the practices of enlightening beings and harmonize and pacify living beings; to cause all sentient beings to teach according to potential, with inexhaustible powers of elucidation; to cause all sentient beings to be able to know all minds with one mind, and to impartially dedicate all roots of goodness; to cause all sentient beings to always gladly accumulate all sorts of goodness and establish sentient beings in pure knowledge; to cause all sentient beings to attain the pure body of virtue and knowledge of omniscience; to cause all sentient beings to know the roots of goodness of all living beings, to practice dedication perceptively and perfect them all; to cause all sentient beings to attain universal knowledge and realize true enlightenment, complete in every way; to cause all sentient beings to attain full knowledge of spiritual powers, appearing in all places when appearing in one place; to cause all sentient beings to attain knowledge of universal adornment, all communities being adorned and purified when they adorn and purify one community; to cause all sentient beings to see all buddha-lands in one buddha-land; to cause all sentient beings to adorn all buddha-lands throughout with all adornments—unspeakably many adornments, innumerable adornments, infinite adornments; to cause all sentient beings to be able to understand with certainty the most profound meaning of all things; to cause all sentient beings to attain the foremost autonomous spiritual powers of the enlightened ones; to cause all sentient beings to attain autonomous spiritual powers which are not one, not different, and replete with all virtuous qualities; to cause all sentient beings to fulfill all equal roots of goodness and be crowned by the Buddhas; to cause all sentient beings to fully realize the body of pure knowledge, supreme in all realms of existence. 
“Thus do great enlightening beings compassionately aid and comfort all sentient beings, causing them all to be purified, to give up envy and jealousy, to experience the most wonderful bliss, to be endowed with great charisma, to develop great resolute faith, to forever abandon anger and other blinding pollutants, so their hearts are pure, straightforward, and gentle, without deception or deviousness, confusion or folly, so they carry out emancipating practices, consolidating an incorruptible mind of impartiality, never regressing, their power of pure conduct fully developed, without affliction or loss. 
They practice dedication skillfully, always cultivating right practices, civilizing sentient beings, destroying all bad actions, cultivating the roots of goodness of all austerities. They also induce sentient beings to cultivate themselves, accepting suffering for the sake of all conscious creatures. Observing roots of goodness with the eye of great knowledge, knowing they all have knowledge and wisdom as their essence, they expediently dedicate them to all sentient beings. 
This is to cause all sentient beings to be able to abide in the realm of all pure virtues; to cause all sentient beings to be able to embody all roots of goodness, to know the natures and meanings of virtues; to cause all sentient beings to purify all roots of goodness; to cause all sentient beings to plant good qualities in fields of blessings, and have no regrets in their hearts; to cause all sentient beings to be able to embrace all living beings and cause everyone to head for universal knowledge; to cause all sentient beings to take in all roots of goodness, all in accord with impartial dedication. 
“Also, they dedicate these roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings attain ultimate peace; may all sentient beings attain ultimate understanding; may all sentient beings ultimately live in pure ways; may all sentient beings attain unhindered insight; may all sentient beings tune their minds well; may all sentient beings be fully endowed with the ten powers and tame living beings.’ “When great enlightening beings practice dedication in this way, they do not become attached to actions, to consequences, to the body, to objects, to lands, to places, to sentient beings, to the nonexistence of sentient beings, to all things, or to the nonexistence of all things. 
When great enlightening beings make dedication in this way, they distribute these roots of goodness throughout the world, that all sentient beings may fully develop buddha-knowledge, attain pure minds with clear, comprehensive wisdom, their inner minds silent and serene, unmoved by external objects, as they extend and develop the family of Buddhas of past, present, and future. “When great enlightening beings cultivate and practice such dedications they transcend all, so none can surpass them; all the words of praise in the world would be insufficient to describe them. 
They cultivate all the practices of enlightening beings and are able to go to all buddha-lands and see all the Buddhas without hindrance. 
Also they can see the courses of action of the enlightening beings of all worlds. With expert skill in means they analyze the most profound statements and meanings of all the teachings; attaining total mental command, they endlessly expound the wondrous teaching. 
For the sake of sentient beings, from moment to moment they appear, like reflections, in untold worlds, attending the Buddhas; in every instant they adorn untold worlds, causing all to be completely adorned and purified throughout. 
They cultivate the knowledge to adorn buddha-lands tirelessly. Moment to moment they cause untold hundreds of thousands of billions of sentient beings to attain purity and complete impartiality. In those buddha-lands they diligently practice all ways of transcendence, save sentient beings, accomplish pure action, and attain unobstructed ears, hearing, absorbing, and retaining the teachings of each Buddha in untold worlds, energetically practicing them without even a thought of giving up. 
They abide in the spiritual powers of enlightening beings in which there is no acquisition, no dependence, no fabrication, and no attachment; in a single instant, in the time of a fingersnap, they can project themselves to untold buddha-worlds. 
They have the same insight as all enlightening beings. “When great enlightening beings cultivate the practice of enlightening beings in this way, they can fully develop infinite pure virtues, which could never be exhaustively recounted or extolled, and accomplish unexcelled enlightenment, realizing the equality and purity of all buddha-fields, equality and purity of all sentient beings, equality and purity of all bodies, equality and purity of all faculties, equality and purity of all fruits of action, equality and purity of all congregations and sites of enlightenment, equality and purity of all completely fulfilled practices, equality and purity of all knowledge of methods of the teaching, equality and purity of the vows and dedications of all Buddhas, and equality and purity of the realms of spiritual powers of all Buddhas. 
“When great enlightening beings practice dedication in this way, they attain the complete adornment of infinite virtues of gladdening teachings of which all qualities are pure. 
In this dedication, sentient beings are not at variance with all lands, lands are not at variance with all sentient beings; lands and sentient beings are not at variance with actions, actions are not at variance with lands and beings; thought is not at variance with mind, mind is not at variance with thought; thought and mind are not at variance with objects, objects are not at variance with thought and mind; actions are not at variance with consequences, consequences are not at variance with actions; practice is not at variance with the course of practice, the course of practice is not at variance with practice; the nature of things is not at variance with their characteristics, the characteristics of things are not at variance with their nature; the birth of things is not at variance with their nature, the nature of things is not at variance with their birth; the equality of lands is not at variance with the equality of living beings, the equality of living beings is not at variance with the equality of lands; the equality of all living beings is not at variance with the equality of all things; the equality of all things is not at variance with the equality of all living beings; the equality of the realm of dispassion is not at variance with the equality of stability of all living beings, the equality of stability of all living beings is not at variance with the equality of the realm of dispassion; the past is not at variance with the future, the future is not at variance with the past; the past and future are not at variance with the present, the present is not at variance with the past and future; the equality of worlds is not at variance with the equality of Buddhas, the equality of Buddhas is not at variance with the equality of worlds; the actions of enlightening beings are not at variance with universal knowledge, universal knowledge is not at variance with the actions of enlightening beings. 
“When great enlightening beings dedicate in this way, they realize the equality of actions, the equality of consequences, the equality of bodies, the equality of expedients, the equality of vows, the equality of all sentient beings, the equality of all lands, the equality of all practices, the equality of all knowledge, the equality of the Buddhas of all times; they get to serve all Buddhas, attend and provide for all enlightening beings, and plant all roots of goodness; they are able to fulfill all great vows, teach and transform all sentient beings, and know all actions comprehensively; they get to serve and provide for all good teachers, and enter all enlightenment sites with pure congregations; they manage to comprehend and master all true teachings, and fully develop all pure qualities. 
“This is the great enlightening beings’ seventh dedication, dedication equally adapting to all sentient beings, dedication in accord with all sentient beings. 
When great enlightening beings accomplish this dedication, then they can crush all demons; pulling out the thorns of craving, they attain the bliss of emancipation. Abiding in nonduality, they have great mystic powers; they rescue sentient beings and protect them, being monarchs of virtue. Their power of psychic travel is unhindered, and they go to all lands. They enter the realm of extinction, yet may assume any form. 
They attain unobstructed ears and can hear all sounds and voices in all lands. 
They attain the pure eye of wisdom and always see all Buddhas. In all realms they develop roots of goodness, their minds without pride or obsequiousness. 
They attain nonacquisitiveness in regard to all things. Great enlightening beings dedicate all roots of goodness equally in accord with all sentient beings.” Then the enlightening being Diamond Banner, spiritually empowered by the Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said in verse, The virtues of what enlightening beings do Are subtle, great, and most profound; Their practice of even one moment They can dedicate without bounds. 
Enlightening beings’ accoutrements, Various, abundant, in limitless numbers— Prize elephants and horses, drawing carts, Clothing, rare goods, all especially fine, Or their heads, eyes, hands, and feet, Or their bodies, flesh, bones, and marrow, They give to all in infinite worlds, Filling the ten directions. 
The virtues they’ve cultivated for countless eons They dedicate, all, Wishing to rescue sentient beings, Never retreating from this determination. 
Enlightening beings, to serve the living, Always practice supreme dedication, Causing all worlds to attain peace and happiness That everyone may attain the highest fruit. 
Enlightening beings universally make impartial vows, And whatever pure works they have accumulated They dedicate to all living beings, Never giving up this great commitment. 
Enlightening beings’ will power is unlimited and dauntless, Taking in all worlds, Thus dedicated to living beings With never any discrimination. 
They vow that sentient beings’ knowledge be clear, Their generosity and self-control all pure, Diligent in cultivation, indefatigable: 
This great commitment they never give up. Enlightening beings’ dedication reaches the other shore— They open the gates of the pure, sublime teaching; Their knowledge the same as the Buddha, They analyze the true meaning and attain the ultimate. 
Enlightening beings are masters of verbal expression And various kinds of knowledge; They explain the teaching according to truth, without hindrance, And yet their minds are not attached to it. 
They do not create duality in things, Nor do they create nonduality; They are free of duality and nonduality, Realizing they are just manners of speaking. 
They know all worlds are equal, Being naught but the doings of mental talk; And sentient beings are phantoms, without reality, All results of conditions. 
The various consequences in all worlds Are each different— All are made from the power of acts; If action is stopped, all come to an end. 
Enlightening beings observe all worlds, Their words, deeds, and thoughts impartial; And they induce sentient beings to be impartial Like the peerless great sage. 
Enlightening beings’ good works they dedicate all To the purification of beings; They’re fully endowed with virtue and skill in means, Same as the Supreme Tamer. 
Enlightening beings aid all living creatures, Dedicating their whole ocean of virtues, Vowing to cause their light to go beyond the world And attain the body of intrepid power. 
The virtues they cultivate They pray will purify the world, That the purity of sentient beings be like The incomparable purity of Buddha. 
Enlightening beings are skilled in interpretation, And know the supreme teaching of the Buddhas; They equally dedicate all good works, Vowing to make all beings the same as Buddha. 
Enlightening beings know all things are empty And all worlds have no existence; There is no creation and no creator, Yet the consequences of beings’ actions remain. All things—null? not null? 
They divorce this dualistic discriminating mind; They know all notions are worldly views: 
Entering the absolute state, conceptualization ends. Thus are true children of Buddha Born by transformation from the Enlightened One’s teaching; They can practice such dedication well To remove all the world’s confusion. 
“What is great enlightening beings’ dedication with the character of true thusness? 
Here enlightening beings’ correct mindfulness is clear and perfect, their mind is firm and stable, they get beyond confusion, and cultivate practice single-mindedly, their profound mind unstirring, accomplishing indestructible works, proceeding toward omniscience without ever regressing. They are determined to seek the Great Vehicle, bold and fearless; planting roots of virtue, they bring peace to the world, producing excellent roots of goodness and cultivating pure qualities. Their great compassion grows, their mind-treasure develops; they always remember the Buddhas and preserve the true teaching. 
Their belief in the path of enlightening beings is firm and enduring, they perfect immeasurable pure roots of goodness, diligently cultivating all virtues and knowledge. As spiritual guides they produce myriad good principles, dedicating their knowledge and skill in liberative means to the salvation of others. 
“At such a time enlightening beings examine all roots of goodness—immeasurable, boundless—with the eye of wisdom: those roots of goodness, in the course of being cultivated and gathered, involve seeking conditions, preparing instruments, purification, orientation and involvement, concentration and effort, initiation and execution, clarification and understanding, refined examination, and explanation; thus all have various facets, various spheres, various characteristics, various phenomena, various proportions, various acts, various names, various distinctions, various productions, various practices—all the roots of goodness therein are established by the mind directed toward the vehicle of the ten powers, and are all dedicated solely to the knowledge of all means and sciences of liberation. 
“The roots of virtue they dedicate in this way: 
they vow to attain complete, unobstructed action to carry out enlightening practices; they vow to attain pure unobstructed speech, to carry out enlightening practices; they vow to attain fully developed unobstructed mental action and abide in the Great Vehicle; they vow to attain complete, unobstructed minds and purely cultivate all practices of enlightening beings; they vow to develop minds of infinitely magnanimous generosity and provide for all sentient beings; they vow to master all the teachings and spread the light of the great teaching, which nothing can veil; they vow to arrive at the realm of universal knowledge, illumining the world with the will for enlightenment; they vow to always correctly remember the Buddhas of past, present, and future, always clearly picturing the Enlightened present before them; they vow to live by fully developed powerful aspiration and get away from all demons and enemies; they vow to attain stabilization in the ten powers of knowledge of Buddhas and teach all sentient beings ceaselessly; they vow to attain concentration and travel through the worlds without being affected by or attached to the worlds; they vow to live in the world unwearied and always edify and influence sentient beings; they vow to activate innumerable liberative techniques of thought and wisdom and accomplish the inconceivable path of enlightening beings; they vow to attain knowledge never confused in any place, able to distinguish all worlds; they vow to attain the power of knowledge of autonomous spiritual capabilities, able to purify all lands in a single instant; they vow to penetrate the intrinsic nature of things and see all worlds as pure; they vow to develop knowledge of nondifferentiation, entering all fields in one field; they vow to reveal all the adornments of all fields to edify and influence infinite sentient beings; they vow to show the boundless cosmos in a single buddha-field, and to do likewise in all buddha-fields; they vow to attain free psychic powers and spiritual knowledge and be able to travel to all buddha-lands. 
“By means of roots of goodness great enlightening beings vow to accomplish the adornment of all buddha-lands; they vow to be able to pervade all worlds; they vow to accomplish contemplative investigation by knowledge. 
As they thus dedicate roots of goodness for themselves in this way, so also do they do so for all sentient beings; that is, they vow that all sentient beings become forever free from hells, animality, and ghosthood; they vow that all sentient beings get rid of all hindering actions; they vow that all sentient beings attain universal minds with impartial knowledge and wisdom; they vow that all sentient beings deal with opponents and friends impartially, causing them all to be secure and happy, their knowledge and wisdom pure; they vow that all sentient beings’ knowledge become fully complete, with pure light illuminating everywhere; they vow that all sentient beings’ wisdom from reflection be fully developed and that they understand the real truth; they vow that all sentient beings seek enlightenment with pure aspiration and attain immeasurable knowledge; they vow that all sentient beings will be able to reveal the abode of peace. 
“Great enlightening beings always dedicate their good will in this way, to cause all sentient beings to encounter the cloud of pure coolness showering the rain of truth, to cause all sentient beings to always encounter the excellent environment of fields of virtue, to cause all sentient beings to be able to enter the treasury of the spirit of enlightenment and preserve it themselves, to cause all sentient beings to shed all veils and live properly, to cause all sentient beings to attain knowledge of unhindered spiritual faculties, to cause all sentient beings to attain free bodies appearing everywhere, to cause all sentient beings to achieve supreme knowledge of all ways of liberation and bring about unfailing benefit, to cause all sentient beings to purify all creatures, to cause all sentient beings to be able to consummate universal knowledge, to cause all sentient beings to be unshakable and unobstructed in mind. 
“Great enlightening beings, seeing delightful countries, gardens and groves, plants, trees, and fruits, distinguished scents and excellent clothing, rare jewels and goods, various decorations, or seeing delightful villages, towns, or hamlets, or seeing the majesty of sovereigns, or seeing abodes free from clamor, employ their knowledge of means and diligently cultivate innumerable sublime virtues, earnestly seeking good for the sake of sentient beings, never slacking off, widely gathering much good, vast as the ocean, and cover all with infinite good, being bases of myriad good things, expediently dedicating roots of goodness without discrimination, pointing out infinite various roots of goodness, always knowingly observing all sentient beings, their minds always remembering the realms of roots of goodness. 
They ceaselessly dedicate to sentient beings roots of goodness as impartial as true thusness. 
At such a time, they dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings attain the delightful visions of the enlightened, see the true nature of things, equal and impartial, without any grasping or attachment, complete and pure; may all sentient beings see the most delightful, perfect offerings of the Enlightened Ones; may all sentient beings be reborn in all the most delightful pure buddha-lands, free of all afflictions; may all sentient beings manage to perceive the most delightful teaching of the Buddhas; may all sentient beings always happily preserve the pleasing practices of all enlightening beings; may all sentient beings acquire the enjoyable eyes of the wise and see without obstruction; may all sentient beings always see all pleasing things, nothing offensive; may all sentient beings realize all delightful truths and diligently preserve them; may all sentient beings attain pure illumination in the pleasing teachings of all Buddhas; may all sentient beings cultivate all the delightful attitudes of generosity of enlightening beings; may all sentient beings attain fearlessness and be able to expound all admirable teachings; may all sentient beings attain the enlightening beings’ extremely delightful most profound concentration; may all sentient beings attain the enlightening beings’ most pleasant methods of mnemonic spells; may all sentient beings attain enlightening beings’ most admirable analytic knowledge; may all sentient beings be able to manifest enlightening beings’ most delightful autonomous spiritual powers; may all sentient beings be able to expound the pleasing most profoundly wonderful teaching in the great congregations of the Buddhas; may all sentient beings be able to skillfully analyze and explain the most pleasing expressions of differentiation; may all sentient beings always be able to activate most pleasant impartial great compassion; may all sentient beings in every thought activate the most admirable aspiration for enlightenment, always causing their senses to be joyful and blissful; may all sentient beings be able to enter all the most pleasant houses of the enlightened ones; may all sentient beings achieve the admirable action whereby they are able to harmonize and pacify, taming sentient beings unceasingly; may all sentient beings attain the most pleasing inexhaustible eloquence of enlightening beings, expounding all truths; may all sentient beings abide for unspeakably many unspeakable numbers of eons in all pleasant worlds, teaching and transforming sentient beings without wearying; may all sentient beings, by means of innumerable techniques, be able to understand and enter into all the most delightful teachings of the Buddhas; may all sentient beings attain delightful unobstructed liberative techniques and know all things have no basis; may all sentient beings attain the delightful realm of freedom from greed and craving, know all things are ultimately nondual, and cut through all barriers; may all sentient beings develop the delightful way of enlightening beings which is free from inanity; may all sentient beings attain the diamond-mine mind of effort and accomplish the delightful path of universal knowledge; may all sentient beings be endowed with delightful unobstructed roots of goodness and destroy all afflictions; may all sentient beings find the delightful door of omniscience and realize true awakening throughout the world.’ When great enlightening beings cultivate such roots of goodness, they gain the light of knowledge; they are taken into the care of good teachers; the sun of wisdom of the Buddhas illumines their minds, forever annihilating the darkness of ignorance. 
They diligently practice the true teaching, enter into works of knowledge, and learn the stages of knowledge. 
They spread roots of goodness, filling the cosmos, dedicating them wisely. 
They plumb the depths of the source of enlightening beings’ roots of goodness; by means of knowledge they enter deeply into the ocean of liberative means and develop immeasurably great roots of goodness. 
“Great enlightening beings dedicate these roots of goodness in this way: they do not cling to the world, they do not grasp sentient beings; their minds are pure, not relying on anything; they are correctly mindful of all things and dismiss discriminatory views; they do not give up the independent wisdom of all Buddhas; they accord with all impartial truths, and do not destroy the Buddha’s true characteristics; they do not deviate from the correct way of dedication of all Buddhas; they look upon the triple world equally, without any image of sentient beings; they follow the path of Buddha well and explain its principles well, with profound understanding of their meaning; they enter the supreme stage and awaken to the real truth; their knowledge is complete, their faith is firm; though they practice correct actions well, they know the nature of action is empty; they understand all things are like phantoms, and know all things have no intrinsic essence of their own; they observe all meanings and all kinds of practices according to their conventional explanations and are not attached to them; they abolish all causes and conditions of grasping and clinging; they know the truth and see the nature of all things being null and void; they comprehend that all things have the same unique real character; they know the characteristics of things are not mutually opposed; they live with enlightening beings and practice their path; taking all sentient beings into their care, they enter the door of dedication of all enlightening beings of past, future, and present; their minds are not startled or frightened by the Buddha’s teachings; with minds of boundless kindness, compassion, joy, and equanimity, they cause all sentient beings to attain purity; in the worlds of the ten directions, they do not develop selfish, possessive grasping and clinging; they do not conceive of anything in the world; they do not give rise to obsession with any objects; they diligently practice all ways to transcend the world and have no attachments to or reliance on any mundane realm; their insight into the profound, wonderful path is accurate and steady, and they are rid of all erroneous views; they understand the real truth. 
“Just as true thusness permeates all places, without boundaries, so also does their dedication of roots of goodness pervade everywhere unbounded; just as true thusness has reality as its essence, so likewise does their dedication of roots of goodness have as its essence understanding of the reality of all things; just as true thusness always retains its original nature without change, so too does their dedication of roots of goodness preserve its original nature unchanging throughout; just as true thusness has as its nature the essencelessness of all things, so also does their dedication of roots of goodness have as its nature the understanding of the essencelessness of all things; just as the mark of true thusness is signlessness, so too is the mark of their dedication of roots of goodness the signlessness of all things; just as those who realize true thusness never backslide, likewise those who attain this dedication of roots of goodness never retreat from the Buddha teachings; just as true thusness is the sphere of action of all Buddhas, so too is this dedication of roots of goodness the sphere of action of all Buddhas; just as the realm of true thusness is unconnected to any mark of boundary or realm, so also is the dedication of roots of goodness free from any sign of boundary or realm, yet it is the realm of all Buddhas of past, present, and future; just as true thusness can have establishments, so too can the dedication of roots of goodness establish all sentient beings; just as the nature of true thusness always adapts, so also does the dedication of roots of goodness forever adapt ceaselessly; just as true thusness cannot be measured, likewise the dedication of roots of goodness is equal to the realm of space and the minds of all sentient beings cannot measure it; just as true thusness fills all, so also does the dedication of roots of goodness pervade the cosmos in a single instant; just as true thusness is eternal and inexhaustible, so also is the dedication of roots of goodness ultimately inexhaustible; just as true thusness has no compare, likewise the dedication of roots of goodness can fulfill all the Buddha teachings without compare; just as the essence of true thusness is stable, so also is the essence of dedication of roots of goodness stable, impervious to delusions and afflictions; just as true thusness is indestructible, so too is the dedication of roots of goodness stable, impervious to delusions and afflictions; just as true thusness is indestructible, so too is the dedication of roots of goodness, which no creatures can damage; just as the body of true thusness is illumination, so also the nature of the dedication of roots of goodness is universal illumination; just as true thusness is omnipresent, likewise the dedication of roots of goodness is present in all places; just as true thusness pervades all times, so also does the dedication of roots of goodness pervade all times; just as the nature of true thusness is eternally pure, likewise the dedication of roots of goodness abides in the world yet is essentially pure; just as true thusness is unhindered by things, so too the dedication of roots of goodness extends everywhere unobstructed; just as true thusness is the eye of all phenomena, likewise the dedication of roots of goodness is an eye for all sentient beings; just as the nature of true thusness has no fatigue, so also is the dedication of roots of goodness, cultivating all the practices of enlightening beings with never any fatigue; just as the inherent nature of true thusness is most profound, so too is the nature of dedication of roots of goodness most profound; just as there is not a single thing in true thusness, likewise there is not a single thing in the essence of dedication of roots of goodness; just as the nature of true thusness is not manifestation, similarly the substance of dedication of roots of goodness is subtle and refined and hardly visible; just as true thusness is apart from all defilements and obscurations, so too is dedication of roots of goodness, the eye of wisdom pure and unclouded by ignorance; just as the nature of true thusness has no equal, so also is the dedication of roots of goodness, accomplishing all practices of enlightening beings, peerlessly supreme; just as the essential nature of true thusness is absolutely quiescent, so also is dedication of roots of goodness well able to accord with the truth of quiescence; just as true thusness has no basis, likewise is dedication of roots of goodness able to penetrate all baseless phenomena; just as the inherent nature of true thusness is boundless, similarly dedication of roots of goodness purifies boundless numbers of sentient beings; just as the essential nature of true thusness has no attachments, likewise the dedication of roots of goodness is ultimately divorced from all attachments; just as true thusness has no obstructions, so also the dedication of roots of goodness eliminates all barriers in the world; just as true thusness is not a mundane sphere, so too the dedication of roots of goodness cannot be carried out by any worldling; just as the essential nature of the true thusness has no abode, so also is the dedication of roots of goodness not the dwelling place of any birth and death; just as true thusness by nature has no fabrication, so too does dedication of roots of goodness relinquish all fabrication; just as the essential nature of true thusness remains steady, so also does dedication of roots of goodness abide steadily in truth; just as true thusness corresponds with all things, so too does dedication of roots of goodness correspond with the learning and practice of the enlightening beings; just as true thusness is inherently always equal in all things, likewise does the dedication of roots of goodness practice impartiality in all worlds; just as true thusness is not apart from all phenomena, similarly dedication of roots of goodness never ever abandons the world; just as true thusness is ultimately inexhaustible in all things, so too is dedication of roots of goodness inexhaustibly directed toward sentient beings; just as true thusness is not at variance with all things, likewise dedication of roots of goodness is not at variance with the teachings of all Buddhas of past, present, and future; just as true thusness universally includes all things, so too does dedication of roots of goodness completely include the roots of goodness of all sentient beings; just as true thusness is of the same essential nature as all things, so is dedication of roots of goodness of the same essential nature of the Buddhas of all times; just as true thusness is not divorced from all things. 
likewise dedication of roots of goodness holds all mundane and transmundane things; just as true thusness cannot be obscured, similarly none in any world can obscure dedication of roots of goodness; just as true thusness cannot be stirred, in the same way dedication of roots of goodness cannot be disturbed by any demonic activity; just as the essence of true thusness has no pollution, so too is dedication of roots of goodness like this, cultivating the practices of enlightening beings without defilement; just as true thusness is without change, so also is dedication of roots of goodness, compassionately caring for sentient beings without change of mind; just as true thusness is inexhaustible, so is dedication of roots of goodness—it cannot be exhausted by mundane norms; just as the nature of true thusness is always aware, likewise dedication of roots of goodness is able to be aware of all truths; just as true thusness cannot be lost or destroyed, dedication of roots of goodness is also like this, arousing great commitment to sentient beings which is never lost or destroyed; just as true thusness is able to greatly illumine, in the same way dedication of roots of goodness illumines all worlds with the light of great knowledge; just as true thusness cannot be explained in words, likewise all words and speech cannot explain dedication of roots of goodness; just as true thusness holds all worlds, likewise dedication of roots of goodness holds all the practices of enlightening beings; just as true thusness goes along with conventional verbal expression, similarly dedication of roots of goodness goes along with all verbal expression of wisdom; just as true thusness pervades all phenomena, so does dedication of roots of goodness pervade all buddha-fields in the ten directions, manifesting great spiritual powers and fulfilling true enlightenment; just as true thusness has no discrimination, so too dedication of roots of goodness has no discrimination in regard to all beings in all worlds; just as true thusness is in all bodies, so also is dedication of roots of goodness in the infinite bodies of the lands of the ten directions; just as the essential nature of true thusness is birthless, so too is dedication of roots of goodness, expediently manifesting birth yet having no birth; just as true thusness is omnipresent, in the same way dedication of roots of goodness is omnipresent in the buddha-lands of all times and places, everywhere manifesting spiritual powers; just as true thusness permeates the night, so also dedication of roots of goodness emits great light in all nights, giving it to perform buddha-work; just as true thusness permeates the day, so does dedication of roots of goodness cause all sentient beings in the day to see Buddha’s spiritual displays expounding the nonregressive teaching, free from defilement, pure, beneficial to all; just as true thusness is omnipresent in the fortnight and month, the dedication of roots of goodness requires skill in dealing with the succession of seasons in all worlds, knowing all times in a single moment; just as true thusness is present throughout the years, likewise does dedication of roots of goodness abide for measureless eons, clarifying and maturing all faculties, developing them to completion; just as true thusness is omnipresent in ages of becoming and decay, so also dedication of roots of goodness abides in all ages, pure and unaffected, educating beings and purifying them; just as true thusness extends throughout the future, dedication of roots of goodness cultivates the pure sublime practices of enlightening beings throughout the future, fulfilling their great vows, never retreating; just as true thusness pervades past, present, and future, dedication of roots of goodness causes sentient beings to see the Buddhas of past, present, and future in a single instant, never parting for a moment; just as true thusness is in all places, so too dedication of roots of goodness transcends the triple world and reaches everywhere in complete freedom; just as true thusness abides in existence and nonexistence, similarly dedication of roots of goodness comprehends all existent and nonexistent things, ultimately pure; just as the essential nature of true thusness is pure, dedication of roots of goodness is able to assemble aids to enlightenment by means of expedient techniques and purify the practices of enlightening beings; just as the essential nature of true thusness is immaculate, similarly dedication of roots of goodness causes enlightening beings to attain the immaculate mind of concentration; just as the essential nature of true thusness has no defilement, so too is dedication of roots of goodness beyond all defilements, fulfilling all pure intentions; just as true thusness has no self or possessions, dedication of roots of goodness fills all buddha-lands in the ten directions with the selfless, nonpossessive pure mind; just as the essential nature of true thusness is impartial, likewise dedication of roots of goodness attains impartial universal knowledge, illumining all things, free from all clouds of ignorance; just as true thusness is beyond all calculations and measurements, likewise dedication of roots of goodness abides together with the treasury of powerful teaching of the vehicle of universal knowledge which is beyond all calculation and measurement, spreading vast clouds of teaching throughout all worlds in the ten directions; just as true thusness is poised in equality, so too is dedication of roots of goodness, initiating all enlightening practices, poised equanimously in the path of omniscience; just as true thusness subsists in all realms of sentient beings, similarly dedication of roots of goodness fulfills unhindered knowledge of all kinds of ways of liberation and appears in all realms of sentient beings; just as true thusness has no discrimination and universally abides in knowledge of all sounds, so too the dedication of roots of goodness has in it knowledge of all sounds of speech and can everywhere manifest all kinds of speech sounds to teach sentient beings; just as true thusness is forever detached from the world, so also does dedication of roots of goodness cause sentient beings to be forever detached from the world; just as the essential nature of true thusness is immensely vast, so too dedication of roots of goodness can retain the extensive Buddha teachings of past, future, and present, never forgetting, diligently cultivating all practices of enlightening beings; just as true thusness is uninterrupted, likewise dedication of roots of goodness, out of desire to place all sentient beings securely on the ground of great knowledge, cultivates enlightening practice unceasingly through all ages; just as the essential nature of true thusness is spacious and open, so too is the dedication of roots of goodness, with pure mindfulness unobstructed, containing all spacious open doors to truth; just as true thusness embraces all kinds of creatures, similarly dedication of roots of goodness realizes knowledge of innumerable types and species, and cultivates the genuine sublime practices of enlightening beings; just as true thusness has no grasping or attachment, dedication of roots of goodness too has no clinging to anything, destroying all mundane grasping and attachment, purifying all worldings; just as the essential nature of true thusness is unmoving, likewise dedication of roots of goodness abides steadily in the perfect complete practical commitments of Universal Good, ultimately unmoving; just as true thusness is the sphere of Buddhas, so too dedication of roots of goodness causes sentient beings to fulfill all spheres of great knowledge and annihilate the spheres of afflictions, causing them to be purified; just as true thusness cannot be ruled or conquered, so also dedication of roots of goodness is not ruled or conquered by any delusive actions or erroneous theories; just as true thusness is not something that can be cultivated yet not something that cannot be cultivated, similarly dedication of roots of goodness abandons all illusions and attachments and has no discrimination between cultivating and not cultivating; just as true thusness has no withdrawal, so also is dedication of roots of goodness like this, always seeing Buddhas, rousing the aspiration for enlightenment adorned with great vows, never withdrawing or giving up; just as true thusness universally contains the sounds of all speech of all beings, similarly dedication of roots of goodness potentiates acquisition of superknowledge of all different languages, producing all kinds of utterances; just as true thusness has no seeking in respect to anything, likewise dedication of roots of goodness causes sentient beings to ride the vehicle of Universal Good to emancipation, having no craving for anything; just as true thusness abides in all stages, so too dedication of roots of goodness causes all sentient beings to give up the stages of mundanity and abide in the stages of knowledge and wisdom, adorning themselves with the practice of Universal Good; just as true thusness has no end, dedication of roots of goodness is also like this, attaining fearlessness in all truths, expounding them everywhere according to the languages of the audience, without end; just as true thusness is free from all taints, so too dedication of roots of goodness causes all sentient beings to develop objective knowledge, comprehend the truth, and fulfill the untainted qualities of enlightenment; just as there is not the slightest thing that can damage or disturb true thusness and cause it to be even slightly unaware, likewise dedication of roots of goodness causes universal awareness of all truths with a boundless mind pervading the cosmos; just as true thusness has no beginning in the past, no end in the future, and no variation in the present, likewise dedication of roots of goodness continually renews the vow of the aspiration for enlightenment for all sentient beings, enabling them all to be purified and forever freed from birth and death; just as true thusness has no discrimination among past, present, and future, dedication of roots of goodness is also like this, the mind always aware in each instant of the present, and totally pure in past and future; just as true thusness develops all Buddhas and enlightening beings, likewise dedication of roots of goodness, initiating means of expediting all great vows, develops the great knowledge of the Buddhas; just as true thusness is ultimately pure and not concurrent with the afflictions, so too dedication of roots of goodness can extinguish all sentient beings’ afflictions and fulfill all pure knowledge and wisdom. 
“When great enlightening beings practice dedication in this way, they realize the equality of all buddha-fields, because they adorn and purify all worlds; they realize the equality of all sentient beings, because they turn the wheel of the teaching of nonobstruction for all of them; they realize the equality of enlightening beings, because they produce all knowledge and vows; they realize the equality of all Buddhas, because they observe the essence of the Buddhas is nondual; they realize the equality of all things, because they know the nature of things is invariable; they realize the equality of all worlds, because by means of knowledge of expedients they understand all manners of speaking; they realize the equality of all practices of enlightening beings, because they dedicate all roots of goodness as they plant them; they realize the equality of all times, because they diligently carry out buddha work at all times, never ceasing; they realize the equality of all fruits of action, because they have no obsession with or attachment to any mundane or transmundane roots of goodness, while consummating them all; they realize the equality of spiritual powers of Buddhas, because they manifest buddha work adapted to the world. 
“This is great enlightening beings’ eighth dedication, dedication with the character of true thusness. 
When great enlightening beings abide in this dedication, they attain realization of innumerable pure teachings, and are able to make the lion roar of the enlightened, free and without fear; with skill in means they teach and develop countless enlightening beings, never ceasing at any time; they attain the infinite complete body of Buddhahood, one body filling all worlds; they attain the infinite complete voice of Buddhahood, one utterance enlightening all beings; they attain the infinite complete power of Buddhahood, able to contain all lands in a single pore; they attain the infinite complete occult abilities of Buddhahood, placing sentient beings in a single atom; they attain the infinite complete liberation of Buddhahood, manifesting all spheres of buddhahood in the body of a single being, attaining true enlightenment; they attain the infinite complete concentration of Buddhahood, able to manifest all concentrations in one concentration; they attain the infinite complete powers of analysis and elucidation of Buddhahood, explaining a single statement of principle forever without exhausting it, removing the doubts and confusion of all sentient beings; they attain the infinite complete being of Buddhahood, endowed with the ten powers of Buddhahood, manifesting the attainment of true enlightenment throughout the realm of sentient beings. 
This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of all roots of goodness in accord with the character of true thusness.” Then the enlightening being Diamond Banner, invested with the awesome power of Buddha, looked over the ten directions and spoke these verses: Enlightening beings’ determination is stable, With true mindfulness steadfast, free from ignorance and confusion. 
Their minds are flexible, always cool; They build up boundless virtuous practices. Enlightening beings are humble and inoffensive; Their aspirations are all pure. 
Enlightening beings’ meditations and works are great, Variously different, extremely rare; They cultivate practice with determination, not retreating, Thereby to aid all living beings. 
Their acts are infinitely various; Enlightening beings practice them all diligently, Adapting to sentient beings, not opposing their wishes, Causing all minds to be pure and joyous. 
They have already ascended to the honored stage of the Human Tamer, Freed from all burning afflictions, their minds unobstructed; They know the meanings of all the teachings And practice them ever more diligently for the benefit of the living. 
The good practices cultivated by enlightening beings Are measureless, countless, variously different; They know the particulars of all of them, And dedicate them to help living beings. 
With subtle knowledge they ever examine The ultimate, universal truth, Cutting off all hypostases, Dedicating in accord with true thusness. 
Just as true thusness pervades all, So do they embrace all worlds; This mind do enlightening beings dedicate To freeing sentient beings from attachment. 
The power of enlightening beings’ vows is all-pervasive, Just as true thusness is omnipresent; Their mindfulness comprehends the seen and unseen, Whereby they dedicate virtues. 
Subsisting in the night and the day, In the fortnight and the month, And in the year and the eon: As is true thusness, so is their practice. 
In all times and all lands, All sentient beings and all phenomena— Abiding therein yet without dwelling anywhere, They dedicate practice like this. 
True thusness’s whereabouts is everywhere— Such practice do they dedicate. 
As in the fundamental essence of true thusness There has never been a single thing, Ungraspable essence the true essence, Such work do they dedicate. As is the character of true thusness, so is their work; As is the essence of true thusness, so is their work: As the essence of true thusness is basically real, So is their work the same as true thusness. Just as true thusness has no limits, So too is their work boundless— And yet they have no ties therein, Therefore this work is pure. 
Thus are brilliant true children of Buddha, Their will steadfast, unwavering; By their power of knowledge they comprehend well And enter the treasury of Buddhas’ techniques. 
Awakening to the true teaching of Buddha, They are not obsessed or bound by it— Thus their free mind is unobstructed— They’ve never seen anything to originate. 
The acts of the Buddhas’ reality body, The features of all worlds as they are, The explanation of the signs of things as signless: 
Entering this inconceivable realm, Thought and nonthought are both silenced. 
Thus do they contemplate the nature of things, Comprehending all distinctions in acts; Obliterating all attachment to self, They abide in virtue, immovable. 
The fruits of the acts of enlightening beings Are all stamped by inexhaustible knowledge; This infinity’s inherently null, Therefore inexhaustible expedients vanish. 
Enlightening beings observe the mind is not outside And also is not found within; They know the nature of mind has no existence, Detached from self and things, forever extinct. 
Thus do those buddha-children know The nature of all things is eternally void, And there’s not a single thing that can create— They realize selflessness, same as the Buddhas’. 
They know that all worlds Are equal to the nature and characteristics of true thusness; Seeing these inconceivable characteristics, They can know the uncharacterized. 
If any abide in this profound truth, Always happily cultivating enlightening practices, Desiring to aid all living beings, Adorned with great vows, unregressing, They then transcend the mundane, Not creating erroneous concepts of birth and death, Comprehending the mind is like a magical production, Diligently cultivating practices to liberate sentient beings. 
Enlightening beings observe the world with true awareness, Seeing that all comes from active conditions; They cultivate practices in order to liberate, Including all in the triple world. 
This they observe with complete clarity, Without destroying the nature of things. 
The wise comprehend all Buddha teachings And dedicate such practices, Taking pity on all living beings, Causing them to contemplate rightly the truth. 
“What is great enlightening beings’ unattached, unbound, liberated dedication? Here they honor and respect all roots of goodness: 
that is to say, they honor and respect emancipation from birth and death, embodiment of all roots of goodness, seeking all roots of goodness, repentance of past acts, moral support of roots of goodness, expression of respect for Buddhas, making prostrations before tombs and shrines, and exhorting Buddhas to expound the teaching—they honor and respect such various roots of goodness, recognizing and approving them all. 
“When great enlightening beings honor, respect, recognize and approve these roots of goodness, they are extremely delighted, and affirm their faith, attaining peace and stability themselves and also enabling others to attain peace and stability. 
They diligently cultivate roots of goodness without attachment, freely building them up, developing supreme determination, abiding in the realm of the enlightened, their power growing, able to see and know all. 
They dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: 
with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to accomplish the deeds of Universal Good; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to purify the speech of Universal Good; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to perfect the mental action of Universal Good; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to arouse the vast energy of Universal Good; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to fulfill the methods of concentration formulae of unobstructed expression of Universal Good, their voices pervading the ten directions; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to fulfill the method of concentration formulae for perception of all Buddhas of Universal Good, always seeing all Buddhas of the ten directions; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to achieve and understand the method of concentration formulae of all sounds, the same as all sounds, expounding infinite principles; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to accomplish Universal Good’s method of concentration formulae abiding through all ages, cultivating enlightening practice everywhere in the ten directions; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to accomplish the power of freedom of Universal Good, in the body of one being showing the cultivation of the practices of all enlightening beings, eternally throughout the future, ever unceasing, and as in the body of one being, so also in the bodies of all beings; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to achieve the power of freedom of Universal Good to enter into the enlightenment sites of all congregations, appearing before all Buddhas, and cultivating the practices of enlightening beings; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to accomplish the power of freedom of buddhahood of Universal Good, and appear to spend endless eons on various methods, causing all sentient beings to attain entry into enlightenment, appearing bodily before all Buddhas; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to attain the power of freedom of Universal Good, and moment to moment enable untold beings to abide in the knowledge of the ten powers, without weariness of mind; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to accomplish the power of freedom of Universal Good, in the bodies of all sentient beings manifesting all Buddhas’ autonomous spiritual powers, causing all sentient beings to live by the practice of Universal Good; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to develop the power of freedom of Universal Good, in the speech of one being producing the speech of all beings, causing each and every being to dwell in the stage of universal knowledge; with unattached, unbound, liberated minds to attain the power of freedom of Universal Good and contain the bodies of all beings in the body of each individual being, causing all to think they have attained the buddha-body; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to achieve the power of freedom of Universal Good and be able to adorn all worlds of the ten directions with a single flower; with unattached, unbound, liberated minds to accomplish the power of freedom of Universal Good and produce a great voice pervading the cosmos, heard in all buddha-lands, pacifying all beings; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to attain the power of freedom of Universal Good, able to enter, in each passing instant of the endless future, all worlds everywhere, adorning them as they wish by the spiritual power of Buddha; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to achieve the power of freedom of Universal Good and through the ages of the future always be able to enter into all worlds and manifest attainment of Buddhahood in the world; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to accomplish the practice of Universal Good, with one light illumining all worlds in the realm of space; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to achieve the practice of Universal Good, attain immeasurable knowledge, be endowed with all spiritual powers, and explain all kinds of truths; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to accomplish the practice of Universal Good, and enter the eternal immeasurable spiritual knowledge of the enlightened; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to accomplish the practice of Universal Good, abide in the realm of the enlightened ones throughout the cosmos, and by the spiritual power of the enlightened cultivate the physical, verbal, and mental actions of the practices of enlightening beings, never flagging; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to accomplish the practice of Universal Good, and be pure in speech, not deviating from the truth or corrupting the teaching, with inexhaustible eloquence teaching and pacifying all sentient beings so that they may attain the unexcelled enlightenment of all Buddhas; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to cultivate the practice of Universal Good, and when entering into a single aspect of the teaching emit immeasurable light illuminating inconceivably many aspects the teaching, abide in the practices of enlightening beings, master of the teaching, arrive at the other shore adorned by Universal Good, and examine and gain understanding of every single object by means of universal knowledge, without universal knowledge being exhausted; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to live by the practice of Universal Good from this life forever onward, never ceasing, attaining omniscience and realizing innumerable truths, to be ultimately free from confusion and delusion in regard to truth; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to cultivate the work of Universal Good, with mastery of technique, attaining the light of truth and illumining the practices of enlightening beings without obstruction; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to cultivate the practice of Universal Good and attain knowledge of all means of liberation—that is, innumerable means, inconceivable means, the means of enlightening beings, means of universal knowledge, all enlightening beings’ means of training, means of activating innumerable cycles of teachings, means appropriate to unspeakably many times, means of explaining all kinds of methods, means of the boundless treasury of fearlessness, means of explaining all truths; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to live by the practice of Universal Good, accomplish actions that cause all witnesses to rejoice and not give rise to slander or repudiation and to set their minds on enlightenment with ultimate purity, never regressing; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to cultivate the practice of Universal Good and attain pure knowledge of the languages of all sentient beings, fully adorned by all verbal expression to respond to all sentient beings and gladden them; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to abide by the practice of Universal Good and establish an extraordinary will, have a pure mind, attain great spiritual powers and vast knowledge and wisdom, and go to all vast worlds and vast lands, and to immense congregations of sentient beings expound unspeakably many far-reaching teachings of the Buddhas, their treasuries full of vast adornments; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to fulfill the practice and vows of dedication of Universal Good and attain the pure body, pure mind, and pure understanding of all Buddhas, embody the virtues of buddhahood, abide in the realm of buddhahood, universally illumining with the seal of knowledge, revealing the pure deeds of enlightening beings, entering into the meanings of all different expressions, demonstrating the tremendous freedom of the Buddhas and enlightening beings, and for the sake of all sentient beings manifest the attainment of true enlightenment; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to diligently cultivate the practical commitments of the faculties of Universal Good and attain clear, sharp faculties, well-tuned faculties, faculties free in all ways, inexhaustible faculties, faculties diligently cultivating all roots of goodness, equanimous faculties of the range of all Buddhas, faculties of great vigor giving all enlightening beings the prediction of nonregression, faculties knowing the realm of indestructibility of all Buddhas, faculties of adamantine flames of the illuminating light of knowledge of all Buddhas, faculties freely distinguishing all capacities, faculties for establishing all sentient beings in universal knowledge, boundlessly vast faculties, totally complete faculties, pure unhindered faculties; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to cultivate the practice of Universal Good and attain all enlightening beings’ spiritual powers—spiritual powers of boundlessly great strength, spiritual powers of immeasurable independent knowledge, spiritual power to appear in all buddha-fields without physically moving, spiritual power of unhindered, uninterrupted freedom, spiritual power to concentrate all buddha-fields in one place, spiritual power to pervade all buddha-fields with one body, spiritual power of unhindered, liberated roaming, spiritual power of instantaneous freedom without doing anything, spiritual power abiding in essencelessness and nonreliance, and spiritual power to progressively set up untold worlds in a single pore, traveling to all Buddhas’ enlightenment sites throughout the cosmos to teach sentient beings and cause them all to enter the door of great knowledge; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to enter the door of Universal Good, produce the practices of enlightening beings, and with independent knowledge enter into innumerable buddha-lands in a single instant, contain immeasurable buddha-lands in one body, attain knowledge of how to purify buddha-lands, and always observe boundless buddha-lands with knowledge and wisdom, never developing the mentality of individual salvation; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to cultivate the practices of expedient means of Universal Good, enter the realm of wisdom, be born in the house of the enlightened, abide in the path of enlightening beings, fulfill infinite supreme aspirations, carry out infinite vows without ever ceasing, and know all realms of reality of all times; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to accomplish the pure teaching of Universal Good, able to contain the innumerable worlds of the cosmos throughout all space in a spot as big as a hairtip, causing all to be clearly seen, with the same applying to every single point throughout the space of the cosmos; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to accomplish the profound mental techniques of Universal Good, able in a single mental moment to manifest the states of mind of one sentient being over untold eons, and in the same way manifest the states of mind of all sentient beings over untold eons; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to enter the stage of employment of techniques of dedication of Universal Good, able to contain in one body the unspeakably unspeakable numbers of bodies throughout the cosmos, without there being any increase or decrease in the realm of sentient beings, and as of one body, so also of all bodies throughout the cosmos, so all contain all in the same way; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to accomplish the means of the vows of Universal Good, abandon all delusions of thought, mind, and view, and enter the sphere of all Buddhas and always see the pure Buddhas’ reality-body, equal to space, to be adorned with the marks and embellishments of buddhahood, master spiritual powers, and always teach unimpededly and uninterruptedly with a sublime voice, causing all who hear to absorb and retain what they have been taught, and to realize the body of enlightenment has no acquisition; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to cultivate the practice of Universal Good and abide in the stages of enlighenment, in a single moment entering all worlds—upright worlds, inverted worlds, untold numbers of immense worlds in the ten directions enmeshing all locations—and with the means of distinction of the cosmic net of Indra, distinguish all reality-realms, having various worlds enter one world, having untold infinities of worlds enter one world, having the infinite worlds structured by all realms of phenomena and principles enter one world, having the infinite worlds established in all realms of space enter one world, yet without destroying the features of their structures, causing all to be clearly seen; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to cultivate Universal Good’s practical vows of enlightening and be crowned by the Buddha, instantly entering the stage of skill in means, fully developing the treasure of knowledge steadfastly living by enlightening practices, capable of comprehensive knowledge of all perceptions—perceptions of sentient beings, perceptions of phenomena, perceptions of fields, perceptions of locations, perceptions of Buddha, perceptions of worlds, perceptions of action, perceptions of practices, perceptions of realms, perceptions of understandings, perceptions of faculties, perceptions of time, perceptions of continuity, perceptions of afflictions, perceptions of purity, perceptions of maturation, perceptions of seeing Buddha, perceptions of turning the wheel of teaching, perceptions of hearing the teaching and understanding, perceptions of training, perceptions of infinity, perceptions of emancipation, perceptions of various stages, perceptions of innumerable stages, perceptions of knowledge of enlightening beings, perceptions of training of enlightening beings, perceptions of concentrations of enlightening beings, perceptions of enlightening beings emerging from concentration, perceptions of the becoming of enlightening beings, perceptions of disintegration of enlightening beings, perceptions of the demise of enlightening beings, perceptions of the birth of enlightening beings, perceptions of the liberation of enlightening beings, perceptions of the independence of enlightening beings, perceptions of the preservation of enlightening beings, perceptions of the spheres of enlightening beings, perceptions of the formation and decay of ages, perceptions of light, perceptions of darkness, perceptions of day, perceptions of night, perceptions of changes of the fortnight, month, season, and year, perceptions of going, perceptions of coming, perceptions of standing still, perceptions of sitting, perceptions of sleeping, perceptions of waking—able to know all these perceptions in an instant of thought, while at the same time detached from all perceptions, without arbitrary discrimination, cutting through all barriers, without any attachments, the knowledge of all Buddhas filling their minds, all Buddha teachings developing their roots of goodness, having the same one body as all Buddhas, in the keeping of all Buddhas, free from defilement, thoroughly pure, cultivating all Buddha teachings as appropriate, reaching the other shore; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to cultivate the practice of Universal Good for the sake of all sentient beings and produce the jewel of great knowledge, knowing infinite minds in each individual mind, seeing clearly their various fixations, notions, various natures, doings, functions, features, thoughts, and awareness; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to perfect the jewel of knowledge of the great vows of Universal Good, knowing infinite places in one place, and likewise in all places; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to cultivate the stage of knowledge of practice of Universal Good, and in one action be able to know all actions, clearly seeing the various conditions making up those actions, and as of one action, so of all actions; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to cultivate and learn Universal Good’s knowledge of all things, knowing infinite things in one thing, knowing one thing in all things, these things each different, without obstruction, without opposition or attachment; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to live by the practice of enlightening beings and acquire the unobstructed ear faculty of Universal Good, in the sound of one utterance knowing the boundless differentiations in countless utterances, without clinging, and as of one utterance, so of all utterances; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to cultivate the knowledge of Universal Good, initiate the practice of Universal Good, and abide in the state of Universal Good, in each individual principle expounding countless principles, those principles far-reaching, variously different, teaching, transforming, saving, in accord with inconceivable expedient means, at all times, in accord with the inclinations, understandings, and faculties of sentient beings, in accord with the time expounding the teaching for them with the voice of Buddha, with one marvelous voice gladdening innumerable sentient beings in the congregations at unspeakably many sites of enlightenment, so the innumerable enlightening beings with all Buddhas fill the cosmos, making extraordinary determinations, producing great insights, ultimately knowing all practices abiding in the state of Universal Good, according to the principles explained able to enter moment to moment into the space of a single instant and develop and increase a store of infinite great knowledge forever and ever—to teach this way, to cultivate in all fields great practices equal to space, fully perfecting them; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to cultivate the methods of operation of the faculties of Universal Good, becoming masters of great action, in each and every faculty able to know innumerable faculties, innumerable mental inclinations, and the sublime practice born of the realm of inconceivability; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to live by the heart of great dedication practice by Universal Good and attain the most subtle knowledge of form, the most subtle knowledge of bodies, the most subtle knowledge of lands, the most subtle knowledge of ages, the most subtle knowledge of worlds, the most subtle knowledge of places, the most subtle knowledge of times, the most subtle knowledge of numbers, the most subtle knowledge of consequences of actions, and the most subtle knowledge of purity, able to know all such subtleties instantly, without fear, confusion, distraction, cloudiness, or depression of mind, being single-minded, skilled in quiet concentration and discernment, the mind well stabilized; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to abide in the knowledge of enlightening beings and cultivate the practice of Universal Good tirelessly, able to know the details of the tendencies of sentient beings, the details of the deaths of sentient beings, the details of the births of sentient beings, the details of the subsistence of sentient beings, the details of the locations of sentient beings, the details of the types of sentient beings, the details of the realms of sentient beings, the details of the acts of sentient beings, the details of the grasping of sentient beings, the details of sentient beings’ clinging to objects, able to know all such details instantly; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to establish profound determination, cultivate the practice of Universal Good, and be able to know the details of efforts of all enlightening beings for the sake of living creatures from their first inspiration—the details of cultivation of enlightening beings’ practices, the details of enlightening beings’ abodes, the details of enlightening beings’ spiritual powers, the details of enlightening beings’ travels to innumerable buddha-lands, the details of enlightening beings’ pure eyes, the details of enlightening beings’ development of transcendent mentality, the details of enlightening beings’ visits to congregations at enlightenment sites of all Buddhas, the details of enlightening beings’ knowledge of methods of concentration spells, the details of enlightening beings’ expositions of the treasury of all skills of analysis and elucidation of the stage of infinite fearlessness, the details of the characteristics of innumerable concentrations of enlightening beings, the details of enlightening beings’ knowledge of concentration on vision of all Buddhas, the details of enlightening beings’ knowledge of extremely deep concentration, the details of enlightening beings’ knowledge of concentration on great adornments, the details of enlightening beings’ knowledge of concentration in great autonomous spiritual powers, the details of enlightening beings’ knowledge of concentration on preservation of great practices throughout the future, the details of enlightening beings’ knowledge of production of innumerable different concentrations, the details of enlightening beings’ knowledge of concentration on being born in the presence of all Buddhas and diligent practice of service of the Buddhas, never leaving them, the details of enlightening beings’ knowledge of cultivation of all profound, vast, unobstructed states of concentration, the details of enlightening beings’ unobscured knowledge of concentration of the stage of consummation of universal knowledge, the stage of knowledge and practice of preservation, the stage of great spiritual powers, and the stage of certitude of meaning, able to know all such details completely; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to cultivate the practice of Universal Good and know the details of all enlightening beings’ knowledge of structures, the details of enlightening beings’ stages, the details of enlightening beings’ innumerable activities, the details of enlightening beings’ production of dedication, the details of enlightening beings’ attainment of the treasuries of all Buddhas, the details of enlightening beings’ analytic knowledge, the details of enlightening beings’ spiritual capabilities and will power, the subtleties of enlightening beings’ explanations of concentration, the details of enlightening beings’ versatile skill in means, the details of the gestures of enlightening beings, the details of enlightening beings’ life on the threshold of buddhahood, the details of enlightening beings’ birth in Tushita heaven, the details of enlightening beings’ sojourn in the celestial palace, the details of enlightening beings’ purification of a buddha-land, the details of enlightening beings’ observation of the human world, the details of enlightening beings radiating great light, the details of the excellence of families of enlightening beings, the details of the congregations at the enlightenment sites of enlightening beings, the details of enlightening beings’ birth throughout all worlds, the details of enlightening beings’ manifestation of the end of a life of all bodies in one body, the details of enlightening beings entering their mothers’ wombs, the details of enlightening beings’ life in their mothers’ wombs, the details of enlightening beings’ free manifestation of the congregations at the sites of enlightenment in all realms while yet in their mothers’ wombs, the details of enlightening beings’ manifestation of the spiritual powers of all Buddhas while in their mothers’ wombs, the details of enlightening beings’ manifestation of birth, the details of the knowledge of enlightening beings walking seven steps like a lion, the details of enlightening beings’ knowledge of skill in means, expediently appearing to abide in a royal palace, the details of enlightening beings leaving home and cultivating practices for self-mastery, the details of enlightening beings sitting under trees of enlightenment at sites of enlightenment, the details of enlightening beings conquering armies of demons and attaining unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment, the details of the realized ones sitting on the seat of enlightenment and emanating great light illumining the worlds of the ten directions, the details of the enlightened ones showing innumerable mystical transfigurations, the details of the enlightened ones’ lion roar and great extinction, the details of the enlightened ones taming all sentient beings without hindrance, the details of the enlightened ones’ inconceivable autonomous powers like the adamantine mind of enlightenment, the details of the enlightened ones minding all worlds, the details of the enlightened ones doing buddha work in all worlds forever and ever without ceasing, the details of the enlightened ones’ unobstructed spiritual powers pervading the cosmos, the details of the enlightened ones appearing in all worlds throughout space to fulfill buddhahood and tame sentient beings, the details of the enlightened ones manifesting innumerable buddha-bodies in one buddha-body, the details of the enlightened ones’ knowledge of the freedom to be at the site of enlightenment in the past, future, and present, completely knowing all such minute details with consummate clarity, able to manifest appearance in all worlds, moment to moment increasing in knowledge, perfecting non-regressive skill in liberative means, cultivating enlightening practice without ceasing, fulfilling the stage of dedication of Universal Good, attaining the virtues of all Buddhas, never tiring of or giving up what enlightening beings practice, producing the enlightening beings’ state of presence, with innumerable means of enlightenment, all pure, wishing to pacify all sentient beings, cultivating the deeds of enlightening beings and accomplishing the enlightening beings’ stage of great power, attaining the aspiration of the enlightening mind, reaching the gate of dedication of Diamond Banner, producing the treasury of qualities of the realm of truth, always in the care of the Buddhas, entering the doors of the profound principles of enlightening beings, expounding all true meanings, flawlessly skilled in teaching, carrying out great vows, never abandoning sentient beings, thoroughly knowing the mine of conceivable and inconceivable realms, demonstrating the production of thought in the realm of inconceivability, detaching from verbal expression, abiding in knowledge, doing as all enlightening beings do, with the power of spiritual freedom demonstrating the path of attainment of Buddhahood forever and ever without cease, by spiritual power and the power of vows able to show all worlds, sentient beings, and ages, defined by illusory ideas and speech; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to cultivate the practice of Universal Good and attain knowledge of the minute details of the realms of all sentient beings—knowledge of the details of distinctions of realms of sentient beings, knowledge of the details of the verbal expression of realms of sentient beings, knowledge of the details of the attachments in realms of sentient beings, knowledge of the details of the different species in the realms of sentient beings, knowledge of the details of similar species in the realms of sentient beings, knowledge of the details of the innumerable tendencies in the realms of sentient beings, knowledge of the details of the inconceivably many artifices of various conceptions in the realms of sentient beings, knowledge of the details of the immeasurable pollution in the realms of sentient beings, knowledge of the details of the immeasurable purity in the realms of sentient beings—able to instantly know such minute details as these of all realms of sentient beings, knowing them as they truly are, widely expounding the truth for sentient beings, showing them various kinds of pure teachings and practices to enable them to cultivate the vast knowledge and wisdom of enlightening beings, emanating countless bodies, gladdening to all who see, illumining enlightening beings’ minds with the sun of knowledge, causing their understanding to open up and their wisdom to be freed; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to cultivate the practices of Universal Good in all worlds for the sake of all beings, attaining detailed knowledge of all worlds in the cosmos of space—detailed knowledge of small worlds, detailed knowledge of large worlds, detailed knowledge of polluted worlds, detailed knowledge of pure worlds, detailed knowledge of incomparable worlds, detailed knowledge of various worlds, detailed knowledge of broad worlds, detailed knowledge of narrow worlds, detailed knowledge of worlds with unobstructed adornments, detailed knowledge of Buddhas’ appearance throughout all worlds, detailed knowledge of explanation of truth throughout all worlds, detailed knowledge of bodily manifestation throughout all worlds, detailed knowledge of emanation of great light throughout all worlds, detailed knowledge of manifestation of the Buddhas’ autonomous spiritual powers throughout all worlds, detailed knowledge of entry into the congregations at enlightenment sites of buddha-fields in all worlds, detailed knowledge of demonstration of all tones with one voice throughout all worlds, detailed knowledge of making all buddha-fields in the cosmos into one buddha-field, detailed knowledge of making one buddha-field into all buddha-fields in the cosmos, detailed knowledge of awareness that all worlds are like dreams, detailed knowledge of awareness that all worlds are like reflections, detailed knowledge of awareness that all worlds are like illusions—knowing all this thoroughly, producing the path of all enlightening beings, enter the knowledge and spiritual powers practiced by Universal Good, fulfill the meditation of Universal Good, cultivate enlightening practices unceasingly, attain the free mystic metamorphoses of all Buddhas, acquire unobstructed bodies, abide in nonreliant knowledge, be without grasping or attachment to anything, being nonacquisitive in all mental actions, developing detachment in all situations, thinking of enlightening practice as purification, having no thought of grasping or clinging to universal knowledge, adorning themselves with concentrations, their knowledge in accord with all realms of reality; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to enter the door of practices of Universal Good and attain detailed knowledge of innumerable realms of reality, detailed knowledge of explanations of all realms of reality, detailed knowledge of entry into vast realms of reality, detailed knowledge of distinction of inconceivably many realms of reality, detailed knowledge of distinction of all realms of reality, detailed knowledge of one thought pervading all realms of reality, detailed knowledge of entry into all realms of reality, detailed knowledge of awareness that all realms of reality are ungraspable, detailed knowledge of observation of all realms of reality without obstruction, detailed knowledge of awareness that all realms of reality have no birth, detailed knowledge of manifestation of miracles in all realms of reality, with vast knowledge knowing such minute details of all realms of reality as they truly are, mastering the truth, demonstrating the practice of Universal Good, causing all sentient beings to be fully satisfied, not abandoning principle yet not clinging to doctrine, producing impartial, unobstructed knowledge, aware of the basis of nonobstruction, not dwelling on anything at all, not destroying the nature of things as it really is, pure and spacelike, while producing verbal explanation adapted to the world, opening up the true meaning, pointing out the silent, null essence, not relying or dwelling on any object, without vain discrimination, clearly seeing the universal structure of the realm of reality, comprehending that all worlds and all things are equal and nondual, divorcing all attachments; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to cultivate the practices of Universal Good and develop detailed knowledge of all eons—detailed knowledge of making unspeakably many eons one moment, detailed knowledge of making one moment unspeakably many eons, detailed knowledge of fitting incalculable eons into one eon, detailed knowledge of one eon entering incalculable eons, detailed knowledge of long eons entering short eons, detailed knowledge of short eons entering long eons, detailed knowledge of entry into eons with Buddhas and eons without Buddhas, detailed knowledge of the number of all eons, detailed knowledge of how all eons are not eons, detailed knowledge of seeing all eons past, present, and future in a single moment—instantaneously knowing all such minute details of all eons as they truly are by means of enlightened knowledge, attaining to the mind mastering the completely fulfilled practices of enlightening beings, the mind entering the practice of Universal Good, the mind free from all inane speculation and erroneous conceptualization, the mind tirelessly making great vows, the mind perceiving the network of innumerable worlds filled with Buddhas, the mind able to learn and remember the roots of goodness of the Buddhas and the practices of the enlightening beings, the mind which, having heard, never forgets the great practices for comforting all sentient beings, the mind which can manifest the appearance of Buddha in the world in all ages, the mind which unceasingly practices unshakability and imperturbability in all worlds forever and ever, the mind which in all worlds fills the bodies of enlightening beings with the behavior of the enlightened; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to cultivate the practice of Universal Good, accomplish nonregression, and attain extremely detailed knowledge of principles and phenomena—detailed knowledge of the principles and phenomena of mysticism, detailed knowledge of far-reaching principles and extensive phenomena, detailed knowledge of various principles and phenomena, detailed knowledge of principles and phenomena of adornment, detailed knowledge of the immeasurability of all principles and phenomena, detailed knowledge of all principles entering one principle, all phenomena entering one phenomena, all principles entering one phenomenon, all phenomena entering one principle, detailed knowledge of one principle entering all principles, one phenomenon entering all phenomena, one principle entering all phenomena, one phenomenon entering all principles, detailed knowledge of all principles and phenomena entering what is not principle or phenomenon, detailed knowledge of defining all principles and phenomena where there are none, without contradiction, detailed knowledge penetrating the techniques of all Buddha-teachings—knowing as they truly are all such things as defined by all speech in all worlds, with extremely detailed and subtle knowledge equal to all of them, that knowledge unobstructed, attaining the mind which enters the boundless realm of reality, abiding steadfastly with a profound mind in each sphere of reality, perfecting unobstructed practice, filling all faculties with universal knowledge, entering the knowledge of buddhahood, properly mindful of expedient means, accomplishing the great qualities of Buddhas, filling the entire cosmos, realizing all the bodies of the enlightened, manifesting all the physical actions of enlightening beings, expounding the teaching in the terms of expression of all worlds, attaining the mental activity of knowledge spiritually empowered by all Buddhas, producing omniscient knowledge skillfully distinguishing all things; with unattached, unbound, liberated mind to cultivate the practice of Universal Good and produce detailed knowledge of all kinds—that is, detailed knowledge of all lands and fields, detailed knowledge of all sentient beings, detailed knowledge of the fruits of all practices, detailed knowledge of the minds of all sentient beings, detailed knowledge of the proper timing of all expositions of the teaching, detailed knowledge of all realms of reality, detailed knowledge of all past, present, and future worlds throughout space, detailed knowledge of all manners of verbal expression, detailed knowledge of all worldly activities, detailed knowledge of all transmundane activities, and detailed knowledge of the paths of all Buddhas, the paths of all enlightening beings, and the paths of all sentient beings—cultivating enlightening practices, living by the path of Universal Good, knowing all expressions and meanings truly, bearing knowledge that all are like reflections, like dreams, like illusions, like echoes, like phantoms, like space, bearing knowledge of nullity, bearing knowledge of all realms of reality, bearing independent knowledge, bearing knowledge of all principles of Buddhahood. 
“Enlightening beings dedicate their unattached, unbound, liberated minds, without forming arbitrary notions of worlds or worldly things, of enlightenment or enlightening beings, of the practices of enlightening beings or the paths of emancipation, of Buddhas or Buddha teachings, of taming or not taming sentient beings, of roots of goodness or dedication, of self or others, of gifts or recipients, of practices of enlightening beings or true enlightenment, of truth or knowledge. 
“Great enlightening beings dedicate those roots of goodness in this way: that minds be unattached, unbound, liberated; that bodies be unattached, unbound, liberated; that speech be unattached, unbound, liberated; that actions be unattached, unbound, liberated; that rewards be unattached, unbound, liberated; that worlds be free from attachment and bondage and be liberated; that buddha-lands be free from attachment and bondage and be liberated; that sentient beings be free from attachments and bondage and be liberated; that laws be free from attachment and bondage and be liberated; that knowledge be free from attachment and bondage and be liberated. 
“When great enlightening beings practice dedication in this way, they do so as the Buddhas of past, present, and future during their enlightening: 
they study the dedication of Buddhas of the past, make the dedication of Buddhas of the future, and live by the dedication of Buddhas of the present; they remain on the path of dedication of the Buddhas of the past, do not give up the path of dedication of the Buddhas of the future, and follow the path of dedication of the Buddhas of the present; they diligently practice the teachings of the Buddhas of the past, accomplish the teachings of the Buddhas of the future, and know the teachings of the Buddhas of the present; they fulfill the equanimity of the Buddhas of the past, achieve the equanimity of the Buddhas of the future, and abide in the equanimity of the Buddhas of the present; they traverse the ranges of the Buddhas of the past, abide in the ranges of the Buddhas of the future, and equal the ranges of the Buddhas of the present; they attain the roots of goodness of the Buddhas of past, present, and future, are endowed with the essential nature of all Buddhas of past, present, and future, abide in the sphere of action of all Buddhas of past, present, and future, and accord with the realm of all Buddhas of past, present, and future. 
“This is great enlightening beings’ ninth dedication, dedication with unattached, unbound, liberated mind. 
When great enlightening beings live by this dedication, they cannot be broken down even by adamantine mountains; their physical characteristics are supreme among all sentient beings; they can destroy all the evildoing of demons; they appear in all worlds in the ten directions, cultivating the practices of enlightening beings; because they want to enlighten all sentient beings, they expound the Buddha-teachings to them in appropriate ways; attaining great knowledge and wisdom, they have no confusion in their minds about the teachings of the Buddhas; wherever they live, whether they go or stay, they always encounter incorruptible company; they are able to absorb and retain the teachings expounded by the Buddhas of all times by means of pure mindfulness; they cultivate the practice of enlightening beings forever and ever, never ceasing, developing and fulfilling the practical vows of Universal Good, attaining universal knowledge, disbursing it as buddha-work, perfecting the autonomous spiritual powers of enlightening beings.” Then the enlightening being Diamond Banner, spiritually empowered by Buddha, looked over the ten directions and said in verse, The peerless honored ones of the ten directions Have never had a thought of pride; Whatever virtuous works they perform, They are still respectful and reverent. 
All the virtues they cultivate Are not for themselves or others; Always, with a mind of supreme resolve, They dedicate them to the benefit of all the living. 
They have never developed pride or conceit, Yet they are not self-demeaning; The actions of the enlightened ones They inquire into and earnestly practice. 
The various roots of goodness they cultivate Are all for the benefit of conscious creatures; They abide in profound will and broad understanding, Dedicated to the most honorable, virtuous human state. 
The various skills and marvels There are in the world, beyond measure, Crude and fine, broad and deep, They practice and master all. 
All the various bodies in the world They enter by equality of bodies; Cultivating this, they attain understanding And accomplish nonregression in the door of wisdom. 
The lands in the worlds, innumerable kinds, Minute, immense, with different orientations, Enlightening beings can, via the door of knowledge, See all in a single pore. 
Sentient beings’ mental activities, without measure, They can cause to equally enter one mind: Through the door of knowledge they understand all, And do not regress in their practice. 
Sentient beings’ faculties and inclinations, Superior, middling, and inferior, are each unalike; All are profoundly hard to know: But enlightening beings can comprehend them in accord with their fundamental nature. 
Sentient beings’ various actions, Superior, middling, and inferior, are each different: Enlightening beings, deeply entering enlightened power, Clearly see all through the door of knowledge. 
Inconceivably innumerable eons They can cause to equally enter one instant; Thus having seen, throughout the ten directions They cultivate all pure actions. 
Past, future, and present— They know their characteristics, each different, Yet without deviating from the principle of equality— This is the great mind’s practice of clear comprehension. 
The actions of the sentient beings of the world are not the same— Sometimes apparent, sometimes hidden, there are innumerable kinds: Enlightening beings know all their different forms, And know too their forms are formless. 
The autonomous spiritual power manifested By all Buddhas in the worlds in the ten directions, Vast, extensive, inconceivable, Enlightening beings are able to distinctly know. 
The naturally enlightened Human Lions In the Tushita heavens of all worlds, Their virtues great, pure, beyond compare, All their features the enlightening can see. 
Sometimes they manifest spiritual descent into the mother’s womb, Or innumerable autonomous miraculous displays— Attaining Buddhahood, teaching, showing extinction, Throughout the world, unceasingly. 
When the Human Lions are first born, All those of superior knowledge serve them: The gods, such as Indra and Brahma, All respectfully attend to them. 
In the infinite, boundless realms Throughout the ten directions, Without beginning or end, far or near, They manifest the powers of the enlightened. 
After the Honored Human Leaders manifest birth, They walk seven steps in each direction: Wishing to enlighten the living by the wondrous truth, The Buddhas therefore observe all. 
They see sentient beings sunk in the sea of cravings, Veiled by blindness and folly: The Free Humans show a smile And reflect that they should save beings from suffering. The great Lion’s Roar emits a wondrous voice: 
“I am most honored in the world; I should light the lamp of clear pure knowledge And destroy the darkness of ignorance and folly in birth and death.” When the Human Lion Kings appear in the world They radiate infinite great beams of light Causing an end to the courses of misery And extinguishing the sufferings of the world. 
Sometimes they manifest life in a royal palace, Sometimes they manifest leaving home and cultivating enlightenment; Because they want to benefit sentient beings They demonstrate such powers of freedom. 
When the Buddhas first sit on the enlightenment site, The whole earth trembles; All worlds in the ten directions are bathed in light, And beings in all states are relieved of pain. 
Shaking the palaces of all demons, Awakening the minds of all sentient beings, Those who received the teaching and practiced it in the past They cause to know the true meaning. 
All the lands in the ten directions Completely enter a pore; The lands in all pores are boundless: Therein they manifest spiritual powers. 
Enlightening beings understand the innumerable methods Expounded by all the Buddhas; Even those the Buddhas have not explained They understand and diligently practice. 
All the demon armies create conflicts Filling all worlds of the universe; The infinite varied ills they create Unhindered knowledge can all destroy. 
The Enlightened may be in buddha-fields, Or may appear to be in celestial palaces. Sometimes they manifest their bodies in Brahma’s palace— Enlightening beings see all without obstruction. 
Buddha manifests infinite, various bodies, Turning the wheel of the pure teaching; No bounds to this can ever be found, Even throughout all times. 
Jeweled thrones, high and wide, without compare, Fill the infinite worlds of the ten directions, Adorned with various wondrous forms: 
Buddhas sit on them, inconceivable, Surrounded by crowds of enlightening beings Filling the whole of the cosmos, Revealing infinite practices for enlightenment, The paths followed by all the Buddhas. 
The appropriate acts of the Buddhas Are infinite, boundless as the cosmos; The wise are able, by one technique, To know them all entirely. The Buddha’s spiritual powers Manifest all kinds of bodies: 
They may show infinite lives in all states of being, Or may appear surrounded by concubines, Or else they may in countless worlds Manifest leaving home and attaining buddhahood, Add on the final demise, Distribution of relics and setting up of shrines. 
By these boundless varied actions The guides explain the abode of buddhahood; The great virtues of the World Honored Enlightening beings vow to cultivate and achieve. 
When they dedicate those roots of goodness They abide in such expedient means, Thus cultivating enlightening practice, Their minds never wearied or lazy. 
The great spiritual powers of the Buddhas As well as their boundless supreme virtues And also wise acts in the mundane world: 
All they know exhaustively. Thus all lordly humans In whatever realms they may be Understand all at once Yet don’t give up enlightenment practice. 
The subtle, refined practices of the Buddhas And the various laws of all fields, They are able to know as they encounter them, Ultimately dedicating them to transcendence. 
Finite or infinite, all ages Enlightening beings know are the same as one instant: Herein they enter enlightenment practice, Always cultivating it diligently, never regressing. 
All the lands in the ten directions, Some polluted, some pure, And all the Buddhas there Enlightening beings can distinguish and know. 
In every moment they clearly see Inconceivably many eons; Thus, throughout all times, They cultivate enlightening practice. 
Into all minds they penetrate, And penetrate all things equally too, The same for all buddha-fields throughout space, Comprehending all their excellent practices. 
They produce all kinds of knowledge Of sentient beings and phenomena As well as spiritual powers of enlightening beings: All of this inexhaustible. 
Knowledge of all minute details, each distinct, Enlightening beings thoroughly absorb: Similar and different aspects they all know well, Thus cultivating far-reaching practice. 
Innumerable are the sentient beings in each Of the innumerable buddha-lands in the ten directions: Their conditions and types are variously different— By the power of their practice enlightening beings can know them all. 
All the guides there are In past, present, and future worlds— If one has knowledge and dedication like them, One’s practice is equal to those Buddhas. If people can practice this dedication, This is learning the path of the Buddhas: 
They’ll attain the virtues of all Buddhas, And the knowledge and wisdom of Buddhas. 
Invulnerable to all worldlings, Accomplishing all that is to be learned, They’ll always be able to recollect all Buddhas And see all the Lamps of the World. 
Enlightening beings’ excellent practices are immeasurable, And so are their virtuous qualities: Once living by the unexcelled practice of the Enlightened, They know all the spiritual powers of the Buddhas. 
“What is great enlightening beings’ boundless dedication equal to the cosmos? 
Here they wrap their heads with the turban of nondefilement, dwell in the position of a teacher of truth, and extensively carry out the giving of teaching, with great kindness and compassion establishing sentient beings in the aspiration for enlightenment. 
Always practicing charity, by the determination for enlightenment they nurture roots of goodness. Being directors for sentient beings, they point out to them the path of universal knowledge. Being suns of truth for sentient beings, the light of their roots of goodness illumines all. 
Their minds are impartial toward all sentient beings. They practice good works without rest. 
Their hearts are pure, free from stain, and their knowledge and wisdom are free. They never give up good works, and, acting as wise caravan leaders for sentient beings, they bring them all into the right path of peace. 
Being leaders and guides for sentient beings, they have them cultivate the practices of all roots of goodness. 
Being incorruptible, steadfast, good friends to sentient beings, they cause their roots of goodness to develop and mature. 
“These great enlightening beings make giving of teaching principal; developing all pure, good qualities, they embody the mind directed toward universal knowledge, their supreme will power ultimately enduring, developing, and growing. 
They contemplate and examine the boundless realms of the way into universal knowledge. 
“These roots of goodness they dedicate in this way: 
they vow to become able to cultivate, perfect, and increase all perspectives of universal nonobstruction; they vow to become able to absorb retain, and expound whatever they hear of the true teaching of the Buddhas, even a single line or verse; they vow to become able to recollect all the Buddhas, past, future, and present, of all worlds, innumerable, boundless, equal to the cosmos, and, having remembered them, to cultivate enlightening practices; they also vow to cultivate enlightening practice for one being in one world forever by this root of goodness of remembrance of Buddhas, and as in one world, so in all worlds, throughout the space of the cosmos, and as for one being so for all sentient beings, in each case being eternally adorned with great vows for their sake, eradicating any thought of separation from the Buddhas and spiritual friends, always seeing the Buddhas before them, able to draw near to every Buddha that appears in the world. 
The pure religious practices extolled and expounded by all Buddhas and enlightening beings they vow to cultivate and completely fulfill—religious practice of unbroken morality, flawless morality, unalloyed morality, spotless morality, impeccable morality; religious practice that cannot be shrouded, religious practice lauded by Buddhas, religious practice of nonreliance, religious practice of nonacquisitveness, religious practice of increasing the purity of the enlightening being, religious practice as carried out by the Buddhas of all times, religious practice of nonobstruction, religious practice of nonattachment, religious practice of noncontention, religious practice without extinction, religious practice of stabilization of good will, religious practice of incomparable compassion, religious practice of immutable joy, religious practice of undisturbed equanimity, religious practice of freedom from anger. 
“If great enlightening beings are able to cultivate such pure religious practices for their own sake, then they will be able to do so for the sake of all sentient beings, enabling all sentient beings to attain stability, enabling all sentient beings to attain open understanding, enabling all sentient beings to attain completion, enabling all sentient beings to attain purity, enabling all sentient beings to attain nondefilement, enabling all sentient beings to attain illumination, enabling all sentient beings to be unstained by sense objects, enabling all sentient beings to be free from blinding hindrances, enabling all sentient beings to be freed from inflaming afflictions, enabling all sentient beings to be freed from all bonds, enabling all sentient beings to forever depart from all evils, enabling all sentient beings to be harmless and ultimately pure. 
If great enlightening beings cannot themselves be pure in religious practice, they cannot cause others to attain purity; if they themselves regress from religious practice, they cannot cause others not to regress; if they themselves are corrupt in religious practice, they cannot cause others to be free from corruption; if they themselves stray from religious practice, they cannot cause others not to stray; if they themselves are lazy in religious practice, they cannot cause others not to slack off; if they themselves have no faith in religious practice, they cannot cause others to have faith; if they themselves do not live steadily by religious practice, they cannot cause others to live steadily; if they themselves have no realization of religious practice, they cannot cause others’ minds to attain realization; if they themselves give up religious practices, they cannot cause others to persevere; if they themselves waver in religious practice, they cannot cause others not to waver. 
Great enlightening beings act without delusion and teach doctrine that is free from delusion; what they say is truthful, and they practice what they preach. 
They purify their deeds, words, and thoughts, eliminating all dross and defilements. They abide in unobstructed action and annihilate all hindrances. 
Great enlightening beings themselves attain pure minds and explain to others ways to purify the mind; they themselves cultivate harmony and tolerance, taming their minds with roots of goodness, and cause others to be harmonious and tolerant, taming their minds with roots of goodness. 
They themselves get rid of doubt and regret, and also cause others to be forever rid of doubt and regret. 
They themselves attain pure faith and also cause others to attain indestructible pure faith. 
They themselves abide by the truth, and also cause others to live by the truth. 
“Great enlightening beings also dedicate the roots of goodness arising from giving of teaching in this way: 
‘May I attain the infinite means of teaching of all Buddhas and analyze and explain them for all sentient beings, causing them all to rejoice and be satisfied in mind, shattering all false philosophies; may I be able to expound the ocean of teachings of the Buddhas of past, present, and future for all sentient beings, in terms of the upshot of each teaching, the meanings and principles of each teaching, the interpretation of each teaching, the revelation of each teaching, the ways of access to each teaching, the awakening to each teaching, the contemplation and investigation of each teaching, and the field and position of each teaching, attain infinite treasuries of truths, acquiring fearlessness, endowed with all powers of analysis and elucidation, extensively analyzing and explaining for sentient beings, throughout the future, inexhaustibly.’ Because they want to enable all sentient beings to establish transcendent will and develop unhindered, impeccable discernment; because they want to cause all sentient beings to be joyful; because they want to enable all sentient beings to develop the light of all pure principles, unceasingly expounding them in expressions adapted to the type of audience; because they want to cause all sentient beings to be profoundly faithful and joyful, they abide in universal knowledge, discern and comprehend all things, and cause them to be without confusion, thinking in these terms: 
‘I should earnestly cultivate practice in all worlds for the sake of sentient beings, attain an infinite free body pervading the cosmos, attain an infinite great mind pervading the cosmos, become endowed with infinite pure speech equal to the realms of the cosmos, appear in sites of enlightenment of infinite congregations throughout the extent of the cosmos, cultivate enlightening practices as infinite as the cosmos, attain stations of enlightening beings as infinite as the cosmos, realize equanimity of enlightening beings as infinite as the cosmos, learn principles of enlightening beings as infinite as the cosmos, live by practices of enlightening beings as infinite as the cosmos, and enter into dedications of enlightening beings as infinite as the cosmos.’ This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness, to cause all sentient beings to be able to attain universal knowledge. 
“Great enlightening beings also dedicate roots of goodness to their aspiration to see Buddhas infinite as the cosmos, to tame sentient beings infinite as the cosmos, to maintain buddha-lands infinite as the cosmos, to realize enlightening knowledge infinite as the cosmos, to attain fearlessness infinite as the cosmos, to attain enlightening beings’ inconceivable abodes infinite as the cosmos, to be endowed with virtues infinite as the cosmos, and to fulfill roots of goodness beneficial to sentient beings as infinite as the cosmos. 
They also pray that by these roots of goodness they will be enabled to attain impartiality of virtue, impartiality of knowledge, impartiality of power, impartiality of fearlessness, impartiality of purity, impartiality of freedom, impartiality of true awakening, impartiality of teaching, impartiality of doctrine, impartiality of certitude, and impartiality of all spiritual powers, fully developing all these qualities and also vowing that all sentient beings should attain them just as they have. 
“Great enlightening beings also dedicate roots of goodness in this way: 
that is, as the cosmos is infinite, so is the dedication of roots of goodness—the wisdom attained is ultimately infinite; as the cosmos is boundless, so is the dedication of roots of goodness, seeing all Buddhas without any bounds; as the cosmos is unlimited, so is the dedication of roots of goodness, going to buddha-fields without limit; as the cosmos has no boundaries, so also is the dedication of roots of goodness, cultivating enlightening practices in all worlds, without boundaries; as the cosmos has no end, so too is the dedication of roots of goodness, abiding in universal knowledge forever without end; as the cosmos is of one nature, so too is the dedication of roots of goodness of the same nature of knowledge as all beings; as the cosmos is inherently pure, so too is the dedication of roots of goodness, causing all sentient beings to ultimately be pure; as the cosmos is adaptive, so too is the dedication of roots of goodness, causing all sentient beings to accord with the practical vows of Universal Good; as the cosmos is adorned, so too is the dedication of roots of goodness, causing all sentient beings to be adorned with the practices of Universal Good; as the cosmos cannot be lost or destroyed, so too is the dedication of roots of goodness, causing all enlightening beings never to lose or destroy pure practices. 
“Great enlightening beings also dedicate roots of goodness in this way: 
‘By these roots of goodness may we serve all Buddhas and enlightening beings and gladden them all; by these roots of goodness may we quickly attain entry into the essence of universal knowledge; by these roots of goodness may we cultivate omniscience in all places; by these roots of goodness may we cause all sentient beings to always get to go see all the Buddhas; by these roots of goodness may we cause all sentient beings to always see the Buddhas and be able to do buddha-work; by these roots of goodness may we enable all sentient beings to always see the Buddhas and never be lazy about buddha-work; by these roots of goodness may we enable all sentient beings to always see the Buddhas and be joyful and pure in mind and never regress; by these roots of goodness may we enable all sentient beings to always get to see the Buddhas and attain good understanding; by these roots of goodness may we cause all sentient beings to always see the Buddhas and not give rise to clinging attachments; by these roots of goodness may we cause all sentient beings to always see the Buddhas and comprehend withoùt obstruction; by these roots of goodness may we enable sentient beings to always see the Buddhas and accomplish the practices of Universal Good; by these roots of goodness may we cause all sentient beings to always see the Buddhas appearing before them, never leaving them for moment; by these roots of goodness may we cause all sentient beings to always see the Buddhas and produce the infinite powers of enlightening beings; by these roots of goodness may we enable all sentient beings always to see the Buddhas and never forget their teachings.’ “Great enlightening beings also dedicate the roots of goodness in these ways: 
they dedicate them in conformity with the nonoriginated nature of the cosmos; they dedicate them in conformity with the fundamental nature of the cosmos; they dedicate them in conformity with the inherent essential nature of the cosmos; they dedicate them in conformity with the nonreliant nature of the cosmos; they dedicate them in conformity with the unforgetting nature of the cosmos; they dedicate them in conformity with the empty nature of the cosmos; they dedicate them in conformity with the placeless nature of the cosmos; they dedicate them in conformity with the tranquil nature of the cosmos; they dedicate them in conformity with the immutable nature of the cosmos; they dedicate them in conformity with the undifferentiated nature of the cosmos. 
“Great enlightening beings also dedicate the revelations and enlightenment of the giving of teaching, as well as the roots of goodness arising therefrom, in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings become enlightening teachers, always in the care of the Buddhas; may all sentient beings become unsurpassed teachers, skillfully establishing all sentient beings in universal knowledge; may all sentient beings become indefatigable teachers, never stymied by challenging questions; may all sentient beings be unobstructed teachers, attaining the unobstructed light of all truths, may all sentient beings be teachers with a treasury of knowledge, able to skillfully explain all Buddha teachings; may all sentient beings become teachers with the freedom of the enlightened ones and be able to skillfully analyze the knowledge of the enlightened; may all sentient beings be teachers with the eye of thusness, explaining the truth without depending on the instruction of another; may all sentient beings become teachers who remember all the teachings of Buddhas, expounding them in accord with their principles, not deviating from the meaning of their expressions; may all sentient beings become teachers practicing the signless path, adorning themselves with subtle characteristics, emanating immeasurable light, skillfully entering into all truths; may all sentient beings become great-bodied teachers, their bodies pervading all lands, creating great clouds of teaching, showering the Buddha-teachings; may all sentient beings become teachers preserving the treasury of the teachings, setting up the banner of invincibility, preserving the Buddha-teachings, causing the ocean of true teaching not to diminish; may all sentient beings become teachers who are suns of all truths, attain the powers of analysis and elucidation of Buddhas, and skillfully explain all truths; may all sentient beings become teachers with skill in means of vocal expression, skillfully explaining the boundless treasury of the realm of truth; may all sentient beings become teachers who have arrived at the other shore of the doctrine, opening up the treasury of teaching with the spiritual powers of knowledge; may all sentient beings become teachers stably abiding by the true teaching, and expound the ultimate knowledge of the enlightened; may all sentient beings become teachers who have thoroughly comprehended all the teachings, able to explain infinite, inexhaustible virtues; may all sentient beings become teachers who don’t deceive the world, able with skill in means to enter reality; may all sentient beings become teachers destroying the throngs of demons, able to be well aware of all workings of demons; may all sentient beings become teachers accepted by the Buddhas and get rid of the mind taken in by ego and possessiveness; may all sentient beings become teachers pacifying all worlds, accomplishing the will power of teaching of truth of enlightening beings.’ “Great enlightening beings also dedicate roots of goodness in this way: 
they do not dedicate them because of attachment to deeds, they do not dedicate them because of attachment to rewards, they do not dedicate them because of attachment to mind, they do not dedicate them because of attachment to things, they do not dedicate them because of attachment to events, they do not dedicate them because of attachment to cause, they do not dedicate them because of attachment to words and speech, they do not dedicate them because of attachment to names, phrases, and statements, they do not dedicate them because of attachment to dedication, they do not dedicate them because of attachment to benefiting sentient beings. 
“Great enlightening beings also dedicate roots of goodness in this way: 
they do not dedicate them because of involvement in forms, they do not dedicate them because of involvement in sounds, smells, tastes, feelings, or things, they do not dedicate them to seek birth in heaven, they do not dedicate them to seek pleasure, they do not dedicate them because of attachment to objects of desire, they do not dedicate them in hopes of getting followers, they do not dedicate them in quest of rulership, they do not dedicate them for the sake of mundane happiness, they do not dedicate them because of attachment to life, they do not dedicate them because of enjoyment of existences, they do not dedicate them in search of the pleasures of union, they do not dedicate them because of seeking that which one may be fondly attached to, they do not dedicate them because of maliciousness, they do not dedicate them for that which would destroy roots of goodness, they do not dedicate them because of dependence on the world, they do not dedicate them because of attachment to stages of meditation, liberation, or concentration, they do not dedicate them because of dwelling in the vehicles of Buddhas’ disciples and self-enlightened people—they only dedicate them to edify and pacify all sentient beings, to fulfill all-knowledge, to attain unobstructed knowledge, to attain unhindered pure roots of goodness, to cause all sentient beings to transcend birth and death and realize great knowledge, to cause the great determination for enlightenment to be adamant and unbreakable, to accomplish the method of ultimate immortality, to adorn the lineage of Buddhas with infinite adornments, to reveal the freedom of universal knowledge, to seek enlightening beings’ great spiritual superknowledge clarifying all things, to carry out the practice of Universal Good in all buddha-fields throughout the space of the cosmos, completely fulfilling it without regressing, don the strong, durable armor of great vows and cause all sentient beings to abide in the realm of Universal Good, to liberate sentient beings throughout the future without resting, and show the unobstructed light of the stage of universal knowledge, forever uninterrupted. 
“When great enlightening beings dedicate these roots of goodness, they dedicate them in these frames of mind: 
they dedicate roots of goodness with mindfulness of the equality of fundamental nature, with mindfulness of the equality of the essence of things, with mindfulness of the equality of the infinity of all sentient beings, with mindfulness of the equality of noncontradiction, with mindfulness of the equality of nonproduction of inherent nature, with a mind knowing all things without disturbance, with a mind entering into the equality of past, present, and future, with a mind producing the seed nature of Buddhas of all times, with a mind that has attained undiminishing spiritual powers, with a mind producing and maturing practical applications of universal knowledge. 
“Also, they dedicate the roots of goodness to cause all sentient beings to forever leave behind all hells, to cause all sentient beings not to enter into animalistic dispositions, to cause sentient beings not to go to the realm of ghosts, to cause all sentient beings to get rid of all factors hindering enlightenment, to cause all sentient beings to fulfill all roots of goodness, to cause all sentient beings to be able to expound the teaching in accord with the time and bring joy to all, to cause all sentient beings to enter the sphere of the ten powers, to cause all sentient beings to fulfill the boundless pure ways and vows of enlightening beings, to cause all sentient beings to follow the instructions of all good spiritual teachers so the vessel of the determination for enlightenment may be fulfilled, to cause all sentient beings to absorb, retain, and apply the most profound Buddha teachings and attain the light of knowledge of all Buddhas, to cause all sentient beings to cultivate the unobstructed practices of enlightening beings and always be in their presence, to cause all sentient beings to always see the Buddhas appearing before them, to cause all sentient beings to always be in the presence of the pure light of the truth, to cause the fearless great determination for enlightenment to always be present in all sentient beings, to cause the inconceivable knowledge of enlightening beings to always occur to all sentient beings, to cause all sentient beings to everywhere rescue and safeguard living beings and cause the pure mind of great compassion to always be present, to cause all sentient beings to adorn all buddha-fields with unspeakably many superb ornaments to cause all sentient beings to obliterate all ensnaring doings of conflict provoked by all demons, to cause all sentient beings to cultivate enlightening practices in all buddha-fields without relying on anything, to cause all sentient beings to develop knowledge of all means of liberation and enter the wide doors of all Buddha teachings. 
“Great enlightening beings also dedicate these roots of goodness with purity of right mindfulness; with certainty of knowledge; knowing all the methods and expedients of the Buddhas’ teachings; in order to accomplish immeasurable unobstructed knowledge; desiring to fulfill pure transcendent aspirations; by virtue of abiding kindness toward all sentient beings; by virtue of abiding compassion for all sentient beings; by virtue of abiding joy for all sentient beings; by virtue of abiding equanimity toward all sentient beings; in order to forever abandon attachment to duality and to live by supreme roots of goodness; in order to ponder, investigate, distinguish, and explain all aspects of interdependent origination; in order to establish the mind marked by great courage; in order to establish the treasury of invincibility; in order to demolish the hordes of demons; in order to attain unobstructed mindfulness of the purity of all things; in order to cultivate all enlightening practices without regressing; in order to attain the mind that happily seeks the supreme truth; in order to attain the free pure omniscient mind happily seeking all virtuous qualities; in order to fulfill all wishes and remove all conflict, attain free, pure, unobstructed buddhahood and expound the nonregressive teaching for all sentient beings; in order to become adorned by the hundreds of thousands of light beams of the sun of knowledge of the supreme truth of the enlightened ones and illumine the sentient beings of all realms; in order to tame all sentient beings, always satisfying them according to their pleasures, not giving up their original vows throughout all time, listening to the true teaching, cultivating its great practice, attaining the undefiled light of pure wisdom, getting rid of all conceit, dissolving all afflictions, breaking the net of craving, destroying the darkness of delusion, and fulfilling the undefiled unobstructed teaching; in order to always cultivate the practice of universal knowledge through incalculable eons for the sake of all beings, without regressing, causing each to attain unobstructed wisdom, and manifest the autonomous spiritual powers of the Buddhas without cease. 
“When great enlightening beings dedicate roots of goodness in this way, they should not greedily cling to objects of desire. 
Great enlightening beings should dedicate roots of goodness free from greed, should dedicate roots of goodness free from anger, should dedicate roots of goodness free from delusion, should dedicate roots of goodness free from malevolence, should dedicate roots of goodness free from pride, should dedicate roots of goodness free from deceitfulness, should dedicate roots of goodness of honesty, should dedicate roots of goodness of diligence, should dedicate roots of goodness of cultivation and practice. 
“When great enlightening beings practice dedication in this way, they attain minds of pure faith, joyfully accepting the practices of enlightening beings, cultivating the pure great path of enlightening beings, endowed with the essence of buddhahood, attaining enlightened knowledge and wisdom, abandoning all evil, getting rid of all manias, associating with good spiritual friends, and, fulfilling their own great vows. 
they invite all sentient beings to partake of their charity. 
“Great enlightening beings also dedicate the roots of goodness produced by this giving of teaching in this way: 
they cause all sentient beings to acquire clear beautiful voices, gentle voices, voices like celestial drums, voices capable of articulating innumerable sounds, pleasant voices, pure voices, voices pervading all buddha-fields, voices adorned by countless qualities, far-ranging voices, sonorous voices eliminating all distraction, voices filling the cosmos, voices able to pick up the languages of all sentient beings; and to acquire knowledge of the boundless sounds of all sentient beings, knowledge of all pure sounds of speech, knowledge of infinite sounds of speech, knowledge of the supremely free sound that enters all sounds; and to acquire all pure adorning speech tones, tones which all beings never tire of hearing, speech ultimately not bound to any world, joyful tones, pure tones of the speech of Buddhas, tones of speech expressing all Buddha teachings, unmuffled by delusion, famed everywhere, tones that cause all sentient beings to acquire the adornment of concentration formulations of all the teachings, tones of speech expressing innumerable kinds of teachings, sounds of speech reaching the infinite congregations at enlightenment sites throughout the cosmos, tones of speech containing indestructible expressions of inconceivable truths, speech revealing all facts, speech able to expound the treasury of knowledge of differences in unspeakably many words and phrases, speech that explains all things without attachment or interruption, speech shining with the light of all truths, speech able to cause all worldlings to be purified and ultimately reach universal knowledge, speech that contains the expressions and meanings of all the teachings, free uninhibited speech maintained by spiritual powers, speech of the knowledge which reaches the other shore of all worlds. 
“Also by these roots of goodness, they enable all sentient beings to acquire nongroveling speech, fearless speech, unobsessed speech, speech gladdening all congregations at sites of enlightenment, harmonious, beautiful speech, speech able to explain all the principles of buddhahood, speech cutting off the doubts of all sentient beings and causing them to awaken, speech endowed with all powers of analysis and elucidation, speech awakening all sentient beings from their slumber in the long night of ignorance. 
“Great enlightening beings also dedicate the roots of goodness in this way: 
‘May all sentient beings attain the pure reality body free from all faults and ills; may all sentient beings attain pure sublime virtues free from all faults and ills; may all sentient beings attain pure sublime characteristics free from all faults and ills; may all sentient beings attain the pure results of action free from all faults and ills; may all sentient beings attain the pure mind of universal knowledge free from all faults and ills; may all sentient beings attain the infinite pure will for enlightenment free from all faults and ills; may all sentient beings attain impeccable skill in means of comprehending all faculties; may all sentient beings attain impeccable pure faith, may all sentient beings attain impeccable pure diligence in carrying out commitments unimpeded; may all sentient beings attain impeccable pure right mindfulness, knowledge, and powers of analysis and elucidation.’ “Great enlightening beings also dedicate roots of goodness for the sake of all sentient beings to the attainment of various pure subtle bodies—the body of light, the body of freedom from pollution, the body of nonobsession, the body of purity, the body of extreme purity, the body of detachment from objects of sense, the body of ultimate detachment from objects of sense, the body of freedom from defilement, the body of beauty, the body of nonobstruction—manifesting images of action in all worlds, manifesting images of speech in all worlds, manifesting images of construction in all abodes, like a clear mirror in which all kinds of images of forms spontaneously appear, showing sentient beings the practices of enlightenment, showing sentient beings the most profound truths, showing sentient beings all kinds of virtuous qualities, showing sentient beings the path of practice, showing sentient beings developmental practices, showing sentient beings the undertakings of enlightening beings, showing sentient beings in all worlds the appearance in the world of the Buddhas of all worlds, showing sentient beings the spiritual powers and mystical transfigurations of all Buddhas, showing sentient beings the awesome power of the inconceivable liberation of all enlightening beings, showing sentient beings the essence of omniscience fulfilling the practical vows of the enlightening being Universally Good. 
Great enlightening beings skillfully take care of all sentient beings with such subtle pure bodies and enable them to attain the body of all-knowledge with pure qualities. 
“Great enlightening beings also dedicate the roots of goodness generated by giving of the teaching to the aspiration to live in all worlds cultivating enlightening practices, so that sentient beings who see them do not do so in vain, but develop the determination for enlightenment without ever regressing, follow the truth unshakably, and in all worlds, throughout all time, live undefatigably by the path of enlightening beings, with great compassion, impartial and universal, as vast as the cosmos, knowing the faculties of sentient beings and ever explaining the truth to them according to the time, always rightly mindful of spiritual friends, never forgetting for an instant, all the Buddhas always appearing before them, their minds always truly aware, never flagging, cultivating roots of goodness without any falsehood, placing all sentient beings in universal knowledge, causing them not to regress, imbued with the light of all the Buddha teachings, holding the clouds of the great teaching, receiving the rain of the great teaching, cultivating the practices of enlightening beings, entering in among all sentient beings, entering all buddha-fields, penetrating all phenomena and principles, penetrating all times, penetrating the knowledge of consequences of all sentient beings, penetrating the knowledge of skillful methods of all enlightening beings, penetrating the knowledge of production of all enlightening beings, penetrating the knowledge of the pure realm of all sentient beings, penetrating the autonomous spiritual powers of all Buddhas, penetrating all the boundless realms of reality, and herein cultivating enlightening practice. 
“Great enlightening beings also dedicate the roots of goodness cultivated by giving of teaching to the aspiration to purify all buddha-lands and adorn them with inexpressibly many embellishments, each buddha-land as vast as the cosmos, purely good, without obstructions, with pure light, the Buddhas manifesting the attainment of true awakening therein, the pure realms in one buddha-land able to reveal all buddha-lands, and as of one buddha-land, so of all buddha-lands, each of those lands adorned with arrays of pure exquisite treasures, as measureless as the cosmos—countless thrones of pure jewels spread with precious robes, countless jeweled curtains and jeweled nets draping, countless precious canopies with all kinds of jewels reflecting each other, countless jewel clouds raining jewels, countless jewel flowers all around, completely pure, countless pure arrays of balustrades made of jewels, countless jewel chimes always emitting the subtle tones of the Buddhas circulating throughout the cosmos, countless jewel lotuses of various jewel colors blooming with glorious radiance, countless jewel trees arrayed in rows all around, with flowers and fruits of innumerable jewels, countless jewel palaces with innumerable enlightening beings living in them, countless jewel mansions, spacious, magnificent, long and wide, far and near, countless jewel ramparts with exquisite jewel ornaments, countless jewel gates hung all around with strings of beautiful jewels, countless jewel windows with pure arrays of inconceivable numbers of jewels, and countless jewel palms, shaped like crescent moons, made of clusters of jewels—all of these embellished with myriad jewels, spotlessly pure, inconceivable, all produced by the roots of goodness of the enlightened, replete with adornments of countless treasuries of jewels. 
There are also countless jewel rivers from which flow all pure good principles; countless jewel seas filled with the water of the teaching; countless jewel lotuses always emitting the sound of the lotus of the sublime teaching; countless jewel polar mountains, monarchs of the mountains of wisdom, standing out completely pure; countless eight-faced jewels, strung on precious threads, incomparably beautiful and clear; countless jewels of pure light always emanating the unimpeded light of great knowledge illumining the entire cosmos; countless jewel chimes striking one another and producing wonderful tones; countless pure jewels filled with jewels of enlightening beings; countless jeweled streamers of many colors hung all around, with radiant, clear colors; countless jeweled banners adorned with jewel crescents; countless jeweled pennants, each one able to shower innumerable jeweled pennants; countless jeweled sashes hanging in the sky, beautifully adorned; countless precious mats able to produce various kinds of subtle pleasant feelings; countless jewel wreaths showing the enlightening beings’ eye of universal knowledge; countless jewel garlands, each garland the superb adornment of a hundred thousand enlightening beings; countless jewel palaces, absolutely peerless; countless jewel ornaments embellished with diamonds; countless ornaments of all kinds of jewels always displaying all pure wonderful colors; countless jewels with different shapes and colors, their lights reflecting with thorough clarity; countless jewel mountains surrounding like a fence all around, with unhindered purity; countless precious scents perfuming all worlds; countless precious magical events, each one pervading the cosmos; countless jewel light beams, each beam manifesting all lights; there are also countless jewel lights, the lights of pure knowledge, comprehensively illumining all things, and countless unimpeded jewel lights, each pervading the cosmos; there are countless jewel places where there are all kinds of precious substances, and countless jewel treasuries revealing all the treasuries of the true teaching; countless jewel banners emblematic of the enlightened standing out on high; countless precious saints, images of saints of great knowledge, thoroughly pure; countless gardens of jewels producing the bliss of meditation of enlightening beings; countless precious sounds, the wondrous voice of the enlightened teaching all the world; countless jewel forms, each one emanating countless lights of sublime doctrines; countless precious marks, each one transcending common characteristics; countless precious modes of bearing, all who see which develop the joy and rapture of enlightening beings; countless collections of jewels, all who see which develop a collection of jewels of wisdom; countless precious peaceful abodes, all who see which develop a precious well-stabilized mind; countless precious garments, those who wear which develop the peerless concentration of enlightening beings; countless precious vestments, those who wear which attain the spell of good vision as soon as they wish; countless jewel practices, those who see which know that all ‘jewels’ are results of action, definitively pure; countless precious unhindered insights, those who perceive which can realize all pure objective vision; countless treasuries of jewel lights, those who see which immediately can attain the treasury of great knowledge; countless jewel thrones with Buddhas sitting on them like great lions roaring; countless jewel lamps always radiating the light of pure knowledge; countless jewel trees arrayed in rows, wound with jewel ropes, their adornments thoroughly pure, also having countless jewel trunks, standing high, straight, round, and clean, countless jewel boughs, thick with adornments, with inconceivable numbers of birds flying around and gathering there, always warbling beautiful songs expressing the true teachings, countless jewel leaves emitting the light of great knowledge pervading everywhere, countless jewel flowers, with innumerable enlightening beings sitting on each blossom, traveling throughout the cosmos, and countless jewel fruits, those who see which will attain the fruit of nonregression from all-knowledge; also there are countless jewel villages, those who see which give up the ways of worldly habitats; countless jewel cities filled with free beings, countless palaces with monarchs in them who are endowed with the godlike body of enlightening beings, courageous and steadfast, wearing the armor of the truth, their minds unshrinking; countless jewel houses, those who enter which can eliminate the mind of attachment to house and home; countless jewel garments, those who wear which can foster the understanding of nonattachment; countless jewel palaces filled with enlightening beings who have left home; countless jewel curios which bring immeasurable joy to those who see them; countless jewel wheels emanating inconceivable lights of knowledge, turning the wheel that never turns back; countless jewel trees adorned with Indra nets, all pure; countless jeweled grounds, inlaid with inconceivably many jewels; countless jewel pipes, their clear sounds filling the cosmos; countless jewel drums, their wondrous sounds beating in harmony unbroken throughout the eons; countless jewel sentient beings, all able to bear the jewel of the unexcelled teaching, with countless jewel bodies replete with innumerable jewels of virtuous qualities, countless jewel mouths always uttering the voice of the jewels of all the sublime teachings, countless jewel minds endowed with the jewel of pure intention set on great knowledge, jewel mindfulness cutting off all folly and ultimately solidifying the jewel of universal knowledge, jewel superknowledges reciting and retaining the jewels of all Buddha teachings, jewel intellects understanding with certainty the treasure of all Buddha teachings, jewel knowledges attaining the jewel of great complete omniscience, jewel eyes mirroring the treasure of the ten powers without obstruction, jewel ears hearing the infinite sounds of the whole realm of reality clearly and without obstruction, jewel noses always smelling the pure jewel fragrance of harmony, jewel tongues able to enunciate countless rules of speech, jewel bodies traveling unhindered throughout the ten directions, jewel minds always diligently cultivating the practical vows of Universal Good, jewel voices, clear and beautiful, pervading the worlds in the ten directions, jewel acts guided by knowledge, jewel speech always explaining the cultivation of the jewel of unobstructed knowledge, and jewel thought attaining the treasure of unimpeded great knowledge, which is ultimately complete. 
“The great enlightening beings vow that in all those buddha-lands, in each direction of each buddha-land, in each and every place, even so minute as a hairtip, there be incalculable, boundless, unspeakable numbers of great enlightening beings, all accomplished in pure clear knowledge, filling everywhere, in every point of space in every place in every direction of every buddha-land throughout the cosmos. 
This is great enlightening beings’ dedication of roots of goodness vowing that all the buddha-lands should be replete with all kinds of precious adornments, as extensively told of the jewel ornaments, that they should have such adornments of fragrances, flowers, garlands, perfumes, incenses, aromatic powders, robes, parasols and canopies, banners, pennants, crystals, and so on, a hundredfold more, all like the ‘jewel’ ornaments. 
“Great enlightening beings dedicate the roots of goodness amassed by such practices as the giving of teaching to nurturing all roots of goodness; to purifying all buddha-lands; to fully developing all sentient beings; to causing all sentient beings’ minds to be pure and imperturbable; to causing all sentient beings to enter the most profound Buddha teaching; to causing all sentient beings to attain unsurpassable pure qualities; to causing all sentient beings to attain indestructible power of pure virtue; to causing all sentient beings to attain inexhaustible power of knowledge, liberate all living beings, and enable them to enter buddhahood; to causing all sentient beings to attain impartial, inexhaustible, pure speech; to causing all sentient beings to attain the equanimous unobstructed eye and achieve knowledge equal to the entire cosmos throughout space; to causing sentient beings to attain pure recollection and know all worlds of past ages; to causing all sentient beings to attain unobstructed great knowledge and be able to comprehend with certainty all treasuries of truths; to causing all sentient beings to attain unlimited, immeasurable great enlightenment, pervading the cosmos without any hindrance; to causing all sentient beings to attain impartial, nondiscriminatory, homogeneous roots of goodness; to causing all sentient beings to attain pure physical, verbal, and mental action adorned with all virtues; to causing all sentient beings to accomplish action the same as Universally Good; to causing all sentient beings to be able to enter all homogeneously pure buddha-fields; to causing all sentient beings to examine universal knowledge, penetrate it, and fulfill it; to causing all sentient beings to be able to avoid partial roots of goodness; to causing all sentient beings to attain equanimous, unvarying will, gradually fulfilling all-knowledge; to causing all sentient beings to be able to live steadily by all good principles; to causing all sentient beings to instantly realize universal knowledge and reach the ultimate; to causing all sentient beings to be able to fulfill the pure path of omniscience—this is wherein they dedicate their roots of goodness. 
“Once great enlightening beings have dedicated their roots of goodness in this way for the sake of all living beings, they also dedicate these roots of goodness because they want to fulfill and expound the power of all pure practical methods; because they want to achieve the spiritual power of pure practice and comprehend unspeakably many oceans of truths; because they want to be imbued with infinite lights of pure knowledge, equal to the cosmos, in each ocean of truths; because they want to analyze and explain the different expressions and meanings of all teachings; because they want to accomplish the boundless vast concentration of the lights of all teachings; because they want to follow the powers of elucidation of the Buddhas of past, present, and future; because they want to develop the free body of all Buddhas of past, present, and future; because they respect the admirable unhindered state of all Buddhas; in order to fulfill the heart of great compassion and rescue all sentient beings without ever retreating; because they want to achieve the mind of unobstructed knowledge of infinite differentiations, untainted purity of senses, and enter all congregations in all sites of enlightenment; because they want to always turn the wheel of the impartial, nonregressive teaching in all buddha-lands, whether inverted or upright, coarse or subtle, broad or narrow, small or large, tainted or pure; because they want to attain fearlessness in every moment, without end, all kinds of analytic and expository skills, and the light of the sublime teaching, to reveal and explain the truth; in order to happily seek all goodness, to learn and practice with determination, all faculties growing better, to attain the great spiritual knowledge of all truths; because they want to draw near to and provide offerings at all congregations’ enlightenment sites, and expound the teachings to all sentient beings to make them joyful. 
“Great enlightening beings also dedicate these roots of goodness in this way: 
they dedicate them by abiding in abodes infinite as the cosmos, by abiding in physical action infinite as the cosmos, by abiding in verbal action infinite as the cosmos, by abiding in mental action infinite as the cosmos, by abiding in the equality of matter infinite as the cosmos, by abiding in the equality of sensation, perception, patterning, and consciousness infinite as the cosmos, by abiding in the equality of aggregates infinite as the cosmos, by abiding in the equality of elements infinite as the cosmos, by abiding in the equality of sense media infinite as the cosmos, by abiding in internal equality infinite as the cosmos, by abiding in external equality infinite as the cosmos, by abiding in the equality of impulses infinite as the cosmos, by abiding in the equality of wills infinite as the cosmos, by abiding in the equality of means of liberation infinite as the cosmos, by abiding in equality of inclinations infinite as the cosmos, by abiding in the equality of faculties infinite as the cosmos, by abiding in equality of beginnings, middles, and ends infinite as the cosmos, by abiding in the equality of acts and consequences infinite as the cosmos, by abiding in the equality of defilement and purity infinite as the cosmos, by abiding in the equality of living beings infinite as the cosmos, by abiding in the equality of buddha-fields infinite as the cosmos, by abiding in the equality of phenomena infinite as the cosmos, by abiding in the equality of mundane lights infinite as the cosmos, by abiding in the equality of Buddhas and enlightening beings infinite as the cosmos, by abiding in the equality of practices and vows infinite as the cosmos, by abiding in the equality of emancipations of enlightening beings infinite as the cosmos, by abiding in the equality of teaching and training of enlightening beings infinite as the cosmos, by abiding in the equality of nonduality of realms of reality infinite as the cosmos, by abiding in the equality of sites of enlightenment and congregations of Buddhas, infinite as the cosmos. 
“When great enlightening beings practice dedication in this way, they abide in equal pure embodiments infinite as the cosmos, they abide in equal pure speech infinite as the cosmos, they abide in equal pure minds infinite as the cosmos, they abide in equal pure commitments of enlightening beings infinite as the cosmos, they abide in equal pure sites of enlightenment of congregations infinite as the cosmos, they abide in pure knowledge infinite as the cosmos equally explaining things for all enlightening beings, they abide in bodies infinite as the cosmos equally able to enter into all worlds in the cosmos, they abide in equal pure fearlessness of the light of all truths able to cut away the nets of doubts of all sentient beings with one voice, gladdening them in accord with their faculties and inclinations, abiding in the ways of emancipation, the great virtues and spiritual powers and fearlessness of knowledge of all sciences of liberation. 
This is great enlightening beings’ tenth dedication, dedication as infinite as the cosmos. 
“When great enlightening beings dedicate all roots of goodness, such as giving of teaching, in this way, they fulfill the infinite, boundless commitment of Universal Good, are able to purify all buddha-fields throughout the cosmos, equal to space, and cause all sentient beings to also attain such fully developed boundless knowledge, understand all truths, in every moment see all Buddhas appearing in the world, and in every moment see all Buddhas’ infinite boundless powers—vast powers, powers of nonattachment, powers of unimpeded freedom, powers to purify all sentient beings, powers to structure all worlds, powers to manifest all languages, powers to appear appropriately in accord with the time, powers dwelling in irreversible spiritual knowledge, powers to explain all realms of reality exhaustively, powers producing the boundless eye of the enlightening being Universally Good, powers of hearing the true teachings of infinite Buddhas with unobstructed ear consciousness, powers to pervade the infinite cosmos with one body while sitting still without crowding the sentient beings, powers of penetration of all the infinite phenomena of past, present, and future by means of complete knowledge. 
They also realize infinite purities—purity of all sentient beings; purity of all buddha-fields; purity of all things; purity of comprehensive knowledge of all realms; purity of boundless knowledge pervading the realm of space; purity of knowledge of all different vocal sounds, using various kinds of verbal expression adapted to all sentient beings; purity of radiance of infinite spheres of light illuminating all the boundless worlds; purity of knowledge producing the practices of all enlightening beings of past, present, and future; purity of knowledge instantly entering the sites of enlightenment of congregations of all Buddhas of past, present, and future; purity of entering into all worlds, boundless though they be, and causing all sentient beings to do what they should do—in all these they attain fulfillment, completion, accomplishment, equanimity, actualization, direct knowledge, and true realization, having seen into all of them, attained purity in all respects, and reached the other shore.” At that point, by the spiritual power of the Buddha, in each of the ten directions as many worlds as atoms in a million buddha-lands quaked in six ways—trembling, trembling all over, trembling equally all over; rising, rising all over, rising equally all over; surging, surging all over, surging equally all over; shaking, shaking all over, shaking equally all over; roaring, roaring all over, roaring equally all over; crashing, crashing all over, crashing equally all over. 
Because of the Buddha’s spiritual power, and by natural law, it rained celestial flowers, celestial garlands, celestial incense powders, celestial mixed perfumes, celestial raiment, celestial gems, celestial ornaments, celestial crystals, celestial aloe wood, celestial sandalwood incense, celestial parasols of surpassing beauty, all kinds of celestial banners, multicolored celestial pennants, countless celestial bodies, innumerable billions of unspeakable numbers of celestial sounds of the wonderful teaching, inconceivably many celestial voices praising Buddha, countless celestial sounds of joyful eulogy. 
Innumerable celestials bowed in respect, countless celestial children constantly remembranced the Buddhas and the immeasurable rare virtues of the Enlightened Ones, countless celestial children made music and sang hymns of praise to offer the Enlightened, countless billions of celestials emanated great lights illuminating all buddha-fields in the entire cosmos throughout space, revealing countless realms of Buddhas and disguised bodies of the Enlightened, surpassing all celestial beings. 
As such a teaching was expounded in the palace of the Tushita heaven of happiness and satisfaction in this world, so it was in the celestial palaces of the Tushita heavens in all worlds throughout the ten directions. 
Then, again by the spiritual power of Buddha, there assembled as many enlightening beings as atoms in a million buddha-fields from beyond as many worlds as atoms in a million buddha-fields in each of the ten directions, filling all quarters, all saying “Good, good! 
Child of Buddha, you have ably explained these great dedications. 
We all have the same name—Diamond Banner—and all have come here from the presence of Diamond Banner Buddhas in worlds in Diamond Light. 
In those worlds we expound this teaching by the spiritual power of Buddha, and the congregations, the followings, the expressions and doctrines are all like this, no more and no less: 
we have all come from those lands, empowered by the Buddhas, to stand as witnesses for you. 
And we have come to this assembly to be your witnesses, so also do the hosts of enlightening beings come to all the jewel-adorned halls of the palaces of the Tushita heavens in all worlds in the ten directions to be witnesses in the same way.” Then the enlightening being Diamond Banner, spiritually empowered by Buddha, looked over all the congregations in the ten directions, reaching throughout the cosmos; knowing expression and meaning well, he expanded his great mind, with great compassion covering all beings, fixing his mind on the lineage of the Buddhas of past, present, and future and dwelling steadily thereon, he entered into the ways to the qualities of all Buddhas, and attained the body of freedom of the Buddhas. 
He observed the inclinations of the minds of sentient beings as well as all the roots of goodness they had planted, knowing them all distinctly, and in accord with the body of reality he manifested for them bodies of pure sublime forms. 
Then at this time he uttered verses saying, Enlightening beings accomplish knowledge of truth, Understanding boundless ways of right teaching: 
Becoming teachers with the light of truth, They know the unobstructed genuine verity. 
Enlightening beings are great guides to truth; They reveal the most profound teaching, hard to attain: 
Leading the measureless masses of the ten directions, They cause them to abide securely in truth. 
Enlightening beings have drunk the ocean of Buddha teachings; Their clouds of truth shower the worlds of the ten directions. 
The sun of truth appears in the world, Revealing the sublime teaching for the benefit of the living. 
They are always rarely-met donors of teaching, Understand convenient means to enter truth. 
The light of truth, pure, illumines their minds, And they teach in the world without fear. 
They have cultivated a mind in command of the teachings, Able to understand all aspects thereof; Developing the deep deep ocean of wondrous teaching, They beat the drum of truth for all sentient beings. 
They proclaim the most profound, rare teaching, With which are nurtured all virtues; Endowed with the mind of pure joy in truth, They show the world the treasury of Buddhahood. 
Anointed and crowned by the Buddhas, kings of truth, Having developed the body of knowledge of the nature of things, They are able to understand the true character of all things, And abide by all good ways. 
Enlightening beings practice the foremost giving Praised by all the enlightened ones— All their acts are approved by Buddhas, Thereby they perfect the most honorable humans. 
Enlightening beings have attained the subtle truth body Personally born by transformation of the Buddha teachings. 
To benefit the living they are lamps of truth, Expounding countless supreme principles. 
According to the giving of the wonderful teaching they practice, They also examine their roots of goodness; The good deeds they do for sentient beings They dedicate all with knowledge. 
The virtuous ways to attain buddhahood They pass on to living beings, Wishing that all may be pure And reach the Buddhas’ magnificent other shore. 
The buddha-lands of the ten directions are infinite, And all have infinite great adornments: 
Such adornments, inconceivable, Are all used to adorn one land. 
The pure knowledge of the enlightened They vow to enable all beings to have, Like Universally Good, the true offspring of Buddha, Adorning themselves with all virtues. 
Accomplishing vast spiritual power, They travel throughout all worlds, Causing all beings without exception To practice the enlightening path. 
The countless sentient beings of the ten directions Awakened by the Buddhas They cause to be like Universally Good, Fully carrying out the highest practice. 
The various different virtues Achieved by the Buddhas and enlightening beings They vow to have everyone fulfill, Boundless though they be. 
Enlightening beings are endowed with the power of freedom And go to study wherever they should learn; Manifesting all great psychic powers, They go to the infinite lands of the ten directions. 
Enlightening beings are able in one instant To see countless Buddhas, many as beings, And also in a single hairtip Concentrate all things, seeing all clearly. 
The sentient beings of the worlds, without measure, Enlightening beings can distinguish and know. 
The Buddhas are as infinite as living beings; They generously present offerings to them all. 
All kinds of wonderfully scented flowers, Jewels, clothes, pennants, and parasols, They distribute throughout the cosmos, Determined to offer them to all Buddhas. 
In a single pore they clearly see All the inconceivably many Buddhas— And so it is in every pore: 
They bow to all the lamps of the worlds. 
With their whole bodies they successively bow In respect for those boundless Victors; They also praise them with their words Forever and ever more. 
Their offerings to one Buddha Are as numberless as sentient beings; Thus do they make offerings to one Buddha And to all Buddhas in the same way. 
They provide for and laud the Buddhas Throughout all ages of the world; The ages of the world may come to an end, But enlightening beings’ offerings never cease. 
In the various ages of all worlds They cultivate practices there, Honoring and attending one Buddha Tirelessly throughout all ages. 
As they provide for one Buddha for immeasurable eons, So do they also for all Buddhas; Yet they do not think of the number of eons, Or ever tire of making offerings. 
The cosmos is boundlessly vast: 
Enlightening beings observe it with clear comprehension, Spreading great lotus blossoms throughout As presents to Buddhas infinite as beings. 
Jewel flowers of perfect color and scent, Pure ornaments, most delicate, Beyond compare in any world, They bring to offer the most noble of humans. 
Infinite lands, many as sentient beings, They fill with precious canopies, Which they offer to one Buddha And do the same for all Buddhas. 
Perfumes, incomparable, most excellent, Never before found in any world, They offer to the Guide of humans and divines Throughout eons as many as beings. 
Powder and burning incense, exquisite flowers, Jewels, raiment, and ornaments, They present to the Supreme Victors Joyfully serving them tirelessly. 
World-Illumining Lamps, as many as beings, Attain great enlightenment every moment, And boundless verses of eulogy and exposition They present to the Human Tamers. 
To Buddhas numerous as living beings They make most excellent offerings; For eons countless as living beings, They praise them without end. 
When they make offerings to the Buddhas this way, By Buddhas’ spiritual power they extend everywhere, Seeing all the infinite Buddhas of the ten directions, Abiding in the practice of the Universally Good enlightening being. 
All the roots of goodness Of past, future, and present, Enable us to always carry out Universal Good practice And quickly gain the station of the realm of Universal Good. 
May the infinite sentient beings of the worlds Seen by all the Buddhas Become like Universally Good, Praised by the intelligent. 
This is the practice of dedication Cultivated in common by all great beings; All the Buddhas explain for us This unexcelled practice of dedication, To enable all living beings In all worlds in the ten directions To attain awakening and enlightenment And to always act as Universally Good does. 
Practicing giving in accord with their dedication And also strictly maintaining the precepts, Persevering over the long run, unshrinking, Tolerant, gentle, minds unstirred, In meditation keeping the mind on one point, By wisdom comprehending objects, same as concentration, Penetrating past, future, and present, To which none in the world can find any bounds— Enlightening beings’ physical, verbal, and mental actions, Like this practice, are all pure; All they cultivate, omitting none, All on a par with the enlightening being Universally Good. 
Like the cosmos, free from false discrimination, The stain of inanity is forever gone; And as nirvana has no obstructions, Their minds likewise are free from all grasping. 
The principles of dedication of the wise The Buddhas have revealed; All kinds of roots of goodness they dedicate, Therefore they can accomplish the enlightening path. 
Offspring of Buddha learn this dedication well, Fulfilling innumerable undertakings, Taking in the cosmos comprehensively; Therefore they can attain the power of the Blissful Ones. 
If you want to accomplish, as the Buddha explains, The great, superlative practices of enlightening beings, You should live by this dedication— Such offspring of Buddha are called Universally Good. 
All living beings may be counted, And the experience of past, present, and future minds may be known, But the virtues of such Universally Good Offspring of Buddha cannot be measured. 
The bounds of space may be measured with a hair, The number of atoms in all lands may be known, But the practical vows by which these sages live Cannot be measured by anyone. 
The Ten Stages At that time Diamond Matrix, by the power of Buddha, entered the concentration called Light of the Great Vehicle, and as soon as he had done so there appeared to him as many buddhas as atoms in ten billion buddha-lands from beyond as many worlds as atoms in ten buddha-lands in each of the ten directions, all of whom were alike named Diamond Matrix. 
Those buddhas said, “It is good that you have entered this concentration of enlightening beings’ Light of the Great Vehicle. 
In this you are supported by the Buddhas numerous as atoms in ten billion buddha-lands beyond worlds as numerous as atoms in ten billion buddha-lands in the ten directions, and by the power of the ancient vow of Vairocana Buddha, and it is also due to the excellence of your virtue and knowledge, so that all enlightening beings may enter the stages of knowledge of the illuminating power of the inconceivable Buddha teachings, to attain all roots of goodness, for skill in analyzing all Buddha teachings, for breadth of knowledge of things, for the exposition of well-constructed teachings, for the purification of holistic knowledge, so as to be unstained by worldly things, for the purification of supramundane roots of goodness, for the discovery of particulars of the sphere of inconceivable knowledge, and for the realization of the sphere of omniscient knowledge: 
that is to say, it is for the sake of the undertaking and attainment of the ten stages of enlightening beings, for the sake of correct explanation of skill in setting up the stages of enlightening beings, for the sake of proper focusing on the teachings of the buddhas, to distinguish undefiled phenomena, for skill with the light of great wisdom with knowing discernment, for entry into complete definitive adaptive knowledge, for the light of eloquence to explain without hesitation or obstruction in accord with differences in capability and station, to fulfill the stage of great discursive knowledge, to never forget the determination for enlightenment, to develop all beings to perfection, and to attain skill in discernment in all situations. 
Furthermore, you should explain this teaching, skill in differentiation of means of revealing truth, by the power of the Buddha, by the aid of the light of knowledge of the Buddha, for the perfect purification of your own roots of goodness, for the thorough purification of the cosmos, for the protection of sentient beings, for the body of knowledge of the body of reality, to receive the anointment of all buddhas, for the manifestation of the most exalted being in all worlds, to completely transcend all worldly paths, to purify the path to the supramundane, to fulfill omniscience.” Then those buddhas gave the enlightening being Diamond Matrix physical invincibility, the ability to teach with unhindered presence of mind, pure knowledge of differentiation, the power of unfailing recollection, skill with certain intellect, unfailing understanding in all situations, the invincible power of the perfectly enlightened, indomitability of power and expertise of a buddha, attainment of discernment and teaching by the discursive knowledge of the omniscient, and gave him the well-arrayed physical, verbal, and mental adornments of all buddhas. 
Because of his attainment of the reality of this concentration in accord with its name; because of the upshot of his past vows; because of his thoroughly pure determination; because of his purification of his sphere of knowledge; because of his having stored well the provisions for the Path; because of his having accomplished well what he had to do; because of his being an immeasurable vessel of remembrance; because of his having purified clear faith; because of his having mastered the method of concentration spells without corruption; because of his being perfectly stamped with the seal of self-knowledge; and because of his being perfectly stamped with the seal of knowledge of the realm of reality. 
Then those buddhas, by their occult power, extended their right hands from where they were and rubbed the head of Diamond Matrix, at which point the enlightening being arose from that concentration and said to the other enlightening beings, “Perfectly sure, O blessed offspring of the Victorious, is the vow of enlightening beings, unadulterated, impossible to see in its entirety, vast as the cosmos, including all space, eternal, rescuing all beings, wherein alone the blessed enlightening beings enter the stage of knowledge of the past buddhas, enter the stage of knowledge of the future buddhas, and enter the stage of knowledge of the present buddhas. 
There are ten stages of enlightening beings that enter into the stage of knowledge of the buddhas. 
And what are these ten stages of enlightening beings that have been, will be, and are being explained by the buddhas of the past, future, and present? Having meditated on them, I will now tell you. 
They are the enlightening beings’ stage called Extreme Joy, that called Purity, that called Refulgence, that called Blazing, that called Difficult to Conquer, that called Presence, that called Far-Going, that called Immovable, that called Good Mind, and the stage of enlightening beings called Cloud of Teaching. 
These are the ten stages of enlightening beings that have been, will be, and are expounded by the buddhas of the past, future, and present. I have never seen any buddha-land where the buddhas do not elucidate these ten stages of enlightening beings. 
This is the supreme light of teaching method to purify the path of enlightening being—that is the definition of the specifics of the ten stages. 
Inconceivable is this realm of knowledge of the ten stages.” Then Diamond Matrix, having mentioned the names of these ten stages, fell silent and gave no further definitions. 
Thereupon the assembly of enlightening beings became anxious, having heard only the names of the stages, their definition not having been explained. They wondered why Diamond Matrix remained silent after mentioning only the names of the ten stages and did not analyze them further. 
At that time there was among the assembly of enlightening beings an enlightening being named Moon of Liberation who knew what was on the minds of the assembly of enlightening beings and who asked Diamond Matrix in verse, O ye of pure intent, mindfulness, knowledge, and virtue, Having mentioned the supreme stages, why do you not explain them? 
All these honored enlightening beings are sure in mind; Why, having mentioned the stages, do you not define them? 
These experienced offspring of buddhas want to hear— Please explain the meanings and ways of the correct stages. 
This assembly is quiet, free from sloth, pure; Purified, steadfast, full of virtue and knowledge. 
All stand there gazing respectfully, Desirous, as bees for honey, for the ultimate ambrosia. 
Having heard this, the wise, experienced Diamond Matrix spoke to please the assembly: Difficult, supreme is this, rare, the revelation of enlightening beings’ practice. 
Supreme is the discernment of the practices of the stages whence buddhahood is attained. Subtle, hard to see, beyond thought, beyond the ground of mind, hard to approach, It is the realm of the wise with untainted minds, hearing which confuses the worldly. 
Keeping the mind as stable as diamond, believe in the supremacy of buddha-knowledge: 
Knowing the mind-ground is selfless, then one can hear this subtle knowledge. 
Like colors painted in the sky, like the wind in space— So is this undefiled knowledge of Buddha hard to see, though it be defined. 
Such is my understanding of that—it’s hard to find anyone in the world who knows it, Or even believes in it—thus I cannot explain this ultimate. 
This having been said, the enlightening being Moon of Liberation said to Diamond Matrix, “Pure is this assembly that has gathered, enlightening beings with thoroughly purified aspiration, thoroughly purified will, who have done their work well, who have attended hundreds of thousands of billions of buddhas, who have thoroughly gathered the provisions for the Path, who have attained immeasurable knowledge and virtue, who are free from folly and confusion, free from affliction, impurity, and attachment, who are firm in determination and faith, whose undivided attention is on these buddhas’ teachings. 
Speak, therefore, for the enlightening beings directly witness this realm.” Diamond Matrix said, “What though this assembly of enlightening beings is pure, with thoroughly purified aspirations and will, having done their work well, having well attended countless buddhas, having attained immeasurable virtue and knowledge, free from folly and delusion, undefiled, with well-established determination and zeal, with undivided attention on these teachings of buddhas, yet because of the lack of benefit and the suffering in the long night of ignorance for those others who would give rise to dissent and doubt upon hearing of such inconceivable states, it is out of compassion for them that I want to remain silent.” Then Moon of Liberation again asked Diamond Matrix for this doctrine: 
“Very well, explain by the power of the Enlightened—these inconceivable stations will be well protected and believed in. 
Because that naturally occurs when these stages are being explained: 
this is what all buddhas keep in mind, and all enlightening beings are intent on the protection of this knowledge. 
This is the fundamental practice, and this is the fulfillment of the Buddha teachings. 
It is like the instruction of combinations of letters—it begins and ends with the basic characters; there is nothing expressed by combinations of letters without indication of the basic characters. 
In the same way all the Buddha teachings are based on the stages and their practices are fulfilled thereby. 
The consummations of the stages lead to the attainment of the knowledge of the independent. 
Therefore speak; the realized ones, the saints, the perfectly enlightened ones will protect and support you.” At this point those enlightening beings uttered verses in one voice asking Diamond Matrix for this teaching: 
O ye of supreme wisdom and boundless eloquence, Speak the finest words, in accord with ultimate truth. 
With recollection, steadfastness, pure knowledge, pure resolve to attain the ten powers, And discerning intellect, explain these ten supreme stages. 
Tranquil, disciplined, with accumulated goodwill, free from afflictions, delusion, pride, and views, Free from doubt, this assembly hopes for your explanation. 
As the thirsty desire cool water, the hungry food, the sick medicine, And bees honey, so does this assembly desire your words. 
Therefore, ye of pure knowledge, speak of the exalted stages, free from taint, Joined to the ten powers, unobstructed, producing all good states. 
At that time a radiance called “light of power of enlightening beings” emanated from the circle of hair between the eyebrows of Shakyamuni Buddha, accompanied by innumerable rays of light, illuminating all worlds in all ten directions, stopping all evils and suffering, eclipsing all realms of demons, illuminating the circles of innumerable buddhas, revealing the features, occult powers, and mystic transfigurations in the inconceivable realm of the buddhas, illuminating the enlightening beings empowered to teach in the circles of all buddhas in all worlds in the ten directions; having shown the inconceivable mystical power of the Buddha, it formed a great tower of networks of clouds of light up in the sky and remained there. 
In the same way, lights called “light of power of enlightening beings” emanated from the circle of hair between the eyebrows of the other buddhas, accompanied by innumerable beams of light, illuminating all worlds in the ten directions, stopping all evils and suffering, eclipsing all realms of demons, illuminating the circles of innumerable buddhas, revealing the features, occult powers, and mystic transfigurations in the inconceivable realm of buddhas, illuminating the enlightening beings empowered to teach in the circles of all buddhas in all worlds in the ten directions; having revealed this inconceivable mystic power of buddhas, and having illuminated the circle of Shakyamuni Buddha and the body of the enlightening being Diamond Matrix, in the same way the beams formed a great tower of webs of clouds of light up in the sky and remained there. Thus by means of the light beams emanated from the circle of hair between the eyebrows of Shakyamuni Buddha, those worlds and those circles of buddhas and the bodies and sitting places of their enlightening beings were clearly illumined. 
By the lights emanated by those other buddhas, this world system, the circle of Shakyamuni Buddha, and the body and sitting place of Diamond Matrix were seen clearly illumined. 
Then, from the great tower of webs of clouds of light, by the power of the Buddha, this sound emerged: By those with the ten powers, peerless, equal to space, with boundless virtues, By the teachings of Shakyamuni, by those beyond all men and gods, is this miraculous display made. 
By the power of the buddhas, open the storehouse of the Kings of Truth And reveal the supreme practice and stages of knowledge distinctly. 
Those who hear this supreme teaching will also be Empowered and supported by the buddhas and enlightening beings, Who will cause them to attain buddhahood once they attain the ten powers, After having gradually fulfilled the undefiled ten stages. 
Even sunk in the ocean or thrown into the holocaust, They will be able to hear this teaching, without doubt. But those stuck to folly, suspicious and unreceptive, Will never get to hear it. 
The path of knowledge of the stages, supreme, from entry, station, and attainment, Please explain in order, including the practice and sphere of action. 
Then Diamond Matrix, looking over the ten directions, in order to increase the purity of this assembly, at this juncture spoke these verses: Subtle and hard to know is the path of the great sages, Nonconceptual, beyond conception, most difficult to contact. 
It is pure, known only to the wise, Its nature is quiescent, without extinction or origination. 
Inherently empty, utterly tranquil, nondual, inexhaustible, Liberated from all states, impartially reaching nirvana, Without extremes or mean, not expressed by words, Outside of time, like the sky, Quiescent, ultimately silent, realized by the enlightened, Most difficult to express by any manner of speaking: 
Such are the stages and their practice— Most difficult to speak of, more difficult to hear. 
Beyond thought and the path of mind, Elicited by knowledge, realized by the highest sages, Not revealed by the elements of matter and sense, Unattainable by mind, intellectually inconceivable: 
Just as the tracks of a bird in the sky Cannot be described or seen even by the enlightened, In the same way all the stages Cannot be told of, much less heard. 
I will tell just the beginning, then, Out of kindness, compassion, commitment: 
I will tell of them in order; yet not by spheres of thought But by knowledge are they to be fulfilled as one wishes. 
Such a realm is hard to see, impossible to tell of— It just rests in one’s own mind; But I will speak out by the power of Buddha— It should be heard with concentration and respect. 
This entry of knowledge, being as such, Cannot be explained even in eons: 
I will now give a summary, According to the meaning of the teaching as it is. Attend respectfully, blessed ones; I will speak by the power of Buddha. I will utter the voice of the highest teaching, In appropriate words, with examples. 
Though it is difficult to express in speech, Yet mine is the power to do so, By the immeasurable power of Buddha and the power of the body of light That have entered into me. 
“Now then, in beings who have well-developed roots of goodness, who have done their tasks well, who have accumulated provisions for the Path, who have attended buddhas in the world, who have consolidated pure practices, who are in the care of spiritual friends, who have thoroughly purified their intentions, who have great determination, who are endowed with supreme zeal, and who actualize pity and compassion, the aspiration for enlightenment is aroused, for the quest of enlightened knowledge, for the attainment of the ten powers, for the atttainment of great expertise, for the attainment of the enlightened quality of impartiality, for the salvation of all beings, for the purification of great mercy and compassion, for the attainment of knowledge of all in the ten directions, for the unobstructed purification of all buddha-lands, for awareness of past, present, and future in a single instant, and for expertise in turning the wheel of the great Teaching. 
“This intention of enlightening beings, furthermore, is aroused and guided by great compassion, controlled by wisdom and knowledge, sustained by skill in means, stabilized by will and determination, immeasurable as the power of buddhas, clearly distinguishing the power of sentient beings and the power of Buddha, focused on unfragmented knowledge, in accord with spontaneous knowledge, completely receptive to the guidance of wisdom and knowledge of all Buddha teachings; it is as ultimate as the cosmos, as enduring as space, abiding forever. 
“With this arousing of the mind the enlightening being is beyond the stage of mundane beings, has entered the rank of enlightening beings, is born in the family of the enlightened, cannot be slandered by any racial slur, has left all mundane paths and has entered the transmundane Path, is stationed in the reality of enlightened beings, is properly established in the abode of enlightening beings, has attained equanimity, is established in the lineage of buddhas of past, present, and future, certain to become perfectly enlightened. 
Established in these things, the enlightening being is established in the first stage of enlightening beings, that of Extreme Joy, by attainment of imperturbability. 
“Here, standing on the stage of Extreme Joy of enlightening beings, one is filled with extreme joy, filled with calm, filled with happiness, filled with ebullience, filled with exaltation, filled with delight, greatly invigorated, most uncontentious, most harmless, and free from anger. 
“Thus is the enlightening being extremely joyful when stationed in the enlightening beings’ stage of joy; one becomes extremely joyful thinking of the buddhas, of the Buddha teachings, of the enlightening beings, of the practices of enlightening beings, of the purification of the transcendent ways, of the eminence of the stages of enlightening beings, of the indestructibility of enlightening beings, of the teachings of the buddhas, and of the ability to benefit beings; and, thinking of the means of entry into the knowledge of all buddhas, the enlightening being is imbued with extreme joy. 
‘Detached am I from all mundane objects; I have entered the vicinity of buddhahood; I have left behind the stage of infantile ignorance and drawn near to the stage of knowledge; I am cut off from all evil and states of misery; I am a refuge for all beings; I am near to the vision of all buddhas; I am born in the realm of all buddhas; I have reached equality to all enlightening beings; gone from me are all fears and terrors’—thus thinking, the enlightening being gives rise to extreme joy. 
Because that is what happens to all fears with the enlightening being’s attainment of the stage of joy—fears such as fear of not surviving, fear of ill repute, fear of death, fear of states of misery fear of intimidation by groups—all these fears leave. 
Why is that? 
Inasmuch as the very concept of self is gone, there is no self-love, much less any love for material things; therefore there is no fear of not surviving. 
One does not seek any honor from anyone, but rather thinks one should provide others with sufficient means of subsistence, therefore there is no fear of ill repute. 
And because one has no view of self, one has no concept of self and therefore no fear of dying. 
Thinking that when one is dead, one will certainly not be separated from the buddhas and enlightening beings, one therefore has no fear of states of misery. 
Thinking that there is no aspiration in any world equal to, much less greater than, one’s own aspiration for enlightenment, there is no fear of intimidation by groups. 
“Furthermore, the enlightening being, due to having made great compassion foremost, strives all the more with an indestructible, extraordinary will, for the fulfillment of all roots of goodness, by mastery of perfect faith, by purity of intention, by wealth of true understanding, by having developed mercy and compassion, by having attained great kindness, by indefatigability of mind, by adornment with conscience, by attainment of joy in tolerance, by honor and respect for the teachings of the completely enlightened, by tireless collection of roots of goodness night and day, by service to good spiritual friends, by enjoyment of true teaching, by insatiable search for learning, by correct contemplation of the teachings as they are heard, by mental nonattachment, by absence of craving for gain, honor, or fame, by absence of desire for goods, by tireless production of a jewel-like mind, by seeking the stage of omniscience, by concentration on the powers, expertise, and unique buddha-qualities of all enlightened ones, by unattached seeking of the transcendent ways, by abandonment of all deception and dishonesty, by acting in accord with one’s words, by constant preservation of truthful speech, by not allowing the family of the enlightened to die out, by not abandoning the teachings of enlightening beings, by mountainlike imperturbability of mind, by discerning knowledge of all mundane doings, by attainment of the transmundane path of relinquishment, by constant seeking of the supreme ultimate. 
“Imbued with these ways of purifying the stages, enlightening beings are well established in the stage of Extreme Joy. 
Once established in this stage, enlightening beings undertake great vows, great resolutions, great undertakings such as the following: 
They undertake a first great vow to make offerings to each and every buddha, in the best of forms, with the highest purity of faith, as extensively as the cosmos, to the furthest reaches of space, throughout all time. 
They undertake a second great vow to maintain the eye of the teachings spoken by all buddhas, to associate with all buddhas and enlightening beings, to preserve the teachings of all complete buddhas, to take in all truths, to the extent of the cosmos, to the furthest reaches of space, throughout all time, without ceasing, in all eons for as many buddhas as appear in the world. 
They undertake a third great vow to go to all places in all worlds where buddhas appear—from their existence in the heaven of satisfaction, descending into the human world, entry into the womb, abiding in the womb, birth, youthful enjoyments, married life, renunciation, practice of austerities, conquering demons, enlightenment, being requested to teach, setting the wheel of the great teaching in motion, and entry into great absolute nirvana—to go to all places at once, taking the lead in making offerings, receiving the teaching, and applying it in practice, to the extent of the cosmos, to the farthest reaches of space, throughout all time, without ceasing in all eons for as many buddhas as appear in the world, until the attainment of great absolute nirvana. They undertake a fourth vow to bring forth the determination to disseminate instruction in the accomplishment of means of purification of the ways of transcendence, accurate explanation of the path of the stages, the practices of all enlightening beings, bringing forth their total and particular aspects, with consideration of their common and distinctive features, as they are formed and dissolved, the many extensive immeasurable holistic practices of all buddhas and enlightening beings contained in the ways of transcendence, purifying all the stages of enlightening beings, vowing to call forth this aspiration to the extent of the cosmos, to the furthest reaches of space, throughout all time. They undertake a fifth great vow to fully develop all beings, corporeal or immaterial, thinking, nonthinking, or neither, born of eggs, wombs, moisture, or spontaneously, in all realms contained in the worlds of desire, forms, and formlessness, bound to the six paths of mundane existence in all places of birth, caught up in names and forms—to develop them to lead them into the Buddha teaching, to free them from all mundane groupings, to establish them in omniscience, to develop and mature all beings forever, to the extent of the cosmos, throughout the reaches of space, for all time, for as many eons and beings as there be. 
They undertake a sixth great vow for direct knowledge of the innumerable distinctions in all the worlds of the ten directions, variously reflecting one another, subtle and gross, upside-down, inverted, and upright, their appearance and consolidation—they vow to comprehend the distinctions of worlds, to the extent of the cosmos, throughout the reaches of space, for all time. 
They undertake a seventh great vow, to show all beings the purification of all lands in one land and one land in all lands, the adornment of innumerable buddha-lands with arrays of light, entering into the supreme realm of buddhas from which all afflictions are removed, completely purified and filled with wise beings, showing this to all beings to please them in accord with their mentalities, vowing to thoroughly purify all buddha-lands, to the extent of the cosmos, to the farthest reaches of space, throughout all time, unceasing for as many eons and buddha-lands as there may be. 
They undertake an eighth great vow, to work with the same one determination as all enlightening beings, to build up roots of goodness without opposition, to be equally focused on the same one object as all enlightening beings, to be in concert with all enlightening beings, to manifest appearances of Buddha as desired, to attain the knowledge of the powers of the Enlightened at will, to attain ever-present mystic knowledge, to travel to all worlds, to appear in the circles of all buddhas, to adapt to all situations, to attain realization of the inconceivable great vehicle, to continue to carry out the practices of enlightening beings, vowing to enter the great vehicle, to the extent of the cosmos, to the furthest reaches of space, throughout all time, unceasing for as many eons and practices as there may be. 
They undertake a ninth great vow to carry out the practice of enlightening beings, riding on the wheel that never rolls backward, by means of fruitful words, thoughts, and deeds, so that those who see them will surely realize buddhahood, those who hear what they say will attain knowledge, and so that those who have pure faith will be freed from afflictions—they vow to attain a state like a master physician, to attain embodiment of magical fulfillment of aspirations, to carry out the practices of enlightening beings as extensively as the cosmos, to the farthest reaches of space, throughout all time, unceasing for as many eons and as many practices as there be, that their deeds not be in vain. 
They undertake a tenth great vow, to awaken completely to unexcelled perfect enlightenment in all worlds, to show at every point—without leaving one place—birth, leaving home, transfiguration, austere practice, conquering demons, sitting at the pinnacle of enlightenment, turning the wheel of the teaching, and final absolute nirvana, to attain the knowledge of power of the vast realm of buddhahood and in each instant show all sentient beings the emergence of a buddha in accordance with their mentalities so that they may attain enlightenment and perfect peace, to universally realize the nirvana of all phenomena by one pefect enlightenment, to please all beings according to their mentalities with a single utterance, to show great ultimate nirvana without cutting off the power of practice, to show the construction of all teachings of the stages of great knowledge, to pervade all worlds by the mystic power of the knowledge of truth and the mystic knowledge of illusoriness, vowing to bring forth great knowledge to the extent of the cosmos, to the farthest reaches of space, throughout all time, never ceasing for all eons, for all true enlightenments. 
“Thus, having brought to the fore such great aspirations, great purposes, great undertakings, through ten great vows, enlightening beings stationed in the stage of Extreme Joy undertake countless consummate vows, which they undertake in ten ultimate terms: 
that is, to the ultimate extent of living beings, to the ultimate extent of worlds, to the ultimate extent of space, to the ultimate extent of the cosmos, to the ultimate extent of the realm of nirvana, to the ultimate extent of the emergence of buddhas, to the ultimate extent of enlightened knowledge, to the ultimate extent of realms of mental objects, to the ultimate extent of entries of knowledge into the sphere of buddhas, to the ultimate extent of the courses of worlds, the courses of teachings, and the courses of knowledge. 
Enlightening beings vow that their undertakings shall be coterminous with living beings, worlds, space, the cosmos, nirvana, the emergence of buddhas, enlightened knowledge, mental objects, entries of knowledge into the sphere of buddhas, the courses of worlds, the courses of teachings, and the courses of knowledge; and that just as all of these are endless, so shall the enlightening beings’ roots of goodness be endless. 
“In those who have taken such vows upon themselves, the workable mind and the gentle mind are incorruptibly pure. 
The enlightening beings have faith in the perfectly enlightened buddhas’ attainments of past practices, their realization of the transcendent ways, their consummate attainment of the stages, their consummate attainment of the powers, their complete fulfillment of expertise, the indestructibility of unique qualities of buddhahood, the inconceivability of buddhahood, the attainment of the sphere of buddhas, which is infinitely various, the attainment of immeasurable knowledge, the complete entry into the realm of those who arrive at Thusness. 
Enlightening beings believe in the consummation of the fruits; in sum, they believe in the practice of enlightening beings, including all that upon which is based the teaching of the stage of knowledge of enlightened ones. 
“Furthermore, it occurs to the enlightening beings that these qualities of buddhahood are so profound, so detached, so peaceful, so empty, so signless, so desireless, so undefiled, so vast, so immeasurable, so supreme, so hard to approach. “What is more, enlightening beings reflect, ignorant creatures, because of continually slipping into erroneous views, because of minds shrouded by the darkness of ignorance, because of being puffed up with pride, because of conceptions, because of mental fixations of desires caught in the net of craving, because of hopes pursued by actions in the tangle of deceit and falsehood, because of deeds connected with envy and jealousy producing mundane states, because of accumulation of actions rife with passion, hatred, and folly, because of the flames of mind ignited by anger and resentment, because of undertakings of actions bound up with delusion, because of seeds in the mind, intellect, and consciousness bound to the flows of lust, existence, and ignorance, therefore produce sprouts of subsequent life in the world. 
That is to say, name and form are born together, inseparable; and by the development of name and form, the assembly of six sense mediums takes place; once the mediums are formed, from their mutual contact sensation comes to be; and that sensation being enjoyed and sought more and more, the operation of craving grows; craving being developed, existence comes to be; once there is existence, birth, death, sorrow, lamentation, suffering, sadness, and anxiety appear. 
Thus does the mass of suffering of sentient beings arise. 
Seeing these beings’ inability to escape from this mass of suffering—not realizing it is without self or anything pertaining to self, that it is unreal, insubstantial, void, inert, ineffective, insensate as wood and stone, like a reflection—the enlightening beings develop great compassion to rescue them and free them from their miseries, and develop great kindness to bring them to endless bliss and nirvana. 
“Thus, abiding in the first stage, by sympathy and kindness and by supreme will the enlightening beings, relinquishing all things with an equanimous mind, cultivate great relinquishments in a spirit of most urgent quest for enlightened knowledge. 
Thus, having become indifferent to these, the intellect most ardently seeking enlightened knowledge relinquishes all things. Thus does the great relinquishment of those in the first stage of enlightening beings come to be. “Thus, based on compassion, kindness, and relinquishment, the enlightening beings, for the sake of the salvation and liberation of all beings, more and more seek mundane and transcendental benefits for them, and while seeking arouse an unwearying mind. Thus do the enlightening beings become indefatigable and, being indefatigable, become expert in all learning. 
Thus in possession of learning, by intelligent consideration of what should and should not be done, the enlightening beings arrive at what is variously appropriate for inferior, mediocre, and superior beings, according to their power and endowments, thus attaining knowledge of the world and humanity. 
And the enlightening beings, knowing the world, acting in accord with time and measure, adorned with constant modesty and conscience, strive for the benefit of self and others. 
And in those efforts the enlightening beings become uninterested in mundane satisfactions and attain nonreceding, undiminishing power; hence the arising of enlightening beings’ stable support of power. 
Thus stably empowered, the enlightening beings work on service to buddhas and receive their instructions. 
Hence arise in the enlightening beings the elements that purify the ten stages—faith, compassion, kindness, relinquishment, indefatigability, knowledge of the teachings, knowledge of the world and humanity, modesty and conscience, stable power, and attendance on buddhas. 
“Enlightening beings in this stage of Joy get to see many buddhas, by broad vision and by the power of vows seeing many hundreds of buddhas, many thousands of buddhas, many hundreds of thousands of buddhas, many millions, many billions, many trillions of buddhas. Having seen those buddhas, those saints, those completely enlightened ones, by broad vision and the power of vows, the enlightening beings honor and serve them with supreme zeal, presenting them with the necessities of life, such as food, clothing, drink, vessels, bedding, and medicines, and they also bring comforts for enlightening beings, and they also respect and support the religious community. 
These supreme roots of goodness the enlightening beings dedicate to consummate enlightenment. “From this service of buddhas arise means of development of beings, and the enlightening beings develop sentient beings to maturity by giving and by kind speech, the other two means of salvation helping out by the power of faith, though as yet without complete knowledge and attainment. Of the ten transcendent ways, the transcendent way of giving is foremost; not that the others are not cultivated, but they are practiced according to the enlightening beings’ power and endowment. And as the enlightening beings serve the buddhas and work for the development of sentient beings, practicing to accumulate these elements that purify the stages, thus do the enlightening beings’ roots of goodness, dedicated to universal knowledge, become more and more purified and capable of application as desired. 
Just as when gold is plunged into fire over and over by a skilled smith, it becomes more and more purified and workable and can be made into various ornaments as desired, in the same way as the enlightening beings attend buddhas and work for the perfection of sentient beings and cultivate the factors that purify the stages, so do their roots of goodness become more and more purified and useful. 
“Then the enlightening beings in this stage should ask buddhas, enlightening beings, and spiritual friends about the characteristics and attainments of this first stage and should be tireless in seeking fulfillment of the components of this stage. 
In the same way, in order to fulfill the components of the stages of enlightening beings up to the tenth, the enlightening beings should become versed in the problems and solutions of the stages, in the formation and dissolution of the stages, in the forms and actions of the stages, in the attainments and cultivation of the stages, in the purification of the elements of the stages, in the progression from stage to stage, in the attainment of each stage without regression, in the purification of all stages of enlightening, and in the accession to the stage of enlightened knowledge. 
“There is no cease in the ascent of the enlightening beings who are skilled in fostering the forms of practice of the stages up to accession to the tenth stage; by unceasing progress on the Path and by the light of knowledge of the stages, the enlightening beings attain the light of buddha-knowledge. 
It is like a skilled caravan leader who, wanting to lead a large caravan to a great city, first finds out about the qualities of the road to be traveled, the defects of the road, the best places to stop along the way, the places not to stop, and what is to be done about provisions for the trip, thus knowing well how to get to the great city, from the beginning to the end of the journey. Thus, by fully preparing for the way by this intelligent consideration, the caravan leader finally reaches the great city along with the caravan, without the caravan or himself being beset by difficulties in desolate places. 
In the same way the enlightening beings, as clever caravan leaders, when established in the first stage of enlightening beings, become familiar with the issues and solutions of the stages, the formation and dissolution of the stages, the practical aspects of the stages, the attainments and cultivation of the stages, the purification of the elements of the stages, the progression from one stage to another, the consolidation of each stage, the special knowledge of each stage, attainment of each stage without regression, and accession to the stage of buddha-knowledge by means of the quality of purification of all the stages of enlightening beings. Then the enlightening beings, having gotten together provisions of great virtue and knowledge, and having well established a store of knowledge, wishing to lead the great caravan of sentient beings to the city of omniscience, first inquire into and find out the qualities of the path of the stages, deviations from the path of the stages, errors on the path of the stages, the best of stations along the path of the stages, and what is to be done about the provisions of virtue and knowledge for the path of the stages, asking buddhas, enlightening beings, and spiritual friends about this to become versed in how to reach the great city of omniscience. 
Thus, by intelligent consideration of the way before proceeding and by thus fully preparing provisions of virtue and knowledge, the enlightening beings lead the great caravan of sentient beings according to their maturity across the wasteland of the mundane whirl to the great city of omniscience, without either the caravan or the enlightening beings being beset by the ills of the wasteland. 
Thus enlightening beings should work tirelessly on the cultivation of stages. 
“This is a brief explanation of enlightening beings’ entry into the first stage of Extreme Joy. 
Enlightening beings in this stage are mostly monarchs of a continent, having attained great power and sovereignty, guardians of right, wise and capable, taking good care of beings with great generosity, undertaking unlimited acts of charity to rid beings of the taint of envy and discontent. 
And whatever acts the enlightening beings undertake, whether by giving, or by kind speech, or by beneficial action, or by cooperation, those acts are never apart from thoughts of Buddha, of the Teaching, of the Community, of enlightening being, of the practices of enlightening beings, of the transcendent ways, of the stages, of the expertise and unique qualities of buddhas, of omniscience complete in all respects. To what purpose? 
To become the best of beings, unexcelled leaders and guides, and ultimately omniscient refuges. 
“Those who seek to be thus undertake the appropriate effort, by which they give up all comforts and go forth in conformity with the teaching of Buddha. 
Having gone forth, enlightening beings instantly attain a hundred concentrations and see a hundred buddhas and acknowledge their power; they stir a hundred worlds, go to a hundred lands, illumine a hundred worlds, mature a hundred beings, live for a hundred eons, penetrate a hundred eons past and future, contemplate a hundred teachings, and manifest a hundred bodies, each body manifesting a company of a hundred enlightening beings. 
Then enlightening beings with superior power of commitment, by the quality of excellence of vows, transform their bodies, auras, mystic powers, vision, spheres of operation, voices, conduct, adornments, power, resolutions, and performances in countless ways.” Then Diamond Matrix spoke these verses explaining the meaning of this stage: Having accumulated pure qualities and attained virtues, Done service, following enlightened kindness and compassion, Embodying supreme faith and pure goodwill, They produce an incomparable mind for enlightened knowledge. 
Intent on the power, purification, and energy of the all-knowing buddhas, To attain the state of the Victorious and save the world, The supreme will arises to develop great compassion, Turn the wheel of the teaching, and purify the buddha-lands. 
To know all times in an instant without discriminating thought, To clarify good timing in the world in its variety, Seeking, in short, all the qualities of the Guides, This noble mind, immeasurable as space, is born. 
Commanded by wisdom, led by compassion, endowed with skill in means, Pure in resolution and intent, measureless in power, Unobstructed, direct, not relying on another’s guidance, Knowledge of the supreme mind equal to the enlightened, With the birth of this mind-jewel of enlightening beings One transcends the sphere of the ignorant and reaches the sphere of buddhas, Is born in the family of the enlightened, impeccable, Gone to equality with buddhas, certain of highest enlightenment. 
Once one produces this mind, one attains this stage, The will immovable as a mountain, Joyful and happy, serene, resolute, and forceful, With a buoyant mind, Nonviolent, harmless, free from anger, Modest and respectful, with superior honesty, self-controlled; One remembers the immeasurable knowledge that saves the world And becomes joyful in anticipation of that state. 
When one attains this stage, five fears depart— Not being able to make a living, dying, reputation, misery, fear of groups— Thus fear is gone: 
Because there is no attachment to self. 
Those free from fear and full of compassion and kindness, With faith, respect, and modesty, rich in virtues, Practicing good day and night, seek the teaching for the sake of truth And not for enjoyment of mundane desires. 
Considering well the teachings they have heard with unattached minds, Their will for enlightenment directed without desire for gain, Seeking knowledge and power, the purifying teachings of buddhas, They work on the ways of transcendence, free from delusion and conceit. 
Acting in accord with their words, steadfast in truthful speech, They do not sully the family of buddhas, carrying out the study of enlightenment; Detached from mundane doings, wishing benefit for the world, Tireless in good works, they climb ever higher. 
Thus seeking the truth, intent on the quest for virtue, They undertake the vow to behold the buddhas; To preserve the true teaching and approach the seers, They undertake the vows of those whose acts are supreme. 
To develop beings and purify the buddha-land, To populate their land with enlightening beings, With unity of purpose, not in vain, They seek enlightenment everywhere. 
They undertake many such vows, which are infinitely extensive, Enduring as space, beings, time, the nature of things, nirvana, The world, the emergence of buddhas, And the ground of knowledge. 
They will their vows to last as long as there are mental objects And access to knowledge, endless in the world as long as it operates: 
“When these end, may my undertakings end too— May I attain practice enduring as these.” Thus thoroughly dedicated, with harmonious, flexible minds, They put faith in the virtues of buddhas and observe sentient beings: 
Knowing beings are conditioned, out of compassion they feel They should rescue suffering beings from afflictions. 
For that purpose they undertake various kinds of giving— Of kingship, all kinds of treasures, horses and elephants, Their heads, hands, feet, eyes, even their blood and flesh— All they give away, without becoming distressed in mind. They seek out various teachings, indefatigable; Learned, they accord with the ways of the world. 
Knowing the world, modest and steadfast, They serve innumerable buddhas with reverence and respect. 
Thus they practice constantly, day and night, Their virtue refined as gold in fire; Thus having made the preparations for the ten stages, They attain freedom from hindrance, having destroyed the obstacles. 
Just as a caravan leader, for the benefit of the great caravan, Asks about the features of the road and then goes safely, So do enlightening beings in the first stage setting out Reach enlightenment unhindered, by way of the ten stages. 
Stationed here, they become virtuous sovereigns, Guiding aright, nonviolent and benevolent; Leaders of the whole continent, they bring all people To relinquishment and the highest buddha-knowledge. 
Having boldly abandoned rulership in search of truth, They betake themselves to Buddha’s teaching and begin to practice it; Attaining a hundred concentrations and seeing a hundred buddhas, They shake a hundred lands and travel as illuminators. 
They purify a hundred beings, seek out a hundred doors of truth, And penetrate a hundred eons, manifesting a hundred bodies; They manifest a hundred enlightening beings, or even more, The power of their supreme vows immeasurable. 
“This is an explanation of the excellent first stage of enlightening beings seeking benefit for all worlds. 
Such is the first stage of enlightening beings, which is called Extreme Joy.” Having heard about the supreme felicitous realm of this stage, the enlightening beings were delighted, their minds and thoughts pure: 
getting up from their seats and rising into the air, they scattered flowers all around, uttering words of praise: 
Excellent, Diamond Matrix, replete with great wisdom and expertise; You have explained well this stage practiced by enlightening beings. 
The assembly pure in mind, Moon of Liberation asks To hear about the next highest, second stage. How should the mind be directed to see the second stage? 
Speak forth, O wise one—the enlightening beings desire to hear. 
The enlightening being Diamond Matrix said, “The enlightening beings who have successfully accomplished the requirements of the first stage and seek the second stage should activate ten mental dispositions: 
When these ten dispositions are operative, one is established in the second stage of enlightening beings, the stage of Purity. 
“Enlightening beings in the stage of Purity naturally become imbued with ten virtuous ways of acting: 
they avoid taking life, they abandon weapons and hostility, they have conscience and sympathy and are compassionate and kind to all living beings, wishing for their welfare. They do not harm living beings even in their fantasies, much less injure other beings by gross physical harm with the conception of beings as such. “The enlightening beings also abandon taking what is not given. They are satisfied with what they have and do not desire others’ possessions. 
Thinking of things that belong to others as belonging to others, they do not give rise to any intention to steal and do not take even so much as a blade of grass or a leaf that is not given to them, much less take the necessities of life from others. “The enlightening beings also abandon sexual misconduct. 
They are satisfied with their own spouses and do not desire the spouses of others. They do not give rise to desire for others’ spouses, much less have sexual intercourse with them. 
Even in dreams they do not speak falsehood with the intention to deceive by concealing what they see, believe, wish, intend, or desire; they do not tell lies even in dreams, much less consciously. 
They do not gossip or tell tales here and there to cause division; they do not break up those who are together or increase the division of those already split. 
“The enlightening beings also abandon coarse speech and give up speech that is out of place, crude, dirty, harsh to others, openly or covertly annoying to others, vulgar, worldly or impure, unpleasant to hear, provocative, irritating, outrageous, displeasing, disagreeable, unpleasant, destructive to self or others. 
They speak words with content, carefully considering and guarding their speech, in accord with the occasion, in well-regulated order, reflecting even before telling a joke, and never, of course, chattering at random. 
“The enlightening beings also become free from covetousness, not even conceiving any craving for others’ wealth, pleasures, enjoyments, goods, and possessions, much less desiring to possess what belongs to others; they do not seek or hope for or desire gain. 
They give up divination and various misguided views, see rightly, do not practice deception, and set their minds on the Buddha, Teaching, and Community. 
“As the enlightening beings constantly preserve these ten virtuous ways, they evoke this intent: ‘Whatever ills, states of woe, and pitfalls beset sentient beings, all are caused by practicing nonvirtuous action, so I myself will abide in right action and also lead others to right action. 
It is impossible to get others to abide in right action as long as one does not abide in right action oneself.’ “They also think thus: 
the realms of hells, animality, and ghosthood are established by the practice of bad ways of action, and the states from humanity up to the highest realm of existence are established by the practice of good ways of action. 
The ten ways of good action on a higher level practiced by wisdom, due to narrowness, fear of the world, lack of great compassion, and following the speech of another, develop the vehicle of hearers. 
Purified on a yet higher level, because of not being led by another, because of self-realization without following anyone, because of self-enlightenment without seeking from another, because of lack of great compassion and skill in means, and because of profound understanding of conditionality, they develop the vehicle of individual illuminates. 
Purified on an even higher level, by immeasurable broadmindedness, sympathy and compassion, absorption of skill in means, undertaking of great vows, not abandoning sentient beings, and focus on the vast knowledge of buddhahood, they make for the breadth of practice to purify the stages of enlightening beings and the ways of transcendence. Purified on a yet higher level, they are conducive to the perfection of all characteristics of enlightenment, up to endowment with the ten powers and the full realization of all qualities of buddhahood. Therefore, by means of these ways of good action, having undertaken them all equally, effort should be made to accomplish the complete purification of all of their aspects. “They also realize this: 
bad actions at their worst, when developed and done a lot, are the cause of hell; at a middling degree, they are the cause of animality; at their least they are the cause of the underworld. 
Taking life leads to hell, to animality, to the underworld, but if one is born human, it brings about two consequences: a short life and much sickness. 
Stealing leads to hell, to animality, to the underworld, but if one is born human, it brings about two consequences: 
material poverty and common possession of property. 
Sexual misconduct leads to hell, to animality, to the underworld, but if one is born human, it brings about two consequences: 
an unruly society and an unfaithful spouse. 
Lying leads to hell, to animality, to the underworld, but if one is born human it brings on two consequences: much slander and unreliability. 
Divisive talk leads to hell, to animality, to the underworld, but if one is born human it brings about two consequences: 
a broken home and a wretched family. 
Harsh talk leads to hell, to animality, to the underworld, but if one is born human it brings about two consequences: 
hearing what is displeasing, and argumentativeness. 
Confused, senseless talk leads to hell, to animality, to the underworld, but if one is born human it brings about two consequences: 
one’s words will not be believed and one’s speech will be unclear. 
Covetousness leads to hell, to animality, to the underworld, but then if one is born human it brings about two consequences: 
dissatisfaction and ambitiousness. 
Anger leads to hell, to animality, to the underworld, but then if one is born human it brings on two consequences: 
falling into bad views and becoming tricky and deceitful. 
Thus these ten bad ways of action tend to the formation of an immeasurably great mass of misery—so let us leave behind these ten bad ways of action and enjoy the delights of the garden of righteousness. 
“Having abandoned these ten bad ways of action, they live by the ten good ways of action and also lead others to them. 
Even more do the enlightening beings arouse toward all sentient beings desire for their welfare and happiness, with kindness, sympathy, compassion, and desire to care for them and protect them, thinking of all beings as equal to themselves, thinking of them as examples and teachers. “This is what the enlightening beings think: 
‘Alas, these beings have fallen into wrong views; their thinking and disposition of mind is wrong: traveling on erroneous paths, in the midst of entanglements, they should be set by us on the true way, the road of right insight, in accord with reality. 
Alas, these beings are at odds, argumentative, involved in disputes, always burning with anger and hatred—we should establish them in the exercise of unexcelled great kindness. 
Alas, these beings are insatiable, coveting others’ goods, following bad ways of making a living—we should establish them in pure deed, word, thought, and livelihood. 
Unfortunately, these beings follow the motivations of lust, hatred, and delusion, are burned by the flames of various afflictions, and do not seek a means of final escape from them—we should lead them to nirvana, where all afflictions cease and there are no ills. 
Regrettably, these beings are veiled by the darkness and obscurity of delusion and covered by the darkness of ignorance; they have entered a vast tangle of darkness, have become far estranged from the realm of wisdom and fallen into a great darkness, entered a wilderness of erroneous views—we should clarify their eye of unobstructed wisdom, so they will know all things as they really are without being directed by another. 
Alas, these beings are traveling in the desert of routine existence; they are in trouble, uneasy, fallen into a great pitfall, facing a fall into the realms of hells, animality, or the underworld; they are ensnared in the dangerous net of false views, entangled in delusion; they have gone off on the wrong road, are blind, lack a guide, and think what is not salvation is salvation; bound by the rope of demons, they are taken in by the thieving sense objects, are without a good guide, and have entered a thicket of demonic dispositions, becoming far estranged from the enlightened mentality: 
we should save them from such hardships of the wasteland of the mundane whirl and should settle them in the city of fearlessness, the city of all knowledge, where there is no affliction or pain. 
These beings, unfortunately, are sunk in the waves of great torrents, plunged into the flows of desire, existence, ignorance, and views, swept along by the current of the mundane whirl, fallen into the river of craving, into a great rapids, unable to see objectively, going along the creepers of thoughts of lust, malice, and viciousness, caught by the demon of the view of real existence of the body, plunged into the swirling abyss of desire, into the midst of passion for enjoyment, cast up on the land of self-conceit, rotten inside with misconduct and bad behavior, unable to escape the danger of the village of the six senses, without anyone to rescue them, without a savior or protector, without a refuge: 
we should bring forth great compassion, virtue, and power, and set them on the jewel island of omniscience, free from troubles, free from passion, peaceful, happy, free from danger, beyond all fears. 
These beings are unfortunately locked up in much suffering, sadness, and irritation, in bonds of love and hate, like and dislike, in sadness and grief, in the fetters of craving, in the tangles of illusion, deceit, and ignorance, in the prison of the triple world: 
we should lead them to nirvana, detached from the triple world, the city of fearlessness, where all suffering ceases, free from obstruction. 
Alas, these beings are attached to self and possessions, unable to get out of clinging to the elements of body and mind, acting according to delusions, dwelling in the desolate village of the senses, attacked by the vipers of physical constituents, besieged by the murderous bandits of the body-mind clusters, experiencing immeasurable pain: 
we should bring them to supreme bliss, free from all attachments—that is, to nirvana void of all obstructions. 
It is a pity that the aspirations of these beings are base and narrow and they lack the will for highest omniscience; even if they want to escape, they think of the vehicles of those aiming for individual enlightenment and liberation alone—we should set them in the unexcelled Great Vehicle of universal salvation in accord with focus on the great resolution for supreme buddhahood and the perspicacity of omniscience.’ “Thus many buddhas come within the range of perception of the enlightening beings who are in accord with the sustaining power of morality, who have skillfully activated sympathy, compassion, and kindness, who are unsolicited good friends to all beings, who have not abandoned sentient beings, who skillfully accomplish what is to be done, who are stationed in the enlightening beings’ stage of purity, by the enlightening beings’ great vision and willpower: 
the enlightening beings perceive enormously many buddhas, many hundreds, thousands, millions, billions, trillions of buddhas, by their tremendous vision and the power of their vows. Having seen those buddhas, they honor and pay respect and homage to them with lofty intent, and provide them with the necessities—clothing, food and drink, bedding, and medicine; they also provide comforts for enlightening beings and pay respect to the religious community. 
They dedicate these roots of goodness to unexcelled perfect enlightenment. 
Also they attend those buddhas and respectfully learn from them the ten ways of virtuous action and never forget them as they have learned them; over countless eons rid of the defilements of envy and bad behavior, they therefore attain purity of generosity and morality. 
“Just as gold becomes more and more free from all impurities when put in vitriol, so do enlightening beings in this stage of Purity, by virtue of riddance of the impurities of envy and bad behavior, accomplish purity of generosity and morality. 
Among the four means of salvation, kind speech is paramount in them; among the ten transcendent ways, morality is paramount. 
This does not mean they do not practice the rest—they do so as best they can, as is appropriate. 
“This is a brief explanation of the second stage of enlightening beings, the stage of Purity. 
Many of the enlightening beings in this stage are sovereigns, lords of four continents and masters of the law, competent, powerful, able to rid beings of the impurities of bad behavior, to set them on the ten paths of virtuous conduct. 
Whatever acts the enlightening beings undertake, whether by way of giving, or kind speech, or beneficial action, or cooperation, all of it is done with no other thoughts in mind but thoughts of the Buddha, the Teaching, the Community, enlightening beings, the practices of enlightening beings, the ways of transcendence, the stages, the powers, the expertises, the unique qualities of buddhas, and all aspects of omniscience. 
To become the best of beings, unexcelled leaders and guides, and ultimately omniscient refuges. 
“Those who seek to be thus undertake the appropriate effort, by which they give up all comforts and go forth into the teaching of Buddha. 
Having gone forth, in a single instant they suddenly attain a thousand concentrations, see a thousand buddhas and recognize their power, shake a thousand worlds, go to a thousand fields, illumine a thousand worlds, mature a thousand beings, live for a thousand eons, penetrate a thousand eons past and future, contemplate a thousand teachings, and manifest a thousand bodies, each body manifesting a company of a thousand enlightening beings. 
Then enlightening beings with superior power of commitment, by the quality of excellence of vows, transform their bodies, auras, mystic powers, vision, spheres of operation, voices, conduct, adornments, power, resolutions, and performances in countless ways.” Then Diamond Matrix spoke these verses explaining the meaning of this stage: They are gentle, honest, mild, capable, Of goodwill, docile, unalloyed, unattached, of lofty awareness; With breadth of mind they enter the second stage. Here, they are bearers of virtue, imbued with good. Avoiding the taking of life, their minds are free from viciousness. 
They do not take what is not given or take others’ spouses. They are truthful, do not slander, are not harsh in speech. They have no desire for others’ possessions, are kind-hearted, Follow the right Path, and have no deceitful mind. With phantom bodies, beautifully adorned, They honor the Teacher and are always diligent. 
The pains of hells and animal realms, Punishment in the underworld, eternal burning and hunger, All are produced by evil doings; Rejecting them, let us arrive at truth. 
From birth in the human realm as desired, Up to the peak of existence, free from strife, with the bliss of meditation, The vehicle of solitary illuminates, the vehicles of disciples and buddhas, All come to exist from the ten paths of virtue. 
Knowing this, enlightening beings are always diligent, Firmly abiding by ethics and also inducing others to do so. 
Furthermore, imbued with compassion, Knowing beings are suffering, they give rise to sympathy. 
“Fallen into wrong views are these ignorant ones, With minds quick to anger, hate, and argue, Always unsatisfied, seeking objects ever more— These beings motivated by desire, hatred, and delusion should be liberated. 
“They are covered by a great darkness, plunged into delusion, On a bad road in a wilderness, in a great net of views; In the cage of mundane life, enemies attack them— We should liberate those in the cage of the devil. 
“Taken by the waves of afflictions, sunk in the torrents, They are tormented by a hundred miseries in the triple world, Wrapped up in the clusters, thinking of them as self— For their sake we strive, to release them from pain. 
“Having given up this supreme vehicle of buddhahood, Though they aim for escape, their aspiration is low; We will establish them in the undefiled knowledge of the enlightened.” Thus enlightening beings arouse incomparable vigor in the cause of enlightenment. 
In this stage the great sages, having gathered hundreds of virtues, See many buddhas and honor them with offerings. 
Their virtue is burnished the more for countless eons, Like gold plunged into vitriol. 
Here enlightening beings become monarchs, Leading sentient beings by the ten virtues: 
By all the virtue they have amassed, They will to become saviors of the world, rich in the ten powers. 
Willfully giving up the pleasures of kingship, Gone forth into the supreme Teaching, steadfast, Full of vigor, they attain supreme concentration And instantly see a thousand buddhas. 
The enlightening beings in this stage also display Many spiritual powers, of such worthy intentions; Beyond this, imbued with the power of vows and knowledge, They guide beings with many kinds of miracles. 
“Thus has been explained the second stage, exalted, of enlightening beings, who work for the weal of all worlds.” Having thus heard of the supreme stages of practice in the sphere of enlightening beings, inconceivable, the enlightening beings in the audience, delighted, scattered multitudes of flowers from the sky, saying, “Excellent! 
Well have you explained, out of compassion for all beings, the body of conduct of the wise, the sphere of the second of the highest stages. 
Truthfully, without falsehood or change, have you explained the delightful practice of enlightening beings, with supreme clarity, for the welfare and happiness of all beings. 
Go on to speak of the third of the most excellent stages—let this superlative realm be told of as it is, linked with true knowledge and action. 
Tell of the path of the conduct of the Victorious, the practice of charity and morality of the sages, patience, energy, tranquillity, wisdom, skillfulness, supreme kindness, and compassion—tell all, omitting naught.” Moon of Liberation said, “O Diamond Matrix, tell of the disposition of those who approach the third stage.” Diamond Matrix said, “The enlightening beings who have thoroughly purified the mind in the second stage come to the third stage. 
One enters the third stage by ten conscious focusings of the mind: 
purity, stability, disillusion, dispassion, nonregression, steadfastness, ardor, tirelessness, high-mindedness, and magnanimity. 
By consciously focusing the mind on these ten things, one enters the third stage. 
“Furthermore, the enlightening beings in this third stage examine the impermanence of all that is conditioned, as it truly is; and they examine the painfulness, impurity, unreliability, destructibility, instability, instantaneous arising and passing away, not-coming-to-be-previously, not-reaching-the-past, and nonperdurance in the present of all that is conditioned. 
Seeing all conditioned things in this way, the enlightening beings, seeing themselves without refuge, without protection, in grief, sadness, distress, bound by likes and dislikes, with much suffering, dejection, and turmoil, without resources, burned by the fires of lust, hatred, and delusion, filled with many diseases, cause their minds to be more and more liberated from all conditioned things and direct their minds toward enlightened knowledge. 
The enlightening beings also recognize the inconceivability of enlightened knowledge and recognize its incomparability, its immeasurability, its difficulty of access, its independence, its freedom from afflictions, its freedom from distress, and how it arrives at the city of fearlessness and never comes back from it, and how it saves many people. 
“Thus observing the immeasurability of enlightened knowledge, and observing how full of ills all conditioned states are, the enlightening beings further develop ten feelings toward sentient beings: 
the feeling that they are without a leader or a refuge; the feeling that they are always destitute; the feeling that they are burned by the fire of passion, hostility, and folly; the feeling that they are locked in the prison of existence; the feeling that they are always veiled in sleep in the thickets of afflictions; the feeling that they are incapable of viewing things objectively; the feeling that they have abandoned the desire for good; the feeling that they have lost the way to enlightenment; the feeling that they go along with the flow of the mundane whirl; the feeling that they have lost the means to liberation. 
“Seeing the world of sentient beings so full of afflictions, the enlightening beings arouse their energy, thinking, ‘I should rescue and liberate these beings; I should purify and emancipate them; I should lead them, direct them, make them happy, develop them, and cause them to reach perfect peace.’ “Thus disillusioned with all conditioned things, considerate toward all sentient beings, seeing the benefit in omniscience, taking refuge in enlightened knowledge, dedicated to the salvation of all beings, the enlightening beings reflect thus: 
‘By what means can these beings, fallen as they are into so much misery, be lifted out of it and established in the ultimate bliss of nirvana and be caused to attain freedom from doubt about all things?’ It occurs to these enlightening beings, ‘The means to do this is nowhere else but in the realm of knowledge of unobstructed liberation; and the knowledge of unobstructed liberation is nowhere else but in awareness of all things as they are; and awareness of all things as they are is nowhere else but in transcendent knowledge of the unconditioned and unproduced; and that light of knowledge is nowhere else but in contemplation by the analytic intellect skilled in meditation; and that contemplation by the analytic intellect skilled in meditation is nowhere else but in skill in learning.’ “The enlightening beings thus apply this contemplative knowledge to the quest of the Buddha Way, day and night intent on hearing the Teaching, desirous of the Teaching, enjoying the Teaching, delighted in the Teaching, relying on the Teaching, devoted to the Teaching, concentrated on the Teaching, intent on the Teaching, taking refuge in the Teaching, dwelling on the Teaching, saved by the Teaching, acting in accord with the Teaching. 
“While the enlightening beings are thus focused on the quest for the Buddha Way, there is nothing they do not give up—goods, supplies, dwelling, precious things, even their own bodies—and because of their desire for truth they do not consider this difficult to do; they only consider it difficult to find a person who utters the truth, who teaches even a single phrase of truth. 
For the sake of the Buddha Teaching there is no external thing whatsoever that they are attached to that they do not give up, and there is nothing whatsoever within themselves that they do not give up. 
There is no service to teachers they do not take on; there is no pride or conceit they do not abandon and no humility of action they do not accept; there is no physical suffering they do not bear. 
They are more glad to hear a single verse of the Teaching that they have not heard than they would be to get a galaxy full of jewels; they are more glad to hear a well-spoken verse than they would be to gain kingship; they are more glad to hear a new phrase of teaching spoken by a complete buddha purifying enlightening practice than they would be to attain godhood for many hundreds of thousands of eons. 
If someone should declare to the enlightening beings, ‘I too have a phrase of teaching spoken by a perfectly enlightened buddha that purifies the practice of enlightening beings, which I will tell you if you throw yourself in a great blazing pit of fire and endure the agony,’ the enlightening beings think, ‘For the sake of even a single phrase of teaching spoken by a completely enlightened buddha I could even bear to hurl myself from the heavens into a whole galaxy of fire, to say nothing of an ordinary pit of fire. 
Indeed, we should seek the Buddha Teaching even through all the afflictions and pains of hells, to say nothing of the pains of life in the human world.’ They seek the teachings with such heroic vigor as this, and they contemplate the teachings truthfully as they hear them. 
Furthermore, having heard these teachings, with profound meditation in their own minds, alone in solitary places, they think, ‘It is by realization and practice of the Teaching through appropriate methods that these doctrines of Buddha are to be followed they cannot be clarified just by talk.’ “Enlightening beings in this stage of Refulgence leave desires and evil and unwholesome things for the sake of realization of the Teaching and its practical application: with thought and reflection, becoming aloof, joyful and blissful, they attain the first stage of meditation and abide there. 
By cessation of thought and reflection, inner purity, and mastery of single-mindedness, free from thought and cogitation, concentrated, joyful and blissful, they attain and abide in the second stage of meditation. 
By freedom from desire for joy they abide in equanimity; with mindfulness and precise knowledge, they experience physical bliss: as the sages say, those who are dispassionate, mindful, blissful, and detached from joy attain to and abide in the third stage of meditation. 
By the abandonment of pleasure and pain, and by the disappearance of former joy and dejection, free from both pleasure and pain, equanimous, with pure mindfulness, they attain to and abide in the fourth stage of meditation. 
“By transcendence of all perceptions of form, by disappearance of all perceptions of objects, by not placing the attention on various perceptions, they attain to and abide in the realm of infinity of space, aware of infinite space. 
Totally transcending the realm of infinity of space, they attain to and abide in the realm of infinity of consciousness, aware of boundless consciousness. 
By totally transcending the realm of infinity of consciousness, they attain to and abide in the realm of nothingness, aware of the absence of anything at all. 
Totally transcending the realm of nothingness, they attain to and abide in the realm of neither perception nor nonperception. 
This is done on a basis not of enjoyment, but only for the purpose of accomplishment of practical application of the Teaching. 
In the same way, with minds imbued with compassion, joy, and equanimity, broad-minded, magnanimous, nondualistic, without hostility or enmity, without obstruction or affliction, reaching everywhere, they roam throughout the cosmos, to all worlds in space. 
They experience many kinds of miraculous actions, even shaking the earth; being one, they become multiple, and having become multiple, they become one; they are able to appear and disappear; they go through walls and even through mountains, just as through space; they travel sitting through the sky like birds; they emerge from and sink into the earth unhindered as though in water, and walk on water as on earth; they produce smoke and flames like a great bonfire and emit water from their bodies like great clouds, by which torrents this world system, set ablaze, is annihilated; even the sun and moon here, powerful and mighty, they take in hand, and extend their power even up to the heaven of Brahma; by the divine ear, purified, beyond humans, they hear both celestial and human voices, whether soft or loud, far or near, hearing even the sounds of insects; they know the minds of other beings, other persons, as they really are—they know if they are covetous or desireless, if they are hateful or not, if they are deluded or not, if they are afflicted or not, if they are small-minded or broad-minded, if they are magnanimous, if they are beyond measure, if they are confused or not, if they are concentrated or not, if they are liberated or not, if they are defiled or not, if their minds are crude or not—all this they know as it really is; in this way they know the minds of other people as they really are. 
They remember many former abodes: 
they remember one lifetime, two, three, four, five, ten, one hundred, two hundred, three hundred, four hundred, five hundred—they remember hundreds of lifetimes, many hundreds of lifetimes, many thousands of lifetimes, many hundreds of thousands of lifetimes, many hundreds of thousands of billions of trillions of lifetimes; they remember the age of becoming, the age of disintegration, the age of becoming and disintegration, and remember many ages of becoming and disintegration, hundreds of ages, thousands of ages, hundreds of thousands of ages, hundreds of millions of ages, hundreds of billions of ages, up to hundreds of billions of trillions of ages—they know, ‘I was in such and such a place named such and such, of such and such a family, of such and such a caste, with such and such a diet, with such and such a life span, abiding so long, experiencing such and such pleasures and pains; I died there and was born here, died here and was born there’—they know many kinds of former abodes, including their characteristics, appearances, and speech there. 
With the divine eye, purified, beyond that of humans, they see beings, dying, being born, of good character, of bad character, in good states, in bad states, inferior, superior, following the force of their deeds; they know beings as they truly are: 
‘These beings are badly behaved in thought, word, and eed, they slander the sages, they entertain false views; owing to the pursuit of actions based on false views, by that cause, that condition, after the disintegration of the body and death they fall into states of woe and are born in hells. 
These other beings are virtuous in thought, word, and deed, they do not slander the sages, they see rightly; because of their deeds and undertaking of duty based on right views, after they die they are born in blissful states in heavens.’ Thus, by the divine eye, purified, beyond that of humans, they see beings, their characteristics, appearances, and speech, dying, being born, of good and bad appearance and character, in good or bad states, inferior and superior, according to their deeds—they know them as they truly are. 
They enter and arise from these meditations, liberations, concentrations, and attainments, without being born by their force. 
If they see somewhere where the elements of enlightenment may be fulfilled, they are purposely born there by willpower because such is the mental consistency of enlightening beings, having accomplished skill in means. 
“The enlightening beings in this stage of Refulgence see many buddhas, by great vision and the power of will they see many hundreds of buddhas, many hundreds of thousands, millions, billions, trillions of buddhas, by great vision and willpower. Having seen those buddhas, those completely enlightened ones, they honor and make offerings to them with great earnestness, providing them with food, clothing, medicines, and seats and beds. They also provide comforts for enlightening beings and honor the religious community. 
They dedicate these roots of goodness to consummate enlightenment. 
They observe the absence of process and nonextinction and conditionality of all things; all their bonds of desire become weaker, all their bonds to form, all their bonds to existence, all their bonds of ignorance become weaker, and their bonds caused by views have already been removed. 
Wrong desires are gone from the enlightening beings in the stage of Refulgence because of countless eons of nonaccumulation, and so are wrong hatred and misguided delusions, because they do not produce or accumulate them. 
Their roots of goodness become clarified, purified, and useful. 
Just as gold in the hands of a skillful smith remains the same weight, in the same way the wrong desire, hatred, and delusion are gone from the enlightening beings in the stage of Refulgence, not being accumulated for countless ages, while their roots of goodness become clarified and purified and useful. 
“Furthermore, their patience and gentleness are purified, as well as their friendliness, freedom from anger, imperturbability, calmness, freedom from pride and self-abasement, freedom from desire to be honored, freedom from desire for reward for what they do, honesty, and nonentanglement—all these are purified. 
For them, among the four means of salvation, beneficial action is paramount, and among the ten transcendent ways, transcendent tolerance is paramount, while they practice the others according to their power. 
“This is a summary of the third stage of enlightening beings, the stage of Refulgence. 
The majority of the enlightening beings in this stage are Indras, chiefs of the celestial beings of the thirty-three heavens, capable, powerful, providing means of detaching beings from lust and desire, skilled in extricating beings from the mud of desire. 
Whatever the enlightening beings do—whether by charity, kind speech, beneficial action, or cooperation—their thoughts are always fixed on Buddha, the Teaching, the Community, enlightening beings, the practices of enlightening beings, the transcendent ways, the stages, the expertises and unique qualities of buddhas, including complete omniscience. 
“Those who seek to be thus undertake the appropriate effort, by which they instantly attain a hundred thousand concentrations, see a hundred thousand buddhas and recognize their power, shake a hundred thousand worlds, go to a hundred thousand lands, illumine a hundred thousand worlds, mature a hundred thousand beings, live for a hundred thousand eons, penetrate a hundred thousand eons past and future, contemplate a hundred thousand teachings, and manifest a hundred thousand bodies, each body accompanied by a hundred thousand enlightening beings. 
Then enlightening beings with the power of vows perform, by the excellence of their vows, countless transformations of their bodies, auras, mystic powers, vision, spheres of operation, voices, conduct, adornments, power, resolutions, and performances.” Then Diamond Matrix spoke these verses explaining the meaning of this stage: With pure minds, full of virtue, keen of mind, Dispassionate and unregressing, Steadfast, ardent, firm, energetic, magnanimous, They enter the third stage. 
In the third stage, Refulgence, they contemplate The principle of suffering, impermanence, impurity, Dissolution, evanescence, momentariness, inefficiency, And absence of coming and going, of all that is conditioned. 
They see the conditioned as sickness, accompanied by grief and lament, Affliction, bound by attraction and aversion, An abode of suffering and unhappiness, like blazing fire, All this endlessly arising together. 
Disillusioned with all states of being, unattached, Single-mindedly seeking enlightened knowledge, They see the knowledge of buddhas as inconceivable, Unthinkable, incomparable, free from affliction. 
Seeing buddha-knowledge free from all ills, They pity those who are helpless, forever destitute, Burned by the fires of passion and folly, Minds bound by a hundred miseries in hellish existences. 
They undertake steadfast effort to save those veiled in afflictions, Those who are without insight, who have little will, Who are deprived of the jewel of the way of enlightenment, Following the flow of the mundane whirl, afraid of liberation. 
Seeking knowledge, unattached, acting for the sake of the world, They consider how the liberation of the world may be caused— It is nowhere but in the unobstructed knowledge of the enlightened, And the endless knowledge of Buddhas is born of wisdom. 
Reflecting that wisdom comes from learning, Enlightening beings strive diligently as learners; Day and night, in the cause of learning, doing nothing else, They seek the truth as the ultimate goal. 
Collections of jewels and pearls, beloved relatives, Sovereignty, endless kinds of cities and fine abodes, Spouses and children, agreeable companions— All they relinquish without attachment for the sake of truth. 
Head, hands, feet, eyes, flesh, tongue, teeth, ears, Heart, blood, bones, marrow, They gladly give away, not considering it hard, Only considering it hard to get to hear the truth. 
If someone should tell them He would give a jewel of the Buddha’s teaching To anyone who would jump into a blazing fire, They would jump in without anxiety. 
For a single phrase of the Teaching they would leap From the heavens into a galaxy of fire: 
How hard is this supreme enlightenment of buddhas to attain, That is gained by such human suffering? 
They would endure the unremitting pains of hell For as long as it takes to attain the knowledge of the seers, To say nothing of the mass of pain of the human world— They will accept pain for the sake of the supreme Teaching. 
And having heard the Teaching, they think about it reasonably And accomplish the four meditations, immeasurable minds, Formless trances, and five supreme mystic knowledges, But, having mastered them, are not born under their sway. 
Here the bearers of virtue pay honor to myriad buddhas And with doubt-free minds listen to the Teaching; In this stage they become free from error, purified, Like gold freed from dross, undiminished. 
Here the virtuous ones undertake celestial lordship, Powerful, free from lust, Making manifold groups of people virtuous and dispassionate, Intent on seeking the qualities of buddhahood. 
Here enlightening beings undertake vigorous effort; Having attained a full hundred thousand concentrations, They see buddhas’ bodies’ various eminent characteristics, And infinitely more qualities, by superlative will. 
“This has been an explanation of the third stage of enlightening beings, who seek benefit for all people.” Thus having heard of this far-reaching practice, this lofty, eminent stage, the enlightening beings were delighted and showered the Buddha with flowers. 
When this teaching was spoken, the oceans and earth trembled; beautiful devoted goddesses reveled in the Teaching in song, while the gods, overjoyed, showered heavenly jewels on the Buddha and said, “A victor who speaks beneficially has arisen, having reached the ultimate weal and virtue. 
We have now heard of the superlative way, the supreme conduct of enlightening beings, the stage of the wise, which is hard to get to hear of even in a hundred eons. 
Speak further, O sage, for the benefit of heaven and earth, of the excellent practice of enlightening beings. 
This crowd of celestials wants to hear the definitive, exhaustive truth.” Moon of Liberation said to Diamond Matrix, “Heroic speaker, tell the enlightening beings of the exalted state of those who enter the fourth stage.” Diamond Matrix said, “Whoever has thoroughly purified vision in the third stage enters the fourth stage. 
One attains this stage by ten entries into the light of the Teaching: 
by entry into the light through contemplation of the realms of beings; by entry into the light through contemplation of the realms of the world; by entry into the light through contemplation of the realms of phenomena and principles; by entry into the light through contemplation of the realm of space; by entry into the light through contemplation of the realm of consciousness; by entry into the light through contemplation of the realm of desire; by entry into the light through contemplation of the realm of form; by entry into the light through contemplation of the realm of formlessness; by entry into the light through contemplation of the realm of high-minded devotion; and by entry into the light through contemplation of the realm of inclinations of the magnanimous mind. 
“Here, in this fourth stage, called Blazing, simultaneous with the attainment of this stage the enlightening beings are born in the family of buddhas, so as to attain the qualities proper to it by means of ten things that develop and mature knowledge: 
by nonregressing will; by ultimate unbreakable faith in the three treasures; by contemplation of the origination and extinction of conditioned things; by contemplation of the nonorigination of inherent nature; by contemplation of the formation and disintegration of worlds; by contemplation of coming into existence due to actions; by contemplation of the mundane whirl and nirvana; by contemplation of actions of beings and lands; by contemplation of past and future; and by contemplation of nonbeing and nonanmhilation. 
Having embodied these ten things that mature knowledge, enlightening beings are born in the family of buddhas by attainment of the principles that are proper to it. 
“Furthermore, the enlightening beings in this Blazing stage carry on examination of the inner body vigorously, with precise awareness and mindfulness, getting rid of worldly desire and dejection. 
They carry on examination of the external body vigorously, with precise awareness and mindfulness, getting rid of worldly desire and dejection. 
They do the same to internal sensation, external sensation, and internal and external sensation, to the internal mind, the external mind, and the internal and external mind. 
They carry on examination of internal phenomena, precisely aware and mindful, getting rid of worldly desire and dejection. They carry on examination of external phenomena, precisely aware and mindful, getting rid of worldly desire and dejection. They carry on examination of internal and external phenomena, precisely aware and mindful, getting rid of worldly desire and dejection. 
“The enlightening beings will and strive for the nonarising of bad and unwholesome states that have not yet arisen; they initiate vigorous effort, commanding the mind and directing it properly. 
They will and strive for the destruction of bad and unwholesome states that have arisen, initiating vigorous effort, commanding the mind and directing it properly. 
They will and strive for the arising of good states that have not yet arisen, initiating vigorous effort, commanding the mind and directing it properly. 
They will and strive for the stabilization, prevention of loss, augmentation, increased production and cultivation, and complete fulfillment of good states that have already arisen, initiating vigorous effort, commanding the mind and directing it properly. “They develop the basis of mystical power of will combined with concentration and exertion, based on detachment, based on dispassion, based on extinction, given to relinquishment. They develop the basis of mystical power of energy combined with concentration and exertion, based on detachment, based on dispassion, based on extinction, given to relinquishment. They develop the basis of mystical power of attention combined with concentration and exertion, based on detachment, based on dispassion, based on extinction, given to relinquishment. 
They develop the basis of mystical power of contemplation combined with concentration and exertion, based on detachment, based on dispassion, based on extinction, given to relinquishment. 
They develop the faculty of energy, based on detachment, based on dispassion, based on extinction, given to relinquishment. They develop the faculty of recollection, based on detachment, based on dispassion, based on extinction, given to relinquishment. 
They develop the faculty of concentration, based on detachment, based on dispassion, based on extinction, given to relinquishment. They develop the faculty of wisdom, based on detachment, based on dispassion, based on extinction, given to relinquishment. 
They develop the power of recollection, based on detachment, based on dispassion, based on extinction, given to relinquishment. 
“They develop the branch of enlightenment of mindfulness, based on detachment, based on dispassion, based on extinction, given to relinquishment. 
They develop the branch of enlightenment of investigation of things, based on detachment, based on dispassion, based on extinction, given to relinquishment. 
They develop the branch of enlightenment of energy, based on detachment, based on dispassion, based on extinction, given to relinquishment. They develop the branch of enlightenment of joy, based on detachment, based on dispassion, based on extinction, given to relinquishment. They develop the branch of enlightenment of tranquillity, based on detachment, based on dispassion, based on extinction, given to relinquishment. They develop the branch of enlightenment of concentration, based on detachment, based on dispassion, based on extinction, given to relinquishment. 
They develop the limb of enlightenment of equanimity, based on detachment, based on dispassion, based on extinction, given to relinquishment. “They develop right thought, based on detachment, based on dispassion, based on extinction, given to relinquishment. They develop right seeing, based on detachment, based on dispassion, based on extinction, given to relinquishment. They develop right speech, based on detachment, based on dispassion, based on extinction, given to relinquishment. 
They develop right livelihood, based on detachment, based on dispassion, based on extinction, given to relinquishment. 
They develop right effort, based on detachment, based on dispassion, based on extinction, given to relinquishment. 
They develop right mindfulness, based on detachment, based on dispassion, based on extinction, given to relinquishment. 
They develop right concentration, based on detachment, based on dispassion, based on extinction, given to relinquishment. 
“Moreover, the enlightening beings in the stage of Blazing are freed from all points of attachment—to what is considered wealth, what is considered one’s own possessions, what is guarded and kept, what is thought of, what is ruminated on, what is conceived of, appearing and disappearing, aroused by attachment to the ideas of a real body, self, being, life, growth, person, personality, mental and physical clusters, elements, and sense mediums. 
“As the enlightening beings increasingly develop the elements of the Path accomplished by skill in means and wisdom for the attainment of the Path, their minds accordingly become gentle, mild, workable, and altruistic, unafflicted, seeking the final ultimate excellence, seeking higher knowledge, liberating all beings, obeying and respecting their teachers, practicing the teachings as they have learned. 
They also become grateful and appreciative of what has been done for them, and they become extremely courageous, easy to live with, honest, gentle, uncomplicated, undeluded, free from conceit, easy to talk to, skillfull in grasping the speaker’s meaning. 
Thus the enlightening beings attain patience, self-control, and tranquillity. “Thus patient, controlled, and calm, they contemplate the elements of the Path to purify the higher stages with unremitting vigor, unafflicted vigor, unregressing vigor, immense vigor, endless vigor, blazing vigor, unequaled vigor, invincible vigor, vigor in developing all beings to maturity, vigor in discerning what is instructive and what is not. 
And their mentality becomes more and more purified, their prevailing will doesn’t die out, and their element of zeal blazes; great roots of goodness are produced, and they accomplish destruction of worldly defilements. All their doubts and uncertainties are cut off, and they accomplish presence of mind free from doubt. They also attain joy and serenity. 
They come into the presence of the power of the enlightened and attain immeasurable will. 
Having seen those enlightened ones, they honor and make offerings to them with great zeal, providing useful items such as clothing, food and drink, bedding, seat cushions, and medicines; they also provide comforts for enlightening beings and pay honor to the religious community. These roots of goodness they dedicate to unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment. “Also they attend those buddhas and respectfully listen to their teachings, taking them up, remembering them, and putting them into practice to the best of their ability. In many cases the enlightening beings go forth from home into the tutelage of those buddhas. 
Their will, purpose, devotion, and equanimity are further purified. In this stage of blazing the enlightening beings abide in purity of will, purpose, devotion, and equanimity for many eons, many hundreds and thousands and millions and billions and trillions of eons, and their roots of goodness become radiant with extreme clarity. 
Just as gold fashioned by a skilled goldsmith into ornaments cannot be outshone by gold that has not been worked, in the same way the roots of goodness of enlightening beings in the stage of Blazing cannot be outshone by the roots of goodness in the lower stages. 
And just as the light produced from a jewel, light emanating from a sphere of completely pure radiance, cannot be outshone by other pure lights produced from jewels, and the light cannot be destroyed by any wind, water, or rain, in the same way the enlightening beings in this stage of Blazing cannot be outshone by enlightening beings in the lower stages, and their cannot be destroyed by the actions of any demonds or afflictions. 
“This is a summary of the fourth stage of enlightening beings, the stage called Blazing. 
Most of the enlightening beings in this stage are celestial sovereigns of the heaven of timely portion, powerful, able to remove beings’ view of a really existent body and establish them in right insight. 
Whatever actions the enlightening beings in the stage undertake, whether by giving, by kind speech, by beneficial action, or by cooperation, it is never apart from thoughts of Buddtha, the Teaching, the Community, enlightening beings, the practices of enlightening beings, the ways of transcendence, the powers, expertise, and unique qualities of buddhas, up to omniscience consummate in all respects. To become the best of beings, unexcelled leaders and guides, and ultimately omniscient refuges. “Those who seek to be thus undertake the appropriate effort, by which they instantly attain a billion concentrations, see a billion buddhas and recognize their power, shake a billion worlds, go to a billion lands, illumine a billion worlds, mature a billion beings, abide for a billion eons, penetrate a billion eons past and future, contemplate a billion teachings, and manifest a billion bodies, each surrounded by a billion enlightening beings. 
Then enlightening beings with the power of vows, by the excellence of their vows, perform countless transformations of the body, aura, mystic powers, sphere of operation, voice, conduct, adornment, power, resolution, and performances.” Then Diamond Matrix spoke these verse describing the meaning of this stage: Those who have accomplished the third stage, Refulgence, Contemplating the deeds of beings, the world, and phenomena, With purity of resolution and will, they enter The realm of space, the realm of mind, and the triple realm. 
As soon as those of great power attain the stage of Blazing, They are born in the family of the Teacher, never to regress, Inseparable from the Buddha, the Teaching, and the Community, Viewing the inertness of the continuum of birth and death. 
Reflecting on the coming into existence of action that causes the world to develop, On cyclic existence, nirvana, lands, and beings, As well as phenomena, past and future, nonextinction and nonorigination, They grow in the family of the Teacher, acting in accord. 
Having realized these principles, kind and compassionate, They contemplate the phenomena of their bodies and minds; They contemplate the inner, outer, and both, Reflecting on the four points of mindfulness, free from attachment. 
From the destruction of evil, having developed good qualities, They actualize the four right efforts: They develop the four bases of mystic powers, the powers and faculties, The light of the jewels of the limbs of enlightenment, and thus the supreme Path. 
They develop these for the benefit of beings, focusing their minds on this, Their vow supporting them, with compassion foremost, Seeking omniscient knowledge, the field of buddhas, Thinking of supreme power and the highest path. 
Steadfast in seeking also the unshakable state of wisdom And the supreme buddha-voice of the Teacher, The jewel of the profound path and the abode of liberation, They develop great means. 
Free from the view of a real body and from all erroneous views, Free from ego and possession, from living and gaining, In this fourth stage the defilement of attachment To the clusters, sense mediums, and elements is removed. 
Whatever actions are condemned by buddhas As being conducive to affliction and not beneficial These enlightening beings abandon and with purified intent Undertake good deeds for the benefit of the world. 
They become gentle in mind, Careful, mild, genial, honest, kind, easy to live with; Unafflicted, they seek the highest path in quest of supreme knowledge, Acting for the benefit of the world. 
Respectfully approaching the worthy, wishing to learn, They are grateful, easy to teach, not hypocritical. 
Free from pride and guile, equanimous and courageous, They arouse nonregressing vigor in cultivation. 
Those established in the splendor of this stage Have their minds set on pure truth; Their zeal blazes, they increase good qualities— All defilement, impurity, heedlessness, and doubt vanish. 
The enlightening beings here, the best of people, Pay respect to billions of buddhas, hear their teaching And detach from the world to enter it, Impossible to spoil, like ornaments of gold. 
The virtuous state of mind, knowledge, expedient practice, And the path of purification of the sages in this stage Cannot be turned back even by billions of demons, Just as the radiance of jewels cannot be leached away by rainwater. 
Those in this stage, worthy of human and celestial respect, Become lords of the heaven of timely portion, carrying out celestial justice; They withdraw beings from the tangle of views and accumulate good For the sake of enlightened knowledge. 
Full of vigor, they see a billion buddhas, Due to concentration, single-minded: After that for many eons they carry out beneficial actions, Supreme undertakings characterized by knowledge. 
“Children of Buddha, I have explained this fourth stage of enlightening beings, called Blazing, which is pure and involves the immaculate conduct of those with virtue and knowledge.” Having thus heard the practice of this excellent stage of the wise, the enlightening beings were pleased, delighted by the teaching. 
Uplifted, they showered a rain of flowers in the sky, saying, “Well have you spoken, great enlightening one!” The king of gods, with a group of celestials, stood in the sky to honor the Buddha, their minds elevated: 
delighted, happy, they made clouds of various glows for the Buddha, with pleasing lights. 
Goddesses in concert sang and played music to offer to the Teacher; manifesting such power of enlightening beings, they spoke these words: At long last is the will of the Sage fulfilled; At long last has the Victor attained the emancipation of enlightenment. 
At long last is Shakyamuni seen in the celestial city, Having accomplished human and divine weal. 
At long last are the waters of the ocean stirred, At long last is the pure light of the Victor released; At long last do suffering beings become happy, At long last is the Teaching of the Compassionate One heard. 
At long last is the great Sage met Who has attained the consummation of all virtues, Having destroyed the darkness of conceit and heedlessness, The great mendicant, worthy, respected. 
Those who have honored him are gone to heaven, Enjoying many kinds of happiness; Those who have honored him put an end to all suffering And gain supreme knowledge. 
The Victor is pure as space, Undefiled by the world, like a lotus in water, Like the polar mountain rising from the sea— So honor the Buddha glad in mind. 
Then the wise one Moon of Liberation said to Diamond Matrix, “Please tell us the characteristics of the fifth stage.” Diamond Matrix said, “Whoever has fulfilled the path of the fourth stage enters the fifth stage; one enters the fifth stage by tenfold impartiality with purity as the focus of the mind: 
by impartiality of focus on the purity of the teachings of past buddhas, by impartiality of focus on the purity of the teachings of future buddhas, by impartiality of focus on the purity of the teachings of present buddhas, by impartiality of focus on purity of conduct, by impartiality of focus on purity of mind, by impartiality of focus on purity of removal of views and doubt and uncertainty and perplexity, by impartiality of focus on purity of knowledge of right and wrong paths, by impartiality of focus on purity of knowledge of application and relinquishment, by impartiality of focus on purity of the final ultimate discernment and realization of all the elements of enlightenment, and by impartiality of focus on purity of perfecting all beings. 
“Furthermore, the enlightening beings who have reached the fifth stage, from having cultivated these elements of enlightenment and branches of the path, and from having thoroughly purified their intent—practicing what is needed for the quest for a higher path in the future, being supported by the power of vows, compassionately and kindly not abandoning beings, accumulating provisions of virtue and knowledge, never ceasing, putting skill in means into operation, seeing the light of the later stages, seeking the power of the Buddha, being supported by the power of intellect and action and awareness and recollection—attain unwavering attention; and doing so, they accurately know as it really is what the truth of suffering recognized by sages is, what the truth of the cause of suffering is, what the extinction of suffering is, and what the truth of its attainment is. 
They become well versed in conventional truth, in ultimate truth, in the truth of characteristics, the truth of distinctions, the truth of structure, the truth of substance, the truth of becoming, the truth of knowledge of extinction and nonorigination, the truth of entry into knowledge of the path; and by having accomplished the continuity of accession to the stages of enlightening beings, they become well versed in the truth of the accumulation of the knowledge of the enlightened. 
“They know the conventional truth from satisfying other beings according to their inclinations. 
They know the ultimate truth by comprehending all in one principle. 
They know the truth of characteristics from awareness of individual and common characteristics. 
They know the truth of differentiation from learning the definitions of differentiations in the Teaching. 
They know the truth of structure from learning the definitions of the clusters, elements, and sense mediums. 
They know the truth of substance from realizing the pressure of the body and mind. 
They know the truth of becoming from the continuity of realms of existence. 
They know the truth of knowledge of extinction and nonorigination from the ultimate extinction of all burning torments. 
They know the truth of entry into the knowledge of the path from the accomplishment of nonduality. 
By accomplishment of continuity of accession to the stages of enlightening beings from perfect awareness of all their features, ultimately they know the truth of accumulation of the knowledge of the enlightened. 
This is, however, on the basis of the power of knowledge in the process of application, not by ultimate exhaustive knowledge. 
“By means of the awareness effected by this knowledge of truths, they know in truth that all that is conditional is void, unreal, delusive, deceptive, fooling the ignorant. 
They become all the more compassionate toward beings, and the light of great goodwill shines forth. 
Supported by the power of knowledge, with concern for all beings, seeking enlightened knowledge, they examine all conditioned activities, past and future. They know for a fact how the mass of suffering of beings, sprung from ignorance and craving for existence from the past, borne along in the stream of cyclic existence, never having gotten free from the dwelling of the physical and mental clusters, increases, and that it has no self, no being, no life, no soul, no personality, no self or personal possessions. 
They also know in truth whether or not there is an end, limit, or escape from their deluded wishing for the nonexistent future. 
“It occurs to the enlightening beings, ‘How strange and pitiful these ignorant, deluded creatures, whose countless bodies have perished, will perish, and are perishing, yet even while they are passing away they do not give rise to disaffection with the body; they increase the fetters of suffering, flowing along in the stream of the mundane whirl, not turning back from great danger and trouble, not letting go of the dwelling of the body-mind clusters; they do not reject the vipers of the elements, they are unaware of the prison of greed for happiness; they do not pull out the arrows of pride and views, they do not extinguish the flames of desire, hatred, and delusion; they do not disperse the darkness of ignorance; they do not evaporate the flood of craving; they do not seek an enlightened guide; going along with maniacs, they swim around in the sea of the mundane whirl, in the confusion of grasping of various bad thoughts. 
Being without refuge, they fall into intense distress and individually experience many pains, such as birth, old age, sickness, death, grief, lament, dejection, mental disturbance. 
For the sake of these beings, who are suffering distress, without a leader, without a savior, without a refuge, without a reliance, without an island of safety, without direction, in the dark, wrapped up in the shell of ignorance, overcome by darkness, we alone will gather such stores of virtue and knowledge as will enable these beings to be ultimately purified, and finally that they may arrive at the state of unimpeded knowledge of those with the ten powers.’ “Whatever goodness the enlightening beings undertake with this mind which has realized well-considered knowledge, they undertake it all for the salvation of all beings, for the benefit of all beings, for the happiness of all beings, out of compassion for all beings, so that all beings will be free from trouble, for the liberation of all beings, to take care of all beings, for the purification of all beings, to lead all beings to freedom, for the ultimate nirvana of all beings. 
“The enlightening beings in this fifth stage, the stage Difficult to Conquer, become all the more mindful, by not forgetting the nature of things; they become wise, by certain knowledge; they become wayfarers, by realizing the hidden meanings intended by the scriptures; they become conscientious because of protecting self and others; they become steadfast, by maintaining disciplined behavior; they become awake because of careful consideration of what is true and what is not; they become followers of knowledge because of not being led by others; they become followers of wisdom because of skill in expression distinguishing the meaningful and meaningless; they become skilled in maturing beings because of skill in effecting higher knowledge; they become accomplished in mystic knowledge because of skill in accomplishing meditation; they become skilled in expedients because of adaptation to the world; they become tireless because of accumulation of virtues; they become ceaselessly energetic because of seeking knowledge; they become unflagging in determination because of having accumulated great kindness and compassion; they become devoted to tireless seeking because of being in quest of the ten powers, infallible expertise, and unique qualities of buddhas; they become imbued with well-accomplished attention because of having accomplished buddha-land adornment; they become engaged in various good works because of having accumulated the distinctive marks and embellishments of buddhahood; they become constantly engaged in right effort because of seeking the physical, verbal, and mental adornments of the enlightened; they become most respectful in conduct because of listening to all enlightening beings and expounders of truth, they become unhindered in mind because of continually traveling through the world by the great skill in means of enlightening beings; they become undistracted at all times because of application of effort to the full development of all beings. 
“Thus engaged, the enlightening beings develop people by means of charity, kind speech, beneficial action, and cooperation; they develop people by showing forms, by revelation of enlightening action by making clear the greatness of the enlightened, by showing the ills of the mundane whirl, by lauding the knowledge of buddhas, and by production of great spiritual manifestations and application to various practices and works. 
“The enlightening beings, thus engaged in the development of sentient beings with minds continually following buddha-knowledge engaged in unregressing goodness, intent on the search for supreme truth, practice whatever in the world would benefit sentient beings, such as writing, teaching, mathematics, sciences of various realms or elements; medical sciences; prevention of consumption, epilepsy, and possession; warding off poison, zombies, and witchcraft; song and dance, drama, music, storytelling, and entertainment; the construction of villages, cities, par s, canals, reservoirs, ponds abounding in lotuses, groves producing flowers, fruits and medicines; the discovery of gold, jewels, and other precious substances; methods of pointing out the signs of the sun, moon, planets stars, constellations, movements of the earth, omens, dreams, and the characteristics of coordination of general and specific actions and forms of limbs and parts of the body; points of cultivation of discipline, meditation, mystic knowledge, the immeasurables and formless states—and whatever else is not harmful or injurious, that which is conducive to the benefit and well-being of all creatures, that the enlightening beings undertake, guided by compassion, to establish them in the way of buddhas. 
The enlightening beings also attend those buddhas and with greatest respect and reverence listen to, take up, and remember their teachings and, having heard them, apply them as much as possible. “Many enlightening beings go forth from society into the tutelage of those buddhas and, having gone forth, become holders of learning and preachers of the Teaching. Moreover, they become preachers who have attained command of the practices they have learned, because of not forgetting what they have learned from billions of buddhas over billions of eons. 
“The roots of goodness of many eons of the enlightening beings in this stage are refined, purified thoroughly, and become more radiant, over hundreds and thousands and millions and billions of eons, just as gold adorned with jewels becomes brighter, purer, and more radiant. 
Because of accomplishment of the virtues of application of knowledge, they also become impeccable in conduct. 
Just as the light of the sun, moon, planets, and stars cannot be diverted by the winds and is not of a class with the winds, in the same way the roots of goodness of the enlightening beings in the Difficult to Conquer stage, in accord with the thought of the skillful, wise, knowing mind, cannot be surpassed by any who learn or attain individual liberation, and are not of the same class as the worldly. 
“For enlightening beings in this stage the transcendent way of meditation is paramount, while they practice the rest as best they can. 
This is the stage of enlightening beings called Difficult to Conquer. 
Most of the enlightening beings in this stage become celestial sovereigns of the heaven of complete satisfaction, capable, powerful, able to detach beings from all false teachers and to establish them in the truth. Whatever acts they undertake, whether by giving, kind speech, beneficial action, or cooperation, it is all never apart from thoughts of Buddha, the Teaching, the Community, enlightening beings, the conduct of enlightening beings, the ways of transcendence, the stages, the powers, expertise, and unique qualities of buddhas, including omniscience complete in all respects. 
Because they want to be the best of beings, unexcelled leaders and guides, and ultimately omniscient refuges. 
“Those who seek to be thus undertake the appropriate effort, by the energy of which they instantly attain a trillion concentrations, see a trillion buddhas and perceive their power, shake a trillion worlds, go to a trillion lands, illumine a trillion realms, mature a trillion beings, abide for a trillion eons, penetrate a trillion eons past and future, contemplate a trillion doctrines, and manifest a trillion bodies, each appearing surrounded by a trillion enlightening beings. 
“Beyond that, enlightening beings with the power of vows, by the excellence of their vows, perform countless transformations of body, aura, mystic powers, vision, sphere of operation, voice, conduct, adornments, power, resolution, and performances.” Then Diamond Matrix spoke these verses describing this stage: Thus purified in the excellent practices of the fourth stage, They contemplate the equality of the buddhas of past, present, and future— In conduct, mental attainment, purity of the Path, And freedom from doubt—and enter the fifth stage. 
Their bow is recollection, their arrows the spiritual faculties, undeflected; Their horses the right efforts, the bases of mystic power their chariot, The five powers their armor, which no bandits can break through; Heroic, never retreating, they enter the fifth stage. 
Clothed in conscience and modesty, wise, with the fragrance of pure conduct, With the garland of the elements of enlightenment, the unguent of high meditation, With excellent methods adorned by wisdom and reflection, Entering the garden of mental command, they come to this fifth stage. 
The four bases of mystic power their feet, pure mindfulness their necks, Noblest kindness and compassion their eyes, lofty wisdom their teeth, The roar of selflessness overcoming the thieving afflictions, The human lions, equanimous, wise, enter this fifth stage. 
Having attained this excellent fifth stage, They further cultivate the luster of the pure path: With a pure intent, to attain buddhahood, They think of compassion and kindness, without distress. 
By gathering stores of virtue and higher knowledge, By many means they observe the range of the stages. Mindful of the power of the Buddha, imbued with intelligence and reason, They contemplate the four truths completely. 
They delve into the ultimate truth, the conventional truth, The truth of characteristics, of distinctions, and structure, The truth of substance, of the tainted and annihilation, The truth of the Path, up to the truth of the unobstructed. 
Yet though their subtle discernment seeks the truth They do not attain highest unobstructed liberation; Still, by great knowledge and application they surpass All virtues of which worldlings are capable. 
Thus having developed veritable discernment of truth, They know the conditioned is unreal by nature and valueless. 
They gain the light of compassion and kindness of buddhas yet more, Seeking enlightened knowledge for the benefit of sentient beings. 
They observe the past and future of the conditioned, Those shrouded in the darkness of delusion, caught up in suffering, And rescue worldlings bound to this mass of suffering, Though they are without self or soul and equal to grass and trees. 
“Because of two simultaneous afflictions are you reborn, Past, present, and future; you find no end to suffering.” They see these people are lost, not turning back From the mundane whirl, though it has no being of its own. 
Dwelling in the clusters, with the serpents of the senses, Infested with errant views, hearts burning with fire, shrouded in darkness, Sunk in a flood of craving through lack of insight, Without the guidance of Buddha, they are stranded in the sea of suffering. 
Knowing this, enlightening beings strive yet more diligently, Undertaking the liberation of all sentient beings: 
They become mindful, discerning, intent, steadfast; They become conscientious, hence awake and full of wisdom. 
They do not cease their accumulation of virtue and higher knowledge; Without weariness or laxity seeking power, They develop lands, features, and voices of buddhas Unceasing, all their deeds being for the weal of the living. 
In order to mature people, they establish arts and skills— Writing, printing, mathematics, medical sciences, Exorcism, antidotes, curing, Establishing excellent education, compassionate, kind, intelligent. Witty in the finest song and dance, they build delightful places— Canals, parks with flowers and fruits, places to sit, Doing many things for the pleasure of beings, Even revealing many kinds of treasure troves. 
Mastering observation of the movements of celestial bodies and earth As well as physiognomy, They accomplish formless meditations, mystic knowledges, and the immeasurables, Desiring well-being and happiness for the world. 
Arriving in the Difficult to Conquer stage, practitioners of higher wisdom Serve billions of buddhas and hear their teaching: 
Their goodness and heart become more radiant, Like gold sprinkled with jewels. 
As the jewel palaces of the constellations Are not swept away by the wind, so are enlightening beings Unaffected while working in the world for beings’ sake, Like lotuses to which water does not cling. 
In this stage, those experienced lords of contentment Destroy the actions of false teachers, the abodes of manifold views. 
All the good they do is in the cause of enlightened knowledge, Wishing to become saviors of beings, rich in the ten powers. 
Arousing superior energy, unflagging, They serve a trillion buddhas; Having attained concentration, they shake a trillion worlds, Bearing the undertakings of the virtuous. 
“Thus have enlightening beings, excellent guardians of the living, told of the fifth stage, called Difficult to Conquer, in myriad different ways.” Having heard of the superior practice of this exalted stage of the wise the host of enlightening beings, delighted, showered flowers and sprinkled the Buddha with sublime jewels radiating pure light, uttering praise. 
A hundred thousand celestial beings in the sky, pleased, scattered exquisite varicolored celestial jewel dust on the Buddha, presenting incense, garlands, perfumes, parasols, decorative banners and pennants, and ornamental crescents. The commanding lord of the celestials, along with all heavenly hosts, hovering in the empyrean, well pleased and serene, showered clouds of jewels in offering to the Victor, urging the enlightening beings to speak. 
A thousand goddesses in the sky sang pleasantly and played music, singing as with one voice in praise of the Buddha, destroyer of the fire of afflictions: 
Empty nature quiescent, all things are signless, Equal to space, beyond discriminating thought, totally pure; Beyond motion or stillness, beyond philosophy, all equal in suchness, By their suchness, the essence of things is beyond thought. 
Those who understand all things thus Are unmoved by existence or nonexistence: 
With compassion for the world, striving for liberation, They are offspring of Buddha, born from the Teaching. 
They practice generosity without concern for appearances, With well-disciplined minds, fundamentally tranquil, extremely calm: They tolerate what is made in the world, knowing the imperishable truth; They are endowed with vigor and strength, detached from all things. Having fully entered into meditation, exhausted afflictions, they are purified; Knowing all things, they are centered in primordial emptiness. 
Rich in knowledge and practical power, they are always devoted to the welfare of the world, For they are great beings, offspring of Buddha, having extinguished all evil. 
Having uttered a thousand such songs, those beautiful goddesses hovered in the sky silently gazing at the Buddha, serene, enraptured with admiration for the Teaching. 
Moon of Liberation said, continuing, to Diamond Matrix, “What are the characteristices of attainment of the next stage after this fifth one?” The enlightening being Diamond Matrix said, “Those who have thoroughly fulfilled the path of the fifth stage of enlightening beings enter into the sixth stage. 
They enter by way of ten equalities of things: 
by the equality of signlessness of all things; by the equality of nonorigination of all things; by the equality of absence of characteristic marks of all things; by the equality of nonbirth of all things; by the equality of detachment of all things; by the equality of primordial purity of all things; by the equality of nonconceptuality of all things; by the equality of all things in neither coming nor going; by the equality of all things in being like illusions, dreams, reflections, echoes, the moon’s image in the water, or apparitions; and by the equality of nonduality of existence and nonexistence of all things. 
Thus observing all things in terms of their intrinsic nature and according with it without opposition, they attain the sixth stage of enlightening beings, the stage of Presence. 
But this is only by penetrating conformative tolerance; they have not yet attained the tolerance of the nonorigination of things. 
“Thus understanding all things in their intrinsic nature, enlightening beings, all the more guided by compassion, commanded by great compassion, in order to completely fulfill great compassion, observe the formation and disintegration of the world. 
While observing the formation and disintegration of the world, it occurs to them, ‘The origins of worldly ways are all due to attachment to self. 
In those who have no attachment to self the development of worldly ways does not take place.’ “It also occurs to them, ‘These beings, intellectually infantile, attached to their selves, covered by the blinders of nescience, seeking existence and nonexistence, thinking illogically, gone on a wrong path, acting perversely, accumulate conditioned states of good, bad, and immobility. The mental seed conceived and planted by those conditioned states, imbued with taint and grasping, leads to future birth, old age, and death, coming into being as a result of renewed existence. 
In the field of action, in the darkness of ignorance, with the moisture of craving and the flow of egotism, the net of views grown, the sprouts of name and form appear. 
Having appeared, they grow, and, name and form having developed, the five senses become operative. From the intercourse of the operative senses comes contact. From the intercourse of contacts comes sensation. After sensation there is desire; thence craving and grasping grow. 
The development of name and form is the six sense mediums. The conjunction of the sense faculties, objects, and consciousnesses is tainted contact. Born together with contact is sensation. Clinging to sensation is craving. 
The disintegration of the aged clusters is death. 
The mental anguish of the dying, the disintegrating, who are deluded and attached, is grief; crying out in grief is lament; in the five senses it is pain; in the vision of the mind it is dejection. 
The coming into being of much pain and dejection is torment. 
Thus this whole mass of suffering, this tree of suffering, grows, without any agent or knower.’ “They also think, ‘From attachment to an agent, actions are cognized—where there is no doer, doing cannot, in the ultimate sense, be found either.’ They also think, ‘All that is in the world is only mind. 
These twelve elements of becoming analyzed and explained by the Buddha are also all based on one mind. 
The development of name and form is the six sense mediums. Connected with the six mediums is contact. Born together with contact is sensation. Obsession with sensation is craving. 
The end of old age is death.’ “The ignorance there tends to produce two kinds of effects: as an object, it confuses beings, and it provides a cause for the development of conditioning. 
Conditionings also tend to produce two kinds of effects: they manifest future development and provide a cause for the emergence of consciousness. 
Consciousness also tends to produce two kinds of effects: it makes the continuity of existence and also provides cause for the development of name and form. 
Name and form also tend to produce two kinds of effects: they make mutual support and also provide cause for the development of the six sense mediums. 
The six sense mediums also tend to produce two kinds of effects: they show the differentiation of their own spheres and provide cause for the emergence of contact. 
Contact also tends to produce two kinds of effects: it contacts objects and provides cause for the emergence of sensation. 
Sensation also occasions two kinds of effects: it effects reception of the desired, of that which is not desired, and of that which is neither, and it also provides cause for the emergence of craving. 
Craving also occasions two kinds of effects: it creates intense desire for desirable things and provides cause for the emergence of grasping. 
Grasping also occasions two kinds of effects: it creates bondage by afflictions and provides cause for the emergence of becoming. 
Becoming also occasions two effects: it creates a tendency toward other courses of existence and provides cause for the emergence of birth. 
Birth also occasions two effects: it produces the emergence of the clusters and provides cause for old age. 
Old age also occasions two effects: it produces changes in the faculties and provides the cause for meeting in death. 
Death also occasions two effects: it destroys the compounded and causes continuation through lack of perfect knowledge. 
“Therein, ‘conditionings grounded on ignorance’ means the continuation and support of conditionings by ignorance as a cooperating cause. 
‘Consciousness grounded on conditionings’ means the continuation and support of consciousness by conditioning as a cooperating cause. 
‘Name and form grounded on consciousness’ means the continuation and support of name and form by consciousness as a cooperating cause. ‘The six sense mediums grounded on name and form’ means the continuation and support of the six sense mediums by name and form as a cooperating cause. ‘Contact grounded on the six sense mediums’ means the continuation and support of contact by the six sense mediums as a cooperating cause. ‘Sensation grounded on contact’ means the continuation and support of sensation by contact as a cooperating cause. 
‘Birth grounded on becoming’ means the continuation and support of birth by becoming as a cooperating cause. ‘Old age and death grounded on birth’ means the continuation and support of old age and death by birth as a cooperating cause. “The extinction of conditionings due to the extinction of ignorance means the stilling and nonestablishment of conditionings due to the nonexistence of ignorance as a cooperating cause. 
The extinction of old age and death due to the extinction of birth means that without the cooperating cause of birth, old age and death are stilled, unsupported. “Ignorance, craving, and grasping are the continuation of the course of affliction. Conditioning and becoming are the continuation of the course of action. The rest are the continuation of the course of suffering. 
The preceding and the succeeding annihilated by analysis, these courses are cut off. Thus these three courses—affliction, action, and suffering—have no self and have nothing to do with anything pertaining to self; becoming and decaying, it is all in essence like a hollow reed. “Also, what are called conditionings grounded on ignorance are connected to the past; consciousness up to sensation are connected to the present; craving up to becoming are connected to the future. Henceforth there is continuation of this. 
The extinction of conditionings due to the extinction of ignorance is the cutting off of their connection—the same is true of the rest. “Furthermore, the state of triplex suffering is due to these twelve elements of becoming. 
Therein, ignorance, conditioning, up to the six sense mediums are the suffering that is due to conditionality; contact and sensation are the suffering that is due to pain; the rest of the elements of becoming are the suffering that is due to disintegration. 
The extinction of conditionings due to the extinction of ignorance is the cutting off of the triplex suffering. 
The same is so of the rest. ‘Conditionings grounded on ignorance’ means the nature of conditioning being produced by causal relations; the same is so of the rest. The extinction of conditioning due to the extinction of ignorance means the nonexistence of conditioning; this is so of the rest too. 
‘Conditionings grounded on ignorance’ means attachment to origination; ‘the extinction of conditioning due to the extinction of ignorance’ means attachment to annihilation. This is so of the rest too. ‘Conditionings grounded on ignorance’ is viewing it according to existence, and this is so of the rest too. 
The ‘extinction of conditionings due to the extinction of ignorance’ is viewing it according to annihilation, and this is so of the rest too. “Enlightening beings contemplate interdependent origination in these ten patterns, forward and backward: 
that is, in terms of the interconnection of the elements of becoming, in terms of being all together in one mind, in terms of differentiation of one’s own action, in terms of inseparability, in terms of the procession of the three courses of affliction, action, and suffering, in terms of the connection of past, present, and future, in terms of accumulation of the three kinds of suffering, in terms of production by causes, in terms of attachment to origination and annihilation, and in terms of contemplation of becoming and annihilation. “Enlightening beings thus contemplate interdependent origination in ten patterns; because of contemplating it in terms of being without self, without being, without soul, without person, inherently empty, without doer or subject, the door of emptiness and liberation becomes manifest to them. 
Because of the nullity of own-being of these elements of becoming, being in the presence of ultimate liberation, no sign of any thing occurs to them. 
In those who have thus entered into emptiness and signlessness, no desire whatsoever arises, except, led by great compassion, for the full development of sentient beings: thus the door of liberation of wishlessness becomes manifest to them. 
Causing these three doors of liberation to become manifest, they leave behind the ideas of self and other, of agent and perceiver, of being and nonbeing. All the more, filled with compassion, they work to perfectly attain the elements of enlightenment which they have not yet attained. 
“The enlightening beings think, ‘That which is fabricated goes on because of linkage—without linkage it does not proceed; the fabricated goes on because of assemblage—without assemblage it does not go on. 
Having recognized the many ills and bad effects of the fabricated states of conditioning, we should cut off this linkage, this assemblage. 
But we should not go to the ultimate cessation of the created, for the sake of the full development of sentient beings.’ This abode of transcendent wisdom, encountered by enlightening beings examining the many ills of fabricated conditioned states, by nature without inherent existence, unborn and not annihilated, is called the presence of unattached knowledge; it is realized by undertaking great compassion and not abandoning duty to living beings, by merging with its light. 
Endowed with such knowledge, illumined by transcendent wisdom, they bring together the cooperating causes conducive to the elements of enlightenment, but they do not abide in the created state. 
They also observe the essential nullity of conditioned states, but they do not settle down in that, because they have not yet completely fulfilled the elements of enlightenment. “The enlightening beings in this stage, the stage of Presence, realize the concentration of enlightening beings called ‘entry into emptiness.’ They attain absorption in emptiness of inherent nature, emptiness of ultimate reality, supreme emptiness, great emptiness, emptiness of union, emptiness of production, nonconceptual emptiness according to reality, emptiness of concern, emptiness of disconnection and nondisconnection. With these ten doors of concentration on emptiness in the forefront, a hundred thousand doors of concentration on emptiness become manifest to them, and so do a hundred thousand doors of concentration on signlessness and a hundred thousand doors of concentration on wishlessness. 
“Furthermore, the enlightening beings in this stage of Presence fully develop unbreakable intent, certain intent, good intent, profound intent, unretreating intent, unrelenting intent, pure intent, endless intent, intent to seek knowledge, intent to perfectly unite means and wisdom. These ten intents of enlightening beings lead to the enlightenment of buddhas; the enlightening beings become courageous and do not retreat before verbal opposition; they enter the stage of knowledge; they give up the stages of listeners and individual illuminates, being wholly directed toward buddha-knowledge. They also become immune to the doings of demons and afflictions, and become firmly established in the light of enlightening beings. 
They also become fully imbued with the practices of the principles of emptiness, signlessness, and wishlessness, and they become one with the contemplations of means and wisdom, and they become filled with the elements of enlightenment. 
“In the enlightening beings in this stage of Presence, the abode of transcendent wisdom becomes paramount, and they attain the third acceptance of these principles, that of keen accord, by following them without opposition. 
“To the enlightening beings in this stage many buddhas become visible, by great vision and willpower—many hundreds of buddhas, many thousands, hundreds of thousands, millions, billions, trillions of buddhas. Having seen these buddhas, with great zeal they pay honor and respect to them, providing them with offerings of food, clothing, bedding, medicines, and other furnishings, and also bring comforts for enlightening beings, and also honor the religious community. They dedicate all these roots of goodness to perfect enlightenment. They also attend those buddhas and listen to their teachings in person with great respect and appreciation of their rarity, taking up the teachings and remembering them. 
Just as gold covered with jewels becomes even more radiant, so do the roots of goodness of enlightening beings in this stage, cultivated by expedient means and wisdom, become all the more radiant. They also become more and more tranquil and imperturbable. 
Just as moonlight refreshes and delights people and cannot be diverted by the four winds, in the same way those roots of goodness of enlightening beings in the stage of Presence quench the fires of afflictions of countless beings and make them refreshed and happy, and those roots of goodness cannot be diverted by the four demons. 
“Among the ten transcendent ways, transcendent wisdom is paramount in these enlightening beings, but they also practice the others as best they can. 
They cannot be distracted by the interrogations of all listeners. They are skilled in introducing beings into interdependent origination. Whatever actions they undertake, whether by giving, or by kind speech, or by beneficial action, or by cooperation, all of it is never apart from thoughts of Buddha, the Teaching, the Community, enlightening beings, the practice of enlightening beings, the transcendent ways, the stages, the powers, expertise, and unique qualities of buddhas, including omniscience complete in all respects. To become the best of beings, unexcelled leaders and guides, and ultimately omniscient refuges. 
“Those who seek to be thus undertake the appropriate effort, by which exertion they instantly attain a hundred trillion concentrations, see a hundred trillion buddhas and recognize their power, shake a hundred trillion worlds, go to a hundred trillion lands, illumine a hundred trillion worlds, mature a hundred trillion beings, remain for a hundred trillion eons, penetrate a hundred trillion eons past and future, contemplate a hundred trillion doctrines, manifest a hundred trillion bodies, each body manifesting a company of a hundred trillion enlightening beings. 
Beyond that, enlightening beings with the power of vows perform, by the excellence of their vows, countless transfigurations of body, aura, mystic powers, vision, sphere of operation, voice, conduct, adornment, power, resolution, and performance.” Then the great enlightening being Diamond Matrix uttered these verses describing this stage: Having fulfilled the practice of the path of the fifth stage, Realizing knowledge of the signlessness, formlessness, and birthlessness of things, Knowledge of their nonorigination, primordial purity, and inexpressibility, Thus enlightening beings enter the sixth stage. 
The objective eye tracing phenomena consistently Without rejection or attachment, without false ideas, Knowing them to be of the nature of illusion, apart from being and nonbeing, Enlightening beings enter the higher sixth stage. 
Stable in keen accord, full of knowledge and power, They observe becoming and decay in all worlds. 
The becoming of the world is in essence the becoming of the dark of delusion; When that delusion is destroyed, becoming is nonexistent. 
They contemplate conditional creation, ultimately empty, Without contradicting the causal relations of action or the function of names; Knowing in truth action has no agent, They look upon the fabricated as like dense clouds, without will. 
Not knowing the truth in the highest sense is ignorance; Action and consciousness are the results thereof; Then, born together based on consciousness are name and form; Thus all come into being, the whole mass of suffering. 
They realize the three realms are only mind— And the twelve elements of becoming are in one mind, Born of desire and produced by the mind; Thus extinction and becoming, too, are distinctions of the mind. 
The function of ignorance is dual; it creates delusion, And in delusion also provides a cause for sensations; And so on, up to old age, degeneration, and death— The production of all suffering from this has no end. 
It cannot be cut off under conditions of ignorance, But having stopped this continuous production, all ceases completely— Delusion, craving, and grasping are the courses of affliction; Action and becoming are conditionings, the rest are suffering. 
From delusion to the sense mediums is suffering due to conditionality, Contact and the development of sensation are suffering due to painfulness, The rest of the elements are suffering due to degeneration; If their development is stopped, that suffering has no self. 
The forerunners are ignorance and conditioning; Consciousness and sensation operate in the present; Craving, becoming, and suffering take place in the future: 
Those who observe unattached cut off their inception and progress. 
The condition of delusion creates bondage; The end of bondage is the extinction of conditions. 
The production of result by cause does not happen without cause: Enlightened knowledge sees it as void of inherent existence. 
Following delusion is the cause and force of becoming; Opposing it, all becoming is cut off by the annulment of the cause. 
Those with unattached minds observe in ten ways The profound interrelation of one thing and another. 
Intention, the elements of becoming, and the locus of action Are inseparable in the forefront of the three courses: 
Unoriginated and unperishing is the procession of conditions, The cause and destruction of the three forms of suffering, origin and extinction. 
Thus do enlightening beings comprehend interdependent origination— Like illusion, unreal, without knowing or doing, Like a dream, like a reflection, void of intrinsic being, Like the mirage of the ignorant and deluded. 
Whoever meditates thus rests in the emptiness of the wise; They realize this signlessness of conditions: 
Knowing they’re completely unreal, they have no wishes, But they go on living out of compassion for beings. 
Thus having accomplished this door of liberation, the great beings Are even more compassionate in mind and seek the qualities of buddhahood. 
Observing the fabricated is a matter of conjunction, They become more diligent, replete with many virtues. 
Having fulfilled myriad concentrations in emptiness, As well as signless and wishless liberation, Their wisdom and conformative acceptance increase, And their freedom and knowledge mature. 
They also serve many buddhas resolutely And practice the Way in the buddhas’ tutelage. 
Attaining the treasury of Buddha teachings, they propagate roots of goodness Like gold encrusted with jewels. 
As moonlight refreshes the minds of people in the world Undeflected by the four winds, The light of enlightening beings, overcoming the path of demons, Quenches the burning of afflictions of those suffering from pain. 
Having reached this stage, they become celestial monarchs, Adept at emanation, destroyers of conceit. 
Whatever they do on the path of knowledge Is insuperable, steadfast, beyond the path of listeners. 
Seeking, the enlightening beings, imbued with vigor, Having attained a hundred trillion consummate concentrations, See in an instant the buddhas in the ten directions Blazing like the sun in the midsummer sky. 
“Here I have told of the sixth stage of great beings, the stage of Presence, which is profound, hard to see, hard for listeners and self-conquerors to know.” Now the crowd of celestials, exhilarated, showered clouds of various lights and uttered sweet words full of supreme pure joy, praising the supremely acute mind, master of knowledge, imbued with a hundred virtues, excellent in conduct, blissful, benefactor of the world, one of the lotuses of humanity. 
The great gods traversing the sky showered sublime immeasurable light on the best of humans, and clouds of fragrance of supreme beauty, to destroy afflictions. 
The host of celestials spoke in sweet, pleasing, beautiful voices of how they had gained supreme benefit on hearing the explanation of this stage. 
The goddesses, delighted, playing sweet music, spoke in praise of this eminent practice, by the power of Buddha: 
Best in conduct among the wise, Tamers of the tamed, benefactors of the world, Having transcended the world, They act in the world, showing the subtle. 
They manifest various bodies, All the bodies one with the essence of things; Peaceful, uncontentious, They speak without the idea of having said even a syllable. 
They go to a hundred lands and pay respect to the Guides, Those who are most worthy of honor, Having given up their concept of a land, Being masters of knowledge. 
They fully develop beings, Yet have no concept of self or other, They accumulate highest goodness, Yet have no attachment to accumulation of good. 
Having seen the world burning With desire, hatred, and delusion, They get rid of all concepts And out of compassion undertake higher efforts. 
The gods and goddesses, having offered their splendid song, became silent, enraptured, all gazing at Buddha. 
“This assembly is calm,” they said to the enlightening being; “tell us the features of the seventh stage, abode of virtues.” The enlightening being Diamond Matrix said, “Any enlightening beings who have thoroughly fulfilled the course of the sixth stage come to the seventh stage. 
What are these ten? 
They develop a mind well trained in focus on emptiness, signlessness, and wishlessness, yet they collect great provisions of virtue and knowledge. 
They enter into the selflessness, absence of being, absence of soul, absence of individuality, and absence of personality in all things, yet they do not give up the production of the four immeasurables—immeasurable kindness, compassion, joy, and equanimity. 
They perform transcendent practices to increase virtuous ways, yet they do not cling to anything. 
They become detached from everything in the world, yet they produce arrays of adornments for the world. 
They become ultimately calm and tranquil due to removal from the fires of afflictions, yet they undertake to accomplish the extinction of the flames of afflictions of lust, hatred, and delusion of all beings. 
They realize the nonduality of essence of being and nonbeing, all things being like illusions, mirages, dreams, reflections, echoes, apparitions, yet they put into effect resolution in innumerable different deeds and works. 
They have cultivated the perception that all lands and paths are equal to space, yet they undertake the adornment of buddha-lands. 
They arrive at the nature of all buddhas as being fundamentally and essentially the reality-body, yet they undertake the production of the adornments of the marks of distinction and embellishments of the physical body of a buddha. 
They grant that the voice of the buddha is unutterable, free from sound, and by nature ultimately silent, yet they undertake the production of pure arrays of all different tones to communicate with all beings. 
In a single instant they enter buddhas’ awareness of past, present, and future, yet they enter into distinctions of various appearances, ages, and reckonings by discernment of beings’ minds. 
By these ten kinds of special undertaking on the Path, accomplished by skill in means, wisdom, and knowledge, enlightening beings enter the seventh stage; and they are said to be in this stage by virtue of the manifestation of the practice of these undertakings. 
“Enlightening beings in this seventh stage penetrate infinite realms of beings, unlimited acts of guidance by which buddhas develop beings, infinite networks of worlds, infinite purification of buddha-lands by the enlightened ones, the infinite variety of phenomena, the infinite realization of knowledge of buddhas, the unlimited methods of calculating ages, the buddhas’ immeasurable awareness of past, present, and future, the infinite differences in beings’ interests, the infinite variety of manifestations of the material body of buddhas, the infinite variety of mental dispositions and faculties of beings, the infinite gladdening of the stream of beings by the utterances of the buddhas, the infinite variety of mental actions of beings, the buddhas’ infinite following of the progress of knowledge, the infinite variety of application to the way of emancipation of the vehicle of listeners, the infinite manifestations of teachings of the Path of the buddhas, the infinite consummation of the attainment of the vehicle of individual illuminates, the infinite teachings of ways of ingress into the profound knowledge of the buddhas, the infinite application of enlightening beings to the conduct of enlightening beings, and the buddhas’ infinite teachings of entry into the assembly of the Great Vehicle. 
“It occurs to the enlightening beings that the spheres of the buddhas, those who have realized Thusness, the perfectly enlightened ones, are infinite and could not be counted even in hundreds of millions of billions of trillions of eons, and that they themselves should develop these spheres of buddhas and fulfill them, effortlessly, without vain thought, without false discrimination. 
“Thus with perspicacious mystic knowledge, continuous application, replete with skill in means and wisdom, they become well established in these special undertakings on the Path, by unshakable application. While undertaking the accomplishment of the Path, they do not leave it for a moment; even while walking, standing, sitting, reclining, and even sleeping they are devoted to the accomplishment of knowledge. 
They are free from all obstruction, they maintain proper conduct, and they keep in mind such thoughts, by the inspiration of which they collectively fulfill the ten transcendent ways of enlightening beings. 
How so? 
In that way do the enlightening beings dedicate each thought, led by great compassion, to the fulfillment of buddhahood and enlightened knowledge. 
“The giving to beings of their own roots of goodness by those attending to living beings compassionately while seeking enlightened knowledge is their transcendent generosity. 
The extinguishing of the burning of all afflictions is their transcendent discipline. 
Tolerance toward all beings out of kindness and compassion is their transcendent forbearance. 
Strength in tireless undertaking of ultimately good practices is their transcendent vigor. 
Proceeding toward omniscient knowledge without distraction is transcendent meditation. 
Tolerance in face of the essential nonorigination of all things is their transcendent wisdom. 
The accomplishment of unlimited knowledge is their transcendent skill in means. 
The realization of the penetration of knowledge of the ultimate undertaking is their transcendent vowing. 
Not suffering their path to be cut off by any opponents or gangs of demons is their transcendent power. 
The accomplishment of knowledge of all things as they are is their transcendent knowledge. 
Thus are the ten transcendent ways of enlightening beings fulfilled in every instant in this stage, which is called Far-Going. 
In the same way the four means of salvation, the four powers, the thirty-seven elements of enlightenment, the three doors of liberation—in sum, all aspects of enlightenment—are fulfilled moment to moment.” When Diamond Matrix had said this, the enlightening being Moon of Liberation said to him, “Are all the elements of enlightenment fulfilled moment to moment only by enlightening beings in the seventh stage, or in all ten stages?” Diamond Matrix said, “All the elements of enlightenment are fulfilled moment to moment by enlightening beings in all ten stages, but especially in this seventh stage. 
This stage of enlightening beings fulfills practice that involves appropriate efforts and accedes to the practice of knowledge and mystic knowledge. 
Now in the first stage of enlightening beings the elements of enlightenment are fulfilled in the enlightening beings moment to moment by focus on all vows; in the second, by removal of mental defilements; in the third, by increase in commitment and attainment of the illumination of the Teaching; in the fourth, by entry into the Path; in the fifth, by going along with worldly occupations; in the sixth, by entry into the door of the teaching of profundity; and in this seventh stage all elements of enlightenment are fulfilled moment to moment by the establishment of all qualities of buddhahood. 
What is the reason for this? 
All the elements of effort to evoke knowledge that are accomplished by enlightening beings in the first through seventh stages are accomplished without effort beginning in the eighth stage, and on until the final end. 
“It is as if there are two worlds, one defiled and impure, and one thoroughly pure; it is difficult to cross over the gap between these two worlds, except by the great power of higher knowledge: 
in the same way it is hard to cross over the gap between alloyed and pure practice of enlightening beings, and it is impossible to do so except by the empowerment of great vows, skill in means, and higher mystic knowledge.” Moon of Liberation said, “Then is the practice of enlightening beings in this seventh stage to be considered alloyed with afflictions, or pure?” Diamond Matrix said, “From the first stage of enlightening, all enlightening beings’ practices should be considered free from the blemishes of afflictions, due to the dominance of dedication to enlightenment, but because of being even with the path that accords to their station, up to the seventh stage it cannot be called practice which has completely transcended afflictions. 
It is like a king riding around on an elephant, recognizing people’s afflictions of suffering and poverty without himself being affected thereby—yet he has not thus far totally gone beyond the human condition. Then if he is born in the Brahma heaven, having relinquished the human body, and ascends to the Brahma palace, with little effort he goes around looking at the universe and shows the radiance of Brahma, he then cannot be called human. 
In the same way, from the first stage enlightening beings, mounted on the vehicle of the transcendent ways, course through all worlds, recognizing the ills of afflictions, but are not affected by them because of being on the right Path, but thus far cannot be said to have completely gone beyond the ills afflicting all beings. 
Having given up the practices of the seventh stage, they enter the eighth, and then, mounted on the completely pure vehicle of enlightening beings, traveling around all worlds, they recognize the ills afflicting all worldly beings, but they are not affected by those ills, having totally transcended worldly actions. 
“Yet the enlightening beings in this seventh stage have mostly transcended the mass of all afflictions, beginning with greed; enlightening beings practicing this seventh stage, Far-Going, cannot be said either to be defiled with affliction or to be free of affliction. 
Because they do not act out any afflictions, they cannot be said to be afflicted; because they are seeking buddha-knowledge and have not yet completely fulfilled their aspiration, they cannot be said to be without affliction. 
“Enlightening beings in this seventh stage become endowed with physical, verbal, and mental action that is pure in intent; and they get beyond all bad courses of action that are disapproved of by the enlightened, and continually act in accord with the virtuous paths of conduct recognized by the enlightened. 
Also, whatever worldly arts and crafts and businesses they do in the fifth stage all operate without effort in the seventh stage. 
They become universally accepted as teachers, except of perfect buddhas and enlightening beings from the eighth stage on, who have no peer, whether in terms of will or practice. 
All their meditations, concentrations, attainments, mystic knowledges, and liberations become present to them, in terms of cultivation, but not as yet as mature accomplishments, just as in the eighth stage the power of cultivation of wisdom and means in every thought by enlightening beings in the seventh stage is fulfilled. They attain all the elements of enlightenment to an even greater degree than before. 
“In this seventh stage enlightening beings attain an enlightening concentration called perfect conscious ascertainment, one called careful consideration of meaning, one called preeminent intellect, one called store of differentiation of meanings, one called ascertainment of all meanings, one called ascertainment of meanings of things as they are, one called firmly established root, one called door of knowledge and mystic power, one called purification and adornment of the phenomenal realm, one called praise of the enlightened, and a concentration called door of existence and nirvana concealing various meanings. In this way, beginning with these, fulfilling the ways of ingress into great mystic knowledge, they attain a hundred thousand sets of ten concentrations that purify the stages. 
By attainment of these concentrations in which means and wisdom are purified, and by the power of great compassion, they go beyond the stages of listeners and individual illuminates, and encounter the stage of contemplation with wisdom and knowledge. 
The unlimited actions of enlightening beings in the seventh stage are carried on without specific marks, as are their unlimited speech and thought. 
Thoroughly purified is the manifestation of acceptance of the nonorigination of all things.” Moon of Liberation said, “Are not the unlimited physical, verbal, and mental actions of enlightening beings in the first stage beyond the practice of listeners and individual illuminates?” Diamond Matrix said, “They are, but that is because of the magnitude of their intense focus on the Buddha Way, not by their own conscious contemplation. 
But in this seventh stage of enlightening beings they become insuperable because of realization through contemplation in their own sphere of awareness. 
It is like a prince born of a king and queen, who has the marks of kingship and as soon as he is born is superior to the ministers—that is because of the lordship of the king, not due to thought by his own intellectual power. 
Then when he grows up, he goes beyond the works of all the ministers because of his own intellectual power. 
In the same way, enlightening beings excel all listeners and individual illuminates as soon as they are inspired, because of the greatness of their determination, not because of contemplation by their own intelligence. But enlightening beings in this seventh stage go beyond all listeners and individual illuminates by establishment in greatness and preeminence of their own experiential knowledge. 
Furthermore, enlightening beings in this seventh stage attain profound, unattached, inconspicuous physical, verbal, and mental action, yet they do not give up intense effort seeking greater excellence, by which questing effort they reach extinction but do not make it their final realization.” Moon of Liberation said, “From what stage do enlightening beings arrive at extinction?” Diamond Matrix said, “They arrive at extinction from the sixth stage. 
In the seventh stage they enter and emerge from extinction in each mental instant, but they may not be said to actually experience extinction. 
Because of that they are said to have inconceivable physical, verbal, and mental action. It is a marvel how enlightening beings abide in ultimate reality without actually experiencing extinction. 
Just as a person with good knowledge of the characteristics of the waters of the ocean, educated, wise, and intelligent, with consideration relevant to every point, when on board a ship in the ocean becomes familiar with the winds and the currents and is unscathed by the ocean waters, in the same way enlightening beings in the seventh stage, having entered the ocean of omniscience of the great vehicle on board the vessel of the transcendent ways, abide in the sphere of ultimate reality, the limit of existence, yet do not experience extinction, and are not affected by the ills of thoughts of complete ultimate extinction of the compounded. 
“Having attained this power and support of knowledge, by means or great awareness in which concentration, knowledge, and power are developed, by the power of skill in means and wisdom, they also show the face of mundane existence, while their minds are gone to nirvana. They are also surrounded by a great company, yet they have attained to constant detachment of mind. 
They undertake birth in the world by will power for the sake of development of beings, but they are not stained by the ills of the world. 
They are born in the knowledge of buddhas and leave the stages of listeners and individual illuminates. While they come to reach the storehouse of the realm of buddha-knowledge, yet they appear to have entered the realm of demons. Though they have completely transcended the paths of the four demons, yet they show the sphere of operation of the demons. 
They appear to practice the ways of non-Buddhists, yet their minds have not abandoned Buddhism. They appear to follow all worldly occupations, yet they attain the way to transcendence of the world. 
They acquire adornments surpassing those of all creatures, human, celestial, or fabulous, but they do not take their attention off delight in the way of the enlightened. 
Having seen those buddhas, they honor and serve them with great zeal, providing them with food and drink, clothing, bedding, medicines, and furnishings, and also providing comforts for enlightening beings and paying respect to the religious community. Those roots of goodness they dedicate to perfect enlightenment. They attend those buddhas and listen to their teachings, take them up and remember them. Having heard the teachings, they put them into practice by means of the light of true attainment, wisdom, and knowledge, and protect them by accomplishing them, and become preservers of the teachings of the buddhas, unfazed by the intelligent questions of all listeners and individual illuminates. 
Their acceptance of the profound teaching, for the salvation of beings, becomes yet more purified. “The roots of goodness of enlightening beings in this stage of Far-Going are forged over many eons, are purified, and become workable; they become immaculately pure over hundreds of thousands of millions of billions of trillions of eons. 
Just as gold studded with all kinds of jewels becomes yet more radiant, more luminous, and all the more outclasses all other ornaments, in the same way the roots of goodness of enlightening beings in this seventh stage of Far-Going, produced by skill in means, wisdom, and knowledge, become all the more radiant, luminous, and immaculate, and cannot be outshone by listeners and individual illuminates. 
Just as the light of the sun cannot be outshone by the lights of the stars and moon, and dries up most of the swamps and ripens the crops, in the same way those roots of goodness of enlightening beings in this stage of Far-Going cannot be outshone by listeners and individual illuminates, and mostly dry up delusions and their swamps of afflictions, and cause bodies defiled by afflictions to become wholesome. 
“For these enlightening beings, among the ten transcendent ways, transcendent skill in means becomes paramount, while they practice the rest as best they can. 
“This is a summary exposition of the seventh stage of enlightening beings, called Far-Going, most of the enlightening beings in which become celestial sovereigns with command of others’ emanations, competent and powerful, inexhaustible in evoking clear understanding in beings, and in answering the questions of listeners and individual illuminates, skilled at leading beings into certainty. Whatever acts they undertake, whether by giving, or kind speech, or beneficial action, or cooperation, all of it is never apart from thoughts of Buddha, the Teaching, the Community, enlightening beings, the practice of enlightening beings, the transcendent ways, the stages, the powers, expertise, and unique qualities of buddhas, including omniscience complete in all respects. Because they want to become the best of beings, unexcelled leaders and guides, and ultimately omniscient refuges. 
“Wishing to be thus, they undertake appropriate effort, by whose energy they instantly attain a quadrillion concentrations, see a quadrillion buddhas and recognize their power, shake a quadrillion worlds, go to a quadrillion lands, illumine a quadrillion worlds, develop a quadrillion beings to maturity, live for a quadrillion eons, penetrate a quadrillion eons past and future, contemplate a quadrillion means of teaching, manifest a quadrillion bodies, manifesting each body with a company of a quadrillion enlightening beings. 
Beyond that, enlightening beings with the power of vows can, by the excellence of their vows, perform countless transformations, of body, aura, mystic powers, vision, sphere of action, voice, conduct, adornment, empowerment, resolution, and performances.” Then Diamond Matrix spoke these verses describing this stage: With profound knowledge following the trail of ultimate truth, Mind stabilized in the sixth stage, perfectly concentrated, Accomplishing the union of wisdom and means, They enter the seventh stage of superior practice. 
Empty, signless, wishless, yet with compassion and kindness, Gone to the state of felicity, yet honoring the buddhas, Tireless in virtue and power, while knowing them to be empty, They enter the realm of the seventh stage. In the world, with great forbearance, they’ve acquired detachment, Extinguished the flames of afflictions and stilled worldly cravings, Coursing in the nonduality of things as like reflections, illusions, dreams, Yet they show compassion, and enter the seventh stage. 
They purify the land, while their own minds, equanimous, are without discriminatory thought; They’re endowed with the marks of a buddha, while immovable in the essence of truth. 
They speak for the benefit of the world, while detached from And in an instant enter the mind of knowledge of buddhas. 
Illumined, they contemplate these teachings. Entering the higher stage desiring to benefit the world. 
In this stage they do endless works for living beings, Doing the deeds of buddhas, immeasurable. 
They understand lands, their various orders and ages, Inclinations, intentions, various states of mind, And teach without end, faithfully, To develop all to maturity. 
Those who have reached the supreme Path by this mind of knowledge, Combining wisdom and means in all their actions, Having attained in each moment of thought herein the virtues of the Path, Fulfill the ten transcendent states. 
The seeking of good for all beings is giving; Discipline is the cessation of afflictions, tolerance is noninjury; Energy is ever-greater vigor in their undertakings; Imperturbability on the Path is the meditation of the virtuous. 
Thus they attain the qualities of enlightenment moment to moment. 
In the first stage virtues are fulfilled by focus of mind on them; In the second, removal of defilement; in the third, cutting of bonds; In the fourth, the Path; in the fifth, impartial action; In the sixth, knowledge of nonorigination operates. 
Hence, as soon as they reach the seventh stage, They commence virtuous undertakings of many kinds; Why? 
The knowledge and deeds they achieve hence Purify all that develops into the eighth stage. 
Far-Going is hard to cross; by many developmental practices They cross, as one would cross a path between two lands. 
Coursing in the seventh stage, they are undefiled, like kings; While established in the Path, yet they have not definitely transcended all. 
When they reach the eighth stage of knowledge, further, They transcend mental objects, established in the action of knowledge. 
Just as a god does not look on the world as a human does, So do they act, like lotuses unstained. 
In this stage they get beyond various afflictions— Their afflictions are neither active nor completely destroyed. 
Being on the Path, they do not act on afflictions, Yet, filled with zeal for supreme knowledge, their affliction is not yet ended. 
They know various worldly arts and crafts, the use of medicines and spells, And are well versed and grounded in all sciences. 
They attain meditation, mystic knowledge, and powers, by cultivation, And further accomplish various concentrations. 
Having transcended the practices of listeners and the self-awakened, They are established in the infinite practice of enlightening beings, Before by determination, from now on by knowledge; They are like children of kings, full of power when grown. 
Having reached profundity, they proceed yet further; Reaching extinction of mind, still they do not make it their experience, Like having gone into the ocean on a steady-faring ship, Seeing all the water before them yet not being destroyed by it. 
Further endowed with the best of means, wisdom, and power, Rich in virtues of knowledge and action, hard for the world to know, They serve millions of buddhas, becoming more pure, Like gold adorned with jewels. 
The light of the eminent wisdom of the sages in this stage Evaporates the wetness of craving, like the light of the sun. 
Having attained this stage, they become commanders, Capable, skilled in teaching the fruit of knowledge. 
Seeking, imbued with stability, vigor, and strength, They see a quadrillion buddhas In all directions, by concentration, And even more, those of immeasurable, superior will. 
“This is the seventh stage, called Far-Going, purifying means and wisdom, hard for all worldings and those who practice only for themselves to know.” Having heard about this excellent practice of the wise, the gods and celestial hosts were joyful and made offerings to the Buddha and the multitude of enlightening beings, benefactors of the world—they gave flower garlands, banners and pennants, aromatic powders, precious cloth, many splendid parasols studded with jewels, and exquisite clouds of pearl necklaces. 
The goddesses produced many kinds of music, with pleasing, sweet sounds and superb rhythm, in offering to the Buddha and enlightening beings, sages of eminent character; they said, All-seer, mighty, foremost and best, who shows the realm of buddhas for the benefit of the world, It is you who evoke this music, with the strumming of various instruments. 
On a hairtip more buddhas than grains of sand in trillions of Ganges rivers Peaceful, peerless, teach the pure doctrine, preeminent, supreme. 
In a single pore are infinite lands, each with four continents and seas, As well as polar and peripheral mountains, all seen therein, uncrowded. 
On a point the size of a hairtip are all realms of being— Ghosts, beasts, fiends, humans and gods, goblins and serpents, experiencing the various realms of action. 
In all the spheres of the lands the supreme wheel of the Purifiers is turned, As the buddhas teach while adapting to the minds and thoughts of beings. 
In the body of each being are various lands, in the lands, beings; Those of higher development are humans and celestials— Knowing them in their variety, the Buddha teaches them. 
A great land comes to seem to be minute, a mote of dust comes to seem huge— These and more are the spiritual powers of Buddha, of which all beings could not exhaustively tell. 
When such words of grandeur had been spoken, the assembly, silent, gazed happily at the Best of Speakers. 
“Please tell us the way into the practice of the eighth stage.” Diamond Matrix said, “Those who have well accomplished investigation of the seventh stage of enlightening beings, who have purified the path by wisdom and skill in means, have accumulated ample provisions of virtue and knowledge, have thoroughly committed themselves to the great vow, are surely supported by the empowerment of the Buddha, have acquired the support of the power of their own roots of goodness, have their attention on the powers, expertise, and unique qualities of buddhas, have purified their intent and thought, have attained the power of virtue and knowledge, strive compassionately and follow the Path of infinite knowledge, realize the primordial nonorigination of all things as it really is, and also realize the nonbirth, signlessness, absence of becoming or annihilation, nonconsummation, nonprogression, nonregression, essential nonexistence, equality of beginning, middle, and end, and nonconceptuality of all things, accessible to nonconceptual universal knowledge, equal to thusness—they realize these qualities of all things as they really are. 
They are wholly detached from mind, intellect, consciousness, thought, and ideation. Unattached, not grasping, equal to space, having entered into the nature of openness—this is called having attained acceptance of the nonorigination of things. 
“Then, imbued with this acceptance, as soon as enlightening beings attain the eighth stage, Immovability, they attain the profound abode of enlightening beings, which is hard to know, unadulterated, ungraspable by any notion, unoriginated, measureless, unconquerable by any listeners or individual illuminates, aloof, facing total detachment. 
Just as when a monk with spiritual powers and ultimate control of mind has, through successive stages, reached the ninth level of attainment, extinction, he becomes free of all stirring cogitation and flowing thoughts, in the same way enlightening beings, as soon as they attain the eighth stage, Immovability, become freed from all efforts and attain the state of effortlessness, freed from physical, verbal, and mental striving, freed from stirring cogitation and flowing thoughts, and become stabilized in a natural state of development. 
“It is as if a person in a dream saw himself in a great torrent, he then would make great effort, eagerly striving to get out, and because of that great effort and striving he would wake up, and as soon as he woke up he would be freed from all that effort and striving. 
In the same way the enlightening beings, seeing the mortal being in the four torrents, desiring to come to the rescue, exert great efforts and striving for awakening of all-knowledge, acting with great vigor; as soon as they reach the stage Immovability, they become free from all efforts. “In these enlightening beings no actions based on views, passions, or intentions are manifest. 
Just as in the Brahma heaven no afflictions of the realm of desire are acted on, in the same way enlightening beings in this stage of Immovability do not carry on action of mind, intellect, or consciousness. 
They do not even carry on the conduct of Buddhas, of enlightenment, of enlightening beings, of nirvana, or of learners and self-illuminates—how much less would they carry on the conduct of worldlings. 
“Furthermore, to the enlightening beings who have reached this stage of Immovability, who are stabilized by the supporting power of their past vows, the buddhas, in the course of that means of access to the Teaching, miraculously effect the bestowal of knowledge of reality and say, ‘Good, good! 
This is acceptance of the ultimate truth, in accord with the teaching of buddhas. 
However, you do not yet have our ten powers, expertise, and unique qualities of buddhahood fully developed. 
Do not let this acceptance go; nevertheless, though you have attained this abode of peace and liberation, you should care for these restless, agitated ignorant beings acting on various afflictions and ravaged by various thoughts. 
Also, always remember your past vows, the benefit of beings, and the inconceivability of the source of knowledge. 
Furthermore, the essence of all phenomena remains the same whether or not buddhas emerge; the realm of reality of the essence is permanent, for it is the emptiness and ungraspability of all things. 
It is not only by this that buddhas are revealed as such—even listeners to the Buddhist teaching and individual illuminates also attain this nonconceptual essence. 
Yet you should observe the infinity of the body of us buddhas, the infinity of our knowledge, the infinity of the lands of buddhas, the infinity of accomplishments of knowledge, the infinity of spheres of light, and the infinity of purity of voice, and strive to achieve the same. 
Furthermore, you have only this one illumination, which is the illumination of absence of false ideas about things. But such illuminations of buddhas are endless in extent, endless in action, endless in manifestation, their number being incalculable and immeasurable; you should strive to attain them. 
Also, observe the infinity of lands in the ten directions, the infinity of beings, and the infinite differentiations of phenomena, and undertake to comprehend them as they actually are.’ Thus do the buddhas present to the enlightening beings immeasurable, incalculable ways of accomplishing knowledge, beginning with these. 
By these ways of accomplishing knowledge, the enlightening beings, by infinite differentiations of knowledge, cause works productive of knowledge to be consummated. 
“I tell you, if the buddhas did not introduce the enlightening beings this way into ways of effecting omniscient knowledge, the enlightening beings would become completely extinct in parinirvana and would cease all work for sentient beings. Therefore, the buddhas give the enlightening beings such infinite tasks to develop knowledge, the knowledge-producing deeds effected in a single instant of which are immeasurably, incalculably greater than all former undertakings from the first inspiration up to the attainment of stability in the seventh stage. 
Because previously it was practice undertaken with one body, whereas having climbed to this stage the power of practice of enlightening beings is realized by infinite different bodies, by production of infinite voices, by accomplishment of infinite knowledge, by accomplishment of infinite manifestations, by purification of infinite lands, by development of infinite beings, by service of infinite buddhas, by realization of infinite principles of buddhahood, by accomplishment of infinite powers of mystic knowledge, by realization of infinite differences of circles of assemblies; by infinite accomplishments of physical, verbal, and mental actions, the power of enlightening beings’ practice is fully realized by immovable application. 
“It is like a boat going to the ocean—before it reaches the ocean, it is dragged with much effort, but once it reaches the ocean it is propelled without effort by the wind. The distance it travels on the ocean in one day is farther than it could be dragged by force in even a hundred years. 
In the same way, enlightening beings, having stored provisions of roots of goodness and boarded the ship of the Great Vehicle, reaching the great ocean of practice of enlightening beings, arrive at omniscience in a moment by effortless knowledge, which could not be reached even in countless eons by their former practices involving effort. 
“Then when enlightening beings have attained the eighth stage, by the effortless awareness produced by skill in means and knowledge, they contemplate the sphere of omniscience, contemplate the becoming and dissolution of the world. As the world forms, they know it, and as the world disintegrates they know it. They know by what accumulation of actions the world forms, and they know by what ending of actions the world disintegrates. They know how long the world forms and they know how long the world disintegrates. 
They know the limitation, extensiveness, infinity, and differentiation of the wind element. They know the minuteness of atomic particles, they know their grossness, their measurelessness, and differentiation. They also know the skill of differentiation of measureless atomic particles. They know how many atomic particles of each element there are in this world; they know how many varieties of precious substances there are and how many atomic particles of precious substances there are. 
They know how many atomic particles of beings’ bodies there are. They know the total number of particles of land masses. They know the grossness of beings’ bodies, the fineness of their bodies, and the differentiation of their bodies. They know how many particles are formed into bodies of beings in hell, how many into bodies of animals, of ghosts, of titans, of celestial beings, and of human beings. 
They know truly the limitation, the extension, the infinity, and the differentiation of the realm of desire, of the realm of form, and of the formless realm. They know truly what is of these three realms. Furthermore, illumined by well-developed knowledge, versed in knowledge of varieties of bodies of beings, versed in knowledge of differences in bodies of beings, and versed in knowledge of differentiations of land masses, they apply their intelligence to the production of mediums of manifestation as beings; in whatever form beings are born and attain their desires, enlightening beings adopt these forms themselves for the purpose of developing beings to maturity. 
“Permeating a billion-world universe, enlightening beings undertake manifestation according to the form of the beings there, according to their various different inclinations, doing so by following knowledge of how to appear as reflections, according to how beings may become ripe for perfect enlightenment and liberation. 
In the same way they pervade two, three, four, five, ten, twenty, thirty, forty, fifty, up to an unspeakable number of universes and undertake manifestations in the forms of the beings there according to their various inclinations, by means of knowledge of how to appear as a reflection. 
“Imbued with such knowledge, well established in this stage, while not moving from one buddha-land, they appear as reflections in the circles of buddhas in untold buddha-lands. According to the differences in beings’ physical characteristics, their colors, appearances, statuses, physical sizes, inclinations, and dispositions, in various circles in various buddha-lands, in each the enlightening beings manifest the appropriate forms. In circles of mendicants they appear as mendicants; in circles of priests they appear as priests; in circles of warriors and administrators they appear as warriors and administrators; in circles of peasants they appear as peasants; in circles of servants they appear as servants; in circles of householders they appear as householders; in circles of various classes of celestial beings they appear as those particular types of celestial beings; and in circles of demons they appear as demons. To beings who should be taught by Buddhist followers, they appear as Buddhist followers. 
Thus, to the extent of the realms of beings’ forms of existence, senses, and inclinations, in the realms of untold buddha-lands, enlightening beings appear differently in accord with each of them. They are free from all discriminatory conceptions of bodies and have realized the equality of bodies; their manifestation of bodies, endless and not in vain, is for the development and education of all. 
“They know the body of sentient beings, they know the body of lands, they know the body of fruition of action, they know the body of Buddhist followers, they know the body of individual illuminates, they know the body of enlightening beings, the body of buddhas, the body of knowledge, the body of reality, and the body of space. Knowing the wishes of beings, according to time, development, education, progress, and desire, the enlightening beings make the body of beings into their own body. In the same way they make the body of lands, the body of fruition of action, the body of Buddhist followers, the body of individual illuminates, the body of enlightening beings, the body of buddhas, the body of knowledge, the body of reality, and the body of space into their own body. Knowing the heart’s desire of beings, according to their desire, the enlightening beings make their own body into the body of sentient beings. 
In the same way they make the body of beings into the body of lands, the body of fruition of the Teaching, the body of fruition of action, the body of Buddhist followers, the body of individual illuminates, the body of enlightening beings, the body of buddhas, the body of knowledge, the body of reality, the body of space. Knowing the inclination of sentient beings, the enlightening beings put their own bodies into whatever body they wish. “The enlightening beings know the embodiments of the bodies of beings as a mass of action, as a mass of consequences, as a mass of afflictions, as a mass of form, and they know formless embodiment. They know the smallness and greatness of bodies of lands, their measurelessness, their defilement and purity, their confusion, their inversion, their evenness, their interaction, and their differentiation of place and time. 
They know conventional distinctions of bodies of fruition of action; in the same way they know the conventions of distinctions of realization of bodies of Buddhist followers, individual illuminates, and enlightening beings. They know the bodies of buddhas as the embodiment of perfect enlightenment, as the embodiment of vows, as the emanation body, as the embodiment of empowerment, as the body arrayed with marks and embellishments of greatness, as the body of light, as the mentally produced body, as the embodiment of virtue, as the body of reality, and as the body of knowledge. They know the well-considered nature of the bodies of knowledge, their derivation from truth, their inclusion in fruition and effort, their division into mundane and supramundane, their establishment of the Three Vehicles, their generality and uniqueness, their liberative or nonliberative qualities, whether they are proper to those undergoing training or to those beyond it. 
They know the equality of reality bodies, their indestructibility, their conventional definitions according to situation and agreed usage, their definition in terms of animate and inanimate, and their definition in terms of the realities of Buddha and the realities of the holy community. 
“Having realized such knowledge of bodies, the enlightening beings become powerful; they acquire control over life span among all beings, by virtue of the power to live endlessly, for untold eons. They acquire control of mind, by virtue of immersion in knowledge of measureless, countless concentrations and contemplations. 
With the attainment of these ten controlling powers of enlightening beings, they are imbued with inconceivable knowledge, incomparable knowledge, immeasurable knowledge, vast knowledge, insuperable knowledge. 
“In the enlightening beings who have attained this stage and are imbued with such knowledge, ultimately impeccable conduct of physical, verbal, and mental action operates, led by knowledge, following knowledge, ruled by the ten transcendent ways, with great compassion in the forefront, skill in means well articulated, determination well developed, completely stabilized by the empowerment of Buddha, ceaselessly working for knowledge to benefit beings, aware of the endless distinction in realms of worlds. 
In sum, the physical, verbal, and mental actions of the enlightening beings who have attained this stage of Immovability operate for the concerted development of all aspects of buddhahood. 
“Thus having attained this stage of Immovability, the enlightening beings become well established in willpower, through freedom from the activity of all afflictions; they become firmly established in the power of determination, never deviating from the Path; they become well established in the power of great compassion, not giving up the benefit of sentient beings; they become well established in the power of great kindness, being saviors of sentient beings; they become well established in the power of mnemonic control, not forgetting the teachings; they become well established in the power of elocution, through skill in examination of the distinctions of all the Buddha teachings; they become well established in the power of mystic knowledge, through familiarity with the actions in endless worldly realms; they become well established in the power of vows, never giving up all enlightening practices; they become well established in the power of the transcendent ways, through concerted cultivation of all the Buddha teachings; they become well established in the power of the support of buddhas, confronting omniscient knowledge in all its aspects. 
Having attained the support of these powers of knowledge, they show all activities, impeccable and undefiled in all acts. 
“This eighth stage of enlightening beings is called Immovable because the enlightening beings cannot be deflected from their course; it is called the stage of nonregression because of the nonregression of knowledge; it is called the stage difficult to reach because of being difficult for any worldlings to know; it is called the stage of youth, because of innocence; it is called the stage of birth, because of power to effect whatever is wished; it is called the stage of perfection, there being nothing further to do; it is called the stage of completion because of having thoroughly accomplished ascertainment by knowledge; it is called the stage of nirvana because of having thoroughly accomplished vows; it is called the stage of empowerment because of being invulnerable to others; it is called the stage of effortlessness because of having been effected by what went before. 
“Furthermore, having developed such knowledge, the enlightening beings enter the family of buddhas, are illumined by the light of the virtues of buddhas, accord with the conduct of buddhas, come face to face with the realm of buddhahood, and are constantly sustained by the power of buddhas. 
They are welcomed by Indra, Brahma, and the world guardians, constantly attended by the thunderbolt bearers; they are never without the power of concentration, able to produce infinite different embodiments, imbued with the power of action in all bodies, consummate in development of great mystic knowledge, in control of endless concentration, receivers of infinite indications of enlightenment, and demonstrators of attainment of perfect enlightenment according to the maturity of sentient beings. 
“Having attained such knowledge of this stage and entered the circle of the Great Vehicle, with well-considered wisdom and mystic knowledge, constantly emanating the light of wisdom, having entered the unobstructed path of the realm of reality, able to distinguish many paths in the world, showing all aspects of virtue, in control of their own resolutions, with perspicacious knowledge of past and future, endowed with the knowledge to turn back all demons, having entered the realm and sphere of all enlightened ones, they carry out the conduct of enlightening beings in endless places in the realms of the world, with nonregressing application; thus are they said to have attained the eighth stage of enlightening beings, Immovable. 
“Then, having attained the Immovable stage of enlightening beings, they are never without the constant vision of endless buddhas, because of accomplishment of the power of concentration. Yet they never give up extensive meeting and attendance on buddhas: in every age, in every world, they honor, respect, serve, and provide in all ways for many buddhas, many hundreds, thousands, millions, billions, trillions, quadrillions of buddhas; they attend those buddhas and receive from them provisions of illumination through their teachings, beginning with light on the differentiations of worldly realms. They further acquire the treasury of teachings of the buddhas, and become invincible in answering questions in the world. 
“Those roots of goodness of theirs, forged and purified over many eons, become more radiant; over many hundreds, thousands, millions, billions, trillions, quadrillions of eons their roots of goodness are further forged, purified, and become more radiant. 
Just as well-refined gold made by a good goldsmith into an ornament and fastened on the neck or head of an emperor cannot be outshone by the ornaments of all the people in the realm, in the same way the roots of goodness of enlightening beings in this Immovable stage cannot be outshone by all listeners, individual illuminates, and enlightening beings up to the seventh stage. 
“The light of wisdom and knowledge of enlightening beings who have reached this stage annihilates the darkness of afflictions of sentient beings, through accomplishment of accurate discernment of the means of knowledge. 
Just as a great Brahma god of a thousand worlds, pervading the thousand worlds with benevolence, illumines them with light, in the same way enlightening beings in this Immovable stage, pervading up to as many worlds as atoms in a million buddha-lands with the light of goodwill, progressively extinguish the fires of beings’ afflictions and cool them off. 
“This is a summary of the eighth stage of enlightening beings, called Immovable, the details of which would take forever to explain. 
Most of the enlightening beings in this stage become great Brahmas, lords of a thousand worlds, supreme, invincible, seeing what is beneficial, imbued with controlling power, capable, mighty, skilled in the presentation of explanation of the transcendent ways of all listeners, individual illuminates, and enlightening beings, insuperable in answering questions about the differentiations of worldly realms. Whatever they do, whether by way of giving, or kind speech, or beneficial action, or cooperation, is never apart from thoughts of Buddha, the Teaching, the Community, enlightening beings, the practices of enlightening beings, the ways of transcendence, the stages, the powers, expertise, and unique qualities of buddhas, and ultimately of omniscience in all its aspects. That they may become the best of beings, unexcelled leaders and guides, and ultimately all-knowing refuges. 
“Accordingly, they bring forth such energy, by which they instantly attain as many concentrations as atoms in a million billion-world systems, see as many buddhas as atoms in a million billion-world systems and acknowledge their power, shake as many lands as atoms in a million billion-world systems, illumine as many worlds as atoms in a million billion-world systems, mature as many beings as atoms in a million billion-world systems, abide for as many eons as atoms in a million billion-world systems, penetrate as many eons past and future as atoms in a million billion-world systems, ascertain as many ways into the Teaching as atoms in a million billion-world systems, and manifest as many bodies as atoms in a million billion-world systems, manifesting each body with a company of as many enlightening beings as atoms in a million billion-world systems; beyond that, enlightening beings with the power of vowing produce, by the excellence of their vows, countless transformations of the body, aura, light, mystic powers, vision, sphere of action, voice, activity, adornment, power, resolution, or performances.” Then Diamond Matrix spoke these verses describing this stage: 
Having purified wisdom and means in the seventh stage, Well provided for the Way, committed to great vows, Firmly established, the best of humans, imbued with goodness, Seeking knowledge, they enter the eighth stage. 
With virtue and knowledge, compassion and benevolence, Going on infinite paths of knowledge, with awareness like space, With the power of certain understanding of the teachings they hear, The great sages attain acceptance of nonorigination, tranquil and subtle. 
Primordially unborn, unoriginated, signless, all is Imperishable, not having become, unproduced, Void of essence of being, thus, beyond conception; So they are freed from thought and mentation, just like space. 
Accepting all things as such, free from idle fancy, Profoundly immovable, they arrive at peace of mind. 
It can hardly be known by worldlings, by their analytic reasoning, Because it is beyond concepts grasping mental images. 
Thus stabilized, there is no thinking in their minds, Like a monk who has reached extinction and attained nonthought, Like one dreaming of being in a river freed from concern on awakening, Like being in pure heaven, aloof of attachment to pleasure. 
On the basis of their previous resolution, the buddhas further exhort them: 
“This tolerance is higher than coronation by the buddhas, But our vast knowledge and supreme buddhahood Is not yet yours, so begin heroic effort. 
“Though you have extinguished the burning of the fire of affliction, Having seen the world still afflicted, remember your past vows; Having thought of the welfare of the world, work in quest Of the cause of knowledge, for the liberation of the world. 
“The real essence of things is permanent, suchness, beyond thought, In all buddhas, buddhas’ disciples, and individual illuminates— It is not by this that the buddhas appear in the world with ten powers, But only by vast knowledge, unattached to past, present, or future.” Thus do the incomparable ones, worthy of the honor of humans and gods, Provoke in the enlightening beings thoughts of many aspects of knowledge, Endless entry into consummation of the Buddha teachings, Of which past enlightening practice was not even a fraction. 
Having thereby reached this stage of knowledge, these majestic people Pervade everywhere in an instant, having gained entry into knowledge And having reached higher mystic knowledge, Like a ship on the ocean being borne along by the wind. 
Free from mental effort, established in the work of knowledge, They discern the becoming, decay, and subsistence of lands And penetrate the differentiations of the elements, Their fineness, grossness, and distinctions. 
They go into every atom in the billion-world system, The differentiation of the elements and bodies of beings, The distinctions and particles of precious substances in the realms of bliss: 
Knowing these, by their range of knowledge they calculate them all. 
Their minds developed in knowledge, they bring all bodies Into their own body, for the benefit of the beings; Pervading the billion worlds with various forms, They manifest various bodies in endless worlds. 
Just as the sun and moon, while in the sky, Appear as reflections in water, Remaining in the highest knowledge of the unmoving essence of Thusness, Enlightening beings appear, as reflections, intending to purify the world. 
According to beings’ dispositions, and the differences in their forms, Enlightening beings appear in all groups, in all worlds: 
They appear as disciples, as self-enlightened, as enlightening beings, And in the glorified form of buddhas. 
Beings, lands, as well as bodies of fruition of deeds, The various bodies—of reality, of knowledge—the bodies of sages, The body of space, majestic, all equal, They manifest, with various mystic powers, to satisfy the world. 
With tenfold control and reflection based on pure knowledge, Acting in accord with knowledge, following kindness and compassion, Doing whatever produces the qualities of all buddhas, Physically, verbally, mentally, they are stable as a mountain. 
All the ten powers of enlightening beings, unshakable, They attain to, invulnerable to all demons. 
Empowered by buddhas, they are honored by the gods And always attended by thunderbolt-bearers. 
The virtues of those who have attained this stage are endless And could not be exhausted in a billion eons. 
Furthermore, they associate with millions of buddhas And become radiant as regal crowns. 
The enlightening beings who have attained this stage Become great Brahmas, lords of a thousand worlds, rich in virtue. 
Able to expound the three vehicles inexhaustibly, Their pure light of benevolence destroys the afflictions of the world. 
In a single instant they attain concentrations Numerous as atoms in a million world systems, steadfast, And see that many abodes of beings in the ten directions; And those with superior will go even beyond this. 
“This has been a summary of the eighth stage of enlightening beings, the details of which would take forever to tell.” When this stage had been explained, the Buddha’s power shook millions of lands, incalculable, unthinkable. 
Shining light emanated from the body of the All-Seer; the lands illumined by the light, the beings therein were enraptured. 
A thousand enlightening beings hovering in the sky presented the Buddha with gifts surpassing those of the gods. 
The gods of the higher heavens, ecstatic, honored the Ocean of Virtue with a variety of offerings. 
Then a thousand goddesses, thrilled, their senses all delighted, honored the Teacher with celestial song: 
These enlightening beings are all free from defects and defilement, Impeccably practicing whatever stage they are in; Considering the weal of the world, they go to all regions, Showing the way of the Victor, their minds equal to space. 
In the realms of humans, celestials, and dragon kings, The adornments in the ten directions are stamped with higher blessings; Greater still, incomparable, is what the enlightening beings show— They produce the jewels of the path of knowledge. 
In one land unmoving, detached in all lands, Reaching all worlds like the cool light of the moon, Their minds have ceased all thought of sound; Their utterances are like echoes from the mountains. 
To those who are weak-minded and prone to dejection They teach the practice of listeners. 
Those of keen mind inclined to analyze conditions They show the knowledge of the way of individual illuminates. 
Those who incline to benevolence, for the good of all, They show the practice of enlightening beings. 
To those of foremost wisdom They show the peerless body of Buddha. 
Like magicians performing magic, they show millions of different bodies For the benefit of sentient beings, all of them without real existence. 
Thus do enlightening beings, involved in the magic of knowledge, Show all practices, all without real existence. 
Having uttered these sweet words of what they’d heard, the goddesses, seeing the Buddha, became silent. 
“This assembly is calm and clear,” said Moon of Liberation; “speak of the practice beyond the eighth stage, of the kings of the true teaching.” Diamond Matrix said, “Enlightening beings who, by means of the mind which has thus reflected on the infinite possibilities of knowledge, are intent upon yet higher tranquillities and liberations, thinking of consummate attainment of yet higher enlightened knowledge, entering into the secret of the buddhas, ascertaining the greatness of inconceivable knowledge, purifying the ascertainment of spell-concentration, extending mystic knowledge, acting in accord with the differences in worlds, cultivating the insuperability of the powers, expertise, and unique qualities of buddhas, following the might of the turning of the wheel of Teaching of buddhas, not abandoning the attainment of empowerment of great compassion, thus come to the ninth stage of enlightening beings. 
“Enlightening beings in this stage of the Good Mind accurately know the performance of good, bad, and neutral things, the performance of mundane and transmundane things, the performance of conceivable and inconceivable things, the performance of tainted and untainted things, the performance of regular and irregular things, the performance of things listeners and individual illuminates do, the performance of things enlightening beings do, the performance of things pertaining to buddha-hood, and the performance of fabricated and unfabricated things—all these they know as they really are. 
“By means of this knowing awareness, they know accurately how all beings get into entanglement of mind, how they get into entanglement in afflictions, entanglement in acts, entanglement in senses, entanglement in resolutions, entanglement in dispositions, entanglement in inclinations and propensities, entanglement in birth, entanglement in the continuation of habit energies, and how they get into entanglement in the definition of what is beneficial, what is not beneficial, and what is neither beneficial nor unbeneficial—all this they know as it really is. 
“They also know the compartmentalization of mind of sentient beings—they accurately know their complexity of mind, the dissolution and nondissolution in instantaneous action of mind, the incorporeality of mind, the endless, ubiquitous all-pervasiveness of mind, the luminosity of mind, the defilement or nondefilement of mind, the bondage or liberation of mind, the creation by illusion of mind, the manifestation of mind according to the state of being; they accurately know hundreds of thousands of differences of mind. 
“They also know accurately how far-reaching afflictions are, the endlessness of their applications, their inseparable simultaneity, their being the sole cause of the appearance of propensities, their interconnection and disconnection with the mind, their appearance according to the state of being in the continuity of births, their distinction of being in the realm of desire, form, or formlessness, the great blameworthiness of pride stuck with craving ignorance and views, the continuity of the causality of physical, verbal, and mental actions; in sum, they accurately know the pervasiveness of activities of up to eighty-four thousand afflictions. 
“They also accurately know the goodness, badness, or neutrality of actions; whether they are evident or not; their inextricable coexistence with mind; their continuity of fruition through accumulation in spite of their own essence instantly disintegrating; whether or not they have developments; the variety of differences in rewards of pure, impure, and mixed actions; the infinity of the field of action; the difference in holiness and mundanity; how what is produced in the present state is experienced another time around; whether or not actions are a means of release; and whether or not they are sure—in sum, they accurately know as many as eighty-four thousand different aspects of action, as well as how to skillfully ascertain their differences. 
“They also know accurately the weakness, mediocrity, and strength of faculties; their disjunction or continuity past to future; their superiority, mediocrity, and inferiority; their inextricable coexistence with afflictions; whether or not they are vehicles of liberation, sure or unsure; their suitability for guidance, according to maturity or immaturity; their nature as grasping of appearances in the rapid disintegration repeated in the net of faculties; the invincibility of the overlordship of faculties; the difference in regressing and nonregressing faculties; their various differences of extent and concurrence—in sum, they accurately know as many as eighty-four thousand different aspects of faculties. 
“They also know the weakness, mediocrity, and strength of intentions; their disjunction or continuity past to future; their superiority, mediocrity, and inferiority; their coexistence with afflictions; whether they are vehicles of liberation, sure or not; their nature as grasping of appearances in the rapid disintegration repeated in the net of intentions; the invincibility of the overlordship of intent; the difference in regressing and nonregressing intent; differences in extent and concurrence—in sum, they know as many as eighty-four thousand various aspects of intent. 
“They also accurately know the weakness, mediocrity, or strength of dispositions; their disjunction or continuity past and future; their superiority, mediocrity, or inferiority; their concurrence with afflictions; their qualities of being vehicles of liberation or not, sure or not; the certainty or uncertainty of their maturation; their nature of being grasping of appearances in the swift dissolution repeated in the net of dispositions; the invincibility of overlordship of disposition; their persistence and differentiation; differences in extent and concurrence—in sum, they know accurately as many as eighty-four thousand different aspects of inclinations and thousands of various aspects of dispositions. 
“They also accurately know the weakness, mediocrity, or strength of wills; their disjunction or continuity past to future; their superiority, mediocrity, or inferiority; their concurrence with afflictions; their quality of being vehicles of liberation or not, sure or not; their certainty or uncertainty of maturity; their being grasping of appearances in the swift dissolution repeated in the net of wills; the invincibility of the overlord-ship of will; their persistence and variety; their extent and concurrence—they accurately know as many as eighty-four thousand different aspects of will as well as thousands of ways of thinking. 
“They know accurately how propensities are born together with intent and mind; their connection with mind; their disconnection, division, and extent; their never having been uprooted and cast out since beginningless time; their being incompatible with all meditations, liberations, concentrations, trances, and mystic knowledges; their binding of the continuity of existence in the world; their activity of binding the mind since beginningless time; their nature of manifestation of accretions in the realms of sense; their being something to be quelled; their presence or absence in the states of the stages of enlightening; their being extracted only by the path of sages—all this enlightening beings know accurately. 
“They also accurately know the variety of births; birth according to actions; the differentiation of hells, animal, ghost, and titan realms, humans and celestials; birth in the realms of form and formlessness; birth in realms with thought and without thought; the sprouting of future becoming from the field of action, the moisture of craving, the darkness of ignorance, and the seeds of consciousness; the concurrence of name and form; continuity due to ignorant craving for becoming; the beginninglessness and endlessness of desire for enjoyment, desire for existence, and the likes of sentient beings; and how birth is brought forth by grasping for things of the world—all this they know as it really is. 
“They also know whether or not habit energies are active; infusion by impressions according to involvements; habituation according to activities of beings; habituation according to acts, afflictions, and customs; habituation to good, bad, and neutral customs; habituation dominating future courses of existence; habituation gradually becoming dominant; habituation in which there persist aberrations producing long-lasting affliction; substantial and insubstantial habituation; and permeation by impressions of seeing and hearing Buddhist practitioners, individual illuminates, enlightening beings, and buddhas—all these they know as they are. 
“They also know accurately the correct stabilization, incorrect stabilization, and correct and incorrect stabilization of groups of people; their correct stabilization by correct views, their incorrect stabilization by incorrect views, their nonstabilization without either, their incorrect stabilization by one of the five hellish deeds that bring immediate consequence, their correct stabilization by the five religious faculties, their lack of stability without either, their incorrect stabilization in the eight deviations, their correct stabilization in the eightfold right path, their lack of further involvement with either, their indeterminacy without either, their incorrect stabilization on unrelenting envy, jealousy, and lack of sympathy, their stabilization in correctness of practice of the supreme Path of sages, and the indeterminacy of groups apart from both of these—they know all these as they really are. 
Enlightening beings who have attained such knowledge are said to be established in the ninth stage, Good Mind. 
“Enlightening beings in this stage of Good Mind, knowing the differences in sentient beings’ conduct, undertake to effect their liberation accordingly. 
They truly know the maturity of sentient beings as well as their discipline; they truly know the teachings of the vehicle of listeners, the teachings of the vehicle of individual illuminates, the teachings of the vehicle of enlightening beings, and the teachings of the stage of buddhahood. “Knowing all this, they expound teachings to beings so they may realize Thusness. 
They expound teachings according to differences in mental dispositions, according to differences in propensities, according to differences in faculties, according to differences in inclinations, through approaching knowledge according to differences in spheres of action, through proceeding according to knowledge of all spheres of action, through proceeding according to tendencies toward entanglement according to disposition, through adaptation to the afflictions, actions, and habits of the various states of being, through going along with the structures of groups, according to the application of whatever means by which liberation may be attained, by appearing in endless forms, by appearing in all worlds in ways congenial to the beings there, by knowing how to say everything, and by skill in ascertainment of all specific knowledge necessary for elucidation of the teachings. 
“Enlightening beings established in the stage of Good Mind act as preachers of the Teaching and preserve the treasury of teaching of the Enlightened. 
In these enlightening beings the unadulterated four special knowledges of enlightening beings are always operative. 
What are the four? 
They are the special knowledge of principles, of meanings, of expression, and of elocution. 
By the knowledge of principles they know the specific characteristics of principles; by knowledge of meanings they know the differentiations of principles; by knowledge of expression they know the unconfused teaching of principles; by knowledge of elocution they know the interrelated continuity of principles. 
“Also, by specific knowledge of principles they know the nonexistent body of things. 
By specific knowledge of meanings, they know the beginning and end of things. 
By specific knowledge of expression they expound the Teaching by means of interconnected representations of all things. 
By specific knowledge of elocution they can expound the Teaching boundlessly without destroying representations as they are. 
“Also, by specific knowledge of principles they know the present differentiation of things. 
By specific knowledge of meanings they know the past and future differentiation of things. 
By specific knowledge of expression they expound the Teaching without mixup of past, future, and present. 
By specific knowledge of elocution they expound the Teaching in each of the past, future, and present by the beginningless and endless light of truth. 
“Also, by specific knowledge of principles they know the variety of phenomena and principles. 
By specific knowledge of meanings they know the variety of meanings. 
By specific knowledge of expression they expound the Teaching according to the local language. 
By specific knowledge of elocution they expound the Teaching according to mental dispositions and knowledge. 
“Also, by specific knowledge of principles they know the skill of differentiation of direct knowledge of things without mixup. 
By specific knowledge of meanings they know the arrangement of suchness by inductive knowledge. 
By specific knowledge of expression they teach by demonstration of conventional knowledge without mixup. 
By knowledge of elocution they expound the Teaching by familiarity with knowledge of ultimate truth. 
“Also, by specific knowledge of principles, they know one indestructible principle in all things. 
By specific knowledge of meanings, they enter into realization of familiarity with the interdependent origination of matter and mind, senses, sense data, and sense consciousnesses, and the truths. 
By specific knowledge of expression they teach in words pleasing and easy to understand for all beings. 
By specific knowledge of elocution they teach by more and more endless illumination of the Teaching. 
“Also, by specific knowledge of principles they know the variety of entries into the One Vehicle. 
By specific knowledge of meanings they know the distinctions of different vehicles. 
By the specific knowledge of expression they teach without confusing all vehicles. 
By specific knowledge of elocution they teach each vehicle with endless illumination of principles. 
“Also, by the specific knowledge of principles they enter into action in accord with all practices of enlightening beings, practice of knowledge and practice of principles. 
By the specific knowledge of meanings they comprehend the differentiations of the teaching of the arrangement of the ten stages. 
By the specific knowledge of expressions they teach by presenting the path without confusion according to the stage. 
By specific knowledge of elocution they teach each stage in terms of its endless aspects. 
“Also, by the specific knowledge of principles they comprehend all buddhas’ attaining enlightenment in an instant. 
By specific knowledge of meaning they know accord with various differences in times, phenomena, and characteristics. 
By knowledge of expression they teach by different utterances according to attainment of correct enlightenment. 
By knowledge of elocution they expound each phrase of the Teaching continuously for endless eons. 
“Also, by knowledge of principle they know action in accord with all buddhas’ speech, powers, expertises, qualities of buddhahood, great compassion, analytic knowledge, application, teaching, and omniscient knowledge. 
By knowledge of meaning they know the eighty-four thousand utterances of buddhas according to sentient beings’ mental dispositions, faculties, and different inclinations. 
By knowledge of expression they teach the buddhas’ sayings according to the differences in actions of all beings. 
By knowledge of elocution they expound the Teaching by focus on the sphere of practice reflecting the knowledge of the enlightened. “The enlightening beings who are thus skillful in effectuation of the science of these specific analytic knowledges, having reached the ninth stage, having attained the treasury of teachings of the enlightened, acting as great preachers of the Teaching, come to attain the concentration spell containing meanings, the concentration spell containing principles, the concentration spell containing evocation of knowledge, the concentration spell containing illumination, the concentration spell of good intellect, the concentration spell containing treasures, the concentration spell containing vital energy, the concentration spell leading into nonattachment and nonobstruction, the concentration spell of infinity, and the concentration spell containing a store of various meanings. 
They attain countless millions of kinds of concentration spells filled by such spell formulae as these. They expound the Teaching by countless millions of skillfully adapted utterances and unlimited adaptive means of eloquent analysis. 
By means of these countless millions of concentration spells as doors of access, they listen to the Teaching directly from innumerable buddhas of the ten directions and, having heard the Teaching, do not forget it, and also expound it, with innumerable differentiations, as they have heard it. 
They completely learn teachings from one buddha through the mediums of countless millions of concentration spells, and as from one, so too from endless buddhas, by measure of their will, to a yet greater extent do they receive the light of the means of access to the Teaching, such as cannot be attained by the retentive power of greatly learned disciples who take up and hold what they learn, even in a hundred thousand eons. 
“Thus having attained mental command through concentration spells, having attained eloquence, sitting on the seat of teaching, they pervade a billion worlds and expound the Teaching to beings according to the differences in the mentalities of the beings. 
As they sit on the seat of teaching, their seat of teaching has immeasurably greater splendor than any except those of the buddhas and the enlightening beings who have reached the stage of coronation. 
Sitting on the seat of teaching, at will they make one utterance causing all congregations to perceive it as various different utterances. 
At will they convey knowledge by various different utterances and nuances. 
At will they draw forth ways of entry into the Teaching by emanating beams of light. 
At will they emit voices from all their pores. 
At will they bring forth voices of teaching from all forms manifest in the universe. 
At will they convey knowledge of all phenomena by means of one utterance. At will they make all sounds into the sound of the Teaching. 
At will they bring forth the voice of the Teaching from the song and music of all worldly realms. 
At will they draw forth all the different expressions of the Teaching from a single syllable. At will they draw forth untold ways of entry into the Teaching from each and every atom in the clusters of elements of earth, water, fire, and wind in untold worlds. “Even if the beings of a billion worlds were to come up, all at the same moment, and ask questions, each of them asking questions with countless nuances, each one asking a different question, the enlightening beings would take in every tone and nuance, and with a single utterance would satisfy all those beings’ minds. Even if the beings of untold worlds all came up in the same moment and asked questions, each with innumerable nuances, each different, the enlightening beings would take them all on instantly and edify them all with a single utterance. 
Sitting in discourse on the Teaching, receiving the empowerment of the buddhas, they simultaneously face all beings, doing the work of buddhahood. 
‘Even if on a single point there be buddhas as numerous as atoms in untold worlds teaching in the same immeasurable number of assemblies, each buddha teaching according to the differences of all those innumerable beings, presenting to each being’s disposition of mind an equally immeasurable number of teachings, and as one buddha does in one assembly, so also all buddhas, and as in one point so in all universes, there we should produce a memory of such enormous extent and receive the revelation of the Teaching at once from all the buddhas without missing a single word. 
We should purify the ability to express with certainty such revelation of wisdom as will instantly satisfy all the beings in the aforementioned assemblies, with their various groups, ways, and tendencies, as well as the beings in so many worlds.’ “Enlightening beings who have reached this stage of Good Mind, becoming all the more single-minded in their focus of attention, day and night, entering the sphere of buddhas, joining the company of buddhas, reach the profound liberation of enlightening beings. 
Enlightening beings acting in accord with such knowledge never stop the vision of buddhas in concentration—in each age seeing countless buddhas, they honor, respect, and venerate them. With immense vision of buddhas they ceaselessly attend them respectfully and ask the buddhas questions. They attain mental command of the Teaching and can expound it. “Those purified roots of goodness of enlightening beings become all the more beyond compare. 
Just as gold fashioned into ornaments, perfected by a skilled goldsmith and put on the head or neck of a universal monarch, cannot be outshone by the adornments of all minor kings and people of the four continents, in the same way the roots of goodness of enlightening beings in the stage of Good Mind, well arrayed by the light of great knowledge, are so purified that they cannot be outshone by all listeners, individual illuminates, and enlightening beings in lower stages. 
The light of their roots of goodness, shining on the mental tangles of afflictions of sentient beings, put an end to them. Just as great Brahmas of million-world systems illumine the thickets and lowlands in all worlds of the million-world system, in the same way does the light of roots of goodness of enlightening beings in this stage of Good Mind shine on the mental thickets of afflictions of sentient beings and put an end to them. 
Of the ten transcendent ways, transcendent power is predominant in these enlightening beings, while they practice the others as best they can. 
“This is a summary explanation of the ninth stage of enlightening beings, called Good Mind, the full details of which would take forever to tell. 
Most of the enlightening beings in this stage become great Brahmas of enormous power, lords of a million worlds, eminent, unsurpassed, seers of what is beneficial, masterful, able and strong in the exposition of the ways of transcendence of all listeners, individual illuminates, and enlightening beings, invincible in answering questions according to beings’ dispositions. Whatever actions they undertake, whether by giving, kind speech, beneficial action, or cooperation, it is never apart from thoughts of Buddha, the Teaching, the Community, enlightening beings, the practices of enlightening beings, the ways of transcendence, the stages, the powers, expertises, and unique qualities of Buddhas, and ultimately omniscience in all its aspects. Because they want to become the best of beings, unexcelled leaders and guides, and ultimately omniscient refuges. 
“With this desire they exert their energy, by which exertion of energy they attain in one instant as many concentrations as atoms in countless millions of buddha-lands, see as many buddhas as atoms in countless millions of buddha-lands and become aware of their power, shake as many worlds as atoms in countless millions of buddha-lands, go to as many buddha-lands as atoms in countless millions of buddha-lands, illumine as many lands as atoms in countless millions of buddha-lands, mature as many beings as atoms in countless millions of buddha-lands, abide for as many eons as atoms in countless millions of buddha-lands, penetrate as many eons past and future as atoms in countless millions of buddha-lands, ascertain as many ways of entry into the Teaching as atoms in countless millions of buddha-lands, and manifest as many bodies as atoms in countless millions of buddha-lands, manifesting each body accompanied by as many enlightening beings as atoms in countless millions of buddha-lands. 
Beyond that, enlightening beings with the power of vows perform, by the excellence of their vows, countless transformations, of the body, aura, mystic powers, vision, sphere of action, voice, conduct, adornment, power, resolution, and performances.” Then Diamond Matrix spoke these verses describing this stage: 
Contemplating with immeasurably powerful intellect, With very subtle knowledge, atom-splitting knowledge, Thus entering into the abode of the secret of buddhas, They reach the ninth stage, benefactors of the world. Their mental command and concentration are great, Their far-reaching mystic knowledge enters all lands. With certainty of knowledge and power, this is the abode of steadfastness of the conquerers— The wise with commitment and compassion enter this ninth stage. 
Those who have reached this stage, holders of buddhas’ treasury, Know what is good, what is bad, and what is neutral, What is tainted and worldly, and what is transcendent, What is conceivable and what is inconceivable. 
They examine what is certain and what is uncertain, And foster the practices accomplishing the Three Vehicles. Teachings of the stages, according to inclinations and conduct, They prepare and enter the world accordingly. With superior subtle intellect following such knowledge, They search out the mental tangles of sentient beings: They search out the various tangles of mind And comprehend who can be taught, what the end and the beginning are. 
They comprehend beginningless afflictions, in their interrelatedness of application, As well as the continuity of their courses through compulsive propensities, And in terms of the various differences in process of action, And the vanishing of effect with extinction of cause. 
They comprehend which faculties are weak, middling, and strong, And continuity between past and future: 
Inclinations of various kinds, and whether or not they are pure, They comprehend, all, eighty-four thousand. 
Worldly beings are developed into different dispositions, Gone into the tangles of afflictions and views, beginningless, endless, never cut off, Continually bound up with the mind Born together with and stuck to inclinations and propensities. 
Those inclinations and propensities are not real things, They have no location and are not apart from mind; Hard to know, unconquerable by the states of meditation, They can be cut off only by the diamond thunderbolt of the Path. 
Entering the variety of six courses of migration of life, Craving being the moisture, ignorance the shade, action the field, Consciousness the seeds, name and form the simultaneous sprouts— Thus do they see beings in the world, beginningless and endless. 
Those beings’ minds are full of the action of afflictions, according to patterns of habit— Apart from this they have no desire for further continuation of transmigration. 
The enlightening beings know who are stabilized in truth, in error, and indeterminate, Who are those sunk in views, and who are those with knowledge. 
With these reflections, stationed in this stage, Enlightening beings reveal the Teaching in different ways According to people’s dispositions, faculties, and inclinations, Versed in analytic knowledge, meanings, elocution, and expression. 
They are in the position of preachers of the Teaching, Like lions, like bulls, like majestic mountains; They shower the sweet rain of the elixir of immortality, Just as the water spirits fill the sea. 
Skilled in seeking out meanings, as well as the essence of things, Comprehending all expressions, they have mastered elocution; Having attained countless millions of decades of concentration spells, They hold the Teachings as the ocean holds the rain. 
Thus having attained concentration by purification through spells, They see thousands of buddhas in one instant; And having gained the treasure of the Teaching, they expound it, Reaching each and every sphere with its purifying sound. 
They set the various beings of the billion worlds Free by means of the three treasures, Satisfying all according to their faculties and dispositions, Like water spirits filling the ocean. 
With even greater virtue they exert their energy And think how there are, in a minute point, Unthinkable numbers of buddhas teaching, and various beings; Hearing the teachings, they hold them as the earth holds seeds. 
As many beings as there are in the ten directions, All sit in a single circle of assembly: 
Appearing to them all in a single instant, enlightening beings Will satisfy them all with a single utterance. Stationed here, masters of the Teaching, highest of humans and gods, They become children of buddhas, moving by the teachings: 
Day and night they are in the company of the buddhas, Established in profound tranquillity, firm in knowledge and liberation. 
They attend millions of buddhas And become purified, like the adornments of a monarch; Their light overcomes the obscurities of afflictions Like the light of Brahma illumining a million worlds. 
In this stage they become Brahma gods, imbued with virtue, And satisfy beings with the teachings of the Three Vehicles. 
What they undertake is for the benefit of all beings; Following enlightened knowledge, they attain virtue and knowledge. 
In a single instant they attain as many concentrations As atoms in immeasurable lands, steadfast: 
Seeing the buddhas of the ten directions, they hear the Teaching, And beyond that, by willpower, they work innumerable miracles. 
“Thus has been told the ninth stage of those contemplating great knowledge, profound, hard to see, subtle, the ninth stage of enlightening beings, called Good Mind.” Thus having heard of unsurpassed practice, millions of celestials of the Pure Abodes were delighted; they stood in the sky, their senses enraptured, and paid honor to the Buddha. 
Endless millions of enlightening beings hovering in the sky were gladdened; they burnt clouds of incense, incomparably delightful, destroying the afflictions of the world. 
The king of the heaven of power, pleased, was in the sky with a retinue of trillions, all respectfully showering vestments, beautiful, excellent, by the hundreds. 
Many goddesses, their senses delighted, honored the Buddha respectfully, playing trillions of musical instruments, uttering such words as these: The Buddha, sitting in one land, Appears reflected in all lands; Bodies of millions of varieties, pleasing, Pervade the reaches of the cosmos. 
From one hair of the Buddha light beams Emerge, annihilating the afflictions of the world; The elemental particles of the land may be counted, But the number of those light beams cannot be known. 
Sometimes they show buddhas imbued with supreme characteristics Turning the wheel of the highest teaching; Sometimes there appears the lord of humans, pure and calm, With his most excellent, unsurpassed conduct, in other lands. 
The Guide is seen in the abode of happiness, Dying there and so coming to earth, In the womb, thus in millions of lands, Or seen being born there in the land. 
The Guide, going forth for the sake of the world And becoming supremely enlightened, So turning the wheel of the Teaching, Is seen in millions of lands. 
Just as a magician versed in the arts of magic Shows many objects for people, So does the Teacher, versed in supreme knowledge, Show all bodies to people. 
Empty, quiescent, essentially signless, The nature of things is equal to space— The enlightened Teacher, by ultimate truth, Shows the exalted sphere of buddhas. 
As is the essence of the buddhas, So is that of sentient beings—found in the nature of things. Signs and signlessness are equal in that way— All things are ultimately signless. 
Those who seek enlightened knowledge Abandon assumptions, notions, imaginations; Aware that being and nonbeing are the same in essence, They will quickly become supreme human leaders. 
Having spoken thousands of such sweet words, the goddesses, looking at the Buddha, became silent and remained quiet. 
Knowing the assembly was settled, the fearless Moon of Liberation asked Diamond Matrix, the dauntless enlightening being, “Tell us, in order, all the characteristics, qualities, and sphere of those who come to the tenth stage, as well as their marks and miracles.” Diamond Matrix said, “Those enlightening beings who, having wisely reflected on the possibilities of knowledge up to the ninth stage, have made a thorough and discerning investigation, have thoroughly fulfilled pure practices, have gathered inexhaustible provisions, have acquired great stores of virtue and knowledge, have attained great, far-reaching compassion, are familiar with the distinctions and differentiations of worldly realms, have gone into the thickets of the realms of sentient beings, focus their perception and attention on approaching entry into the sphere of buddhas, and are intent on the powers, expertises, and other qualities of buddhahood, are said to have reached the stage of coronation with omniscience in all its aspects. 
“Furthermore, enlightening beings who accord with this knowledge and have reached the stage of coronation realize a concentration called undefiled, one called entry into the analysis of differentiations of the cosmos, one called array of adornments of the pinnacle of enlightenment, one called flower of lights of all appearances, one called oceanic container, one called oceanic plenitude, one called vast as space, once called ascertainment of the intrinsic essence of all things, one called adjusting to the mental behavior of all beings, and one called appearing in the presence of all buddhas. Beginning with these, they realize incalculable millions of concentrations. “They enter and emerge from all these concentrations, and, having attained skill in concentration, they experience all the effects of concentration. 
At the end of the incalculable millions of concentrations, one realizes a concentration of enlightening beings called bearing coronation by the special property of omniscient knowledge. 
At the moment one realizes this concentration, there appears an immeasurable lotus made of the finest jewels, as large as ten billion-world universes, inlaid with all kinds of jewels, beyond the range of all worlds, arisen from transmundane roots of goodness, existing in the realm of the essence of illusoriness, appearing based on the cosmos, beyond the range of the heavens, with a jewel stem, a pericarp of incomparable sandalwood, a fringe of huge emeralds, leaves of shining gold, its body flowering with innumerable rays of light, its interior filled with all the finest jewels, covered with a boundlessly vast net of jewels, surrounded by as many great jewel lotuses as atoms in ten billion-world universes. 
“The enlightening being, in a corresponding form, stands by and, immediately upon attainment of the concentration bearing coronation with the special qualities of omniscience, appears seated on the great jewel lotus. 
As soon as the enlightening being is seated on this great jewel lotus, as many enlightening beings as there are surrounding jewel lotuses come from the ten directions, circle that enlightening being, and sit on those great surrounding jewel lotuses, and each of them enter a million concentrations, while gazing on the central enlightening being. 
Immediately upon everyone’s entry into concentration, all worlds quake, all ills cease, all universes are pervaded with revealing light, all worlds are purified, the names of all buddha-lands are voiced, all enlightening beings of the same practice gather, all celestial and human music and song sound forth, all beings become blissful, the inconceivable honoring and attendance of all the perfectly enlightened ones commence, and the circles of all the buddhas are made known. 
“What is the reason for that? 
As soon as the enlightening being sits on this great jewel lotus, from the soles of the enlightening being’s feet emerge countless millions of light rays, which illumine the uninterrupted great hells in the ten directions and extinguish the torments of the beings in the hells. 
From the circles on the knees of the enlightening being emerge countless millions of light rays which illumine all the animal realms in the ten directions and extinguish the sufferings of all the animals. 
From the sphere of the navel emerge countless millions of rays of light which illumine all the ghost realms in the ten directions and extinguish all the pains of all the beings in the ghost realms. 
From the left and right sides of the enlightening being emerge countless millions of rays of light which illumine the humans in the ten directions and extinguish human sufferings. 
From both hands emerge countless millions of light rays which illumine the abodes of celestials and titans, extinguishing their pains. 
From the shoulders emerge countless millions of rays of light which illumine all those in the vehicle of listeners, followers of the elementary teachings in the ten directions, and present to them a way of entry into the light of the Teaching. 
From the back of the neck emerge countless millions of rays of light which illumine all the individually awakened ones in the ten directions and present to them a method for quiescent concentration. 
From the face emerge countless millions of light rays which illumine all the enlightening beings in the ten directions, from those who have just been inspired for the first time up to those who have reached the ninth stage, and present to them the principle of wisdom and skill in means. 
From the circle of hair between the brows of the enlightening being emerge countless millions of rays of light which shine on the abodes of demons in the ten directions and eclipse them, and then illumine the enlightening beings who have reached the stage of coronation and disappear into their bodies. 
From the top of the head emerge as many rays of light as atoms in countless millions of billion-world universes, illumining the sites of congregation of all buddhas throughout the reaches of the space of the cosmos, then circling the world to the right in ten ways, then stopping in the sky and forming a great circular network of lights, and then proceeding to make a great offering called ‘blazing light’ to all buddhas. That offering is such that the offerings of all enlightening beings from the first inspiration up to the ninth stage cannot compare even to the smallest fraction of it. 
“Furthermore, from that great circular network of lights there rain, in all universes in the ten directions, manifestations of flowers, incenses, garlands, perfumes, aromatic powders, robes, parasols, banners, pennants, clothing, ornaments, jewels, and more, all beyond the scope of all worlds, produced by the influence of stores of transmundane roots of goodness, complete in all their features and qualities, sustained by the inconceivable power of nirvana—rains of various arrays of great riches pour as from a great cloud on the places of assembly of each and every buddha. And whoever perceives those offerings becomes assured of perfect enlightenment. 
“Then the lights, having made these offerings, again illumine the circles of assembly of all buddhas, then circle the world to the right in ten ways, and disappear into the soles of the feet of those buddhas. 
Thence it is known to those buddhas and those enlightening beings that in this world, this realm, this place, the enlightening being following such a practice has reached the time of coronation. 
Then, from incalculable lands in the ten directions, enlightening beings up to the ninth stage come to that enlightening being, encircle the enlightening being, make great offerings, and, while gazing on that enlightening being, enter a million concentrations. 
“From the gloriously adorned thunderbolt symbols of well-being on the bodies of enlightening beings who have attained the stage of coronation emerges a great light ray called demon-conqueror, each ray accompanied by countless millions of light rays; having illumined the ten directions and shown countless miracles, the light rays again disappear into the enlightening beings’ thunderbolt symbols of well-being. 
As soon as those light rays of a hundred thousand higher qualities disappear, there appears an increase in the power and strength of the enlightening being. 
“Then there emerges from the circle of hair between the eyebrows of the buddhas beams of light called possessors of omniscient superknowledge, accompanied by countless light beams; illumining all worlds in the ten directions, circling the worlds in ten ways to the right, inspiring many hundreds of quadrillions of enlightening beings, causing all buddha-lands to quake in six ways, stopping all death and rebirth in bad conditions, eclipsing all abodes of demons, showing the settings of enlightenment of all buddhas, and illuminating all worlds throughout the cosmos to the furthest reaches of space, then returning again, circling all assemblies of enlightening beings to the right and manifesting an immense array, those beams of light disappear into the top of the enlightening being’s head. 
The accompanying light beams in the same way enter into the heads of the enlightening beings assembled around that enlightening being who has reached the tenth stage, whereupon they attain a million concentrations that they have never attained before. 
“At the same time as those light beams enter the enlightening being’s head, the enlightening being is said to be coronated; in the realm of perfectly completely enlightened ones, having fulfilled the ten powers, the enlightening being enters the ranks of the perfect buddhas. 
It is like the son of a universal ruler, the crown prince, borne by the principal wife, becoming imbued with the characteristics of a universal ruler: the universal ruler seats him on a magnificent golden elephant throne and, bringing water from the four seas, setting over the palace great arrays of flowers, incenses, lamps, garlands, perfumes, aromatic powders, cloths, parasols, banners, pennants, music and song, he takes the golden pitcher containing water from the four oceans and anoints the head of his son with the water, whereupon the son joins the ranks of the consecrated rulers. Then, when he has fulfilled the tenfold path of good action, he gains the name of universal ruler, the one who turns the wheel of the law. 
In the same way, as soon as the enlightening being is coronated by those blessed buddhas, the enlightening being is said to be anointed with great knowledge. And having fulfilled the ten powers by the anointment of complete buddhas, the enlightening being enters the ranks of the truly consummately enlightened ones. 
This is the enlightening being’s anointment, or coronation, with great knowledge, in quest of which the enlightening being undertakes many hundreds of thousands of difficult practices. Thus coronated, matured in immeasurable virtue and knowledge, the enlightening being is said to be established in the tenth stage, which is called Cloud of Teaching. 
“Enlightening beings in this stage have accurate knowledge of the totality of the realm of reality, the realm of desire, the realm of form, the formless realm, the realm of worlds, the realm of all beings, the realm of consciousness, the realms of the created and the uncreated, the realm of space, and the teaching of being and nonbeing; they have accurate knowledge of the totality of the realm of nirvana, and of afflictions created by views; they have accurate knowledge of the totality of the becoming and decay of worlds, of the practice of followers of the elementary Buddhist teachings, of the practice of individual illuminates, of the practice of enlightening beings, of the buddhas’ powers, expertises, unique qualities of buddhahood, and material and spiritual bodies, of omniscience in all its aspects, of demonstration of attainment of enlightenment and turning the wheel of teaching—in sum, they have accurate knowledge of accomplishment of all the different ways of access to truth. 
They also have accurate knowledge of the projection of the world, the projection of the cosmos, the projection of Buddhist followers, the projection of individual illuminates, the projection of enlightening beings, the projection of buddhas, and the feasibility or unfeasibility of all projections. 
“They also know the basis of all buddhas as it really is; they know, too, the basis of the Teaching, the basis of the Community, the basis of action, the basis of affliction, the basis of time, the basis of commitment, the basis of reverence, the basis of conduct, the basis of ages, and the basis of knowledge, all as they truly are. 
“Also, all knowledge of the buddhas entering into subtleties—knowledge of details of practice, of death in heaven and rebirth on earth, of birth, of leaving home, of attaining enlightenment, of miracles, of setting the wheel of the Teaching in motion, of preaching the truth, of the full details of the Teaching, of the support of the life span, of the manifestation of the body of glorified form, of the orderly guidance of all beings, of manifestation in all worlds, of observing the mental behavior of all beings, of observing past, present, and future in a single instant, of the entire past and future, of the totality of mental actions of beings in all their variety, of the inconceivable powers, expertises, and special qualities of the enlightened, of the ultimate nirvana of the buddhas, of the lasting of the true Teaching based on instruction—beginning with these, they accurately know all the incalculable knowledges of buddhas entering into subtleties. 
“They know all the secret matters of the buddhas, such as the secret of the body, the secret of speech, the secret of mind, the secret of consideration of right and wrong timing, the secret of giving enlightening beings predictions of enlightenment, the secret of taking care of sentient beings, the secret of encouragement and censure as means of guidance, the secret of impartiality in timely admonition and instruction, the secret of establishing a variety of vehicles of liberation, the secret of distinction of beings’ conduct and faculties, the secret of penetrating beings’ acts and deeds, the secret of distinction of enlightening beings’ practices and faculties, the secret of enlightenment through practice and realization of inherent power, the secret of the basis of realization of intrinsic essence, the secret of manifestation and liberation, the secret of attraction and expulsion, the secret of showing the attitudes of standing, walking, sitting, and reclining, the secret of provision of food and physical necessities, the secret of showing speech, silence, meditation, liberation, concentration, and attainment; they know all such secret matters of the buddhas as they really are. 
“They also accurately realize all the buddhas’ knowledges of the interpenetration of ages, such as one age as containing incalculable ages, incalculable ages as containing one age, calculable ages as containing incalculable ages, incalculable ages as containing calculable ages, a moment of thought as containing ages, ages as containing moments of thought, ages as containing nonages, nonages as containing ages, ages with buddhas as containing ages without buddhas, ages without buddhas as containing ages with buddhas, past ages as containing future and present ages, present ages as containing past and future ages, future ages as containing past and present ages, long ages as containing short ages, short ages as containing long ages, the containment of what is made of preceptions in all ages, the containment of ages in all that is made of perceptions. 
“They also accurately know all the complete buddhas’ penetrating knowledges, such as knowledge penetrating a point the size of a hairtip, knowledge penetrating atomic particles, knowledge penetrating realization of enlightenment in the body and land of a buddha, knowledge penetrating realization of enlightenment with the body and mind of a sentient being, knowledge penetrating the realization of enlightenment in all places, knowledge penetrating demonstration of preposterous actions, knowledge penetrating demonstration of conformist behavior, knowledge penetrating demonstration of unconventional behavior, knowledge penetrating demonstration of conceivable and inconceivable acts, acts that can be recognized by the world and acts that cannot be recognized, knowledge penetrating demonstration of acts that can be understood by buddhas’ disciples, acts that can be understood by self-enlightened people, acts that can be understood by enlightening beings, and acts that can be understood by buddhas. 
Just as such vast extent of knowledge of the buddhas is immeasurable, so also the penetrating knowledge of enlightening beings in this stage is infinite. 
“Furthermore, the enlightening beings following this stage attain the liberation of enlightening beings that is called inconceivable, and the liberations called unobstructed, pure discernment, all-sided illumination, treasury of realization of thusness, following the unhindered wheel, comprehending past, present, and future, matrix of the cosmos, radiance of the circle of liberation, and attainment of the realm of totality. 
Beginning with these, enlightening beings in the tenth stage attain countless hundreds of thousands of doors of liberation, and in the same way they attain hundreds of thousands of concentrations, mental controls, super-knowledges, and spiritual powers; they attain hundreds of thousands of lights of knowledge, mystical transformations, accomplishments of analytic knowledge, masteries of means and wisdom, floods of great compassion, and entries into the controlling powers of enlightening beings. 
“By means of intellect in accord with such knowledge, they become imbued with infinite ability to recollect anything. They are able to receive, take in, and hold infinite great revelations, clarifications, and clouds of teachings from the buddhas of the ten directions in a single instant. 
Just as no place on earth except the ocean can bear, can receive, can take in, can hold the great mass of water showered by the clouds of the oceanic water spirit, in the same way the entries into the mysteries of the buddhas—great revelations, great clarifications, great clouds of teachings—cannot be born, received, taken in, or held by all sentient beings, listeners, or self-enlightened ones, or even by enlightening beings from the first to the ninth stages. 
It is as the ocean bears, receives, takes in, and holds the great clouds of one water spirit, or two, or three, up to the innumerable great clouds of innumerable water spirits in a single moment, because of the immeasurable vast breadth of the ocean. 
In the same way, enlightening beings in this tenth stage, Cloud of Teaching, bear, receive, take in, and hold, in a single instant, immeasurable great revelations, clarifications, and clouds of great teachings from two, three, up to infinitely many buddhas. 
Thus this stage is called Cloud of Teaching.” The enlightening being Moon of Liberation said, “Is it possible to count how many buddhas the enlightening beings receive and hold the great revelations, clarifications, and clouds of teachings from in a single instant?” Diamond Matrix said, “It is not possible to give a numerical account of how many buddhas enlightening beings receive teachings from in a single instant. 
I will, however, make a simile. Suppose that in each of the ten directions, in worlds as numerous as atoms in untold quintillions of buddha-lands, and all the realms of beings found therein, there were one being with the mental command to retain whatever he heard, an attendant of buddhas, a great disciple, foremost of the holders of learning, and that being were endowed with such power of skill in learning. 
Now suppose all the beings in all those worlds were similarly endowed, and what was learned by each one was not learned by another. 
What do you think—would the learning ability of all those beings be immeasurable?” Moon of Liberation said, “Great, immeasurable would be the learning ability of those beings.” Diamond Matrix said, “I tell you, in an instant the enlightening beings in this stage of Cloud of Teaching bear, receive, take in, and hold from a buddha a great cloud of lights of revelation of teaching called ‘treasury of past, present, and future of the cosmos’—the aforementioned ability in learning cannot compare to the minutest fraction of this ability to hold the cloud of light of revelation of the teaching. 
And just as they receive this from one buddha, so also do they receive and hold the cloud of lights of revelation of great teaching called ‘treasury of the past, present, and future of the cosmos’ from as many buddhas as atoms in all the worlds of the ten directions, and from yet more, from infinite buddhas, all in a single instant. Hence this stage is called Cloud of Teaching. 
“Furthermore, enlightening beings in this stage, by the power of their own vows, cause great clouds of compassion to arise, manifesting the thunder of the great Teaching, flashing the lightning of mystic knowledge, science, and expertise, whipping up a great wind of radiance, covering all with a dense cloud of virtue and knowledge, showing a dense swirl of various bodies, uttering the proclamation of the great Teaching, routing the horde of demons; and, in one instant, throughout as many quadrillions of worlds as atoms in the worlds in the ten directions mentioned above, and throughout yet more worlds, incalculable hundreds of quadrillions of worlds, they show great rains of goodness-bearing elixir of immortality and settle and extinguish all the dust and flames of afflictions of beings produced by ignorance. 
Hence this stage is called Cloud of Teaching. 
“Furthermore, the enlightening beings in this stage of Cloud of Teaching manifest all the works of buddhas in one world, beginning with abiding in the heaven of satisfaction, then descending to earth, abiding in the womb, birth, leaving home, attaining enlightenment, being requested to teach, setting in motion the wheel of the Teaching, and the stage of great ultimate nirvana, manifesting these to beings according to their dispositions and capacities for being guided. 
Having attained such control of knowledge, with absolutely certain great knowledge and mystic knowledge, at will they show a defiled world as pure, show a pure world as defiled, show a narrow world as broad, show a broad world as narrow; in this way, by mystic power, they show magical transformations of all worlds—vast, measureless, minute, erroneous, deranged, inverted, upright, and so on. 
If they want they can put a whole world, including its peripheral mountains and seas, into a single atom, yet without expanding the atom or shrinking the world, displaying all functions therein. 
They put two, three, four, five, up to untold numbers of worlds into one atom, yet without expanding the atom, and still displaying all the functions in the worlds. 
At will they show in one world the arrays of two worlds or, as they wish, show the arrays of up to an untold number of worlds. 
As they wish, they show the array of one world in two worlds, or in up to an unspeakable number of worlds. 
As they wish they show in one world the beings in up to an unspeakable number of worlds yet without injuring or troubling those beings. 
As they wish they show the beings of one world in an unspeakable number of worlds, without injuring or disturbing the beings. 
As they wish they show the full array of a buddha-realm in a point the size of a hairtip; if they wish they show the full arrays of untold buddha-realms in one point. 
As they wish they instantly emanate as many bodies as atoms in untold worlds, manifest that many hands on each individual body, and make offerings to the buddhas of the ten directions with those hands; with each hand they sprinkle as many baskets of flowers on those buddhas as there are grains of sand in the Ganges River, and do likewise with fragrances, garlands, perfumes, aromatic powders, robes, parasols, banners, and pennants. 
They also manifest that many heads on each body, and manifest that many tongues in each head, telling of the glory of the buddhas. 
“In the arising of a thought they go throughout the ten directions, in each moment of thought causing the appearance of infinite sets of the process of attainment of enlightenment up to great ultimate nirvana. 
They also manifest infinite embodiments in all times, and also cause to appear in their own bodies the immeasurable arrays of qualities of lands of infinite buddhas. They also cause the appearance of all worlds becoming and disintegrating in their own bodies. 
They also emit all whirlwinds from a single pore, yet without hurting or troubling sentient beings. 
And, if they wish, they can make endless worlds a single body of water and set a great lotus thereon; the array of lights of that great lotus pervades endless worlds, showing therein the branches of the trees of enlightenment and all aspects of omniscience. 
“In their own bodies they manifest the lights of the ten directions, including the lusters of jewels, lightning, the lights of the sun and moon, and the lights of all deities of light. 
With each breath they shake endless worlds, yet without frightening the sentient beings therein. 
They also manifest the destruction by gales, fires, and floods in the ten directions. 
they manifest the body of Buddha in their own body; they manifest their own body in the body of Buddha; they manifest their own buddha-land in the body of Buddha; they manifest the body of Buddha in their own buddha-land. 
“Thus do enlightening beings in this stage of Cloud of Teaching show these and infinitely more magical transformations.” At that point it occurred to the enlightening beings in the assembly, as well as to the spirits, goblins, nymphs, titans, and various gods, “If the range of performances of mystical powers of enlightening beings is thus measureless, what must that of the buddhas be like?” Then Moon of Liberation, knowing what was going on in the minds of the congregation, said to Diamond Matrix, “This assembly is in doubt; show something of the miracles of enlightening beings to stop their doubts.” Then Diamond Matrix entered the concentration of enlightening beings called “revelation of the essence of the body of all buddha-lands,” whereupon all the beings in the assembly perceived themselves being within the body of the enlightening being Diamond Matrix, and there they perceived the formation of a buddha-land, the array of features within which could not be all told of in millions of eons. 
There the tree of enlightenment was as broad as a million billion-world universes, the lofty tops of its innumerable branches wide enough to fill ten million billion-world universes. 
On the terrace of enlightenment there was a broad lion seat, with characteristics corresponding to the tree, on which was seen a buddha named King with a Mind Endowed with All Mystic Knowledges, on the supreme place of enlightenment. Thus they saw such magnificent arrays of adornments as could not be all told in a million eons. 
Then, having displayed this great miracle, Diamond Matrix put all the enlightening beings, gods, dragons, goblins, nymphs, titans, fairies, and other creatures back in their respective places. At that point they all fell silent in unprecedented wonder and stood there looking at Diamond Matrix. 
Then Moon of Liberation said to Diamond Matrix, “The range of production of magnificent arrays of this well-nigh inconceivable concentration is most extraordinary—what is the name of this concentration?” Diamond Matrix said, “It is called ‘revelation of the essence of the body of all buddha-lands.’” Moon of Liberation said, “What is the arrangement of the sphere of action of this concentration?” Diamond Matrix said, “By successful cultivation of this concentration, enlightening beings can, at will, show in their own bodies as many buddha-lands as atoms in as many worlds as grains of sand in the Ganges River, and even more. 
You know, enlightening beings in the stage of Cloud of Teaching attain many hundreds of thousands of enlightening concentrations like this. 
Because of this, enlightening beings who have reached even the stage of ‘crown prince of the teaching’ and are established in the ninth stage, Good Mind, cannot know the body or physical action of enlightening beings in the tenth stage, cannot know their speech or verbal action, cannot know their mind or mental action, cannot know their spiritual powers, cannot know their observation of past, present, and future, cannot know their entry into the state of concentration, cannot know their sphere of knowledge, cannot know their liberation and freedom, cannot know their acts of emanation, mystical power, and radiance, cannot even know, to sum up, even the raising and lowering of their feet as they walk. 
This is how infinite the enlightening beings’ stage of Cloud of Teaching is. 
This is a brief summary explanation; the full details could never be all told.” Moon of Liberation said, “What is the entrance into the range of the sphere of buddhas like, if the realm and power of the practice of enlightening beings is so infinite?” Diamond Matrix said, “Your question seems to me like that of a man who picks up a few pebbles and says, ‘Which is bigger, the endless realms of the earth or these pebbles?’ How can you compare the state of enlightening beings to that of the buddhas, the completely enlightened, who have measureless knowledge? 
That which can be picked up off the ground by hand is small, while the rest of the earth is immeasurable: in the same way, even this Cloud of Teaching stage of enlightening beings would only be told to a small extent even if it were explained for countless eons—how much the more so of the stage of buddhahood! “I will now tell you about buddhahood, so you will know; and the buddhas stand before me to bear me witness. 
Suppose in each of the ten directions as many buddha-lands as atoms in infinite worlds were filled with enlightening beings who had reached this stage: the accomplishments of those enlightening beings effected over endless eons do not amount to the minutest fraction, do not compare at all, to the scope of one moment of knowledge of Buddha. 
Following this knowledge, enlightening beings, with body, speech, and mind not other than those of Buddha, do not abandon the power of concentration of enlightening beings, yet they visit and attend buddhas, and pay each one honor in all kinds of undertakings for endless eons. Because of their extensive service they receive from the buddhas the illumination of empowerment, and become all the more unfazed in answering questions as variegated as the cosmos, for millions and millions of eons. 
“Just as a great ornament, inlaid with great jewels, fashioned by a celestial craftsman, fastened on the head or neck of the king of the gods of controlling power, cannot be outshone by the ornaments of other gods or humans, in the same way the ornament of knowledge gained by enlightening beings in this tenth stage of Cloud of Teaching cannot be outshone by all sentient beings, Buddhist followers, solitary illuminates, or enlightening beings from the first to the ninth stages. 
The light of knowledge of the enlightening beings in this stage is conducive to the introduction of sentient beings into omniscience, and cannot be outshone by other lights of knowledge. 
Just as the light of the great lord god is beyond all realms of birth and delights the bodies of living beings, in the same way the light of enlightening beings in the stage of Cloud of Teaching cannot be eclipsed by all followers, solitary illuminates, and enlightening beings from the first to the ninth stages, and even ultimately leads beings to the state of omniscience. 
“Furthermore, enlightening beings following this knowledge are told by the buddhas knowledge of past, present, and future, knowledge of the differentiations of the cosmos, knowledge of pervasion of all worlds, knowledge of the power of the illumination of all worlds, thorough knowledge of all beings, lands, and phenomena, knowledge of the mental behaviors of all beings, knowledge of how to develop all beings to maturity according to the time, with impeccable discipline and skill in analytic knowledge of all things; in sum they are told infinite revelations of omniscient knowledge. In these enlightening beings the transcendent way of knowledge is paramount, while they practice the other transcendent ways according to their power and their lot. 
“This is a summary of the tenth stage of enlightening beings, called Cloud of Teaching; it would take forever to tell the full details. 
Most of the enlightening beings in this stage are great lord gods, capable, mighty in teaching beings the ways of transcendence of disciples, solitary illuminates, and enlightening beings, unfazed in answering questions on the differentiations of the cosmos. 
Whatever acts they undertake, whether through giving, or kind speech, or beneficial action, or cooperation, it is all never apart from thoughts of Buddha, the Teaching, the Community, enlightening beings, the practice of enlightening beings, the transcendent ways, the stages, the powers, expertises, and unique qualities of buddhahood, and ultimately of omniscience in all its aspects. 
Because they would become the best of beings, unexcelled leaders and guides, and ultimately omniscient refuges. Accordingly, they initiate such effort, by which burst of energy they instantly attain as many concentrations as atoms in ten quintillion unspeakable numbers of buddha-lands, see that many buddhas and realize their power, shake that many worlds, go to that many buddha-lands, illumine that many worlds, mature that many beings, abide for that many eons, penetrate that many eons past and future, ascertain that many ways of access to truth, and show that many bodies, each body surrounded by that many enlightening beings. 
Beyond that, enlightening beings with the power of vows perform, by the excellence of their vows, countless transformations of their bodies, auras, mystic powers, vision, spheres of action, voices, conduct, adornments, powers, resolutions, and performances.” Bequest These, in sum, are the stages of enlightening beings, the details of which would take forever to tell. 
Furthermore, these ten stages of enlightening beings are to be seen in accord with omniscience in all its aspects, as it gradually becomes manifest. It is like the water flowing from the lake Heatless; by four great river currents it suffices the continent, inexhaustible, ever increasing, benefiting infinite beings, and finally pours into the great ocean: that water from the very beginning is headed for the ocean. 
In the same way, the water of roots of goodness flowing from the great lake of the will for enlightenment, by the currents of four great vows and integrative methods of salvation, suffices all realms of beings, inexhaustible, ever increasing, benefiting infinite beings, and finally pours into the great ocean of complete omniscience: that water of roots of goodness from the very beginning is headed for the ocean of omniscience. 
Furthermore, those ten stages of enlightening beings are manifested based on enlightened knowledge. It is as the ten great mountains are manifested based on the earth. 
They are like the Snowy Mountains, Intoxicating with Fragrance Mountain, Crystal Mountain, Wizard Mountain, Yoke-Bearing Mountain, Horse Ear Mountain, Fish-Holding Mountain, the Circular Enclosure Mountains, Endowed with Brightness Mountain, and the polar mountain Wonderfully High. 
Just as the Snowy Mountains are mines of all kinds of medicinal plants, which may be collected without exhausting them, in the same way an enlightening being in the stage of Joy becomes a mine of all worldly poetry, writing, and the science of magic spells, which may be applied endlessly. 
Just as the mountain Intoxicating with Fragrance is a mine of all kinds of fragrances, whence all kinds of fragrances may be collected inexhaustibly, an enlightening being in the stage of Purity becomes a mine of the fragrance of all the ethical conduct of enlightening beings, whence the fragrance of all ethical conduct of enlightening beings may be collected inexhaustibly. 
Just as Crystal Mountain is a mine composed of pure jewels, from which all kinds of jewels may be taken inexhaustibly, in the same way an enlightening being in the stage of Refulgence becomes a mine of all worldly meditations, mystic knowledges, liberations, concentrations, and attainments, inexhaustible in answering questions about all meditations, mystic knowledges, liberations, concentrations, and attainments in the world. 
Just as Wizard Mountain is a pure jewel abode of wizards with five mystic knowledges, where there are countless such wizards, in the same way an enlightening being in the stage of Blazing becomes a mine of higher knowledges of penetration and explanation of all paths to liberation and paths that do not lead to liberation, inexhaustible in answering questions with higher knowledge of the disparity between liberative paths and nonliberative paths. 
Just as Yoke-Bearing Mountain is a pure jewel abode of spirits of great magical powers, where there are countless such spirits, in the same way an enlightening being in the stage Difficult to Conquer becomes a mine of mystic knowledges, spiritual powers, occult transformations, and miraculous effects, able to answer questions about these phenomena inexhaustibly. 
Just as Horse Ear Mountain is a pure jewel mine of all kinds of fruits, from which all kinds of fruits may be gathered inexhaustibly, an enlightening being in the stage of Presence becomes a mine of penetration and explanation of interdependent origination, inexhaustible in answering questions about realization of the fruits of Buddhist discipleship. 
Just as Fish-Holding Mountain is a pure jewel abode of all water spirits of great magical powers, where there are countless water spirits, similarly an enlightening being in the stage of Far-Going becomes a mine of teaching of means and wisdom, inexhaustible in answering questions about the realization of the fruits of individual illumination. 
Just as the Circular Enclosure Mountains are a pure jewel abode of those imbued with power, where there are countless powerful beings, similarly an enlightening being in the stage of Immovability becomes a mine of effects of powers of enlightening beings, inexhaustible in answering questions about the differentiations of worlds. 
Just as the mountain Endowed with Brightness is a pure jewel home of titans with great magical powers, where there are countless titans, similarly an enlightening being in the stage of Good Mind becomes a mine of application of knowledge of the becoming and passing away of all beings, inexhaustible in answering questions about the formation and disintegration of all worlds. 
Just as the mountain Wonderfully High is the pure jewel home of divinities of great power, where the divinities are countless, similarly an enlightening being in the stage of Cloud of Teaching becomes a mine of the powers, expertises, and unique qualities of buddhas, inexhaustible in answering questions about the manifestation of the works of buddhas. 
Just as these ten great mountains exist in the ocean and appear from the ocean, in the same way these ten stages of enlightening beings exist in omniscience and appear from omniscience. 
Just as an ocean undeniably counts as an ocean because of ten characteristics—that is, because of progressively becoming deeper, because of not lodging a corpse, because other waters lose their identity in the ocean, because of uniform flavor, because of containing many valuables, because its depths are hard to reach, because it is immeasurably vast, because it is the abode of giant creatures, because the tides do not exceed their bounds, and because it receives all the rains of the clouds without being filled—in the same way the practice of enlightening beings is undeniably counted as such because of ten characteristics: 
because of gradual deepening of accomplishment of vows, in the stage of Joy; because of not lodging the corpse of bad conduct, in the stage of Purity; because of relinquishment of worldly designations, in the stage of Refulgence; because of the uniform flavor of unbreakable pure faith in Buddha, in the stage of Blazing; because of innumerably many valuable accomplishments of works in the world by higher knowledge and expedient means, in the stage Difficult to Conquer; because of the hard-to-fathom profundity of examination of interdependent origination, in the stage of Presence; because of immeasurable vastness of skill in discernment, in the stage of Far-Going; because of being the abode of colossal displays of production of supernal manifestations, in the stage of Immovability; because of accurate comprehension of profound liberation and worldly actions without going over the boundary, in the stage of Good Mind; because of receiving the water of the great clouds of revelations of teachings of all buddhas without being sated, in the stage of Cloud of Teaching. 
When a great jewel, surpassing the ten classes of jewels, is picked up, fired by a skillful craftsman, well rounded, purified, well polished, skillfully pierced, strung on a precious thread, mounted above a banner on a jewel pole, emanates all kinds of light and becomes recognized by a king, then it serves as a basis for the gathering of all precious things by all beings. 
In the same way, when enlightening beings’ determination for omniscience, surpassing the ten religious groups, is aroused, fired by austerity, frugality, discipline, and training, well rounded by meditation and concentration and absorption, purified by the practices of the Path, polished by expedient means and higher knowledge, pierced by interdependent origination, strung on the variegated precious thread of means and wisdom, mounted atop a banner on a great jewel pole of spiritual power, emanates the light of knowledge of observation of the conduct of living beings, and arrives at coronation with enlightened knowledge by the Buddha; then it becomes a basis for all beings’ collection of the jewels of all Buddha works. 
Furthermore, this book on the way into the teaching of assembly of the practices of enlightening beings and accumulation of the qualities of omniscience cannot be heard by those who have not planted roots of goodness. 
The enlightening being Moon of Liberation said, “With how much virtue do they become imbued who hear the book on the way into the teaching of accumulation of the qualities of omniscience?” The enlightening being Diamond Matrix said, “As much as derives from omniscience, that much would the quantity of virtue be, owing to the objective embraced by the determination for omniscience. 
As much virtue as accrues from the objective embraced by determination for omniscience, that much virtue would be attained by turning to this teaching. None but enlightening beings can hear this book on the way into the teaching of accumulation of the qualities of omniscience, or devote themselves to it, or take to it, or take it up, or hold it, or preserve it, much less cultivate it, act on it, apply it, foster it, or attain it. Thus it is those who follow the way to omniscience that can preserve it, those who hear this book on the way to accumulate the qualities of omniscience, and, having heard it, devote themselves to it, preserve it, and apply it in practice.” Then, by the spiritual power of Buddha, and as a result of the natural order, the worlds of the ten directions, as many worlds as atoms in a hundred million buddha-lands, quaked in six ways, with eighteen characteristics—they trembled, trembled intensely, trembled everywhere intensely, shook, shook intensely, shook everywhere intensely, quaked, quaked intensely, quaked everywhere intensely, resounded, resounded intensely, resounded everywhere intensely, stirred, stirred intensely, stirred everywhere intensely, roared, roared intensely, roared everywhere intensely. 
By the power of Buddha, and by the natural order, celestial clouds of flowers and garlands, robes, parasols, jewels, ornaments, banners, and pennants showered. Also magnificent high celestial clouds of solar orb jewels rained, and magnificent high clouds of musical jewels and clouds of pure gold orbs showered, and celestial music and singing was heard. 
As in this world, in the heaven of control of others’ emanations, in the palace of the chief god, on the jewel mine seat this teaching was spoken, so it was also throughout all worlds in the ten directions. 
By the power of Buddha, and by the natural order, from the ten directions, from beyond as many worlds as atoms in a hundred million buddha-lands, there came and assembled as many enlightening beings as atoms in a hundred million buddha-lands; having arrived, pervading the ten directions, they said, “It is very good, Offspring of Buddha, how well you express the true nature of enlightening beings. 
We also have the same name, Diamond Matrix, and have come here from worlds called Diamond Splendor, from the presence of buddhas called Diamond Banner; in all of those worlds this teaching is also carried on, by the empowerment of the buddhas, in assemblies like this, with the same phrasing and expression driving at the same meaning, with no decrease or increase. We have come here as your witnesses by the power of the buddhas. Just as we have arrived in this world, so have we arrived at the jewel mine throne in the palace of the god king in the heaven of control of others’ emanations in the four continents of each and every world in the ten directions.” Then the enlightening being Diamond Matrix, having looked over the ten directions and the congregations everywhere, observing the cosmos, by way of praising the determination for omniscience, revealing the sphere of enlightening beings, purifying the power of practice, expounding the absorption of omniscience, removing all the defilements of the world, presenting omniscient knowledge, showing the crest of inconceivable knowledge, and revealing the qualities of enlightening beings, spoke these verses by the power of Buddha, describing the meaning of the stages: Listen to the excellent practices of enlightening beings, Who practice calmness and self-control, are tranquil and peaceful in mind, Who are like the sky, similar to space, Who have shed all defilement and abide in knowledge of the Way. 
Born is the will for enlightenment, equal to the Enlightened, In those refined by discipline and austerity, who have reached ultimate patience, Who act with modesty and dignity, born of virtue and knowledge, Who are broad-minded and intent on enlightened knowledge. 
To honor all the buddhas of past, present, and future, Purify all lands throughout space, Truly comprehend all truths and liberate beings, The will for enlightenment is born. 
Born is the will for enlightenment, for the weal of all beings, In those divorced from evil, whose conduct is pure, Who practice self-control, whose senses are calm and cool, Who have taken refuge in Buddha, intent on enlightening practice. 
Born is the will for enlightenment, for the benefit of all, In those who practice good, vessels of patience and coolness, Who know the flavor of virtue, have abandoned arrogance and insolence, With minds detached and pure, calm and cool. 
Initiating pure action, enduring with firmness and vigor, Human lions striving for the welfare of all people, Having conquered afflictions by persistence in virtue, In this state of mind the will for enlightenment is born. 
With well-concentrated minds, the darkness of delusion dissolved, Arrogance gone, they have abandoned defiled paths; Enjoying the bliss of peace, they have given up attachments to routine life— In this state of mind the will for enlightenment is born. 
Firm in means and intelligence to achieve liberation from the realms of being, Endowed with technique, science, and spiritual power to escape the force of evil, Seeking the qualities of buddhas, desirous of virtue, In this state of mind their will for enlightenment is born. 
This will be reiterated in sum, so listen; When the will for enlightenment is attained, those who practice giving Then, having reached Extreme Joy, will become lords of the land. 
There, protecting beings by providing what they require, Having established their own giving, they can get others to do so. 
Having settled all in enlightenment, they will have perfected giving; By following this principle they will arrive at discipline. 
Having achieved right conduct, they will become well behaved; Thence having reached Purity, they will become lords of four continents. 
Stationed there, protecting beings by stopping evil, Abiding in their own moral conduct, they can get others to do so too. 
Maintaining the practice of right forbearance, they will become good bearers of patience; Thence having reached Refulgence, they will become lords of the thirty-three heavens. 
There, protecting beings by stopping the courses of afflictions, Abiding in their own practice of forbearance, they can get others to do so too. 
Having settled all in enlightenment, they will have perfected patience; By maturation of this virtue, they will come to the practice of vigor. 
Having concentrated right energy, they will become good at maintaining vigor; Thence having reached Blazing, they will become lords of the heaven of timely portion. 
Stable in their own practice of vigor, they can exhort others as well; Having settled all in enlightenment, they will have perfected vigor. 
By the results of this virtue they will come to the practice of meditation; Having conquered all afflictions they will become stabilized in concentration. 
Having concentrated on right meditation, they will become skilled in concentration; Thence having reached the Difficult to Conquer, they will become lords of the heaven of the satisfied, There protecting beings by stopping wrong paths, Having established right teaching and fostered enlightenment by effort. 
Abiding in their own practice of meditation, they can urge others to do so too; Having established all in enlightenment, they will have perfected meditation. 
By the results of this virtue they will come to the practice of wisdom; Having conquered all demons, they will possess wisdom, higher knowledge, and spiritual power. 
Abiding in their own practice of wisdom, they can induce others to do so too; Having settled all in enlightenment, they will have perfected wisdom. 
By the results of this virtue they will practice right means; Having conquered all views, they will be skilled in right teaching. 
Abiding in their own skill in means, they will also exhort others; Having settled all in enlightenment, they will have perfected means. 
By the powers of this virtue they will come to good vows; Having conquered false views, they will be wise, having attained right insight. 
Settled in true enlightenment by a rightly resolved mind, Thence having attained Immovability, they will become Brahma lords of a thousand worlds, There protecting beings by teaching the Three Vehicles, Enlightening them by establishing them in comprehension of the world. 
Abiding by their own vows, they can also induce others; Having settled all in enlightenment, they will have perfected commitment. 
By the combined exertions of right power, they will overcome all those in error; Thence having attained Good Mind, they will become Great Brahmas, powerful. 
Steadfast in their own power, they can also induce others; Having settled all in enlightenment, they will have perfected power. 
Having attained right knowledge, they will be skilled in true teaching; Having thence reached Cloud of Teaching, they will become great lords, adept. 
There they will protect beings by enlightening them in all ways, Enlightening them by establishing them in highest omniscience. 
Stable in their own knowledge, they will also guide others; When they have settled all in enlightenment, they will have perfected knowledge. 
By the powers of this virtue, they will be victors, lords of the ten powers, Imbued with all virtues, omniscient, in the course of nature. 
Having contemplated this, the noble should practice with concentrated minds, To attain the state of perfect enlightenment, having fulfilled the ten ways of transcendence. 
Thus having attained enlightenment and liberation, and conquered the four demons, Having settled all in enlightenment, you will attain perfect peace. 
“This has been a summary exposition of the ten stages of enlightening beings, to be seen in accord with omniscience complete in all aspects.” At that point the billion-world universe quaked in six ways, all kinds of flowers rained steadily, celestial and human music played, and the intoxicating sound was heard to the very summit of existence. 
To put it succinctly, if the Buddha were to remain alive for an eon expounding the glories of this teaching day and night, neither would the glory of this teaching be ended nor would the eloquence of the Buddha be exhausted. 
their virtue also has no end.” Then the Buddha, to again make the bequest of this teaching, spoke these verses: 
Whoever wants to honor the buddhas, Or individual illuminates or Buddhist disciples, Should rouse firm determination for enlightenment And always give this lofty scripture. 
For this is the king of all good messages; It has emerged from all the buddhas. The Buddha is in the house Where this scripture-jewel is placed. 
Supreme is that one among guides of humanity; No being can be found like this one; Having heard and accomplished this teaching, One will be inexhaustible as the ocean. 
The Ten Concentrations He was with as many great enlightening beings as atoms in ten buddha-lands, all of whom were of the rank of coronation, had fulfilled enlightening practices as measureless and boundless as the cosmos, and had attained the enlightening beings’ concentration state of universal vision. 
By their wisdom they profoundly penetrated and expounded the truth and were endowed with universal knowledge. 
Their names were Indestructible Knowedge, Peerless Knowledge, Knowledge of Meanings and Expressions, Supreme Knowledge, Eternally Equanimous Knowledge, Dragon Knowledge, Consummate Knowledge, Well-Tuned Knowledge, Immensely Powerful Knowledge, Inconceivable Knowledge, Unhindered Knowledge, Masterful Knowledge, Knowledge of Universal Service, Rational Knowledge, Adaptable Knowledge, Knowledge Mastering All Teachings, Knowledge of Truth, Dispassionate Knowledge, Spacelike Knowledge, Knowledge of Unity, Good Knowledge, Knowledge of Illusoriness, Vast Knowledge, Forceful Knowledge, Worldly Knowledge, Knowledge of Buddhahood, True Knowledge, Holy Knowledge, Illuminate Knowledge, Boundless Knowledge, Adorned with Mindfulness, Arrived at the Limit of Space, Natural Adornments, Most Profound Realm, Comprehending What Is So and What Is Not, Great Light, Eternal Light, Understanding the Seed of Buddhahood, Mind King, One Practice, Always Manifesting Spiritual Powers, Sprouts of Wisdom, Abode of Virtues, Lamp of Truth, Illumining the World, Sustaining the World, Most Serene, Supreme, Unexcelled, Incomparable, Peerless, Unhindered Action, Flames of Light, Moonlight, One Atom, Steadfast Practice, Showering the Rain of True Teaching, Supreme Banner, Universal Adornment, Eye of Wisdom, Objective Eye, Cloud of Wisdom, Spellbinding King, Nondwelling Vows, Mine of Knowledge, Mind King, Inner Awareness, Abiding in Enlightened Knowledge, Forceful Power of Spells, Earth-Sustaining Power, Beautiful Moon, Peak of the Polar Mountain, Jewel Summit, Universal Illumination, Charismatic King, Wheel of Knowledge, Great Power, Dragonlike, Straightforward Action, Nonregressive, Holding the Banner of the Teaching, Unforgetting, Caring for All Beings, Inconceivable Certain Knowledge, Freely Unbounded Knowledge, Inexhaustible Treasury of Wonderful Teachings, Sun of Knowledge, Sun of Truth, Treasury of Knowledge, Luster of Knowledge, Universal Vision, True Vision, Diamond Insight, Diamond Knowledge, Diamond Flame, Diamond Wisdom, Universal Eye, Sun of Buddhahood, Holding the Indestructible Secret Meaning of the Buddha, Adornments of Knowledge of the Sphere of the Universal Eye, and so on; there were as many such enlightening beings as atoms in ten buddha-lands, who had all cultivated the same practices of roots of goodness of enlightening beings with Vairocana Buddha in the past. 
The enlightening being Universally Good is now here, already capable of freely accomplishing inconceivable spiritual effects, beyond those of all enlightening beings, rarely encountered, born of immeasurable enlightening practices. 
They saw countless buddhas before them, attained the power of the enlightened, and, of the same nature as the enlightened, they clearly perceived all the past, future, and present. 
This was because of the support of the awesome power of the Enlightened, and also Universally Good’s command of mystic power caused it to be so. 
Universally Good has attained boundless aspects of knowledge, entered the ‘lion emergence’ concentration, attained unexcelled freedom of action, entered pure nonobstruction, and developed the ten powers of the enlightened: 
his body is the matrix of the cosmos, on which all enlightened ones concentrate together. 
In an instant he can thoroughly realize and enter the unfragmented knowledge of the buddhas of all times. 
This is why you cannot see him.” Then Universal Eye, hearing the Buddha speak of the pure qualities of Universally Good, attained ten thousand infinities of concentrations. 
Know that this is all because of the enlightening being Universally Good’s power of abiding in inconceivable liberation. 
Because the realm of Universally Good is extremely profound, inconceivable, without measure, beyond measure. 
To sum it up, the enlightening being Universally Good, by means of adamantine wisdom, pervades the cosmos of realities, yet does not course in any world or dwell anywhere—he knows that the bodies of all beings are not bodies, and have no coming or going. 
He has attained inexhaustible, undivided, free spiritual powers, independent, uncontrived, inactive, reaching the ultimate bounds of the cosmos. 
“These ten great concentrations the great enlightening beings can skillfully enter; all the buddhas of past, future, and present have expounded, will expound, and are expounding them. 
They draw near all the buddhas of all times and clearly see all the buddhas’ teachings; they skillfully explain all words and comprehend all provisional names. 
In a single instant they attain all knowledge of past, present, and future, and know all things in all times. 
They expound all the buddhas’ teachings and turn all the irreversible wheels. 
In each age, past, future, and present, they realize all paths to enlightenment, and in each enlightenment comprehend what all the buddhas say. 
“If enlightening beings enter these concentrations, they attain cosmic power that has no end; they are enabled to travel through space without hindrance; they attain the rank of spiritual sovereignty, with immeasurable independence and command, like being coronated and enthroned in the world; they attain boundless knowledge comprehending all; they attain vast powers, ten kinds perfectly fulfilled; they develop noncontentious hearts and enter dispassionate tranquillity; they are compassionate and fearless as lions; they are heroes of knowledge and wisdom and light the bright lamp of truth. 
All their merits and virtues cannot be fully told of—no hearers of self-enlightened ones can conceive of them. 
They skillfully open up various different gates of teaching, yet by means of wisdom they know that nothing exists. 
They are expert at knowing proper timing and always carry out the giving of teaching to enlighten everyone. 
Entering the realm of means of universal knowledge, they manifest various great spiritual powers. 
Therefore, Universally Good, you should now analyze and expound the ten great concentrations of all enlightening beings. 
Here the enlightening beings have ten kinds of inexhaustible qualities: 
These are called the ten inexhaustible qualities of great enlightening beings. 
“These great enlightening beings awaken ten kinds of boundless will: 
“These enlightening beings have ten kinds of knowledge of differentiation of entry into concentration: 
“These enlightening beings have ten kinds of knowledge of skills in entry into great concentration: 
yet the physical manifestations are neither one nor many, and not mixed up in entry into concentration or emergence from concentration. 
It is like the case of the titan king Rahula, whose original body is seven hundred leagues tall, while his transformed body is 168,000 leagues tall; the half of his body emerging from the ocean is just level with the polar mountain Sumeru. 
Though that titan king transforms his body into a colossus, that does not destroy his original form—all the psychophysical elements are the same, his mind is not disturbed, he does not think of his transformed body as other or of his original body as not himself. 
The body he was born with is always blissful, and his transformed body is always manifesting all kinds of miraculous powers. 
The titan king has greed, ill-will, and delusion, and is full of pride and conceit, and yet is able to transform his body in this way—how much the more so the enlightening beings who profoundly realize that mental states are like illusions, that all beings are like dreams, that the appearance in the world of all buddhas is like reflected images, that all worlds are like magical productions, that all speech is like echoes: 
they see reality as is and have reality as their body, knowing all things are inherently pure, realizing that the body and mind have no real substance; their bodies are omnipresent in infinite realms and by the great light of buddha-knowledge purify and practice all the deeds of enlightening beings. 
“Enlightening beings in this concentration transcend the world and are detached from the world; nothing can disturb them or overpower them. 
This is called the great enlightening beings’ practical knowledge of the first great concentration, of universal light. 
“What is the great enlightening beings’ concentration of subtle light? 
Here enlightening beings can enter as many billion-world universes as there are atoms in a billion-world universe, and in each world manifest as many bodies as atoms in a billion-world universe, each body emitting as many lights as atoms in a billion-world universe, each light revealing as many colors as atoms in a billion-world universe, each color lighting as many worlds as atoms in a billion-world universe, in each world pacifying as many beings as atoms in a billion-world universe. The enlightening beings know all the various dissimilarities of these worlds: that is, the clutter and pollution of worlds, the purity and cleanness of worlds, the causes of worlds, the structures of worlds, the concomitants of worlds, the colors of lights of worlds, the comings and goings of worlds—the enlightening beings know all these and enter all these, and these worlds also enter the bodies of the enlightening beings, yet the worlds have no mixup or confusion and the various phenomena do not disintegrate or vanish either. “It is like when the sun comes out and circles the polar mountain, illumining the mountains made of seven precious substances: 
So it is also with enlightening beings in this vast concentration of subtle light: 
The multiplicity of the worlds does not destroy this one world, and the singleness of this world does not destroy the multiplicity of those worlds. Because enlightening beings know all phenomena are selfless, they are said to have penetrated the principle of lifelessness and noncreation. 
“It is like a magician in a given place practicing the arts of illusion: 
he does not destroy his actual place by the illusory place, and does not destroy the actual day by the illusory day. 
knowing phenomena are illusory, they know knowledge is illusory; because they know knowledge is illusory, they know action is illusory. 
Living in the world is also living in emptiness. 
Great enlightening beings are able to perceive and cultivate the various different adorning activities of all worlds within emptiness. In a single instant they are able to know countless worlds, becoming or decaying, and also know the continuity and succession of all ages. They are able to manifest countless ages in a single instant without enlarging the instant. “Great enlightening beings attain the illusion knowledge of inconceivable liberation, arrive at the other shore, abide in the realm of illusion, and enter the illusions of the world. 
This is the knowledge of the skill of the enlightening beings’ second great concentration, of subtle light. 
It is like, for example, the sun going around giving light, never stopping day or night; the emergence of the sun is called day and the disappearance of the sun is called night—it is not born with the day and does not perish at night. In the same way the great enlightening being enters concentration of spiritual power in countless worlds, and having entered concentration, clearly sees those countless worlds. This is called the technical knowledge of the third great concentration of great enlightening being, the great concentration of spiritual power successively traveling to buddha-lands. “What is great enlightening beings’ concentration of action of the pure profound mind? 
To all those buddhas they offer all kinds of fine fragrances, all kinds of beautiful flowers, all kinds of canopies, vast as countless buddha-lands, all kinds of exquisite adornments surpassing those of all worlds, all kinds of precious substances, parks arrayed with all kinds of embellishments, treasuries of countless jewels, food and drink produced by enlightened spiritual power, surpassing that of all the heavens in flavor, and all the various superb offerings in all buddha-lands, which they are able to gather by spiritual power. 
To each of those buddhas they pay utmost respect and honor, prostrating themselves on the ground and asking for the Buddha’s teaching, praising the impartiality of Buddha, extolling the magnificent virtues of the buddhas. They enter the great compassion that all buddhas enter, attain the unhindered power that is equal in all buddhas, and in a single instant seek the wondrous teaching from all buddhas. Yet they do not apprehend, in regard to those buddhas, such signs as appearance in the world or entry into ultimate nirvana. Just as the scattered, stirring mind, distinguishing objects, does not know what the conditions of mind’s arousal and quiescence are, in the same way, these great enlightening beings do not discriminate the characteristics of the appearance and nirvana of buddhas. 
Similarly the great enlightening beings do not apprehend forms of the buddhas emerging in the world or entering nirvana: 
The great enlightening being, after having entered this concentration, emerges without forgetting, like someone awakening from sleep remembering what he has dreamed—even though when one is awake the dream scenes are not there, still one can remember them. 
In the same way the great enlightening beings enter this concentration, see buddhas and hear teachings, then arise from concentration, yet remember it all and use these teachings to enlighten all communities at enlightenment sites, and adorn all buddha-lands; they clearly comprehend all the immeasurable meanings and intentions, and all the means of teaching are also purified. They light the torch of great wisdom and perpetuate the seed of buddhahood. Their freedom from hesitation is complete, and their powers of elucidation are inexhaustible; they reveal and expound the treasury of the most profound Teaching. 
This is the technical knowledge of the fourth great concentration of great enlightening beings, the concentration of action of the pure, profound mind. “What is great enlightening beings’ concentration of knowledge of the stores of adornments of the past? Here great enlightening beings are able to know the manifestations of the buddhas of the past. That is, within the order of eons, the order of lands; within the order of lands, the order of eons; within the order of eons, the order of buddhas’ appearances; within the order of buddhas’ appearances, the order of teaching; within the order of teaching, the order of inclinations; within the order of inclinations, the order of faculties; within the order of faculties, the order of training; within the order of training, the order of life spans of Buddhas; within the order of life spans, they know the order of numbers of trillions of years. 
“Because these great enlightening beings gain such boundless knowledge of order, they therefore know the past buddhas, therefore know past lands, therefore know past teachings, therefore know past ages, therefore know past phenomena, therefore know past minds, therefore know past understandings, therefore know past beings, therefore know past afflictions, therefore know past manners, therefore know past purities. 
When those great enlightening beings enter this concentration, they do not annihilate the present or focus on the past. 
“When those great enlightening beings emerge from this concentration, they receive ten kinds of inconceivable anointment from the Enlightened, and also attain, purify, consummate, enter, realize, fulfill, and hold them, comprehending them equally, the three spheres pure. 
One, explanation not violating meaning; two, inexhaustibility of teaching; three, impeccable expression; four, endless eloquence; five, freedom from hesitation; six, truthfulness of speech; seven, the trust of the community; eight, liberating those in the triple world; nine, supreme excellence of roots of goodness; ten, command of the wondrous Teaching. 
These are the ten anointments. 
This is called the technical knowledge of the great enlightening beings’ fifth great concentration, the concentration of knowledge of the stores of adornments of the past. 
“Once great enlightening beings are in this concentration, they skillfully live in untold numbers of ages and lands; they skillfully know untold numbers of various sentient beings; they skillfully know untold numbers of different characteristics of sentient beings; they skillfully know untold numbers of similar and different consequences of action; they skillfully know untold numbers of practices differentiated by vigor, faculties, habit energies, and continuity; they skillfully know untold numbers of various tainted and pure contemplations; they skillfully know untold numbers of various meanings of teachings and innumerable written and verbal expressions; they skillfully know untold numbers of various buddhas’ appearances, families, times, manifestations, teachings, actions, buddha-works, and entries into ultimate final nirvana; they skillfully know untold numbers of boundless doors of wisdom and knowledge; they skillfully know untold numbers of the boundless different manifestations of all spiritual powers. “It is as when the sun comes out, all the villages and towns, mansions and houses, mountains, marshes, birds and beasts, trees, forests, flowers and fruits, and so on, can be clearly seen by all people with vision; the light of the sun is impartial and has no discrimination, yet can cause the eye to see all kinds of forms. This concentration is also like this: it is in essence impartial, without any discrimination, yet can cause enlightening beings to know countless numbers of different characteristics. 
one, fruitful seeing, because of causing sentient beings to develop roots of goodness; two, fruitful hearing, causing sentient beings to gain maturity; three, fruitful association, causing sentient beings’ minds to be pacified; four, fruitful aspiration, causing sentient beings to do as they say and master the meanings of all the teachings; five, fruitful action, causing boundless worlds to be purified; six, fruitful companionship, cutting off countless beings’ doubts in the presence of the buddhas of countless worlds; seven, fruitful vows, causing whatever sentient beings are thought of to make excellent offerings and accomplish undertakings; eight, fruitful skillful methods, causing all to be able to abide in pure knowledge of unobstructed liberation; nine, fruitful showering of the rain of Teaching, expediently revealing the practice of universal knowledge to countless beings of various faculties and causing them to abide in the path of buddhahood; ten, fruitful appearance, manifesting boundless forms, causing all sentient beings to be bathed in illumination. 
They can successively enter all these worlds and see the buddhas emerging in the world, and also see all the spiritual powers of those buddhas, and can also see all the feats of those buddhas, and can also see the immense charisma of those buddhas, and also see the supreme freedom of those buddhas, and also see the great lion roar of those buddhas, and also see the practices cultivated by the buddhas, and also see the various adornments of the buddhas, and also see the psychic projections of the buddhas, and also see the vast congregation of those buddhas, the unity of the congregations, the multiplicity of congregations, the locations of the congregations, the abodes of the congregations, the development of the congregations, the training of the congregations, the dignity of the congregations—all this they clearly see. 
The great enlightening beings also see themselves in those congregations, and see themselves preaching there, and see themselves receiving the words of the buddhas, and see themselves comprehending interdependent origination, and see themselves poised in the air, and see themselves in the reality-body, and see themselves not producing attachments, and see themselves not dwelling on discrimination, and see themselves being indefatigable, and see themselves entering into all knowledge, and see themselves knowing all meanings, and see themselves entering all stages, and see themselves entering all states of being, and see themselves knowing all expedient means of liberation, and see themselves in the presence of the buddhas, and see themselves entering all the powers of enlightenment, and see themselves entering True Thusness, and see themselves entering noncontention, and see themselves entering all truths. 
When they see in this way, they do not discriminate lands, beings, buddhas, or phenomena; they do not cling to the body, to physical actions, to the mind, or to the intellect. 
They also see the buddhas’ embodiments without attachment, without obstruction, supremely pure. 
in a worm hole in a seed it is not diminished, and in countless worlds it is not expanded. 
So it is with the bodies of the buddhas: 
“Great enlightening beings in this concentration develop ten kinds of rapidity: 
“Enlightening beings in this concentration also gain ten kinds of extremely pure bodies of power: one, emitting unspeakably unspeakable numbers of light spheres to illumine unspeakably unspeakable numbers of worlds; two, emitting unspeakably unspeakable numbers of spheres of light of infinite colors to purify all worlds; three, emitting unspeakably unspeakable numbers of light spheres to pacify living beings; four, emanating unspeakably unspeakable numbers of bodies to be near to all the buddhas; five, raining unspeakably unspeakable numbers of clouds of flowers of various wonderful scents to present to all buddhas; six, magically producing unspeakably unspeakable numbers of various kinds of infinitely free miraculous effects to develop and mature sentient beings; eight, crossing unspeakably unspeakable numbers of worlds in a single step in order to ask to hear the Teaching from all the variously named buddhas of the ten directions; nine, showing a body of immeasurably various forms, the crown of which none can see, so that all who see or hear of it will not have done so in vain; ten, uttering unspeakably unspeakable numbers of words to reveal countless secret truths to sentient beings. “Once enlightening beings gain these ten kinds of extremely pure body of power, they can cause sentient beings to attain ten kinds of fulfillment: one, they can enable sentient beings to see Buddha; two, they can induce sentient beings to deeply believe in Buddha; three, they can induce sentient beings to listen to the Teaching; four, they can cause sentient beings to know there is a world of buddhahood; five, they can cause sentient beings to perceive the miracles of Buddha; six, they can cause sentient beings to recollect accumulated deeds; seven, they can cause sentient beings to perfect concentration; eight, they can introduce sentient beings into the purity of buddhahood; nine, they can induce sentient beings to aspire to enlightenment; ten, they can enable sentient beings to fulfill enlightened knowledge. 
They enter this concentration internally and emerge externally; entering externally, they emerge internally; entering in the same body, they emerge in a different body; entering in a different body, they emerge in the same body; entering in a human body, they emerge in a yaksha body; entering in a yaksha body, they emerge in a human body; entering in a dragon body, they emerge in a titan body; entering in a titan body, they emerge in a celestial body; entering in a celestial body, they emerge in a Brahma-king body; entering in a Brahma-king body, they emerge in a desire-realm body; entering in a heaven, they emerge in a hell; entering in a hell, they emerge in the human world; entering in the human world, they emerge in other realms of being; they enter in a thousand bodies and emerge in one body; entering in one body, they emerge in a thousand bodies; entering in a hundred billion bodies, they emerge in one body; entering in one body, they emerge in a hundred billion bodies; entering among people of the south, they emerge among people of the west; entering among people of the west, they emerge among people of the north; entering among people of the north, they emerge among people of the east; entering among people of the east, they emerge among people of three continents; entering among people of three continents, they emerge among people of four continents; entering among people of four continents, they emerge among the different creatures of all seas; entering among different creatures of all seas, they emerge among the spirits of all seas; entering among the spirits of all seas, they emerge in the water element of all seas; entering in the water element of all seas, they emerge in the earth element of all seas; entering in the earth element of all seas, they emerge in the fire element of all seas; entering in the fire element of all seas, they emerge in the air element of all seas; entering in the air element of all seas, they emerge in all four gross elements; entering in all four gross elements, they emerge in the truth of nonorigination; entering in the truth of nonorigination, they emerge on the polar mountain; entering on the polar mountain, they emerge on the mountain of seven precious substances; entering on the mountain of seven precious substances, they emerge on the black mountain of various crops and forests of all soils; entering on the black mountain of various crops and forests of all soils, they emerge in precious arrays of all flowers of sublime fragrances; entering in precious arrays of all flowers of sublime fragrances, they emerge in the incarnations of all beings of the four quarters, the zenith and nadir; entering in the incarnations of all beings of the four quarters, the zenith and nadir, they emerge in the beings of the solar system; entering in the beings of the solar system, they emerge in beings of the galaxy; entering in the beings of the galaxy, they emerge in the beings of the universe; entering in the beings of the universe, they emerge in the beings of a hundred thousand hundred billion universes; entering in the beings of a hundred thousand hundred billion universes, they emerge in the beings of countless worlds; entering in the beings of countless worlds, they emerge in the beings of measureless worlds; entering in the beings of measureless worlds, they emerge in the beings of boundless buddha-lands; entering in the beings of boundless buddha-lands, they emerge in the beings of incomparable buddha-lands; entering in the beings of incomparable buddha-lands, they emerge in the beings of innumerable worlds; entering in the beings of innumerable worlds, they emerge in the beings of incalculable worlds; entering in the beings of incalculable worlds, they emerge in the beings of unthinkable worlds; entering in the beings of unthinkable worlds, they emerge in the beings of immeasurable worlds; entering in the beings of immeasurable worlds, they emerge in the beings of unspeakable worlds; entering in the beings of unspeakable worlds, they emerge in the beings of unspeakably unspeakable numbers of worlds; entering in the beings of unspeakably unspeakable numbers of worlds, they emerge in impure beings; entering in impure beings, they emerge in pure beings; entering in pure beings, they emerge in impure beings; entering in the eye, they emerge in the ear; entering in the ear, they emerge in the eye; entering in the nose, they emerge in the tongue; entering in the tongue, they emerge in the nose; entering in the body, they emerge in the mind; entering in the mind, they emerge in the body; entering in their own senses, they emerge in others’ senses; entering in others’ senses, they emerge in their own senses; entering in a single atom, they emerge in the atoms of countless worlds; entering in the atoms of countless worlds, they emerge in one atom; entering in hearers of Buddha’s voice, they emerge in self-enlightened ones; entering in self-enlightened ones, they emerge in hearers; entering in their own bodies, they emerge in the body of Buddha; entering in the body of Buddha, they emerge in their own bodies; entering in a single instant, they emerge in a hundred million eons; entering in a hundred million eons, they emerge in an instant; entering in the same instant, they emerge in different times; entering in different times, they emerge in the same instant; entering in the past, they emerge in the future; entering in the future, they emerge in the past; entering in past, present, and future, they emerge in a moment; entering in a moment, they emerge in past, present, and future; entering in True Thusness, they emerge in verbalization; entering in verbalization, they emerge in True Thusness. 
In the same way, a great enlightening being in this concentration enters concentration in the same object and emerges in a different object, enters concentration in a different object and emerges in the same object. 
“It is as when a magician keeps repeating a spell, he can become able to cause various different forms to appear—the spell and the illusions are distinct, yet the spell can create illusions; though the spell is just a sound, yet it can produce various illusory perceptions, various forms perceived by the eye-consciousness, various sounds perceived by the ear-consciousness, various smells perceived by the nose-consciousness, various tastes perceived by the tongue-consciousness, various feelings perceived by the body-consciousness, various objects perceived by the mind-consciousness. 
“It is as when the gods of the thirty-three-fold heaven battled with the titans and the gods prevailed and the titans retreated in defeat. 
In the same way, the great enlightening being has already achieved the stage of knowledge of illusions: knowledge of illusion is the enlightening being, the enlightening being is knowledge of illusion—therefore the enlightening being can enter concentration in the undifferentiated and emerge in the differentiated, can enter concentration in the differentiated and emerge in the undifferentiated. “Just as when a farmer plants seeds in the fields, the seeds are below yet the fruits grow above, so also does an enlightening being in this concentration enter concentration in one and emerge in many, enter concentration in many and emerge in one. “It is as when the sperm and ovum unite and there is a living being conceived, at which time it is called an embryo; after this it lives in the womb for nine months, and by the power of proper actions all its limbs and organs achieve completion and its consciousness is clear. 
“This is called the technical knowledge of the great enlightening beings’ eighth great concentration, the concentration of the differentiated bodies of all beings. 
Here the great enlightening beings enter concentration in the medium of their own eyes, in the mediums of their other senses, including the medium of their own minds—this is called freedom in the elemental cosmos. 
“These great enlightening beings also have innumerable virtues, measureless virtues, boundless virtues, incomparable virtues, uncountable virtues, incalculable virtues, unthinkable virtues, immeasurable virtues, unspeakable virtues, inexhaustible virtues. 
“When great enlightening beings abide in this concentration of cosmic freedom, those buddhas by names as numerous as atoms in ten thousand incalculable numbers of buddha-lands from each of the ten directions, with as many buddhas as atoms in ten thousand incalculable numbers of buddha-lands in each name, simultaneously watch over the enlightening beings and enable them to acquire boundless bodies, enable them to attain unobstructed minds, enable them to attain unfailing recollection of all truths, enable them to attain certain comprehension of all truths, enable them to increase in intelligence and absorb all truths, enable them to clearly understand all truths, enable them to attain skill in spiritual capacities, with power and keenness of all faculties, cause their sphere to be boundless, extending through the cosmos unceasingly, enable them to attain unhindered knowledge, ultimately pure, and enable them to manifest attainment of buddhahood in all worlds by mystical power. “Enlightening beings in this concentration attain ten kinds of ocean: they attain the ocean of buddhas because they see them all; they attain the ocean of sentient beings because they pacify them all; they attain the ocean of truths because they can comprehend them all by wisdom; they attain the ocean of lands because they go to them all by psychic realization of essenceless, uncreated spiritual powers; they attain the ocean of virtues because they cultivate them all to perfection; they attain the ocean of spiritual powers because they are able to manifest them extensively to awaken enlightenment; they attain the ocean of faculties because they know all their various differences; they attain the ocean of minds because they know the infinite various different minds of sentient beings; they attain the ocean of practices because they can fulfill them all by willpower; they attain the ocean of vows because they cause them all to be fulfilled, eternally pure. “Once great enlightening beings have attained to these ten oceans, they also attain ten kinds of excellence: 
“Once great enlightening beings have attained these ten kinds of excellence, they also attain ten kinds of power, cultivating practices in the realm of sentient beings: 
“Great enlightening beings in this concentration are able to thoroughly know all the infinite concentrations there are, and the sphere of each concentration, immeasurably vast, in each sphere clearly seeing entry, emergence, and abiding, with their characteristics, manifestations, realms of action, concurrent experiences, inherent natures, extinctions, and emancipations. 
Each river mouth is a league wide. 
They are: 
What are the four? 
Though they do not dwell on any object, yet they do not abandon all points of attention. 
Though they can enter into the realm of a single instant, yet to benefit all beings they manifest enlightening spiritual powers tirelessly. 
Though they enter equally into all phenomenal realms, they do not apprehend their boundaries; though they have no abode and no location, yet they are always proceeding into the path of all-knowledge. 
By the power of mystical projection they enter everywhere into countless groups of beings and fully adorn all worlds. 
Though they are free from the erroneous conceptions of the world and are beyond the realm of all discriminations, yet they do not abandon forms in all their variety. 
Though they are capable of fully equipping themselves with expedient skills, yet they are ultimately pure. 
Though they do not distinguish the various stages of enlightenment, yet they have already entered them all. 
Though they strive to liberate all beings, yet they are free from conceptions of beings. 
Though they have profound knowledge of all phenomena, yet they are free from conceptions of phenomena. 
Though they enjoy seeing all buddhas, yet they are free from conceptions of buddhas. 
Though they skillfully enter various concentrations, yet they know all things are inherently thus, and have no attachment. 
Though they expound inexhaustible statements of the Teaching with boundless intelligence, yet their minds always dwell on the truth beyond words. 
Though they enjoy contemplating the wordless teaching, yet they always manifest pure voices. 
Though they abide in the realm of all things beyond words, yet they always manifest various forms. 
Though they teach beings, yet they know all things are ultimately inherently empty. 
Though they diligently cultivate universal compassion and liberate beings, they know the realm of sentient beings is inexhaustible and has no dissolution. 
Though they realize the realm of reality is everlasting and invariable, yet they ceaselessly guide beings by reading their minds and giving them appropriate instruction. 
It is born of the true teaching of ability to comprehend illusion and is actually beyond any worldly comparison. 
Those jewels are all called treasuries of universal light and are adorned with various colors and characteristics, made of infinite virtues. 
The arrays of innumerable various colors and forms also manifest ornamental canopies of inconceivable arrays of jewels. 
Each jewel reflects pavilions as numerous as atoms in untold billions of buddha-lands, and each pavilion reveals as many lion thrones, each lion throne manifesting as many light beams, each light beam showing as many colors, each color showing as many orbs of light, each orb of light showing as many radiant jewel flowers, each flower showing as many pedestals, on each pedestal there appearing as many buddhas, each buddha displaying as many miracles, each miracle purifying as many congregations, with as many freedoms of buddhahood appearing in each congregation, each freedom showing as many Buddha teachings, each Buddha teaching having as many scriptures, each scripture expounding as many doctrines, each doctrine having as many spheres of truth penetrated by adamantine knowledge, different words each explaining each sphere of truth, maturing as many realms of sentient beings as atoms in untold billions of buddha-lands, each realm having as many beings as atoms in untold billions of buddha-lands achieving peace in the Buddha teaching. 
“Great enlightening beings in this concentration, causing infinite emanations of such miraculous scenes to appear, know they are all like mirages and are not obsessed by them or attached to them. 
They abide in the unimpeded realm of extremelessness, the unspeakable reality, inherent purity, the realm of reality, the true form, the nature of realization of thusness, which has no coming or going, which is not before or after, is infinitely profound, is realized by direct experience and spontaneously entered by knowledge and not understood from another. 
Their minds are free from confusion and discriminatory conceptualization; they are lauded by all buddhas; they flow forth from the power of the buddhas and enter into the realm of all buddhas; they directly witness essential nature as it really is with pure eyes, and see everywhere with the eye of wisdom; they develop the enlightened eye and become bright lamps for the world; they course in the realm known to the eye of knowledge and are able to widely expound subtle truths. 
They are not obstructed by any objects. 
They enter the seed nature of knowledge and produce all kinds of knowledge. 
They are detached from worldly things, yet they appear to live in the world, transforming beings through spiritual powers and taming them by appropriate means. 
They are skilled in all such matters. 
Their virtues, understanding, and will are all thoroughly pure, extremely refined and thoroughly developed. 
Their virtues are inexhaustible, admired by the world. 
Their actions are dispassionate and calm, and they are ultimately without impediment in realization of the teaching of buddhas. 
They embody the knowledge of enlightening beings and are leaders of enlightening beings, protected by all the buddhas together. 
They have perfected the practice of pure generosity, live by the heart of enlightening, purify the seed of enlightening beings, and are able accordingly to give birth to the enlightenment of the buddhas. They are well versed in all the Buddha teachings and can employ them skillfully; they embody their subtle practices and achieve stable, enduring power. “The autonomous spiritual powers of all buddhas, which sentient beings can hardly hear of, the enlightening beings know entirely; they enter the gate of nonduality, abide in the formless truth, and though they have forever relinquished all forms, they are able to explain extensively all kinds of things according to the mentalities, inclinations, and understandings of sentient beings, pacifying and satisfying them. The cosmos is their body; they are free from discriminatory thinking; the sphere of their knowledge is inexhaustible. 
They see the extent of the virtues of all buddhas. They know the differences and order of all ages. “They expose all truths, live peacefully in all lands, beautify all buddha-lands, manifest the light of all true principles, and expound the teachings of all buddhas of past, future, and present. They point out the dwelling places of the enlightening beings, serve as lamps illumining the world, produce all roots of goodness, eternally detach from the world, and are forever born where the buddhas are. 
“Also, to show the roots of goodness of hearing the Teaching, they abide in the sphere of reality, their minds unobstructed in the midst of all things; they do not abandon their practices, but divorce discriminatory thought. 
Their minds have no stirring thoughts in the midst of all things; they acquire the illumination of knowledge and wisdom, and destroy the darkness of ignorance. 
They are able to clearly reflect all Buddha teachings. 
Not destroying the various realms of existence, they are born therein, and comprehend that all realms of existence fundamentally are inert. 
Their physical, verbal, and mental activities are all without extremes. 
“Though they say all kinds of things by way of explanation in accord with local usage, they never destroy the truth which is beyond words. 
They understand that all things are empty, without existence; the practices they cultivate are born from the realm of reality. 
Like space, they are signless and formless; entering deeply into the realm of reality, they explain everything, producing universal knowledge through a single object. 
“They contemplate the stage of the ten powers and cultivate it by knowledge. 
“By this, great enlightening beings reveal the undifferentiated essence of all enlightened ones. 
This can produce all groups of enlightening beings. This state is only in the realm of concentration. 
“When great enlightening beings enter the circle of knowledge of this immensely powerful concentration, they are then able to witness the truth of all Buddha teachings, able to proceed into the Buddha teachings, able to accomplish them, able to fulfill them, able to build them up, able to clarify them, able to live by them, able to comprehend them, in harmony with the inherent nature of all things. 
And yet these great enlightening beings do not entertain the idea that there are so many enlightening beings, so many principles of enlightening beings, so many ultimate ends of enlightening beings, so many illusory ultimate ends, so many fabricated ultimate ends, so many attainments of spiritual powers, so many attainments of knowledge, so many meditations, so many realizations, so many aims, so many realms. 
Because the concentration of enlightening beings is thus in essence, is thus without bounds, is thus transcendent. 
“These great enlightening beings abide in the practice of Universal Good and enter untold billions of concentrations in every successive instant, yet they do not see anything prior to the concentration of Universal Good and the adornments of the realm of buddhahood. 
“Just as a wishing jewel grants all wishes, satisfying endless seekers without losing its power, in the same way a great enlightening being, entering this concentration, knows the mind is like an illusion and produces all objects everywhere inexhaustibly. 
The great enlightening being accomplishes the knowledge of unimpeded action of Universal Good and observes infinite extensive illusory realms, seeing them as like reflected images, without increase or decrease. 
“Just as ordinary people individually give rise to mental states, past, present, and future, without bound, without cease, without end, the continuous flow and change of their mental states going on unbroken, inconceivably, in the same way, great enlightening beings entering this concentration of access to universal illusion have no bounds and are unfathomable. 
Because of the infinite phenomena in the Universally Good enlightening being’s door of access to universal illusion. 
“Just as when the water spirits shower rain, the raindrops are like wheel hubs, without bound, the clouds are not exhausted, though they shower so much rain, this being the realm of nonstriving of the water spirits, in the same way great enlightening beings in this concentration enter the Universally Good enlightening being’s door of concentration, door of knowledge, door of teaching, door of perception of Buddha, door of traveling everywhere, door of mental freedom, door of empowerment, door of mystical projection, door of spiritual powers, door of phantom emanations, door of the illusory quality of all things, door filled with untold numbers of enlightening beings, door of approach to buddhas as numerous as atoms in untold buddha-lands, door of entry into the unspeakably vast network of illusions, door of knowledge of untold numbers of immense different buddha-lands, door of knowledge of untold numbers of worlds with substantial nature and without substantial nature, door of knowledge of the thoughts of untold numbers of sentient beings, door of knowledge of untold numbers of distinctions in time, door of knowledge of the becoming and disintegration of untold numbers of worlds, and door of knowledge of untold numbers of inverted and upright buddha-lands. 
When they enter in this way there are no bounds, there is no end; they are not tired, not wearied, they do not stop, do not rest, do not withdraw, do not slip. 
In all things they do not dwell on untruth; constantly meditating rightly, they do not become either oblivious or excited. 
“They seek omniscience without ever retreating or giving up. 
They operate untold numbers of cycles of the Teaching. 
With sublime intelligence they question the enlightened, never reaching a point of exhaustion. 
They pacify sentient beings, never giving up. 
They manifest bodies of infinite forms, without end. 
“In terms of knowledge of the teachings, they should just abide by them and not try to measure them. 
“These great enlightening beings have already reached the transcendental consummation of the practices of Universal Good and have witnessed the pure truth. 
Because when great enlightening beings are in this concentration, they are naturally like this. 
When great enlightening beings cultivate practice in this way, they benefit living beings, so they increase great compassion, so they draw near to worthy associates, so they see all buddhas, so they comprehend all truths, so they go to all lands, so they enter all regions, so they enter all worlds, so they realize the equality of all things, so they know the equality of the buddhas, so they abide in the equanimity of universal knowledge. 
“In this practice they carry out this kind of action, no other: 
“Great enlightening beings have no different speech or action—they speak and act thus. 
Just as, for example, adamant is unbreakable and gets its name from that, never being apart from unbreakability, in the same way, great enlightening beings get their name from their various practical principles and are never apart from them. 
Why are they not called Ten-Powered? 
Why are they not called Omniscient? 
Why can they not be called Universal Eye? 
Why are they not called Unhindered Seers in All Realms? 
Why are they not called Those Who Abide in the State of Nonduality with the Buddhas of Past, Present, and Future? 
“These great enlightening beings, having already ably practiced the various activities and undertakings of all enlightening beings of past, future, and present worlds, and entered the realm of knowledge, are then called Buddha; unceasingly cultivating the enlightening practices cultivated by the buddhas, they are called enlightening beings. Having completely entered the powers of the enlightened, they are called Ten-Powered; ceaselessly carrying out the activities of Universal Good after having attained the ten powers, they are called enlightening beings. Knowing all truths and being able to explain them, they are called Omniscient; though able to expound all truths, yet never ceasing to think about each truth with versatility, they are called enlightening beings. Knowing all things are nondual, they are called Enlightened in All Things; skillfully examining the path of differentiation of all things, dual and nondual, ceaselessly developing further and further, they are called enlightening beings. 
Able to clearly see the realm of the Universal Eye, they are called Universal Eye; though able to witness the realm of the Universal Eye, ceaselessly developing in every moment, they are called enlightening beings. 
Not coming, not going, without sameness or difference, all such distinctions having ceased forever—such are called Those Who Have Set Their Undertakings to Rest; extensively cultivating fulfillment without turning back, they are called Those Who Have Not Ceased the Undertakings of Universal Good. 
It is well trained and docile. 
If the emperor of gods wants to go somewhere, the elephant immediately knows his intention and disappears from the jewel cave to appear in heaven before the emperor of gods. 
Attended by countless nymphs, he enjoys their singing and playing. 
Similarly, for great enlightening beings, cultivation of the practice of the vows and concentrations of the Universally Good enlightening being are their ornaments of jewels; the seven limbs of enlightenment are the enlightening beings’ bodies; the lights they emanate are nets; they set up the banner of the great Teaching, ring the bells of the great Teaching. 
Great compassion is their cave, steadfast great vows are their tusks. 
Knowing and wise, fearless as lions, their heads are wrapped with the turban of truth. 
They reveal mysteries and reach the other shore of the practice of vows of enlightening beings. 
“Great enlightening beings live by this great principle of the undertaking of Universal Good: 
know that these people’s minds are pure. 
“This is called great enlightening beings’ third superknowledge, the spiritual faculty of knowing past lives. 
Enlightening beings thus entering the realm of reality can manifest their bodies in various forms: 
Seeing what is true and knowing the principles thereof, they spread clouds of teaching and shower rains of teaching. 
Though they know the character of reality cannot be verbally expressed, yet by expedient means and endless intellectual power they teach in an orderly fashion according to principles and according to meanings. 
Because they have mastered the skills of verbal explanation of phenomena and principles, their great kindness and compassion purified, they produce words for all things that are actually beyond words, according to their principles and meanings, without contradiction, explaining that all things arise from conditions. 
Even while they take care of sentient beings, they do not abandon true reality. 
“This is called great enlightening beings’ ninth superknowledge, knowledge of all phenomena. 
“By the superknowledge of concentration on the extinction of all things, great enlightening beings enter into concentration on the extinction of all things in every moment; yet they do not retire from the Path of enlightening beings, they do not give up the tasks of enlightening beings, they do not abandon the heart of great kindness and compassion. 
They enter the family of buddhas and reach the other shore. 
They are able to study all things in each world and comprehend that all things are signless; they know all things come from conditions and have no intrinsic being of their own, nevertheless they explain them expediently according to conventional usage. 
When the enlightening beings enter this concentration on the extinction of all things, no matter how many eons they pass in this concentration, their bodies do not disintegrate, waste away, or change. 
They are neither visible nor invisible. 
They do not pass away, decay, or tire out—it is inexhaustible. 
Though they do nothing at all in respect to existence or nonexistence, yet they are able to accomplish the tasks of enlightening beings: 
Like rays of light, they appear everywhere while remaining silent and unmoving in concentration. 
“These are the ten superknowledges of great enlightening beings. 
“What is great enlightening beings’ conformative acceptance? 
These great enlightening beings do not see that there is anything at all that originates and do not see that there is anything at all that perishes. 
If there is no origination, there is no perishing; if there is no perishing, there is no extinction; if there is no extinction, they are free from defilements; if they are free from defilements, there is no differentiation; if there is no differentiation, there is no location; if there is no location, there is quiescence; if there is quiescence, there is detachment from desire; if there is detachment from desire, there is no doing; if there is no doing, there is no wish; if there is no wish, there is no dwelling; if there is no dwelling, there is no coming and no going. 
In one thing they understand many things, and in many things they understand one thing. 
“What is great enlightening beings’ acceptance of being miragelike? These great enlightening beings know that all worlds are like mirages. Just as mirages have no location, are not inside or outside, not existent or nonexistent, not finite or eternal, not uniform or multiform or formless, but just expressed in conventional terms, in the same way do enlightening beings truly see and know all things, actually realizing this of all things, attaining complete acceptance. 
This is called enlightening beings’ acceptance of being miragelike. 
“What is great enlightening beings’ acceptance of being echolike? 
Here the great enlightening beings, hearing buddhas explain the truth, seeing into the nature of things, applying this practically, achieving realization and reaching the other shore, know that all sounds are the same as echoes, with no coming or going, appearing in this way. 
The great enlightening beings observe the voice of the buddhas as emerging without emerging from inside or outside or both. 
Though they understand that this voice does not emerge from inside, outside, or both, yet it is possible to produce skillful expressions to accomplish explanation. Like echoes in a valley, it is produced by conditions and is not at variance with the nature of things. 
It enables sentient beings each to understand according to kind and to be able to practice this learning. 
“Just as the wife of the emperor of gods can produce a thousand tones in one sound without consciously trying to do so, so also do great enlightening beings enter the realm of nondiscrimination, develop a voice that skillfully adapts to different types, and forever turn the wheel of the Teaching in boundless worlds. 
These enlightening beings skillfully observe all beings and preach to them with a universal tongue, their voices pervading all lands in the ten directions unhindered, causing all to hear the Teaching differently according to their needs. 
Though they know sound has no origin, they manifest the sound of their voice everywhere; though they know there is nothing to say, they extensively explain all things. 
This is called great enlightening beings’ acceptance of being echolike. 
“What is great enlightening beings’ acceptance of being like a reflection? 
These great enlightening beings are not born in the world, do not die in the world; they are not in the world, not outside the world; they do not act in the world, yet are not inactive in the world; they are not the same as the world, yet are not different from the world; they do not go to the world, nor do they not go to it; they do not dwell in the world, nor do they not dwell in the world; they are not worldly or unworldly. 
They are not cultivating the practices of enlightening beings, yet they do not give up their great vow; they are neither real nor unreal. 
Though they always carry out all Buddha teachings, yet they are able to manage all mundane affairs; they do not follow the mundane stream, nor dwell in the religious stream. 
“Just as the sun, moon, men, women, houses, mountains, rivers, springs, and so on, are reflected in anything clear—in oil, water, a jewel, a mirror, and so on—and the reflections are neither one with nor different from the oil, water, jewel, or mirror, are neither separated nor united, not flowing along in river currents, not sinking in lakes or wells, appearing therein without being affected, and people know that such and such a reflection is in such and such a place and not elsewhere, and, though things far and near cast their reflections, there is no corresponding distance of the images from one another, similarly great enlightening beings know their own bodies and others’ bodies are all spheres of cognition and do not understand them dualistically as self and others, and simultaneously appear in their own lands and other lands. 
Just as there are no roots, sprouts, stalks, nodes, branches, or leaves in a seed, yet it can produce these things, so also do great enlightening beings distinguish duality in that which is nondual, their skill in means completely fluid and all-encompassing, without blockage. 
This is called great enlightening beings’ acceptance of being like a reflection. 
“When great enlightening beings achieve this acceptance, though they do not travel to the lands of the ten directions, yet they can appear in all buddha-lands, neither leaving here nor going there. 
They are like reflections appearing everywhere, unhindered wherever they go, causing sentient beings to see different bodies with the same appearance of solidity as the world. 
These great enlightening beings are born from the lineage of the buddhas—their bodies, speech, and minds are pure and unimpeded, so they are able to acquire pure bodies of boundless forms. 
“What is great enlightening beings’ acceptance of being phantomlike? 
These great enlightening beings know all worlds are like phantoms—that is, all sentient beings are phantoms of mentalization, being created by consciousness and thought; all worldly realms are phantoms of acts and conditioning, being created by discrimination; all pain and pleasure are phantoms of delusion, being produced by arbitrary clinging; all worlds are phantoms of unreal phenomena, being made apparent by verbalization; all afflictions are phantoms of discrimination, being created by thoughts. 
There is also the phantom of pure pacification, being manifested by nondiscrimination; the phantom of not changing through time, because of the equality of the uncreate; the phantom of enlightening beings’ willpower, because of their extensive practices; the phantom of buddhas’ great compassion, based on expedient demonstrations; the phantoms of means of teaching, being expounded by wisdom, expertise, and intellectual powers. 
“Thus do enlightening beings know mundane and transmundane phantoms; they know them by direct experience, with extensive knowledge, boundless knowledge, factual knowledge, independent knowledge, true knowledge, incapable of being overturned by false views, going along with the events of the world without loss or corruption. 
“Just as a phantom does not arise from the mind or from mental states, does not arise from action, does not experience consequences, is not born in the world, does not die in the world, cannot be pursued, cannot be grasped or touched, is not long-lasting, is not momentary, is not acting in the world, is not apart from the world, is not bound to one location, is not ubiquitous, is not finite, is not infinite, does not weary or rest, is not unwearying or unceasing, not ordinary, not holy, not defiled, not pure, not born, not dead, not wise, not foolish, not seen, not unseen, not based in the world, not entering the reality realm, not clever, not dull, not grasping, not nongrasping, not birth and death, not nirvana, not existent, not nonexistent, in the same way do enlightening beings course through the world by skill in means, cultivating the path of enlightening beings, knowing worldly phenomena, multiplying their bodies for phantomlike travel, not clinging to the world, not attached to their own bodies, not conceptualizing anything in the world or themselves, not dwelling in the world, not leaving the world, not dwelling on things, not aloof from things. 
Because of their fundamental vow they do not abandon a single sentient being, they do not guide only a few sentient beings, they do not discriminate things yet are not indiscriminate. 
They know the nature of things has no coming or going, and though they have no existence, they fulfill the Buddha teachings, knowing everything is like a phantom, neither existent nor nonexistent. 
“When great enlightening beings thus abide in acceptance of being phantomlike, they are able to fulfill the path of enlightenment of all buddhas and benefit living beings. 
This is called enlightening beings’ acceptance of being phantomlike: 
when great enlightening beings achieve this acceptance, like magicians, everything they do is phantomlike. 
They do not dwell on anything in any buddha-land, do not cling to the world, tirelessly proceed toward enlightenment without producing false ideas about the Buddha teachings, cultivate the practices of enlightening beings, and get rid of delusion. 
Though they have no body, yet they manifest all bodies; though they have no abode, yet they abide in myriad buddha-lands; though they have no form, yet they manifest myriad forms; though they do not cling to ultimate truth, yet they clearly perceive the essential nature of things, impartially and completely. 
“These great enlightening beings, not relying on anything, are called liberated; having shed all errors, they are called disciplined; entering the congregations of all buddhas everywhere without moving, they are called masters of spiritual power; well versed in the truth of nonorigination, they are called unregressing; imbued with all powers, which even mountains cannot impede, they are called unobstructed. 
“What is great enlightening beings’ acceptance of being spacelike? 
These great enlightening beings understand that all phenomena are like space because they are signless; all worlds are like space because they have no origin; all things are like space because they are nondual; all actions of sentient beings are like space because they have no course; all buddhas are like space because they have no discrimination; all buddhas’ powers are like space because they have no distinctions; all meditation concentrations are like space because of equality of past, present, and future; all the principles the buddhas teach are like space because they cannot be explained in words; all buddha-bodies are like space because they have no attachment and no obstruction. 
In this way enlightening beings, by means of the device of being spacelike, comprehend that all things have no existence. 
“When great enlightening beings comprehend all things by the knowledge that recognizes and accepts their spacelike nature, they acquire spacelike bodies, spacelike physical action, spacelike speech, spacelike minds, and spacelike mental action. 
Just as space, the harbor of all things, is not born and does not perish, so also are all the bodies of realities of great enlightening beings unborn and imperishable. 
Just as space is indestructible, similarly are the powers of knowledge of great enlightening beings indestructible; just as all worlds rest in space while space rests on nothing, similarly all true teachings rest on great enlightening beings while they rest on nothing. 
Just as space, without any origin or destruction, can hold the origin and destruction of all worlds, similarly great enlightening beings, without aim or attainment, can show aim and attainment, causing all worldlings to cultivate purity. 
Just as space, without direction or angles, can manifest innumerable directions and angles, similarly great enlightening beings, without actions or consequences, are able to show all kinds of actions and consequences. 
Just as space is not walking or standing yet can reveal all kinds of postures and movements, similarly great enlightening beings are not walking or standing yet can differentiate all movements. 
Just as space is not form and not not form, yet can reveal all kinds of forms, similarly great enlightening beings are not mundane corporeality or transmundane corporeality, yet can manifest all forms. 
Just as space is not old or new, yet can perdure, revealing all things, similarly great enlightening beings are not ancient or recent, but can perdure, revealing the practices carried out by enlightening beings. 
Just as space is not clean or dirty, yet is not apart from cleanness and pollution, similarly great enlightening beings are not obstructed or unobstructed, yet are not apart from obstruction and nonobstruction. 
Just as all worlds appear to space while space does not appear to all worlds, similarly all things appear to great enlightening beings while great enlightening beings do not appear to all things. 
Just as space penetrates everywhere, without boundaries, similarly great enlightening beings penetrate all things, yet their minds have no boundaries. 
“Why is this? 
Because enlightening beings’ doings are like space. That is to say, all their practices, all their purifications, and all their accomplishments are all impartial, of one substance, one flavor, one essence, of the same measure as space, pure and all-pervasive. 
Thus do they witness and know all things without fabricated notions of things, purify all buddha-lands, perfect all supporting bodies, comprehend all realms without confusion, embody all powers, which are indestructible, fulfill all virtues, which are boundless, arrive at the realm of all profound truths, master the paths of all ways of transcendence, sit on all adamantine seats of enlightenment everywhere, utter all voices adapting to all species, and operate the cycles of the Teaching for all worlds according to proper timing. 
This is called great enlightening beings’ acceptance of being spacelike. 
“When great enlightening beings attain these acceptances, they acquire a body that does not come from anywhere because it does not go anywhere; they acquire a birthless body, having no extinction; they acquire a motionless body, having no disintegration; they acquire an insubstantial body, being beyond falsehood; they acquire a uniform body, being formless; they acquire an infinite body, the power of buddhahood being infinite; they acquire an impartial body, being the same characteristic of Thusness; they acquire an undifferentiated body, seeing past, present, and future as equal; they acquire a body that reaches everywhere, their pure eye perceiving equally, without obstruction; they acquire a body free from the realm of desire, knowing that all phenomena neither form nor dissolve; they acquire a body as boundless as space, their store of virtue being as inexhaustible as space; they acquire a body of endless knowledge of the equality of the nature of things, knowing the forms of all things are one form and their nature is natureless, like space; they acquire a body of infinite, unobstructed sound, being unopposed and unobstructed like space; they acquire a body of pure action of enlightening beings endowed with all skills, being unhindered in all places, like space; they acquire a body of continuity of succession of the oceans of all Buddha teachings, because like space they cannot be brought to an end; they acquire a body manifesting infinite buddha-lands within all buddha-lands, being free from greed and attachment, unbounded as space; they acquire a body ceaselessly manifesting all aspects of miraculous power, being boundless as the sky and ocean; they acquire a body of indestructible durable strength, sustaining all worlds like space; they acquire a body with all senses clear and sharp, indestructible as adamant, because like space they cannot be burned by the fires that end an eon; they acquire a body of power to hold all worlds, their power of knowledge being like space. 
“These are called the ten acceptances of enlightening beings.” Then the great enlightening being Universally Good, in order to restate this teaching, spoke these verses: 
Just as people of the world Hearing of a mine of jewels Become glad at heart Because they can obtain them, So enlightening beings, Endowed with great wisdom, Hearing the buddhas’ teaching, The most profound character of nullity, Become calm at heart When they hear this teaching. 
They are not startled or frightened, Nor are they overawed; Great beings seeking enlightenment, Hearing this grandiose message, Minds pure, able to accept, Have no doubt about it. 
Thinking to themselves that by hearing this Exceedingly profound and subtle teaching They will become omniscient Guides of heaven and earth, Enlightening beings, hearing this message, Are very glad at heart. 
Producing steadfast determination, Vowing to seek the buddhas’ truths, Because they incline to enlightenment Their minds are gradually tamed. 
Immutable, stable, They cultivate enlightening practice; In their quest for enlightenment, They proceed wholeheartedly toward that path. 
Diligent, vigorous, never turning back, They do not cast off the yoke of virtues. 
Because they seek enlightenment, Their minds are without fear; Hearing the truth, they become yet braver And serve the buddhas, gaining rapport with them. 
As someone of great fortune Who has found a treasure of gold Makes whatever ornaments Are suitable to wear, So do enlightening beings, Hearing this most profound doctrine, Think and increase the ocean of knowledge, Thereby cultivating conformity to the teaching. 
The existence of things they know accordingly, The nonexistence of things they also know accordingly; As the truth of the teaching is thus, Thus do they know all things. 
Achieving a pure mind, Thoroughly clear, full of joy, They know things arise from conditions And vigorously cultivate practice; They see all things impartially And comprehend their inherent nature. 
Not straying from the Buddha’s teaching, They are aware of all things; Their determination is always firm As they purify enlightenment. 
Immovable as mountains, Single-mindedly seeking true awakening, With a mind inspired to effort They also cultivate the path of concentration, Practicing diligently for countless eons, With never any regression or digression. 
The principles enlightening beings enter Are the sphere of action of buddhas; Able to know them thoroughly, Their minds without aversion or sloth, As the Peerless One teaches, They look upon things impartially. 
Without impartial acceptance None can attain equanimous knowledge; Following the Buddha’s teaching, They accomplish this facet of acceptance; They know things as they are Yet have no notion of things. 
All the gods Of the thirty-three heavens Eat from the same vessel Yet their food is not the same: 
The various foods they eat Do not come from the ten directions— They spontaneously appear in the vessel According to the actions of the gods. 
In the same way do enlightening beings Observe all phenomena As arising from conditions— Having no origin, they have no destruction; Having no destruction, they have no extinction; If there is no extinction, there is no defilement. 
In the changing things of the world They know there is no change; There being no change, there is no location, And no location means nullity. 
Their minds without attachment, They vow to liberate all the living, Thinking only of the Buddha Way, Never distracted or perturbed, Ever with compassionate will Acting expediently in the world. 
Diligently seeking the ten powers, They are in the world without lingering; Without coming or going, They expediently teach the truth. 
These acceptances are supreme, Comprehending truth without end, Entering the cosmos of reality, Yet actually without entering anywhere. 
Enlightening beings abiding in these acceptances See the buddhas everywhere Simultaneously giving them directions— This is called getting the joy of buddhahood. 
They comprehend the nullity and purity Of all things of all times, Yet can influence sentient beings Into the path of virtue. 
The various things of the world Are all illusory; If one can know this is so, One’s mind will be unshakable. 
All acts are born from mind, Therefore it is said mind is like magic: If one gets rid of this false imagination, One extinguishes all paths of existence. 
Just as a skillful magician Causes forms to appear, Causing the masses to crave them in vain, While they ultimately get nothing, So also is the world— All in it is illusion, Without essence or origin, Yet appearing variously. 
Liberating living beings, Letting them know things are illusory, Living beings, too, are not other than illusion— On comprehending illusion, there are no “living beings.” Living beings and lands, All things there are in all times, In the same way, without exception, Are all illusory. 
Making illusory forms of men and women, Elephants, horses, cattle, and sheep, Houses, ponds, springs, and such, Gardens, groves, flowers, and fruits, Illusory things have no awareness And also have no abode; Ultimately of the character of nullity, They only appear according to imagination. 
Enlightening beings are able to see Things of the world this way— All things, existent and nonexistent, They realize are illusions; Living beings and lands Are made by various acts. 
Entering the realm of illusion, They have no attachment therein; Thus attaining skillfulness, They are tranquil, free from folly. 
In the state of nonobstruction Manifesting great power everywhere, The courageous offspring of Buddha Accordingly enter the sublime Teaching, Accurately perceiving all conceptions As wrapping up the world in their mesh, The conceptions like mirages Causing beings to misunderstand. 
Enlightening beings, knowing conceptions well, Get rid of all delusions. 
Living beings, each different, Are not the same in form and type; Enlightening beings understand these are all conceptions, All without true reality. 
All beings in the ten directions Are shrouded by conceptions; If they would give up erroneous views, They would end their conceptions of the world. 
The world is like a mirage, Differentiated because of conceptions; Knowing the world is an ideation, One is freed from delusion of thought, view, and mind. 
Just as a mirage in the heat People think is water, Yet the water does not exist And the wise should not seek it, The same is true of sentient beings: 
Worldly states are all nonexistent, Like mirages, existing in the perception— This is the realm of the unobstructed mind. 
If one detaches from conceptions One will get rid of false descriptions, Liberating all the ignorant Who are attached to ideas. 
Avoiding pride and conceit, Eliminating conceptions of the world, Dwelling on the point of extinction and infinity, This is enlightening beings’ method. 
Enlightening beings realize things of the world Are all like dreams, Neither having nor lacking location, Eternally null in essence. 
All things have no discrimination; Like dreams, they are not different from mind— The worlds of past, present, and future Are all like this. 
The substance of dreams has no birth or destruction And also has no location. The three worlds are all like this— Those who see this are freed in mind. 
Dreams are not in the world, Nor are they unworldly: Not discriminating these two, One enters the stage of acceptance. 
Just like seeing in dreams Various different forms, So also is the world No different from a dream. 
Those in dream-concentration Realize all in the world is like a dream, Not the same and not different, Not one and not various. 
The acts of beings and lands, Polluted and pure, They understand all Are equal to dreams. 
The practices of enlightening beings As well as their great vows They understand are all like dreams, No different from the world. 
Realizing the world is empty, They do not destroy the things of the world, Like long, short, and such forms, As seen in a dream. 
This is called acceptance of the dreamlike; Understanding things of the world by this, One swiftly attains unhindered wisdom To liberate sentient beings. 
Cultivating such practice Produces broad understanding, Knowing well the nature of things, Without mental attachment to things. 
All the various sounds and voices Of all realms of the world Are not internal or external: 
Realizing all are like echoes, Like hearing all kinds of echoes, The mind doesn’t discriminate. 
When enlightening beings hear sounds Their minds are also like this; Looking to the buddhas And listening to the sound of their teachings, Their discourses without number, Though they hear, they are not attached. 
As echoes come from nowhere, So do the voices they hear; Yet they can distinguish the principles And not violate or mistake them. 
They understand utterances While not discriminating among voices; Knowing all voices are empty and null, They broadcast pure, clear sounds. 
Understanding truth is not in words, They enter the wordless realm, Yet can explain in words, Like echoes filling the world. 
They know the ways of speech And are vocally well equipped; While knowing the nature of sound is null, They speak the language of the world. 
According to the voice of the world They show the same differentiations, Their voice pervading everywhere Awakening living beings. 
Enlightening beings, attaining this acceptance, Influence the world with a pure message, Skillfully explaining past, present, and future, Without attachment to the world. 
Because they want to help the world, They single-mindedly seek enlightenment, While always entering the nature of things Without discriminatory thought therein. 
They see all worlds To be null, devoid of intrinsic nature, Yet always cultivate practice intently In order to benefit beings. 
Not dwelling in the world, Not leaving the world, They do not rely on anything in the world— Reliance cannot be found. 
They know the nature of the world And are not attached to that nature; While they do not rely on beings, They teach beings to transcend. 
They know the inherent nature Of everything in the world; Understanding things are not dual, They still have no attachment to nonduality. 
Their minds are not apart from the world, Nor do they dwell on the world; It is not outside the world That they cultivate all-knowledge. 
Just as reflections in water Are not inside or outside, Enlightening beings seeking enlightenment Know the world is not the world: 
They do not dwell in or leave the world, Because the world is inexplicable; And they are not inside or outside, Appearing in the world like reflections. 
Entering this profound truth, They are thoroughly purified; Not giving up their original vow, They are radiant lamps of wisdom. 
Worlds without bound Their knowledge enters, all equally; Edifying beings everywhere, They cause them to give up attachments. 
Contemplating the most profound truth, Aiding living beings, Henceforth they enter into knowledge And cultivate all its ways. 
Enlightening beings examine all things, Clearly realize all are like phantoms, And carry out phantomlike practice, Never giving it up. 
Conforming to phantomlike nature, They practice the way of enlightenment; All things are like phantoms, And so is enlightening beings’ practice. 
All worldly realms And infinite acts Are equally phantomlike, Ultimately resting in nullity. 
The buddhas of all times Are all like phantoms too; Originally vowing to perform certain deeds, They metamorphose into buddhas. 
Buddhas liberate phantom beings By great kindness and compassion; The liberation is also phantomlike; By phantom power they teach them. 
Knowing the world is all phantomlike, They do not discriminate worldly realms; Phantom phenomena, various, different, All come from differences of action. 
Cultivating enlightening practices, Adorning phantom treasuries, With arrays of infinite goodness They make the world according to deeds. 
Phantomlike things are beyond conception, And they do not conceptualize things; Both things and concepts are null and void— Such is enlightening beings’ practice. 
The sea of phantoms understood by knowledge, The phantom nature stamps the world; Phantoms are not things born and perishing— The same is true of knowledge. 
The tenth acceptance clearly sees Sentient beings and phenomena Are null and void in essence, Like space, with no location. 
Attaining this spacelike knowledge, One is forever free from grasping and clinging: Like space, it has no variation And is unobstructed in the world. 
Achievement of acceptance of being like space Is, like space, inexhaustible: Objects are like space, Yet one does not think of them as space. 
Space has no intrinsic nature, And yet it is not nothingness, But has no variation— The power of knowledge is also like this. 
Space has no beginning, No middle, and no end; Its measure cannot be found— Enlightening beings’ knowledge is also thus. 
Thus observing the nature of things, All like space, With no origin or destruction, Is the attainment of enlightening beings: 
Themselves abiding in the principle of being spacelike, They also explain it to others, Conquering all demons— This is the method of the acceptances. 
The distinctions of features of the world Are empty, without any marks; Entering into signlessness, All signs are equal. 
By one single means They enter all worlds: That is knowing that all things in all times Are in essence equal to space. 
Knowledge and voice And the enlightening beings’ body Are in essence like space— All are quiescent and void. 
These ten acceptances Are cultivated by offspring of buddhas; Their minds rest at peace, And they explain them to others. 
Learning them well, They develop great power; The powers of truth and knowledge Become means to enlightenment. Arriving at these acceptances, They achieve unobstructed knowledge Transcending the masses And turn the unexcelled wheel of the Teaching. 
The great practices they carry out Are beyond measure— Only the ocean of knowledge of the Tamer Can know them in detail. Giving up their egos to cultivate practice, They plunge into the profound nature of reality; Their minds always dwelling on pure truths, These they give to others. 
The number of living beings And atoms in lands may be known, But no limit can be ascertained To the virtues of enlightening beings. 
Enlightening beings are able to accomplish These ten acceptances; Their wisdom and their conduct No sentient beings can fathom. 
The Incalculable The Buddha said, “It is good that you ask the Buddha, the Truly Enlightened One, in order to have the beings of the world penetrate the meaning of the numbers known to the Buddha. 
Listen carefully and think well about this; I will explain for you.” Then the enlightening being Mind King willingly received the teaching. 
The Buddha said, “Ten to the tenth power times ten to the tenth power equals ten to the twentieth power; ten to the twentieth power times ten to the twentieth power equals ten to the fortieth power; ten to the fortieth power times ten to the fortieth power equals ten to the eightieth power; ten to the eightieth power times ten to the eightieth power equals ten to the power of 160; ten to the power of 160 squared equals ten to the power of 320; ten to the power of 320 squared equals ten to the power of 640; ten to the power of 640 squared equals ten to the power of 1,280; ten to the power of 1,280 squared equals ten to the power of 2,560; that squared equals ten to the power of 5,120; that squared equals ten to the power of 10,240; that squared equals ten to the power of 20,480; that squared is ten to the power of 40,960; that squared is ten to the power of 81,920; that squared is ten to the power of 163,840; that squared is ten to the power of 327,680; that squared is ten to the power of 655,360; that squared is ten to the power of 1,311,720; that squared is ten to the power of 2,623,540; that squared is ten to the power of 5,247,080; that squared is ten to the power of 10,494,160; that squared is ten to the power of 20,988,320; that squared is ten to the power of 41,976,640; that squared is ten to the power of 83,953,280; that squared is ten to the power of 167,906,560; that squared is ten to the power of 335,813,120; that squared is ten to the power of 671,626,240; that squared is ten to the power of 1,343,252,480; that squared is ten to the power of 2,686,504,960; that squared is ten to the power of 5,373,009,920; that squared is ten to the power of 10,746,019,840; that squared is ten to the power of 21,492,039,680; that squared is ten to the power of 42,984,079,360; that squared is ten to the power of 85,968,158,720; that squared is ten to the power of 171,936,317,440; that squared is ten to the power of 343,872,634,880; that squared is ten to the power of 687,745,269,760; that squared is ten to the power of 1,375,490,539,520; that squared is ten to the power of 2,750,981,079,040; that squared is ten to the power of 5,501,962,158,080; that squared is ten to the power of 11,003,924,316,160; that squared is ten to the power of 22,007,848,632,320; that squared is ten to the power of 44,015,697,264,640; that squared is ten to the power of 88,031,394,529,280; that squared is ten to the power of 176,062,789,058,560; that squared is ten to the power of 352,125,578,117,120; that squared is ten to the power of 704,251,156,234,240; that squared is ten to the power of 1,408,502,302,468,480; that squared is ten to the power of 2,817,004,604,936,960; that squared is ten to the power of 5,634,009,209,893,920; that squared is ten to the power of 11,268,018,419,747,840; that squared is ten to the power of 22,536,036,839,495,680; that squared is ten to the power of 45,072,073,678,991,360; that squared is ten to the power of 90,144,147,357,982,720; that squared is ten to the power of 180,288,294,715,965,440; that squared is ten to the power of 360,576,589,431,930,880; that squared is ten to the power of 721,153,178,863,861,760; that squared is ten to the power of 1,442,306,357,727,723,520; that squared is ten to the power of 2,884,612,715,455,447,040; that squared is ten to the power of 5,769,225,430,910,894,080; that squared is ten to the power of 11,538,450,861,821,788,160; that squared is ten to the power of 23,076,901,773,643,576,320; that squared is ten to the power of 46,153,803,447,287,152,640; that squared is ten to the power of 92,307,606,894,574,305,280; that squared is ten to the power of 184,615,213,789,148,610,560; that squared is ten to the power of 369,230,427,578,297,221,120; that squared is ten to the power of 738,460,895,156,594,442,240; that squared is ten to the power of 1,476,921,790,313,188,884,480; that squared is ten to the power of 2,953,843,580,626,377,768,960; that squared is ten to the power of 5,907,687,161,252,755,537,920; that squared is ten to the power of 11,815,374,322,505,511,065,840; that squared is ten to the power of 23,630,748,645,011,022,131,680; that squared is ten to the power of 42,261,497,290,022,044,263,360; that squared is ten to the power of 94,522,994,580,044,088,526,720; that squared is ten to the power of 189,045,989,160,088,177,053,520; that squared is ten to the power of 378,091,978,320,176,354,107,040; that squared is ten to the power of 756,183,956,640,352,708,214,080; that squared is ten to the power of 1,512,367,913,280,705,416,428,160; that squared is ten to the power of 3,024,735,826,561,410,832,856,220; that squared is ten to the power of 6,049,71,653,122,821,665,712,640; that squared is ten to the power of 12,98,943,306,245,643,331,425,280; that squared is ten to the power of 24,197,886,612,491,286,462,850,560; that squared is ten to the power of 48,395,773,224,982,672,925,701,120; that squared is ten to the power of 96,791,546,449,965,145,831,402,340; that squared is ten to the power of 193,583,092,899,930,291,662,804,480; that squared is ten to the power of 387,166,185,799,860,583,325,608,960; that squared is ten to the power of 774,332,371,599,721,166,651,217,920; that squared is ten to the power of 1,548,664,743,199,442,333,302,635,840; that squared is ten to the power of 3,097,329,486,398,884,666,605,271,680; that squared is ten to the power of 6,194,658,972,797,769,333,210,543,360; that squared is ten to the power of 12,389,317,945,595,538,666,421,086,720; that squared is ten to the power of 24,778,635,891,191,077,332,842,173,440; that squared is ten to the power of 49,557,271,782,382,154,665,686,346,880; that squared is ten of the power of 99,114,543,564,764,309,331,372,693,760; that squared is ten to the power of 198,229,087,129,528,618,662,745,387,520; that squared is ten to the power of 396,458,174,259,057,237,325,490,775,040; that squared is ten to the power of 792,916,348,518,114,474,650,981,550,080; that squared is ten to the power of 1,585,832,697,036,228,949,301,963,100,160; that squared is ten to the power of 3,171,665,394,072,457,898,603,926,200,320; that squared is ten to the power of 6,343,330,788,144,915,797,207,852,400,640; that squared is ten to the power of 12,686,661,576,289,831,594,415,704,801,280; that squared is ten to the power of 25,373,323,152,579,663,188,831,409,602,560; that squared is ten to the power of 50,746,646,305,159,326,377,662,819,205,120; that squared is ten to the power of 101,493,292,610,318,652,755,325,638,410,240; that squared is an incalculable; an incalculable to the fourth power is a measureless; a measureless to the fourth power is a boundless; a boundless to the fourth power is an incomparable; an incomparable to the fourth power is an innumerable; an innumerable to the fourth power is an unaccountable; an unaccountable to the fourth power is an unthinkable; an unthinkable to the fourth power is an immeasurable; an immeasurable to the fourth power is an unspeakable; an unspeakable to the fourth power is an untold, which is unspeakably unspeakable; an untold multiplied by itself is a square untold.” Then the Buddha spoke these verses to the enlightening being Mind King: 
Untold unspeakables Fill all unspeakables; In unspeakable eons Explanation of the unspeakable cannot be finished. 
If untold buddha-lands are reduced to atoms, In one atom are untold lands, And as in one, So in each. 
The atoms to which these buddha-lands are reduced in an instant are unspeakable, And so are the atoms of continuous reduction moment to moment Going on for untold eons; These atoms contain lands unspeakably many, And the atoms in these lands are even harder to tell of Counting this way for unspeakable eons, Using unspeakable numbers, Counting eons by these atoms, One atom standing for ten myriad unspeakable numbers of eons, If you praise a single Universally Good for that many eons, It would still be impossible to exhaust the amount of virtue of Universal Good. 
On a point the size of the tip of a single fine hair Are unspeakably many Universally Goods; The same is true of all points All throughout the cosmos. 
The lands on a point the size of a hairtip Are measureless, unspeakable; So are the lands on every single point Throughout the whole of space. 
The lands on those points Have innumerable different kinds of abode; There are untold lands of different kinds, Untold lands of the same kind. 
On untold points of hairtip size Are untold pure lands, Their various arrays unspeakable, Their various wonders unspeakable: 
On each point in them Are recited untold buddha-names, There being to each and every name Untold numbers of buddhas. 
On the body of each buddha Appear unspeakably many pores; In each of these pores They manifest unspeakably many forms. 
The unspeakably many pores Each radiate unspeakably many beams of light; In each of those beams of light Appear unspeakably many lotuses; In each of those lotuses Are unspeakably many petals; In each of those petals Appear unspeakably many forms; In those untold forms Also appear untold petals; In the petals are untold light rays, In the light rays untold forms; In each of those untold forms Appear untold lights; In the lights appear untold moons, And the moons also manifest untold moons; In each of those untold moons Appear untold beams of light; In each of those light beams Also appear untold suns; In each of those untold suns Are manifest untold forms; And in each of those forms again Are manifest untold rays of light; In each of those rays of light Appear untold lion thrones, Each with untold ornaments, Each with untold lights, With untold beautiful forms in the lights, With untold pure lights in the forms; In each of those pure lights Also appear various subtle lights; These lights also radiate various lights, Untold, unspeakably many. 
In each of these various lights Appear wondrous jewels like mountains; The jewels appearing in each light Are unspeakably many, untold. 
One of those mountainlike jewels Manifests untold lands; All of the mountainlike jewels Manifest lands like this. 
These various forms in atoms All produce untold lights; In each light appear untold buddhas. Untold are each buddha’s discourses, In each discourse are untold sublime verses; Untold are those who gain understanding on hearing them. Untold understandings in each mental instant Reveal unspeakably many truths. They reveal all future buddhas, Externally expounding their teachings, Each buddha’s teachings unspeakably many, With untold purities of all sorts. 
Uttering unspeakably many subtle voices, Turning untold cycles of true teaching, In each cycle of teaching Expounding unspeakably many scriptures, In each scripture Defining unspeakably many doctrines, In each of those doctrines Explaining unspeakably many principles, With each of those principles Taming untold sentient beings. Then again, on a single point Buddhas may dwell for untold eons, And as on one point, so on all points, For the same number of eons, The nonobstruction of their minds unspeakable, Emanating unspeakably many buddhas, Each emanation buddha Also manifesting untold emanations. The reality bodies of those buddhas are unspeakably many, The emanated bodies of those buddhas are unspeakably many, Their adornments are unspeakably measureless. 
They travel infinitely through the ten directions, Coursing through untold lands, Observing untold sentient beings, Purifying untold sentient beings, Taming untold sentient beings. 
Their embellishments are unspeakable, Their masteries are unspeakable, Their mystic transformations are unspeakable, Their spiritual powers are unspeakable, Their spheres are unspeakable, Their empowerments are unspeakable, The worlds they live in are unspeakable, Their pure characteristics of reality are unspeakable. 
They deliver untold discourses, In each and every discourse Expounding untold doctrines, In each and every doctrine Explaining untold principles, Each and every principle Containing untold definitions, Each and every definition Conquering untold beings. Unspeakable homogeneous principles, unspeakable homogeneous minds, Unspeakable heterogeneous principles, unspeakable heterogeneous minds, Unspeakable heterogeneous faculties, Unspeakable heterogeneous languages— In every mental moment, wherever they go, They tame unspeakable numbers of beings. 
Their occult projections are unspeakable, Their miraculous displays are unspeakable; The times and ages therein are unspeakable, The differentiations therein are unspeakable. 
Enlightening beings can explain them in particular, While mathematicians cannot comprehend them; The great and small lands on a point, Polluted, pure, gross, and subtle, All of them unspeakably many, Enlightening beings comprehend and can distinguish. Reducing a land to atoms, Those atoms are measureless, untold; Boundless lands, as many as these atoms, Are gathered on a single hairtip. These lands, unspeakable, Are together on a hairtip without crowding; Without causing the hairtip to expand, Those lands all gather there. 
The lands therein Retain their original form, without mixup; Just as one land does not disorder the others, The same is true of all lands. The realms in space, without bound, All are arrayed on a hairtip; These lands on a hairtip Enlightening beings can tell of in an instant. 
Into a minute pore Untold lands enter in succession; The pore can admit those lands, But those lands cannot fill the pore. The number of eons of their entry is unspeakable, The number of eons of their admission is unspeakable; The durations of their procession, array, and abiding Are all unspeakable eons. 
Thus having taken in and settled these lands, Enlightening beings’ spheres are unspeakable; Their devices during entry are unspeakable, Their deeds after entry are unspeakable. 
The clear comprehensions of their cognitive faculties are unspeakable, Their journeys in all directions are unspeakable, Their vigorous endeavors are unspeakable, Their autonomous mystic transfigurations are unspeakable. Their meditations are unspeakable. Their great vows are unspeakable, Their spheres of action are unspeakable, All their attainments are unspeakable. 
The purities of their subtle knowledge are unspeakable, The purities of their sublime wisdom are unspeakable, Their perceptions of reality are unspeakable, Their cessations of doubts are unspeakable. Their escapes from birth and death are unspeakable, Their ascents to the absolute state are unspeakable, Their deep concentrations are unspeakable, Their total comprehensions are unspeakable. All sentient beings are unspeakable, All buddha-lands are unspeakable, Knowledge of sentient beings’ forms is unspeakable, Knowledge of their dispositions is unspeakable, Knowledge of their deeds and the results is unspeakable, Knowledge of their intellects is unspeakable, Knowledge of their embodiments is unspeakable, Knowledge of their types is unspeakable, Knowledge of their species is unspeakable, Knowledge of their birthplaces is unspeakable, Knowledge of when they are born is unspeakable, Knowledge of their having been born is unspeakable, Knowledge of their understandings is unspeakable, Knowledge of their tendencies is unspeakable, Knowledge of their languages is unspeakable, Knowledge of their works is unspeakable, Enlightening beings with great compassion Benefit all worldly beings, Manifesting untold bodies everywhere, Entering untold buddha-lands, Seeing untold enlightening beings, Developing untold knowledges, Seeking untold teachings, Broadcasting untold lessons of buddhas. They manifest untold various bodies, Traveling to untold lands, Showing untold spiritual powers, Pervading untold regions, Emanating untold bodies in each place, Approaching untold buddhas, Making untold offerings Of untold infinite varieties, Untold pure clear jewels, Untold beautiful lotus blossoms, Untold garlands of the finest scent, Offering them to untold enlightened ones, Their pure faith untold, Supreme resolution untold, Powerful aspiration untold, Honoring untold buddhas. 
Their minds in the untold past Giving to all who seek, untold, Giving all, untold times. The purities of their self-control are untold; The purities of their minds are untold; They eulogize untold buddhas, Delight in untold truths. They accomplish untold forbearances, Their acceptance of nonorigination untold; They embody untold tranquillities, Dwelling in untold states of peace. They exude untold energy, Their past determinations untold, Their irreversible aspiration untold, Their immutable wills untold. 
Their treasuries of all concentrations are untold; They examine untold phenomena and principles, Stilled in untold concentrations, Mastering untold meditations. Their attainments of wisdom are untold, Their freedoms in concentration are untold, Their comprehensions of things are untold, Their clear visions of buddhas are untold. They cultivate measureless, untold practices, Undertake untold far-reaching vows; Their profound spheres are untold, Their pure means of teaching are untold. The power of enlightening beings’ ways is unspeakable, The stations of enlightening beings’ ways are unspeakable, Their right recollection is unspeakable, Their realms of principle and fact are unspeakable. 
They cultivate unspeakably many means of enlightenment, They study unspeakably many profound sciences; Their immeasurable wisdom is unspeakable, Their ultimate wisdom is unspeakable. Their knowledge of things is unspeakable, Their pure cycles of teaching are unspeakable, Their great clouds of teachings are unspeakable, Their great rain of teaching is unspeakable. 
Their spiritual powers are unspeakably many, Their techniques are unspeakably many, Their knowledge of empty quiescence is unspeakable, The continuity of mental instants is unspeakable. 
Their measureless practices are unspeakable, Their constancy instant to instant is unspeakable; The oceans of buddha-lands are untold, They can go to them all, unspeakably. 
The differences in the lands are untold, Their various purities are untold, Their different adornments are untold, Their boundless forms are untold. Their various arrays are untold, Their various refinements are untold; Pure buddha-lands are unspeakably many, Polluted buddha-lands are unspeakably many. Knowing sentient beings is unspeakable, Knowing their natures is unspeakable, Knowing their deeds and rewards is unspeakable, Knowing their mentalities is unspeakable. Knowing beings’ characters is unspeakable, Knowing their understandings and inclinations is unspeakable; Their defilement and purity are unspeakable, Observing and civilizing them are unspeakable. 
Transforming powers are unspeakable; Manifesting various bodies, untold, Cultivating untold energy, Enlightening beings liberate untold sentient beings. They manifest untold mystic transfigurations, Emanate untold great beams of light, With untold various forms, And purify untold sentient beings. Each of their pores, untold, Radiate webs of light, untold, The webs of light manifesting untold hues, Illumining untold buddha-lands. Their courage and fearlessness are untold, Their technical skills are untold, Taming untold sentient beings, Emancipating them from birth and death. 
Their pure deeds are untold, Their pure words are untold, Their boundless thoughts are untold, Their sublime practices are untold. They develop untold jewels of knowledge, And enter untold realms of reality. Enlightening beings’ mnemonic powers are unutterable, They are able to learn inexplicably. The voices of the wise are untold, The purity of their voices is unspeakable; Their accurate awareness of reality is untold, Their awakening of sentient beings is untold. 
The offspring of buddhas are unspeakably many And so are their pure, excellent acts. They eulogize untold buddhas, Their praises inexhaustible, beyond telling. The guides of the world are unspeakably many; So are their expositions and descriptions. 
Those enlightening beings are unspeakably many, Their pure virtues untold. Their spheres are unutterable, They can remain there indefinitely, Their knowledge therein untold; They live through all ages, which none can ever tell. They are gladdened by untold buddhas, Their wisdom and equanimity are beyond speech; They penetrate untold truths, With untold freedom from obstruction amid phenomena. Past, present, and future being like space, unspeakable, Their knowledge of all times is untold; Their comprehension of past, present, and future unutterable, They dwell in knowledge beyond speech. 
Their superlative actions are untold, Their measureless vows are untold, Their pure great vows are untold, They accomplish ineffable enlightenment. 
Their various spiritual powers are inexplicable, They appear in untold worlds; Their cycles of pure teaching are ineffable, Their courageous ability to teach unspeakable, Their various expositions unutterable, Their compassion for the world cannot be told. 
Through all eons, unspeakably many, They praise untold merits and virtues; While unspeakable eons may end, Those untold virtues cannot be exhausted. Untold enlightened ones With untold tongues Praise the untold virtues of buddhas, Impossible to exhaust in untold eons. The living beings in the ten directions All attain enlightenment at once; Therein one buddha can manifest to all Untold embodiments, Each of these untold bodies Manifesting untold heads, Each of these untold heads Manifesting untold tongues, Each of the untold tongues Manifesting untold voices, Each of the untold voices Remaining for untold eons. As is one, so are all buddhas; As one body, so all bodies; As one head, so all heads; As one tongue, so all tongues; As one voice, so all voices, Ever praising the enlightened for untold eons; The untold eons may end, But praise of enlightened virtues cannot be exhausted. 
In a single atom there can be Untold lotus worlds; In each lotus world Are untold Chief of Goodness Buddhas, Pervading the entire cosmos And every atom therein. 
Worlds, becoming, subsisting, and decaying, Are measureless, unspeakable in number; The point of a single atom is boundless, Containing measureless lands therein. The differentiations of the ten directions are unutterable, The arrays of the oceans of worlds cannot be all told of; In each land are buddhas With life spans of unspeakable eons. 
Those buddhas’ deeds cannot be recounted, Their profound teachings are unutterable, Their great spiritual powers are ineffable, Their unimpeded knowledge is inexpressible. They enter into a point, The events at that point untold; They achieve the ten powers, unspeakable, And awaken to ineffable enlightenment. Entering untold realms of pure principle, They gain untold treasuries of deep knowledge: Various numerical measurements, untold, They comprehend, all, as they are; Various physical measurements, untold, They completely master; Various concentrations, untold, They can pass eons in, each one. 
In the presence of untold buddhas, The purifications they practice are untold; They attain unutterable mental freedoms And journey in all directions, beyond the power of speech. 
The manifestations of their spiritual powers are untold, Their spheres of action are boundless, ineffable; They go to untold lands And understand untold buddhas. Their vigor and courage are unspeakable, Their knowledge and comprehension unutterable. They do not act on rules, nor do they not act on them, Their penetration of realms of objects is infinite. For unreckonable vast eons They travel constantly through the ten directions, infinitely. 
Their knowledge of enlightening means is infinite, Their knowledge of truth is infinite, Their knowledge of spiritual powers is infinite, Their miracles in each mental instant are infinite. 
They comprehend infinitely each one Of the infinite buddhas’ teachings; They can realize enlightenment at once Or can enter realization at various times. 
The buddha-lands on a hairtip are infinite, The buddha-lands in an atom are infinite; They can go to all these buddha-lands And see the infinite buddhas. 
They realize one truth infinitely, And enter the infinite line of buddhas. 
The buddhas’ lands are infinite— They can travel to all and attain enlightenment. 
The lands, beings, and buddhas Have infinite distinctions in individuality; As such, past, present, and future worlds are boundless: 
Enlightening beings can see them all. Life Span Dwelling Places of Enlightening Beings “In the ocean there is also a dwelling place called Cave of Adornments, where enlightening beings have lived since ancient times. 
South of Vaishali there is a dwelling place called Stable Roots, where enlightening beings have stayed since ancient times. 
In the city of Mathura there is a dwelling place called Cave of Satisfaction, where enlightening beings have lived since ancient times. 
In the city of Kuchana there is a dwelling place called Seat of the Law, where enlightening beings have lived since ancient times. 
In the city Pure Other Shore there is a dwelling place called Mucilinda, where enlightening beings have lived since ancient times. 
In the state of Maratha there is a dwelling place called Built by the Uninhibited Dragon King, where enlightening beings have lived since ancient times. 
In Afghanistan there is a dwelling place called Producing Compassion, where enlightening beings have lived since ancient times. 
In China there is a dwelling place called Cave of Original Man, where enlightening beings have lived since ancient times. 
In Kashgar there is a dwelling place called Oxhead Mountain, where enlightening beings have lived since ancient times. 
In Kashmir there is a dwelling place called Process, where enlightening beings have lived since ancient times. 
In the city of Increasing Joy there is a dwelling place called Seeing a Hundred Million Treasuries of Light, where enlightening beings have lived since ancient times. 
In the state of Gandhara there is a place called Shangrila Cavern, where enlightening beings have lived since ancient times.” Inconceivable Qualities of Buddhas The Buddha, knowing what the enlightening beings were thinking, used the support of spiritual power, the embrace of knowledge, the radiance of light, and the fulfillment of occult force to cause the enlightening being Blue Lotus Blossom Trove to abide in the nonhesitation of buddhas, enter the reality realm of buddhas, acquire the mystic power and psychic freedom of buddhas, attain the unimpeded, immensely broad insight of buddhas, know the succession of all lineages of buddhas, and abide by the untold means of buddhas’ teachings. 
Thereupon that enlightening being was able to commune with the unobstructed realm of reality, thus was able calmly to sustain profound practice free from impediments, thus was able to fulfill the great vow of universal good, thus was able to know and perceive all aspects of buddhahood. With great compassion he observed sentient beings, wishing to cause them to be pure and diligent in self-cultivation, to accept and apply all the principles of enlightening beings. 
In a single mental instant he produced enlightened knowledge and understood all the inexhaustible means of knowledge, his mnemonic command and intellectual powers complete. 
By the power of Buddha he said to the enlightening being Lotus Blossom Calyx, “The buddhas, World Honored Ones, have innumerable abodes—the abode of eternity, the abode of great compassion, the abode of various bodies performing buddha-work, the abode of equanimously turning the wheel of the pure Teaching, the abode of explaining innumerable principles by means of analytic knowledge, the abode of the inconceivable qualities of all buddhas, the abode of the sound of purity pervading infinite lands, the abode of the inexpressibly profound realm of reality, the abode of manifesting all supreme spiritual powers—and are able to reveal the ultimate truth that has no barrier. 
“The buddhas have ten things that pervade the infinite cosmos. 
What are these ten? 
All buddhas have unbounded bodies, with pure forms, entering into all states of being without defilement or attachment. 
All buddhas have unbounded, unobstructed eyes that can clearly see all things. 
All buddhas have unbounded, unobstructed ears that can understand all sounds and utterances. 
All buddhas have unbounded, unobstructed noses that can reach the other shore of freedom of the buddhas. 
All buddhas have universal tongues that utter sublime sounds pervading the cosmos. 
All buddhas have unbounded bodies that appear to sentient beings in accord with their minds. 
All buddhas have unbounded minds that dwell on the unobstructed impartial body of reality. 
All buddhas have unbounded, unobstructed liberation, manifesting inexhaustible great spiritual powers. 
All buddhas have unbounded pure worlds, manifesting buddha-lands according to the pleasures of sentient beings, replete with infinite adornments, yet without giving rise to any obsession or attachment to them. 
All buddhas have unbounded practical undertakings of enlightening beings, having complete knowledge, spiritual freedom, and ability to master all elements of buddhahood. 
These are the ten phenomena of buddhahood that pervade the cosmos without bound, which are in the perfectly enlightened ones. 
“The buddhas have ten kinds of instantly creative knowledge. 
What are these ten? 
All buddhas can, in a single instant, appear to descend from heaven in infinite worlds. 
All buddhas can, in a single instant, manifest birth as enlightening beings in infinite worlds. 
All buddhas can, in a single instant, manifest renunciation of the mundane and study of the way to liberation in infinite worlds. 
All buddhas can, in a single instant, manifest attainment of true enlightenment under enlightenment trees in infinite worlds. 
All buddhas can, in a single instant, manifest turning the wheel of the Teaching in infinite worlds. 
All buddhas can, in a single instant, manifest education of sentient beings and service of the enlightened in infinite worlds. 
All buddhas can, in a single instant, manifest untold variety of buddha-bodies in infinite worlds. 
All buddhas can, in a single instant, manifest all kinds of adornments in infinite worlds, innumerable adornments, the freedoms of the enlightened, and the treasury of omniscience. 
All buddhas can, in a single instant, manifest countless pure beings in infinite worlds. 
All buddhas can, in a single instant, manifest the buddhas of past, present, and future in infinite worlds, with various faculties and characters, various energies, and various practical understandings, attaining true enlightenment in the past, present, and future. 
“The buddhas have ten kinds of proper timing. 
What are these ten? 
All buddhas develop and mature those with affinity at the appropriate time. 
All buddhas give enlightening beings instructions for the future at the proper time. 
All buddhas show spiritual powers in accord with sentient beings’ minds at the proper time. 
All buddhas show buddha-bodies in accord with sentient beings’ understandings at the proper time. 
All buddhas persist in great relinquishment at the proper time. 
All buddhas go into inhabited places at the appropriate time. 
All buddhas receive the pure and faithful at the proper time. 
All buddhas tame evil sentient beings at the appropriate time. 
All buddhas reveal the inconceivable occult powers of the enlightened at the proper time. 
“The buddhas have ten peerless inconceivable realms. What are they? 
All buddhas, once sitting, pervade infinite worlds in the ten directions. 
All buddhas, uttering one logical statement, can express all Buddha teachings. 
All buddhas, emanating one light, can illumine all worlds. 
All buddhas, in one body, can manifest all bodies. 
All buddhas can show all worlds in one place. 
All buddhas can ascertain all things within one knowledge without any impediment. 
All buddhas can travel to all worlds in the ten directions in a single moment of thought. 
All buddhas can manifest the infinite spiritual powers of the enlightened in a single instant. 
All buddhas can focus on all the buddhas and sentient beings of past, present, and future in a single instant without confusion of mind. 
All buddhas are in one instant essentially the same as all buddhas of past, future, and present. 
“The buddhas can produce ten kinds of knowledge. What are they? 
All buddhas know all things have no aim, yet they can produce knowledge of dedicated undertaking. 
All buddhas know all things have no body, yet they can produce knowledge of pure bodies. 
All buddhas know all things are fundamentally nondual, yet they can produce knowledge capable of awareness and understanding. 
All buddhas know all things have no self and no being, yet they can produce knowledge to civilize beings. 
All buddhas know all things fundamentally have no marks, yet they can produce knowledge of all marks. 
All buddhas know all worlds have no becoming or decay, yet they can produce knowledge of becoming and decay. 
All buddhas know all things have no creation, yet they can produce knowledge of the effects of action. 
All buddhas know all things have no verbal explanation, yet they can produce knowledge of verbal explanation. 
All buddhas know all things have no defilement or purity, yet they can produce knowledge of defilement and purity. 
All buddhas know all things have no birth or extinction, yet they can produce knowledge of birth and extinction. 
“The buddhas have ten kinds of ways of entry into universality. What are they? 
All buddhas have immaculate bodies that penetrate past, present, and future. 
All buddhas are endowed with three kinds of mastery—of diagnosis, prescription, and occult powers—by which they edify beings everywhere. 
All buddhas are endowed with mnemonic powers able to receive and hold all Buddha teachings. 
All buddhas are endowed with four special knowledges—of principles, meanings, expressions, and elocution—and operate all cycles of pure teaching everywhere. 
All buddhas have impartial great compassion and never abandon all sentient beings. 
All buddhas have profound meditation concentration and always observe all sentient beings everywhere. 
All buddhas have roots of goodness beneficial to others, and civilize sentient beings unceasingly. 
All buddhas have unobstructed minds, able to abide calmly in all universes. 
All buddhas have unimpeded spiritual powers and are able to manifest the buddhas of past, present, and future in one instant. 
All buddhas have unobstructed intellect, in a single instant defining sets of ages of past, present, and future. 
“Buddhas have ten great qualities that are hard to believe in. 
What are they? 
All buddhas can destroy all demons. 
All buddhas can overcome all false teachers. 
All buddhas can tame all sentient beings and make them all happy. 
All buddhas can go to all worlds and guide the myriad types of beings there. 
All buddhas can knowingly experience the most profound realm of reality. 
All buddhas can, by means of a nondual body, manifest various bodies, filling the world. 
All buddhas can, with pure voices, produce the special knowledges of principle, meaning, expression, and elocution, and expound truths endlessly, to the unfailing benefit of those who accept. 
All buddhas can manifest buddhas as numerous as atoms in all worlds in a single pore, without end. All buddhas can manifest in a single atom as many lands as atoms in all worlds, replete with all kinds of fine adornments, and continuously turn the wheel of the sublime Teaching therein for the edification of sentient beings—yet the atom is not enlarged and the worlds are not small; they always abide in the realm of reality by realizational knowledge. 
All buddhas arrive at the pure realm of reality, shatter the darkness of ignorance of the world by means of the light of knowledge, cause all to gain understanding of the Buddha teachings, follow the enlightened, and dwell in the ten powers. 
“The buddhas have ten kinds of great virtue that are impeccably pure. 
What are they? 
All buddhas are endowed with great spiritual power, impeccably pure. 
All buddhas are born in the families of the enlightened ones of past, present, and future, of people harmonious and good, impeccably pure. 
All buddhas’ minds are free from obsession forever, impeccably pure. 
All buddhas are free from attachment to anything in the past, present, or future, impeccably pure. 
All buddhas know all kinds of natures are one nature, coming from nowhere, impeccably pure. 
All buddhas’ virtues, past, present, and future, are inexhaustible, equal to the cosmos, impeccably pure. 
All buddhas’ boundless physical forms pervade all lands of the ten directions, teaching all sentient beings at the appropriate times, with impeccable purity. 
All buddhas acquire the fourfold fearlessness, are freed from all fears, and roar the great lion’s roar among the masses, clearly discerning all things, impeccably pure. 
All the buddhas enter final nirvana in untold ages, and when sentient beings hear their names they gain immeasurable benefit, same as if the buddhas were presently existing, impeccably pure. 
All buddhas, though in untold distant worlds, can be seen by sentient beings who correctly meditate on them single-mindedly, impeccably pure. 
“The buddhas have ten kinds of ultimate purity. What are they? All buddhas’ past great vows are ultimately pure. 
All buddhas’ families are ultimately pure. All buddhas’ physical characteristics and refinements are ultimately pure. The non-defilement of the reality-body of all buddhas is ultimately pure. All buddhas’ omniscient knowledge, without obstruction, is ultimately pure. 
All buddhas’ liberation, freedom, accomplishment of their tasks, and arrival at completion are ultimately pure. 
“Buddhas have ten kinds of buddha-work in all worlds in all times. 
What are they? 
If there are sentient beings who think of them single-mindedly, the buddhas appear before them. 
If there are sentient beings whose minds are unruly, they explain the Teaching to them. 
If there are sentient beings able to develop pure faith, they will surely cause them to acquire immeasurable roots of goodness. 
If there are sentient beings able to enter the ranks of truth, they will appear to testify to it, so that they know all. 
They teach and influence sentient beings tirelessly. 
They travel to all buddha-lands, coming and going without impediment. 
With great compassion they do not abandon sentient beings. 
They manifest transfigured emanation bodies, continuing forever. 
Their exercise of spiritual powers is ceaseless. 
They abide in the cosmos of reality, able to observe everywhere. 
“Buddhas have ten kinds of virtues of inexhaustible oceans of knowledge. What are they? 
The virtue of the inexhaustible ocean of knowledge of the boundless body of reality of all buddhas; the virtue of the inexhaustible ocean of knowledge of the infinite buddha-works of all buddhas; the virtue of the inexhaustible ocean of knowledge of the sphere of the enlightened eye of all buddhas; the virtue of the inexhaustible ocean of knowledge of the infinite, inconceivable roots of goodness of all buddhas; the virtue of the inexhaustible ocean of knowledge of all buddhas showering all liberating teachings everywhere; the virtue of the inexhaustible ocean of knowledge of all buddhas extolling the qualities of enlightenment; the virtue of the inexhaustible ocean of knowledge of the various undertakings and practices carried out by all buddhas in the past; the virtue of the inexhaustible ocean of knowledge of the eternal performance of buddha-work by all buddhas; the virtue of the inexhaustible ocean of knowledge of all buddhas comprehending the mental patterns of all sentient beings; the virtue of the inexhaustible ocean of knowledge of the unsurpassable adornments of virtue and knowledge of all buddhas. 
What are they? All buddhas always carry out all the transcendent ways. 
All buddhas are always free from confusion in regard to all things. 
All buddhas always have universal compassion. All buddhas always have the ten powers. 
All buddhas always turn the wheel of the Teaching. 
All buddhas always demonstrate the accomplishment of true awakening for the benefit of sentient beings. 
All buddhas always gladly lead all sentient beings. 
All buddhas always correctly remember the truth of nonduality. 
All buddhas, after having taught sentient beings, always show entry into nirvana without remainder, because the realm of the buddhas has no bounds. 
“Buddhas have ten kinds of exposition of the innumerable facets of the Teaching of the buddhas. 
What are they? All buddhas expound innumerable facets of the realms of sentient beings. 
All buddhas expound innumerable facets of the activities of sentient beings. 
All buddhas expound innumerable facets of effects of acts of sentient beings. 
All buddhas expound innumerable facets of teaching sentient beings. 
All buddhas expound innumerable facets of purifying sentient beings. 
All buddhas expound innumerable facets of vows of enlightening beings. 
All buddhas expound innumerable facets of practices of enlightening beings. 
All buddhas expound innumerable facets of the ages of becoming and decay of all worlds. 
All buddhas expound innumerable facets of enlightening beings devotedly purifying buddha-lands. 
All buddhas expound innumerable facets of the successive emergence in each age of the past, present, and future buddhas in innumerable worlds. 
All buddhas expound the ways of knowledge of all buddhas. 
“Buddhas have ten kinds of performance of buddha-work for sentient beings. What are they? 
All buddhas manifest physical forms to do buddha-work for sentient beings. 
All buddhas make subtle utterances to do buddha-work for sentient beings. 
All buddhas accept things to do buddha-work for sentient beings. 
All buddhas accept nothing to do buddha-work for sentient beings. 
All buddhas do buddha-work for sentient beings by means of earth, water, fire, and air. 
All buddhas magically show all realms of objects to do buddha-work for sentient beings. 
All buddhas do buddha-work for sentient beings by various names and epithets. 
All buddhas do buddha-work for sentient beings by means of the realms of objects of buddha-lands. 
All buddhas adorn and purify buddha-lands to do buddha-work for sentient beings. 
All buddhas do buddha-work for sentient beings silently, without words. 
“Buddhas have ten kinds of supreme qualities. 
What are they. All buddhas’ great vows are firm and steadfast and cannot be broken; they do what they say without fail, and there is no duplicity in their words. 
All buddhas tirelessly practice the deeds of enlightening beings throughout all future ages, in order to perfect and fulfill all virtues. 
All buddhas will go to untold worlds in order to guide a single sentient being, and do the same for all sentient beings, endlessly. 
All buddhas universally regard both faithful and scornful beings with great compassion impartially, without any discrimination. 
All buddhas, from their initial aspiration to their attainment of buddhahood, never lose the determination for perfect enlightenment. 
All buddhas accumulate immeasurable virtues and dedicate them all to omniscience, with never any attachment to the world or its creatures. 
All buddhas learn physical, verbal, and mental practices from buddhas, only carrying out buddha-practice, not the practice of the vehicles of individual liberation, all to be dedicated to omniscience, to attain unexcelled true enlightenment. 
All buddhas emanate great light, that light impartially illumining all places, and illuminating all the buddhas’ teachings, enabling enlightening beings’ minds to become purified and to fulfill universal knowledge. 
All buddhas give up worldly pleasures, without craving or attachment, and wish that all worldlings would be free from suffering and attain bliss, and have no false ideas. 
All buddhas, out of compassion for sentient beings, undergo all kinds of hardship, preserving the seed of buddhahood, course in the sphere of buddhahood, leave birth and death, and arrive at the stage of the ten powers. 
“Buddhas remain unhindered in ten ways. 
What are they? All buddhas can travel to all worlds, remaining unhindered. 
All buddhas can walk, stand, sit, and recline in all worlds, remaining unhindered. All buddhas can abide in all worlds, remaining unhindered. 
All buddhas can expound the truth in all worlds, remaining unhindered. 
All buddhas can abide in the heaven of contentment in all worlds, remaining unhindered. 
All buddhas are able to enter all the pasts, presents, and futures of the cosmos, remaining unhindered. 
All buddhas are able to sit at all enlightenment sites in the cosmos, remaining unhindered. 
All buddhas are able to observe the mental patterns of all sentient beings in each moment of thought, and use their powers of diagnosis, prescription, and occult effects to teach and tune them, remaining unhindered. 
All buddhas are able to sojourn at the places of innumerable buddhas with one body, and in all places, benefiting living beings, remaining unhindered. 
All buddhas are able to expound true teachings spoken by infinite buddhas, remaining unhindered. 
“Buddhas have ten kinds of supreme adornment. What are they? 
All buddhas have all the marks and refinements of greatness—this is the first, buddhas’ supreme physical adornment. 
All buddhas have sixty kinds of vocal sound, each with five hundred elements, each element with countless hundreds of thousands of pure, clear tones adorning it, and they are able, in the midst of all groups in the cosmos, without any qualms or fears, to roar the great lion’s roar, expounding the meaning of the extremely profound teaching of the enlightened, so that all who hear are delighted and are edified according to their faculties and inclinations—this is the second, buddhas’ supreme adornment of speech. 
All buddhas are endowed with the ten powers, the great concentrations, and the eighteen unique qualities, adorning their mental activity; in their sphere of operation, they comprehend and master all enlightening principles without obstruction, and all attain the adornments of the all-inclusive cosmos of reality as their adornment; they are able to clearly perceive in a single instant the mental patterns, past, present, and future, each different, of the beings of the cosmos—this is the third, the supreme mental adornment of buddhas. 
All buddhas are able to emanate countless beams of light, each beam of light accompanied by untold webs of light, illumining all buddha-lands, destroying the darkness in all worlds, revealing the emergence of innumerable buddhas, their bodies equal, all pure, their buddha-works all effective, able to cause sentient beings to reach nonregression—this is the fourth, buddhas’ supreme adornment of light. 
When the buddhas smile, zillions of rays of light radiate from their faces, each light having innumerable, inconceivably many hues of all kinds, lighting up all the worlds in the ten directions; among the masses they utter truthful words, giving innumerable, countless, inconceivably many sentient beings directions for supreme complete perfect enlightenment—this is the fifth, buddhas’ supreme adornment of a smile, free from the delusion and confusion of the world. 
All buddhas have the reality-body, pure, unobstructed, with ultimate comprehension of all truths, abiding in the cosmos of reality, without bounds, though being in the world, not getting mixed up in the world, understanding the true nature of the world, acting on transmundane principles, beyond the power of speech, transcending the realms of matter and sense—this is the sixth, the buddhas’ supreme adornment of the reality-body. 
All buddhas have infinite constant subtle lights with untold colors of all kinds adorning them, forming a treasury of light producing infinite orbs of light illuminating the ten directions without obstruction—this is the seventh, buddhas’ supreme adornment of constant subtle light. 
All buddhas have boundless sublime forms, delightful sublime forms, pure sublime forms, sublime forms that appear in accordance with the mind, forms that outshine all in the realms of desire, form, and formlessness, unexcelled sublime forms arriving at the other shore—this is the eighth, buddhas’ supreme adornment of sublime forms. 
All buddhas are born in the family of the buddhas of past, present, and future, accumulate myriad treasures of virtue, ultimately pure, without fault, impeccable, being adorned by the most pure, refined acts among all things, fully accomplishing total knowledge and character beyond reproach—this is the ninth, buddhas’ supreme adornment of human character. 
All buddhas array themselves with the power of great compassion, ultimately pure, without any cravings, their physical actions forever at rest, their minds well liberated, so that none tire of seeing them, saving all worldly beings, the foremost fields of blessing, the most worthy recipients, mercifully helping all sentient beings to develop stores of unlimited virtue and knowledge—this is the tenth, buddhas’ supreme adornment of the qualities of great kindness and compassion. 
“Buddhas have ten kinds of mastery. What are they? 
All buddhas have command of all the teachings, clearly comprehend all kinds of bodies of expression and nuance, and explain all things with unhindered intellect—this is the first mastery of buddhas. 
All buddhas teach sentient beings without ever missing the appropriate timing, endlessly explaining the right teaching to them in accord with their states of mind, causing them all to become receptive to truth—this is the second mastery of buddhas. 
All buddhas are able to cause all worlds throughout space, arrayed in countless different ways, to quake in six ways, causing those worlds to rise or fall, to expand or contract, to combine or dissolve, without ever harming a single living being, the creatures in those worlds being unaware, not cognizant of this happening, not even suspecting it—this is the third mastery of buddhas. 
All buddhas are able to beautify and purify all worlds by means of spiritual powers, in the space of an instant manifesting the adornments of all worlds, these adornments beyond recounting even in countless eons, all free from defilement, incomparably pure; all the adornments and purities of all buddha-fields they cause to equally enter one field—this is the fourth mastery of buddhas. 
All buddhas, seeing a single sentient being capable of being taught, extend their lives indefinitely for that being, sitting without fatigue of body or mind, concentrating single-mindedly on that being, without ever becoming heedless or forgetful, guiding that being by appropriate means, with appropriate timing, and also do the same for all living beings as they do for one—this is the fifth mastery of buddhas. 
All buddhas can go to all worlds, to the realms of action of all enlightened ones, without ever leaving behind any phenomenal realms, the ten directions each different, there being in each direction incalculable oceans of worlds, there being in each ocean of worlds incalculable world systems; by spiritual powers buddhas reach all of them in a single instant, and turn the wheel of the unobstructed pure Teaching—this is the sixth mastery of buddhas. 
All buddhas, in order to civilize all sentient beings, attain unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment in each mental instant, yet in regard to all elements of buddhahood, they have not already cognized them, do not cognize them, and are not yet to cognize them, and also do not dwell in the stage of learning, yet they know them all, see them all, mastering them without hindrance; with immeasurable knowledge and freedom they teach and tame all sentient beings—this is buddhas’ seventh mastery. 
All buddhas can do the buddha-work of the ears with their eyes, can do the buddha-work of the nose with the ears, can do the buddha-work of the tongue with the nose, can do the buddha-work of the body with the tongue, can do the buddha-work of the mind with the body, and with the mind can sojourn in all kinds of realms, mundane and transcendental, in all worlds, able to perform immeasurable great buddha-works in each realm—this is buddhas’ eighth mastery. 
All buddhas can contain all sentient beings in each pore of their bodies, each sentient being’s body equal to untold buddha-lands, yet there is no crowding; each sentient being can pass countless worlds with every step and go on for countless eons, seeing all the buddhas emerging in the world and edifying beings, turning the wheel of the pure Teaching, showing untold phenomena of past, future, and present, the embodiments of sentient beings in various realms of existence throughout space, their comings and goings and deportment, their needs all fully supplied, yet without any obstruction therein—this is buddhas’ ninth mastery. 
All buddhas, in the space of an instant, manifest as many buddhas as atoms in all worlds, each buddha attaining enlightenment in all universes, sitting on a lotus lion throne in a world of vast arrays of exquisite lotus blossoms, showing the miraculous powers of buddhas, and as in the world of vast arrays of exquisite lotus blossoms, so in untold worlds in all universes, variously arrayed, with various realms of objects, various shapes and forms, various manifestations, various numbers of ages, and as in one instant so in each instant of immeasurable, boundless, incalculable eons, all appearing in one instant, with infinite abodes in one instant, yet without using the slightest power of expedient means—this is buddhas’ tenth mastery. 
“Buddhas have ten kinds of measureless, inconceivable ways of fulfillment of buddhahood. 
What are they? 
The pure features of all buddhas each contain a hundred blessings. All buddhas accomplish all Buddha teachings. All buddhas perfect all roots of goodness. All buddhas perfect all virtuous qualities. 
All buddhas can be leaders of sentient beings. All buddhas perfect pure buddha-lands. 
All buddhas are imbued with the impartial reality of enlightened ones. 
All buddhas, after having done their buddha-work, manifest entry into nirvana. 
“Buddhas have ten kinds of skill in means. What are they? 
All buddhas know all things are beyond idle philosophizing, yet can demonstrate the roots of goodness of all buddhas. 
All buddhas know all things have no vision and are unknown to each other, have no bondage or release, no reception or assembly, and no consummation, and independently ultimately reach the other shore; meanwhile they know the true reality of all things is unvarying, not different, and they attain freedom, selflessly, without grasping, not destroying ultimate truth; having already reached the state of great freedom, they always observe all realms of reality. 
All buddhas are forever aloof from all appearances; their minds do not dwell on anything, yet they know all appearances without confusion or error; while they know all appearances have no intrinsic nature of their own, yet they are able to perceive them all in accord with their essence and also manifest the infinite appearances of the various adornments of innumerable physical bodies and pure buddha-lands, gather lamps of knowledge and wisdom, and destroy the delusions of sentient beings. 
All buddhas abide in the realm of reality; they do not dwell in the past, future, or present, because in Thusness as such there are no marks of the three time frames of past, future, or present; yet they can speak about the emergence in the world of the innumerable buddhas of past, future, and present, causing those who hear to see the realms of all the buddhas. 
All buddhas, in their physical, verbal, and mental actions, do not create anything, have no coming or going, and no abiding; beyond all categories, they reach the other shore of all things, yet are treasuries of all truths, imbued with immeasurable knowledge, comprehending all kinds of mundane and transmundane things, their knowledge and wisdom unhindered, manifesting immeasurable autonomous spiritual powers, edifying the sentient beings of all realms. 
All buddhas know that all things cannot be seen, are neither one nor different, are neither finite nor infinite, are not coming or going, all being without inherent nature of their own, yet they do not contravene the phenomena of the world; the all-knowers see all things in the midst of nonexistence of own-being or inherent nature; being independent of things, they extensively explain things while always abiding steadily in the real nature of True Thusness. 
All buddhas know all times in one time; endowed with pure virtues, they enter the absolute state, yet without any attachment to it; in regard to time frames such as day, month, year, eon, becoming, and decomposition, they neither remain within them nor abandon them, yet they are able to show day or night, beginning, middle, and end, one day, one week, a fortnight, a month, a year, a century, an eon, many eons, inconceivable eons, inexpressible eons, as far as all the eons throughout the future, always turning the wheel of the sublime Teaching for the sake of sentient beings, without interruption, without retreating, without pause. 
All buddhas always remain in the realm of reality, develop the infinite fearlessness of the buddhas, as well as their countless, measureless, inexhaustible, ceaseless, boundless, unique, endless, and true intellectual powers, appropriately demonstrating explanation of all expressions and explanation of all principles, delivering untold millions of discourses using various doctrines adapted to faculties and natures, inclinations and understandings, all ultimately good in the beginning, the middle, and the end. 
All buddhas, abiding in the pure realm of reality, know all things originally have no names, there being no name of past, present, or future, no name of sentient beings, no name of inanimate beings, no name of country or land, no name of noncountry, no name of law or nonlaw, no name of virtue or nonvirtue, no name of enlightening being, no name of Buddha, no names of sets, no names of nonsets, no name of birth, no name of extinction, no name of existence, no name of nonexistence, no name of unity, no name of variety, because the essential nature of things is inexpressible—all things are without location or position, cannot be explained as assembling or dispersing, as one or as many, no verbalization can reach them, all words fail; though the buddhas speak in various ways according to conventional usage, they do not cling to anything as mental objects, do not make anything up, and avoid all false conceptual attachments: in this way they ultimately reach the other shore. All buddhas know the fundamental nature of all things is null: because it has no birth, it is not form; because it has no manifestation it is not sensation; because it has no names or categories it is not conception; because it has no action it is not conditioning; because it has no grasping it is not consciousness; because it has no access it is not sense mediums; because it apprehends nothing it is not sense elements—yet it does not destroy things, because the original nature has no origination, is like space. 
All phenomena are empty and quiescent; there is no action or effect, no cultivation, no accomplishment, no production. They are not in sets, yet not out of order; not existent or nonexistent; not born or annihilated, not defiled or pure; not entering or existing; not abiding, not transitory; not edifying, not unedifying; not beings, not not beings; not living, not lifeless; not caused, not causeless. While knowing this, the buddhas know all sentient beings, whether they are rightly stabilized, wrongly stabilized, or not stabilized, and teach them the subtle truth to enable them to reach the other shore, attain the ten powers and four fearlessnesses, be able to roar the lion’s roar, be imbued with universal knowledge, and abide in the realm of buddhahood. 
These are the ten kinds of skill in means achieved by buddhas. 
“Buddhas have ten kinds of great buddha-work, immeasurable, boundless, inconceivable, unknowable to all celestial and human worldlings, unknowable even to the past, future, and present Buddhist disciples and self-enlightened ones, except by the spiritual power of the buddhas. 
What are they? 
All buddhas appear to be born in the heavens of contentment in all worlds throughout the cosmos, carry out enlightening practices, and perform great buddha-works in the spheres of operation of infinite forms, infinite powers, infinite lights, infinite sounds, infinite verbal expressions, infinite concentrations, and infinite knowledge, taking in all humans, celestials, demons, monks, priests, titans, and so on, their great kindness uninhibited, their great compassion ultimate, impartially aiding and benefiting all living beings, enabling them to be born in heaven or in the human realm, or purifying their senses, or tuning their minds, sometimes explaining three different vehicles of salvation for them, sometimes explaining the complete, full unitary vehicle for them, saving and liberating all, enabling them to get out of birth and death—this is the first great buddha-work. 
“All buddhas descend spiritually from the heaven of contentment into the mother’s womb; by means of ultimate concentration they observe the phenomenon of taking on life as like an illusion, like a phantom, like a reflection, like space, like a mirage, and they take on life however they wish, without bound, without hindrance. 
Entering the state of noncontention, they develop knowledge without attachment; free from desire, clear and pure, they develop a vast treasury of wondrous adornments, take on their final embodiment, live in a great jewel-adorned mansion and perform buddha-work. 
They may do buddha-work by spiritual powers, or by right recollection, or by showing miracles, or by manifesting the sun of knowledge, or by revealing the enormous spheres of buddhahood, or by showing the immeasurable lights of the buddhas, or by entering countless great concentrations, or by manifesting emergence from concentration. 
The buddhas, at that time, in the mother’s womb, wishing to benefit all worldlings, show all kinds of appearances to do buddha-work. 
They may appear to be born, or appear as children, or appear as princes, or appear as leaving home, or they may show the appearance of atttaining true enlightenment, or show the appearance of turning the wheel of the Teaching, or show the appearance of entering final extinction. 
In this way all of them, by various means, perform buddha-work in all regions, all networks, all circles, all systems, in all worlds. 
This is the second great buddha-work. “All good works of all buddhas are already pure, and their knowledge of all life is clear and immaculate: so by birth they lead and guide the deluded, causing them to open up in understanding and practice all that is good. For the sake of sentient beings they appear to be born in a royal palace. 
All buddhas have already abandoned all materialistic desires for palaces and pleasure; they have no craving or obsession, and always reflect upon the emptiness and essencelessness of all existents, that all comforts and delights are not truly real. 
Keeping the pure precepts of buddhas, ultimately fulfilling them, observing the palace ladies and attendants, they develop great compassion; observing that all sentient beings are unreal, they develop great kindness; observing that there is nothing enjoyable in the world, they develop great joy; their minds gaining freedom in the midst of all things, they develop great relinquishment. 
Imbued with the qualities of buddhahood, they manifest birth in the phenomenal realm, their physical features perfect, their associates pure, yet they have no attachment to anything. 
With voices adapting to types, they explain the truth to the masses, causing them to become disillusioned with worldly things; they point out to them the results of what they are doing. 
Also they use expedient means to teach in accord with needs, causing the immature to develop maturity, causing the mature to attain liberation, doing buddha-work for them to cause them not to regress. 
Also, by virtue of a heart of universal love and compassion they continually explain all kinds of principles to sentient beings and also manifest the powers of diagnosis, prescription, and occult influence for them, to enable them to awaken and attain purity of mind. 
Though the buddhas be in the inner palace, seen by all the people, yet they are performing buddha-work in all worlds. 
By means of great knowledge and great energy they manifest the various spiritual powers of buddhas, unhindered, inexhaustible. They always continue three kinds of skillfull, expedient action—that is, their physical activity is ultimately pure, their verbal activity is always carried out in accord with knowledge, and their mental activity is exceedingly profound and has no blockage or inhibition; by these means they benefit living beings. 
This is the third great buddha-work. 
“All buddhas show analytic examination and disenchantment while living in a palace of all kinds of adornments, thereupon giving it up and leaving home, wishing to let sentient beings realize that things of the world are all illusions, impermanent, and perishable, and become deeply disillusioned, avoid creating attachments, forever cut off the affliction of worldly craving, cultivate purifying practices, and benefit living beings. 
When the buddhas leave home, they give up conventional manners, abide in noncontention, and fulfill the immeasurable virtues of their fundamental vow. 
By the light of great knowledge they destroy the darkness of delusion of the world and become unexcelled fields of blessings for all beings. 
They always extol the virtues of buddhas for the benefit of sentient beings, causing them to plant roots of goodness with the buddhas. 
They see truth with the eye of wisdom. They also extol renunciation for the benefit of sentient beings, its purity and blamelessness. 
They are eternally emancipated and are forever lofty paragons of wisdom for the world. 
This is the fourth great buddha-work. “All buddhas have omniscience and already know and see infinite realities. 
Attaining perfect true enlightenment under the tree of enlightenment, vanquishing all demons, their majesty supreme, their bodies fill all worlds. 
Their deeds of spiritual power are boundless and inexhaustible. They attain mastery of all meanings in the sphere of omniscience. They have cultivated virtues to consummation. 
Their seats of enlightenment are fully adorned and pervade all worlds in the ten directions; the buddhas sit on them and turn the wheel of the sublime Teaching, explaining all the undertakings of enlightening beings, revealing the infinite realms of the buddhas, causing the enlightening beings to awaken to and enter into them. 
They carry out all kinds of pure practices and are able to direct and guide all living beings, cause them to plant roots of goodness, be born in the ground of equality of the enlightened, continue in the boundless good practices of enlightening beings, and develop all the most excellent qualities. 
The buddhas know perfectly all worlds, all beings, all buddha-lands, all phenomena, all enlightening beings, all teachings, all pasts, presents, and futures, all disciplines, all mystic transformations, and the inclinations of all sentient beings’ minds, and based on this knowledge perform buddha-work. This is the fifth great buddha-work. 
“All buddhas turn the irreversible wheel of the Teaching, to cause the enlightening beings not to backslide; they turn the immeasurable wheel of the Teaching, to cause all worldlings to know; they turn the wheel of Teaching, awakening all, because they can fearlessly roar the lion’s roar; they turn the wheel of Teaching, which is a treasury of knowledge of all truths, to open the door of the treasury of truth and remove the obstacle of obscurity; they turn the unobstructed wheel of the Teaching, being equal to space; they turn the wheel of Teaching of nonattachment, because they see that all things are neither existent nor nonexistent; they turn the world-illuminating wheel of Teaching, to cause all sentient beings to purify their vision of reality; they turn the wheel of Teaching revealing all knowledge, pervading all things in all times; they turn the wheel of Teaching, which is the same one of all buddhas, because all Buddha teachings are not mutually opposed or contradictory. 
All buddhas, by means of measureless, countless hundreds of thousands of millions of billions of such wheels of Teaching, perform buddha-work inconceivably according to the differences in mental patterns of sentient beings. 
This is the sixth great buddha-work. “All buddhas enter into all capital cities and perform buddha-work for the beings. 
That is, they enter human capitals, celestial capitals, capitals of water spirits, monsters, cherubim, titans, birds, hobgoblins, serpents, goblins, demons, and so on. 
When they enter the gates of the city, the earth trembles, light shines everywhere, the blind gain vision, the deaf are able to hear, the insane regain their sanity, the naked are clothed, the troubled and suffering all gain peace and happiness; all musical instruments spontaneously play, all adornments, used or not, emit marvelous sounds that delight all hearers. 
The buddhas’ physical forms are pure and clean, fully endowed with the marks and refinements of greatness, so that none ever tire of seeing them. 
They are able to do buddha-work for the benefit of sentient beings—whether looking, examining, moving, stretching, walking or standing still, sitting or reclining, silent or speaking, whether manifesting occult powers, or explaining principles, or giving instructions—in all these they are performing buddha-work for the benefit of sentient beings. 
All buddhas, in all the countless worlds, in the midst of the oceans of mental inclinations of all kinds of sentient beings, urge them to remembrance the buddhas, always diligently considering and planting roots of goodness, cultivating the practices of enlightening beings, lauding the subtlety and supremacy of the buddhas’ appearance, which is hard for any living being to get to meet; if beings see buddhas and are inspired with faith, then they produce all the immeasurable good qualities and amass the virtues of buddhas, all pure. 
Thus, having extolled the virtues of buddhas, they multiply their bodies to go to all worlds in the ten directions to let the sentient beings behold them, meditate on them and contemplate them, attend and serve them, plant roots of goodness, gain the good graces of the buddhas, and increase the family of buddhas, all being certain to attain buddhahood. By these actions they perform buddha-work, sometimes manifesting physical bodies for sentient beings, sometimes making sublime utterances, sometimes just smiling, causing them to believe, honor, praise, and behave courteously. 
All buddhas, by means of innumerable, untold, inconceivable such buddha-works of all kinds, in all worlds, according to the inclinations of sentient beings’ minds, teach them expediently, by the power of their original vows, the power of great love and compassion, and the power of omniscience, causing them all to be civilized. 
This is the seventh great buddha-work. “All buddhas may do buddha-work while dwelling in forest retreats, or in quiet places, or in desolate places, or in buddhas’ dwelling places; or they may do buddha-work while in trance, or while alone in a grove, or while concealing themselves from view, or while abiding in knowledge of the ultimate profundity, or while dwelling in the incomparable realm of the buddhas; or they may do buddha-work while carrying on various imperceptible physical actions, adapting to sentient beings’ mentalities, predilections, and understandings to teach them as is expedient, without cease. Or they may do buddha-work seeking omniscience in the form of celestial beings, or they may do buddha-work seeking omniscience in the form of water spirits, goblins, cherubim, titans, birds, serpents, humans, subhumans, and so on. They may also do buddha-work by seeking omniscience in the form of listeners, solitary illuminates, or enlightening beings. 
Sometimes they remain for a day, or a night, or a fortnight, or a month, or a year, up to untold eons, to do buddha-work for the benefit of sentient beings. 
This is the eighth great buddha-work. “All buddhas are mines that produce pure roots of goodness, causing sentient beings to engender pure faith and resolution in the buddha-teachings, so their faculties are tamed and they forever detach from the world. 
They cause enlightening beings to be full of knowledge, wisdom, and clarity in regard to the way of enlightenment and not depend on another for understanding. 
Sometimes they do buddha-work causing sentient beings to turn away from the world to follow the buddha-mind; sometimes they do buddha-work explaining the inevitable ending of life; sometimes they do buddha-work explaining that there is nothing enjoyable in the world. Sometimes they do buddha-work preaching the eternal service of buddhas; sometimes they do buddha-work explaining the buddhas’ turning of the wheel of pure Teaching, causing the hearers to become very joyful. Sometimes they do buddha-work expounding the sphere of buddhahood, inspiring people to cultivate spiritual practices. Sometimes they do buddha-work expounding concentration on remembrance of Buddha, inspiring people to always delight in visions of Buddha. 
Sometimes they do buddha-work expounding the purification of the senses, diligent search for the Buddha Way with unflagging spirit. 
Sometimes they do buddha-work visiting all buddha-lands and observing the various causes and conditions of their environments. 
Sometimes they do buddha-work uniting all bodies of living beings into a buddha-body, causing all lazy and self-indulgent sentient beings to abide by the pure precepts of the enlightened. 
This is the ninth great buddha-work. 
“When buddhas enter extinction, countless sentient beings mourn and weep; looking at each other in great grief and distress, they say, ‘The buddha had great sympathy and compassion, mercifully aiding all worldly beings, a savior and a refuge for all living creatures. 
The emergence of a buddha is difficult to encounter, an unexcelled field of blessings, and now the buddha has passed away forever.’ Thus they use this to cause sentient beings to mourn and miss the buddha, thereby doing buddha-work. 
Also, in order to transform and liberate all celestials, humans, spirits, goblins, titans, cherubim, and so on, according to their desires, they pulverize their own bodies to make countless relics, to cause sentient beings to develop faith, honor, respect, and joyfully reverence them, and cultivate virtues to complete fulfillment. 
They also build monuments, variously adorned, in the abodes of all kinds of creatures, for religious services; their teeth, nails, and hair are all used to make monuments, to cause those who see them to remember the Buddha, the Teaching, and the Community, to believe with unswerving faith, sincerely respect and honor them, and make offerings to them wherever they are, and cultivate virtues, so that by this merit they may be born in heaven or among humans, of noble and prosperous families with ample property and pure retinues, not enter into evil ways, always get to see buddhas, fulfill pure ways, quickly attain emancipation from the three realms of existence, each attain the fruit of their own vehicle according to their aspiration, recognize and requite their debt to buddhas, and forever be a reliance for the world. 
Though the buddhas be extinct, they are still inconceivable pure fields of blessings for living beings, with inexhaustible virtues, supreme fields of blessings, causing sentient beings’ roots of goodness to be complete and their virtue to be fully developed. 
This is the tenth great buddha-work. 
“These buddha-works are immeasurably great, inconceivable: no beings of the world, celestials or humans, and none of the listeners or individual illuminates of past, future, or present can know them, unless they are empowered by Buddha. 
“Buddhas have ten kinds of mastery of nondual action. 
What are they? 
All buddhas can speak words of prediction of enlightenment, definitively, without duality. 
All buddhas can satisfy sentient beings according to their wishes, definitely, without duality. 
All buddhas can manifestly be awake to all truths and expound their meanings, definitively, without duality. 
All buddhas have all the wisdom and knowledge of the buddhas of past, future, and present, definitive, without duality. 
All buddhas know that all instants, past, future, and present, are one instant, definitely, without duality. 
All buddhas know that all past, future, and present buddha-lands inhere in one buddha-land, definitely, without duality. 
All buddhas know the words of all buddhas of all times are the words of one buddha, definitely, without duality. 
All buddhas know that all buddhas of all times and all the beings they teach are essentially equal, definitely, without duality. 
All buddhas know that worldly phenomena and Buddhist principles are essentially not different, definitely, without duality. 
All buddhas know that the roots of goodness of all buddhas of all times are the same one root of goodness, definitely, without duality. 
These are the ten. “Buddhas have ten kinds of abode, abiding therein in all things. What are they? 
All buddhas abide in awareness of all realms of reality. 
All buddhas abide in compassionate speech. 
All buddhas abide in the fundamental great vow. 
All buddhas abide in persistence in civilizing sentient beings. 
All buddhas abide in the principle of absence of selfhood. 
All buddhas abide in impartial salvation. 
All buddhas abide in recollection of truth. 
All buddhas abide in the unobstructed mind. 
All buddhas abide in the constantly rightly concentrated mind. 
All buddhas abide in equal comprehension of all things without violating the character of ultimate reality. 
“All buddhas have ten exhaustive knowledges. 
What are they? 
They know all things of the past exhaustively. 
They know all things of the future exhaustively. 
They know all things of the present exhaustively. 
They know all principles of language exhaustively. 
The know all sentient beings’ minds exhaustively. 
They know all the various ranks, high, middling, and low, of the roots of goodness of enlightening beings. 
They know all buddhas’ complete knowledge and virtues do not increase or decrease. 
They know all phenomena come from interdependent origination. 
They know all world systems exhaustively. 
They know all the different phenomena in all worlds, interrelated in Indra’s net. 
“Buddhas have ten kinds of might with enormous power, supreme power, measureless power, grandiose, awesome power, power difficult to acquire, undiminishing power, stable power, indestructible power, power inconceivable to any worldlings, power that all living beings cannot shake. 
What are they? 
All buddhas have indestructible bodies and life that cannot be cut off—no worldly poisons can affect them; the floods, fires, and gales of all worlds cannot harm the buddhas’ body. 
Even if all demons, gods, sprites, goblins, angels, titans, and sundry other creatures were to rain thunderbolts as big as mountains with all their strength, hurling them down all at once throughout the universe, they could not cause the buddhas’ mind to be startled or frightened and could not even move a single hair of the buddhas. 
That rain cannot fall where the buddhas are unless they let it, and even if they do not prevent it, and let it rain, it does not harm them. 
If there are any beings sustained by the buddhas or in the service of the buddhas, that rain of thunderbolts cannot even harm them, much less the buddhas. 
This is the buddhas’ first mighty quality. 
“All buddhas put the mountains, oceans, forests, and buildings in all worlds in all universes into a single pore for all future ages, yet the sentient beings are not aware, do not know, unless they are empowered by the Buddha. 
Then the buddhas, holding all those worlds in a pore throughout the ages to come, whether walking, standing still, sitting, or reclining, do not conceive a single thought of fatigue. 
Just as space holds all the worlds in the cosmos without fatigue, so do all buddhas hold all worlds in a single pore. 
This is buddhas’ second mighty quality. 
“All buddhas can take as many steps as atoms in untold worlds in a single moment, passing as many lands as atoms in untold buddha-lands with each step, and travel thus for as many eons as atoms in all worlds: 
if there were a great adamantine mountain equal in measure to all those buddha-lands, the buddhas could place as many such mountains as atoms in untold buddha-lands in a single pore; the pores on a buddha’s body being equal in number to all beings in the cosmos, they place the same number of great adamantine mountains in each pore, and, holding all those mountains, walk in the ten directions, entering all worlds in space, from the past throughout the future, through all ages, without resting—yet the buddhas’ bodies are not injured and they do not get tired; their minds are always in concentration, without distraction. 
This is the buddhas’ third mighty quality. 
“Buddhas, after a meal, sit in the lotus posture through the untold eons of past and future, and enter the inconceivable bliss experienced by buddhas; their bodies remain stable, still and unmoving, yet they do not abandon the work of teaching sentient beings. 
Suppose someone measured each world throughout space one after another with a hairtip; the buddhas are able to sit cross-legged forever on a point the size of the hairtip, and likewise on all points. 
Suppose the size and weight of each being in all worlds in the ten directions were equal to those of worlds as numerous as atoms in untold buddha-lands; the buddhas could put all those beings on a fingertip forever and could do the same with all their fingertips, and enter each world in all of space carrying all those beings, exhausting the whole cosmos, yet the buddhas would never be weary in body or mind. 
This is buddhas’ fourth mighty quality. 
“Buddhas can cause to appear on one body as many heads as atoms in untold buddha-lands, manifesting as many tongues in each head as atoms in untold buddha-lands, each tongue producing as many different voices as atoms in untold buddha-lands, which all beings in the cosmos hear, each voice delivering as many troves of discourses as atoms in untold buddha-lands, each trove of discourses expounding as many principles as atoms in untold buddha-lands, each principle having as many terms, statements, and meanings as atoms in untold buddha-lands. 
They preach this way for as many eons as atoms in untold buddha-lands, and when they finish these eons, they again preach for as many eons as atoms in untold buddha-lands, going on like this successively until they exhaust eons as numerous as atoms in all worlds, as numerous as the thoughts of all living beings. 
The eons of the future may be exhausted, but the cycles of teaching operated by the emanated bodies of buddhas have no end. 
This means the cycle of teaching expounded by knowledge, the cycle of teaching cutting off doubts, the cycle of teaching illumining all things, the cycle of teaching opening the treasury of nonobstruction, the cycle of teaching causing sentient beings to be joyful and docile, the cycle of teaching revealing all the practices of enlightening beings, the cycle of teaching of the high-rising, perfectly round sun of knowledge, the cycle of teaching of the bright lamp of wisdom illumining all the world, the cycle of teaching of various adornments of intellectual powers and confidence: 
just as one buddha-body, by spiritual power, operates different cycles of teaching such as these, to which no comparison in the world may be drawn, in the same way throughout space, in every single point, there are as many worlds as atoms in untold buddha-lands, and in each world the buddhas manifest in each mental instant as many emanation bodies as atoms in untold buddha-lands, each emanation body also producing voices and teachings like these, each filling all realms, so all beings therein can understand—yet the voice of the buddhas does not change or die out; it is inexhaustible. 
This is the fifth mighty quality of buddhas. 
“All buddhas adorn their chests with the sign of virtue, indestructible as adamant, and sit at the foot of a tree of enlightenment: 
hordes of demons, boundless in number, with various forms so terrifying that all sentient beings who see them become crazed with fear or even drop dead—such hordes of demons fill the sky, but when the buddhas see them, they are not frightened, they do not pale, not even one hair stands on end, they are not moved or disturbed, they do not think of anything—aloof from emotions, they are tranquil and clear, abiding m the abode of buddhas, imbued with the power of love and compassion, their senses under control, their hearts without fear, impossible for the hordes of demons to upset. 
In fact, it is they who can subdue the demons, cause them to change their minds and take refuge in the buddhas, after which the buddhas teach them by means of correct diagnosis, prescription, and mystic influence, so that all now develop the aspiration for unexcelled, complete perfect enlightenment, never to regress. 
This is the sixth mighty quality of buddhas. 
“All buddhas have unobstructed voices that pervade all worlds in the ten directions, and all sentient beings who hear them spontaneously become docile. 
The sounds of the voices of the buddhas cannot be blocked by any mountains, any habitations of any creatures, or any sounds of any world, no matter how loud. 
According to the ways in which they need to be influenced, all sentient beings hear articulated statements and doctrines and all attain understanding. 
This is the seventh mighty quality of buddhas. 
“All buddhas’ minds are unobstructed, eternally pure; all buddhas of past, future, and present are of the same one essence, unpolluted, unblinkered, without egoism or possessiveness, either internally or externally; they realize objects are void, they do not conceive arbitrary ideas, do not depend on anything, do not fabricate anything, do not dwell on appearances, forever end false imaginings, give up all thoughts clinging to objects, are pure in their fundamental nature, are forever free from conflict while in the midst of all things, abiding in ultimate reality, free from desire, thoroughly pure; entering the cosmos of reality, their teaching is inexhaustible, beyond all illusory ideas of assessment and wrong assessment, totally beyond all talk of the compounded and the uncompounded. 
Having comprehended untold, boundless realms of objects, with unimpeded, inexhaustible knowledge and method they accomplish the ten powers, and their embellishments of all virtues are thoroughly pure. 
They expound innumerable various principles, all without contradicting the character of reality, impartial with respect to the phenomena of past, present, and future of the cosmos, without variance, ultimately free, entering into the supreme treasury of all truths, correctly remembering all facets of truth without confusion, abiding unperturbed in the fields of all buddhas in the ten directions. 
Attaining unbroken knowledge, they know all things ultimately, without exception; putting an end to contamination, their minds are liberated and their intellects are liberated. 
Abiding in ultimate reality, their perceptivity is unimpeded, and their minds are always correctly stabilized. 
In a single thought they comprehend the things of past, present, and future as well as the mental activities of all sentient beings, without any hindrance. 
This is the eighth mighty quality of buddhas. 
“All buddhas have the same one reality-body, a body of infinite range, a body of boundless qualities, a body with no limit in the world, a body undefiled by the realms of desire, form, or formlessness, a body manifested at will, an impartial, pure body that is neither real nor unreal, an indestructible body with no coming or going, no compounding, a body of the inherent essence of phenomena, of one form which is formless, an omnipresent body without position or location, a body of boundless forms produced by free psychic transformations, a body of all kinds of manifestations entering universally into everything, a body of skillful employment of subtle truth, a body of a treasury of knowledge illumining everywhere, a body showing the equality of phenomena, a body pervading the cosmos, a body of eternal purity without movement or discrimination, neither existent nor nonexistent, a body manifest in accord with the various interests and understandings of all beings capable of being edified, which is not an expedient yet not inexpedient, neither perishes nor does not perish, a body born of the treasury of all virtues, a body of True Thusness, containing all the teachings of the buddhas, a body free from obstruction, its fundamental nature absolutely still, a body in which all qualities of nonobstruction are developed, a body omnipresent in all realms of pure principle, a body omnipresent in all worlds in multiple forms, a body of universal comprehension, free from clinging to objects, free from regression, forever liberated, imbued with omniscience. 
This is the ninth mighty quality of buddhas. 
“All buddhas equally understand all the teachings of buddhas and equally cultivate all the practices of enlightening beings; whether undertakings or knowledge, they are purely impartial, like the great ocean, all reaching fulfillment. Their power of action is supreme, and they never shrink back. 
Abiding in the measureless realms of the various concentrations, they show all paths, encourage good, and warn against evil. 
Their power of knowledge is foremost; they expound the truth without fear and are able to answer any question well. 
Their knowledge, wisdom, and teaching are equally pure; their physical, verbal, and mental actions are all unalloyed. 
They abide in the abode of buddhahood, the family of buddhas, doing buddha-work by means of enlightened knowledge and wisdom. Abiding in omniscience, they explain innumerable things as having no basis and no boundaries. Their psychic powers and knowledge are inconceivable, incomprehensible to any worldlings. 
Their knowledge profoundly penetrating, they see all things. The subtle, far-reaching, measureless, boundless gates of truth of past, present, and future, they thoroughly comprehend. 
In all worlds they are able to awaken understanding by means of transmundane knowledge. In all worlds they perform untold buddha-works of all kinds, attain unregressing knowledge, and enter the ranks of the buddhas. 
Though they have already realized untold truths that are beyond verbal expression, yet they can explain all verbal expressions. 
Achieving instantaneous subtle knowledge, they comprehend all things and give out teachings to beings in accord with whatever courses of action are appropriate for them as individuals. 
All things, all worlds, all sentient beings, all times in the cosmos, the range of these phenomena unlimited, they are able to know and see by means of unobstructed knowledge. 
All buddhas appear in the world in the time of a single thought, according to the possibilities for enlightening, abide in a pure land, attain true awakening, manifest spiritual powers, and open up and enlighten the mind, intellect, and consciousness of all sentient beings of past, present, and future, according to appropriate timing. 
Sentient beings are boundless, worlds are boundless, realms of natural law are boundless, past, present, and future are boundless, and the supremacy of the buddhas is also boundless; they appear in the midst of them all, attain true awareness, and skillfully enlighten them by means of buddha-knowledge, never ceasing. 
All buddhas manifest the most wondrous incarnation by means of spiritual power, abide in boundlessness, with great compassion and skill in means, their minds without obstruction, at all times explaining the wondrous teaching for the benefit of all living beings. 
This is the tenth mighty quality of buddhas. 
These mighty qualities of all buddhas are infinite, boundless, inconceivable, incomprehensible to any sentient beings or followers of individual liberation in any time, unless spiritually empowered by Buddha. 
“All buddhas have ten definite principles. What are they? 
All buddhas definitely come down from the heaven of happiness to be born on earth. 
All buddhas definitely appear to be born, spending ten lunar months in the womb. 
All buddhas definitely tire of social convention and gladly seek to leave the world. 
All buddhas definitely sit at the foot of the tree of enlightenment, achieve true awakening, and realize all elements of enlightenment. 
All buddhas definitely realize all truths instantly and manifest spiritual power in all worlds. 
All buddhas definitely can teach in accord with the time. 
All buddhas definitely can teach people at the appropriate times in accordance with the bases of goodness they have developed, and give them directions for enlightenment. 
All buddhas definitely can do buddha-work in accord with the time. 
All buddhas definitely predict the enlightenment of all fully developed enlightening beings. 
All buddhas definitely can answer all sentient beings’ questions in a single instant. 
“All buddhas have ten kinds of speed. 
What are they? 
Any who see any buddha are speedily able to avoid bad dispositions. 
Any who see any buddha are speedily able to fulfill superior virtues. 
Any who see any buddha are speedily able to develop extensive bases of goodness. 
Any who see any buddha speedily attain rebirth in an immaculate heaven. 
Any who see any buddha can speedily get rid of all doubts and confusion. 
Any who have already aroused the aspiration for enlightenment who see any buddha can soon develop immense resolve, never to turn back, and can be able to teach people according to their needs; if they have not yet aroused the aspiration for enlightenment, they will quickly be able to arouse the determination for unexcelled, complete perfect enlightenment. 
Any who see any buddha before having entered the absolute state will speedily enter the absolute state. 
Any who see any buddha will speedily be able to purify all roots of goodness, mundane and supramundane. 
Any who see any buddha will speedily manage to destroy all obstruction. 
Any who see any buddha will speedily be able to acquire fearless intellectual powers. 
“All buddhas have ten kinds of pure things that should always be remembered. 
What are they? All buddhas’ past events should be always remembered by enlightening beings. 
All buddhas’ pure superior actions should be always remembered by enlightening beings. 
All buddhas’ fulfillment of the ways of transcendence should be always remembered by enlightening beings. 
All buddhas’ accomplishment of great undertakings should always be remembered by enlightening beings. 
All buddhas’ accumulation of virtues should always be remembered by enlightening beings. 
All buddhas’ embodiment of spiritual practice should always be remembered by enlightening beings. 
All buddhas’ actualization of true enlightenment should always be remembered by enlightening beings. 
The infinity of all buddhas’ physical forms should always be remembered by enlightening beings. 
The infinity of all buddhas’ spiritual powers should always be remembered by enlightening beings. 
All buddhas’ ten powers and confidences should always be remembered by enlightening beings. 
“All buddhas have ten stations of omniscience. What are they? 
All buddhas instantly know the minds and mental patterns of all sentient beings of past, present, and future. 
All buddhas instantly know the acts and the resulting consequences of those acts amassed by all sentient beings in past, present, and future. 
All buddhas instantly know the needs of all sentient beings and teach and civilize them by means of correct diagnosis, prescription, and occult influence. 
All buddhas instantly know the mental characteristics of all sentient beings in the cosmos, manifest the emergence of Buddha in all places, and take those beings into their care by expedient means. 
All buddhas instantly manifest expositions of teaching according to the mental inclinations, desires, and understandings of all sentient beings in the cosmos, causing them to become civilized. 
All buddhas instantly know the inclinations of the minds of all sentient beings in the cosmos and manifest spiritual powers for them. 
All buddhas instantly manifest appearance in all places according to all the sentient beings who may be taught, and explain to them that the embodiment of Buddha is not graspable. 
All buddhas instantly reach all places in the cosmos, all sentient beings, and their particular paths. 
All buddhas instantly go in response to any beings who think of them, wherever they may be. 
All buddhas instantly know the understandings and desires of all sentient beings and manifest immeasurable physical forms for their benefit. 
“All buddhas have ten kinds of immeasurable inconceivable buddha-concentrations. 
What are they? 
All buddhas, while always in correct concentration, instantly reach all places to expound the sublime Teaching for sentient beings everywhere. 
All buddhas, while always in correct concentration, instantly reach all places to teach all sentient beings ultimate selflessness. 
All buddhas, while always in correct concentration, instantly enter the past, present, and future in all places. 
All buddhas, while always in correct concentration, instantly enter the immense buddha-lands in the ten directions, pervading all places. 
All buddhas, while always in correct concentration, instantly manifest innumerable various buddha-bodies in all places. 
All buddhas, while always in correct concentration, instantly in all places manifest body, speech, and mind in accord with the various understandings of sentient beings. 
All buddhas, while always in correct concentration, instantly, in all places, explain the ultimate reality of all things, beyond desire. 
All buddhas, while always in correct concentration, instantly, in all places, expound the inherent nature of interdependent origination of everything. 
All buddhas, while always in correct concentration, instantly, in all places, manifest immeasurable worldly and transcendental great adornments, causing sentient beings always to get to see Buddha. 
All buddhas, while always in correct concentration, instantly, in all places, enable sentient beings to master all enlightened teachings, attain infinite liberation, and ultimately reach unsurpassed transcendence. 
“Buddhas have ten kinds of unimpeded liberation. What are they? 
All buddhas can cause the emergence in the world of untold buddhas in a single atom. 
All buddhas can cause untold buddhas actively teaching to appear in a single atom. 
All buddhas can cause untold sentient beings being taught and guided to appear in a single atom. 
All buddhas can cause untold buddha-lands to appear in a single atom. 
All buddhas can cause untold enlightening beings receiving predictions of buddhahood to appear in a single atom. 
All buddhas can cause all buddhas of past, future, and present to appear in a single atom. 
All buddhas can cause all past, present, and future miracles to appear in a single atom. 
All buddhas can cause all sentient beings of past, present, and future to appear in a single atom. 
All buddhas can cause all past, present, and future buddha-works to appear in a single atom.” The Ocean of Physical Marks of the Ten Bodies of Buddha “Next there is a mark of greatness called clouds of light of the Buddha-eye. 
It is arrayed with discs of the finest jewels and radiates the light of the lamp of virtue and knowledge of the enlightened, illumining the oceans of worlds in all universes, making all buddhas and enlightening beings visible. This is the third. 
“The top of Buddha’s head is embellished with these thirty-two marks of great people. 
This is the thirty-sixth. “The buddha’s tongue has another mark of greatness called cloud of reality realms. 
“The tip of Buddha’s tongue has a mark of greatness called cloud of light illuminating the cosmos, adorned with wish-fulfilling jewels, always spontaneously producing golden flames wherein appear reflections of the ocean of all buddhas. It also causes subtle sounds to resonate, filling all the boundless worlds, each sound containing all sounds, and explaining the sublime truth, to the joy of the hearers, who appreciate for measureless eons without forgetting. This is the thirty-eighth. “The tip of Buddha’s tongue has another mark of greatness, called cloud lighting up the cosmos, adorned with diamonds, emanating subtle lights of myriad colors, filling infinite lands of the ten directions throughout the cosmos, all pure, all containing infinite buddhas and enlightening beings, such uttering all kinds of sublime messages, received in person by all enlightening beings. 
“The Buddha’s lower left teeth have a mark of greatness called clouds of radiant illumination from jewel lamps, adorned with all kinds of beautiful jewels emitting flowers and scents, emanating pure light from clouds of lamp flames, filling all oceans of worlds, revealing therein all buddhas sitting on lotus blossoms surrounded by enlightening beings. This is the forty-third. “The Buddha’s upper left teeth have a mark of greatness called cloud reflecting the enlightened ones, adorned with gold of pure brilliance, nets and flowers of jewels, emanating great spheres of flames filling the cosmos, revealing therein all the buddhas using their spiritual powers in space to distribute the milk of the Teaching, the lamps of the Teaching, the treasure of the Teaching, to educate all groups of enlightening beings. This is the forty-fourth. 
This is the forty-eighth. The Buddha’s right shoulder has another mark of greatness, called cloud of supreme jewels shining radiantly, pure as gold in color, emanating crystal light filling the cosmos, revealing all enlightening beings therein. 
“The Buddha’s left shoulder has a mark of greatness called cloud of supreme light illuminating the cosmos, variously adorned like the marks on his crown and between his eyebrows, emitting golden, lotus-colored, and jewel-colored lights forming great networks of flames filling the cosmos, showing therein all occult powers. This is the fiftieth. The Buddha’s left shoulder has another mark of greatness, called cloud of light shining everywhere, whirling to the right, adorned with gold and diamonds, radiating lights of fragrant flames of flowers of jewels, filling the cosmos, showing all buddhas and all purified lands therein. This is the fifty-first. 
The Buddha’s left shoulder has another mark of greatness, called cloud of universal radiance, whirling to the right, with subtle mysterious adornments, emitting pure light from clouds of flames of buddhas’ lamps, filling the cosmos, revealing the various adornments of all enlightening beings therein, all superbly beautiful. This is the fifty-second. “The Buddha’s chest has a mark of greatness shaped like a gammadion called oceanic cluster of auspicious signs, adorned with crystal jewel flowers emitting all kinds of orbs of light flames of the colors of all jewels, filling the cosmos, making it all pure, and also producing marvelous sounds expressing the ocean of the teachings. This is the fifty-third. 
“To the left of the mark of auspicious signs there is a mark of greatness called clouds of light of revelation, adorned with countless enlightening beings sitting on jewel lotus blossoms, emanating jewel-flame light beams, studded with diamonds, purifying all oceans of universes, revealing therein infinite buddhas and their sublime voices expounding all truths. This is the fifty-ninth. “There is another mark of greatness to the left of the mark of auspicious signs, called cloud of light appearing throughout the cosmos, adorned by an ocean of jewels, emitting great light pervading all worlds, showing the enlightening beings therein. This is the sixtieth. 
“Buddha’s left palm has a mark of greatness called cloud of flaming wheels, expanding and magically causing all the sites of enlightenment in the cosmos to appear, adorned with a thousand-spoked wheel of sunlike jewels, radiating great beams of light filling all oceans of worlds, revealing therein all enlightening beings, expounding the ocean of practices of Universal Good, entering into all buddhas’ lands, each enlightening innumerable sentient beings. This is the seventy-sixth. “Buddha’s genital organ has a mark of greatness called cloud emanating the voice of Buddha, adorned with all kinds of fine jewels, emitting flowery flame light from crystal lamps, the light refulgent, containing the colors of all jewels, illuminating all universes in space, showing therein all buddhas traveling, coming and going, reaching everywhere. This is the seventy-seventh. 
“Buddha’s left thigh has a mark of greatness called cloud showing the infinite oceans of features of all buddhas, adorned with an ocean of all jewels resting on each one, traveling vast distances, emanating pure light shining on all sentient beings, causing them all to seek the supreme state of buddhahood. This is the eighty-first. “Buddha’s deerlike right calf has a mark of greatness called cloud of all universes in space, adorned with sublime jewels of light. The calf is round and straight and walks well; it emanates pure golden light illuminating all buddhas’ worlds and emits great sounds causing them all to quake. 
“The jewel hair on the Buddha’s lower legs has a mark of greatness called cloud of manifestations of reflected images of the cosmos. 
This is the eighty-sixth. “On Buddha’s left instep is a mark of greatness called cloud of manifestations of all buddhas, adorned with jewels, emanating jewel light moment to moment showing the miraculous displays of all buddhas, as well as their oceans of teachings, and the enlightenment sites they sit at, this continuing unbroken forever. This is the eighty-seventh. 
“Between Buddha’s left toes is a mark of greatness called cloud showing the ocean of all buddhas, adorned with jewel flowers, garlands of fragrant flaming lamps, and discs of all jewels, constantly emitting pure lights from an ocean of jewels, filling space, reaching all worlds in the ten directions, showing therein such features of all buddhas and enlightening beings as their universal voices and their mystic gammadion signs of felicity, benefiting all the infinite sentient beings. This is the eighty-ninth. 
This is the ninety-seventh. “Vairocana Buddha has as many such marks of greatness as atoms in ten Flower Treasury oceans of worlds, each limb adorned with sublime marks of myriad jewels.” The Qualities of the Buddha’s Embellishments and Lights “The thousand-spoked wheels on the soles of my feet as an enlightening being were called king of universal light. They had an embellishment, called the foremost sphere, always emanating forty kinds of light, among them a light called pure virtue, illumining as many worlds as atoms in a hundred trillion buddha-lands, causing all sentient beings to develop maturity according to their various actions and inclinations. Sentient beings in excruciating pain in uninterrupted hell, encountering this light, were born in Tushita heaven after their lives ended. 
When they were born in heaven, they heard the sound of the celestial drum declare to them, ‘Very good! 
Godlings, the enlightening being Vairocana has entered undefiled concentration; you should pay respects.’ Then the godlings, hearing this exhortation from the sound of the celestial drum, thought, ‘How wonderful—what is the cause of this subtle sound?’ Then the drum answered, ‘The sound I make is produced by the power of roots of goodness. 
Godlings, just as I speak of myself without attachment to self or to what is mine, so too do the buddhas say they are buddhas, yet have no attachment to “I” or “mine.” Just as my sound does not come from the east or from the west, the south, the north, or the intermediate directions or the zenith or nadir, in the same way the achievement of buddhahood as a consequence of actions does not come from any of the ten directions. 
It is as when you were in hell before: the hell and your bodies did not come from any of the ten directions; it was only due to your deluded evil deeds and bondage by folly that you were incarnated in hell—this has no basis, it does not come from anywhere. The enlightening being Vairocana, by spiritual power, emanated great light, yet this light did not come from any of the ten directions; in the same way, my sound does not come from any of the ten directions—it is just the power of good roots of concentration and by the spiritual power of transcendent wisdom that produces this pure sound and manifests these various abilities. 
Just as Sumeru, the polar mountain, has thirty-three celestial palaces of exalted splendor, with various appurtenances that do not come from any of the ten directions, likewise my sound does not come from any of the ten directions. 
Just as I teach as many sentient beings as there are atoms in a trillion worlds, each in accord with their inclinations, causing them great joy, yet do not get tired of them or shrink from them, and I do not become proud or heedless, so also does the enlightening being Vairocana do the same, while abiding in undefiled concentration. 
From one embellishment on his right palm he emanates one ray of light that manifests innumerable magical powers such as even individually liberated ones cannot know, much less sentient beings. 
You should go to that enlightening being and attend and serve him. Do not indulge in the pleasures of the senses anymore—attachment to sensual desires obstructs roots of goodness. 
Just as the world-ending holocaust completely burns away the polar mountain, so also does craving bind up the mind and prevent it from developing the will to remember Buddha. 
You should be grateful for your blessings and requite the favor you have received. 
Many ingrates meet untimely deaths and are reborn in hell. 
You were formerly in hell, when your bodies were illumined with light and you left there and were reborn here. You should now quickly rededicate and increase your roots of goodness. 
Just as I, the heavenly drum, am not male or female, yet can produce measureless, boundless, inconceivable things, so too you gods and goddesses are not male or female yet are able to enjoy all kinds of sublime palaces and groves. 
Just as my heavenly drum is not born and does not perish, the same is true of material form, sensation, perception, action, and consciousness. If you can understand this, know that you will then enter the concentration defined by independence.’ “The godlings, having heard this message, realized unprecedented wonder. Then they all magically produced myriad clouds of flowers, fragrances, music, banners, parasols, and eulogies, and went together to the palace where the enlightening being Vairocana was staying. 
Joining their palms in respect, they stood to one side and wished to behold him, but they could not see him. The godlings then said, ‘The enlightening being Vairocana has already passed away from here and been born in the human world, in the house of King Shuddhodana. He has mounted the sandalwood bower and is in the womb of Lady Maya.’ Then the godlings, by means of the celestial eye, saw the body of the enlightening being in the family of the king Shuddhodana in the human realm, being attended by gods of the Brahma heavens and heavens of desire. 
The godlings then thought, ‘If we do not go to the enlightening being and pay our respects, and should give rise to even a single thought of attachment to these celestial palaces, that would not be right.’ “Then each of the godlings, with a retinue of a hundred million, was going to go down to earth. 
At that point the celestial drum produced a voice telling them, ‘The great enlightening being has not ended his life here and been reborn there: it is just that he has, by spiritual power, caused sentient beings to perceive him according to their psychological needs. 
Just as I now am not visible to the eye, yet can produce a voice, so also the great enlighening being, in undefiled concentration, is not visible to the eye, yet can appear to be born anywhere, without vain discrimination, free from conceit, without attachments. 
You should arouse the determination for unexcelled, complete perfect enlightenment, purify your minds, lead well-behaved lives, and repent of and get rid of all obstructions due to past actions, obstructions due to afflictions, obstructions due to retribution, and obstructions due to views; with bodies as many as beings in the cosmos, with tongues as many as beings in the cosmos, with good deeds of body, speech, and mind as many as beings in the cosmos, repent of and get rid of all obstructions and faults.’ “The godlings, hearing this, attained unprecedented wonder and were very joyful. They asked, ‘How does the great enlightening being repent of and get rid of all faults?’ The celestial drum, by the power of roots of goodness of concentration of the enlightening being, said, ‘The enlightening being knows that conditioning acts do not come from any particular location, yet they accumulate and dwell in the mind. They come only from delusion and have no abode. 
The enlightening being clearly sees this with certainty and has no doubt or confusion. 
Just as I, the celestial drum, speak of actions and consequences, of practice and discipline, of joy and peace, and of various concentrations, so do buddhas and enlightening beings speak of “I” and “mine,” speak of sentient beings, of covetousness, wrath, and delusion and their various actions, yet there really is no self or possession—all actions performed, the resulting consequences of the six paths of transmigration, cannot be found wherever you may seek. 
Just as my voice is not born and does not perish, while the celestials who do evil do not hear my voice but the voice waking them up by means of hell, so also are all actions neither born nor perishing, while according to their practice and accumulation their consequences are experienced. 
My drum sound is eternally inexhaustible and uninterrupted, and neither coming nor going can be apprehended in it; if there were coming or going, there would be extinction and permanence—the buddhas never say there is extinction or permanence, except as an expedient to develop sentient beings. 
Just as my sound makes itself available to beings in infinite worlds according to their mentalities, so do all buddhas make themselves visible according to the mentalities of beings. 
Suppose there is a glass mirror called “reflector,” clearly reflecting, equal in size to ten worlds, with the images of all the mountains and rivers, and all the sentient beings, including in the hells, the animals and ghosts, all reflected therein—what do you think, can you say those images enter and exit the mirror?’ The godlings answered, ‘No.’ ‘All actions are also like this; though they can produce resulting consequences, there is no place they come or go. 
Just as a magician deceives people’s eyes by illusion, so do actions also do the same. 
If you know this, this is true repentance of all evils so that all are cleared.’ “When this teaching was spoken, the Tushita godlings in worlds as numerous as atoms in ten quintillion buddha-lands attained acceptance of the nonorigination of all things; immeasurable, inconceivable infinities of godlings of the six heavens of the realm of desire were inspired to seek unexcelled, complete perfect enlightenment; all the goddesses of the heavens of the desire realm relinquished the female body and became determined to attain supreme enlightenment. 
Then the godlings, because of attaining the ten stages on hearing the tremendous dedication of Universal Good told, because of attaining concentration adorned by various powers, and because of repenting of and clearing away all serious hindrances by means of pure physical, verbal, and mental actions equal in number to living beings, thereupon saw lotus blossoms made of all precious substances, as many blossoms as atoms in ten quintillion buddha-lands, with an enlightening being sitting on each blossom emanating great beams of light; in those beams of light were as many buddhas as there are living beings, sitting in the lotus posture expounding the teaching in accordance with the mentalities of sentient beings—yet still not even a little of the power of undefiled concentration was as yet manifested. “Then the godlings, by means of the flowers and other things they had produced before, again magically produced in each pore of their bodies as many clouds of fine flowers and so on as there are living beings, to offer to the realized one Vairocana, and took them and scattered them on the Buddha; all of them hovered over the Buddha’s body while the fragrant clouds rained over worlds as many as atoms in countless buddha-lands. Any sentient beings who were enveloped in that fragrance became physically peaceful and blissful, like a mendicant who has entered the fourth stage of meditation, in whom all obstructions due to past actions vanish. 
Sentient beings have five hundred internal afflictions and five hundred external afflictions relating to form, sound, smell, flavor, and tactile feeling; those rife with covetousness have 21,000, those rife with anger have 21,000, those rife with delusion have 21,000, and those equally habituated to all three also have 21,000—but if they smell this fragrance, they realize that all these are unreal. Once they realize this, they develop pure roots of goodness with the light of mystic power, like clouds of fragrant banners. 
“Those who see the canopies produced by the enlightening beings plant the innumerable roots of goodness of universal monarchs of the pure gold net of the tenth stage of enlightening. 
When enlightening beings are in this status of universal monarch, they edify beings in worlds as numerous as atoms in ten quintillion buddha-lands. In the case of the buddha called Knowledge Like the Moon, of the world called Clear Mirror, there are always monks, nuns, laymen, laywomen, and others from countless worlds who project their bodies to come listen to the Teaching; that buddha, without a moment’s pause, relates to them the events of former lives. Any sentient beings who hear the name of the buddha will surely be reborn in the land of the Buddha. That case of enlighening beings in the rank of universal monarch with the pure golden net is also like this: 
any who encounter their light will surely attain the tenth stage of enlightening beings, because of the power of roots of goodness previously cultivated. When one has attained the first meditation, though one’s life has not yet ended, one can see the palaces in the Brahma heaven and can experience the bliss of the Brahma world; likewise those who attain the other stages of meditation. 
The great enlightening beings in the rank of universal monarch with the pure golden net radiate pure light such that any beings who are touched by it all gain the tenth stage of enlightening and attain immeasurable light of knowledge, acquire ten kinds of pure eyes, ten kinds of pure ears, noses, tongues, bodies, and ten kinds of pure intellects; they accomplish immeasurable profound concentrations and achieve such a pure physical eye. 
“Suppose someone took ten trillion buddha-lands and reduced them to atoms, and then reduced to atoms as many buddha-lands as those atoms, then put all those atoms in his left hand and carried them past an equal number of worlds to the east, and then put down one atom, and continued this way to the east until all the atoms were exhausted, and did the same in the other nine directions: 
if all the worlds in the ten directions, both those in which he had deposited an atom and those in which he had not, were all assembled to form a single buddha-land, do you think that the immeasurable vastness of this buddha-land would be conceivable or not?” Jewel Hand said, “It would not be conceivable. 
The enormous size of such a land would be immeasurable, extraordinary, inconceivable. 
If any sentient beings heard this comparison and believed and understood it, that would be even more extraordinary.” The Buddha said, “This is so, Jewel Hand. 
It is as you say. If any good man or woman should hear this example and believe in it, I would give them the prediction that they will certainly attain unexcelled, complete perfect enlightenment and will acquire the unsurpassed knowledge of buddhas. 
“Suppose again, Jewel Hand, that someone reduced to atoms as many enormous buddha-lands of the magnitude described above as atoms in a hundred billion buddha-lands, and deposited each of these atoms, as in the foregoing example, and all of these worlds, those on which an atom was deposited as well as those in between, were united in a single buddha-land. 
Then again suppose this buddha-land were reduced to atoms, and so on, repeating this process eighty times: 
the enlightening being’s pure physical eye, a consequence of action, can clearly see in a single instant every particle in all those immense buddha-lands, and also see buddhas as numerous as atoms in ten billion immense buddha-lands, just as the pure light of the crystal mirror reflects as many worlds as atoms in ten buddha-lands. 
Jewel Hand, all this is accomplished by the virtues of the most profound concentration of the universal monarch of the pure gold net.” The Practice of Universal Good “I do not see anything that is a bigger mistake than for enlightening beings to become angry at other enlightening beings. 
Because if enlightening beings become angry at other enlightening beings, that creates a million obstacles. What are those million obstacles? 
They are the obstacle of not seeing enlightenment, the obstacle of not hearing the true Teaching, the obstacle of being born in an impure world, the obstacle of being born in miserable states, the obstacle of being born in places where it is difficult to become enlightened, the obstacle of sickliness, the obstacle of being the object of much slander, the obstacle of being born stupid, the obstacle of loss of right mindfulness and recollection, the obstacle of lack of intelligence, obstacles of eye, ear, nose, tongue, body, and mind, the obstacle of bad advisers, the obstacle of bad companions, the obstacle of inclination toward practice of individualistic liberation, the obstacle of inclination toward associating with the vulgar, the obstacle of not believing in people of great spiritual power, the obstacle of living with people who have strayed from correct perception, the obstacle of being born in a family of heretics, the obstacle of dwelling in the realm of demons, the obstacle of being estranged from the right Teaching of Buddha, the obstacle of not seeing good companions, the obstacle of blockage of roots of goodness, the obstacle of increase of bad conditions, the obstacle of meanness, the obstacle of being born in a remote area, the obstacle of being born in a family of evil people, the obstacle of being born among evil spirits, evil ghosts, hobgoblins, demons, titans, vipers, and so on, the obstacle of not caring for the Buddha teachings, the obstacle of habituation to infantile behavior, the obstacle of clinging to the small vehicle of individual salvation, the obstacle of not liking the Great Vehicle of universal salvation, the obstacle of fearfulness, the obstacle of anxiety, the obstacle of clinging to mundane routines, the obstacle of not concentrating on the way to enlightenment, the obstacle of not liking to see or hear of the spiritual powers of Buddha, the obstacle of not acquiring the faculties of enlightening beings, the obstacle of not applying the purifying practices of enlightening beings, the obstacle of shrinking from the determination of enlightening beings, the obstacle of not making the great vow of enlightening beings, the obstacle of not developing the determination for omniscience, the obstacle of slacking off from the practice of enlightening beings, the obstacle of not being able to purify acts, the obstacle of not being able to incorporate great virtues, the obstacle of the power of knowledge not being clear and keen, the obstacle of shutting off great wisdom and knowledge, the obstacle of not preserving the practices of enlightening beings, the obstacle of inclination to repudiate all words of wisdom, the obstacle of estrangement from the enlightenment of the buddhas, the obstacle of inclination to abide in the realms of demons, the obstacle of not concentrating on cultivating the realm of buddhahood, the obstacle of not definitively making the universal commitment of enlightening beings, the obstacle of not liking to live with enlightening beings, the obstacle of not seeking the roots of goodness of enlightening beings, the obstacle of being opinionated and suspicious, the obstacle of the continual befuddlement of the mind, the obstacle of being unwilling to give because of inability to practice the impartial generosity of enlightening beings, the obstacle of transgression of precepts by being unable to maintain the precepts of the Buddha, the obstacle of foolish malevolence and anger due to inability to achieve tolerance and forbearance, the obstacle of the defilement of laziness due to inability to act with the great vigor of enlightening beings, the obstacle of distraction and confusion due to inability to attain concentration, the obstacle of misused intellect due to failure to cultivate transcendent wisdom, the obstacle of lack of familiarity with what is so and what is not so, the obstacle of having no means to liberate beings, the obstacle of inability to contemplate the knowlege of enlightening beings, the obstacle of not knowing enlightening beings’ means of emancipation, the obstacle of failure to develop the ten great eyes of enlightening beings and therefore being as if blind, the obstacle of being dumb as an animal due to not hearing the teaching of nonobstruction, the obstacle of destruction of the nose due to not having the marks and embellishments of buddhahood, the obstacle of inability to understand speech and the consequent inability to speak, the obstacle of physical problems due to demeaning sentient beings, the obstacle of mental problems due to lack of control of mind, the obstacle of physical actions due to not keeping the precepts, the obstacle of verbal actions due to continually committing faults of speech, the obstacle of mental actions due to conceiving much covetousness, anger, and erroneous views, the obstacle of seeking the teaching with a thieving mind, the obstacle of cutting off the perspective of enlightening beings, the obstacle of shrinking from the effort of enlightening beings, the obstacle of laziness of mind on the enlightening beings’ way to emancipation, the obstacle of the mind stopping at the entry of the light of knowledge of enlightening beings, the obstacle of becoming weak-minded and incapable of the recollective power of enlightening beings, the obstacle of being unable to retain the teachings of the buddhas, the obstacle of being unable to approach enlightening beings’ path of detachment from birth, the obstacle of inability to cultivate the incorruptible path of enlightening beings, the obstacle of following the absolute state of one-sided detachment, the obstacle of estrangement from the family of the buddhas and enlightening beings of all times. 
“If an enlightening being conceives a single feeling of anger toward enlightening beings, that produces a million obstacles such as these. 
I do not see anything that is as big a mistake as for enlightening beings to become angry at other enlightening beings. 
Therefore, if great enlightening beings want to quickly fulfill the practices of enlightening beings, they should diligently practice ten principles: 
in their minds they should not abandon sentient beings; they should think of enlightening beings as buddhas; they should never slander any teachings of the buddhas, they should know that there is no end to different lands; they should be profoundly devoted to enlightening practices; they should not give up the cosmic, spacelike, impartial mind of enlightenment; they should contemplate enlightenment and enter the power of buddhas; they should cultivate unobstructed intellectual and expository powers; they should teach and enlighten beings tirelessly; they should live in all worlds without attachment in their minds. 
“When great enlightening beings are living by these ten principles, they are able to embody ten kinds of purity. 
What are these ten? 
Purity of comprehension of the most profound truth; purity of association with good associates; purity of preserving the Buddha teachings; purity of comprehension of the realm of space; purity of profound penetration of the realm of reality; purity of observation of infinite minds; purity of having the same roots of goodness as all enlightening beings; purity of nonattachment to the various ages; purity of observation of past, present, and future; purity of practice of all enlightening teachings. 
“When great enlightening beings persist in these ten things, they become imbued with ten kinds of broad knowledge: 
that is, knowledge of all sentient beings’ mental behavior; knowledge of the consequences of actions of all sentient beings; knowledge of all Buddha teachings; knowledge of the profound, occult import of all Buddha teachings; knowledge of all methods of concentration spells; knowledge of interpretation of all writings; knowledge of the language and speech of all sentient beings; knowledge of manifestation of their bodies in all worlds, knowledge of manifestation of their reflections in all assemblies; knowledge of embodying omniscience in all realms of being. 
“Once great enlightening beings are established in this knowledge, they realize ten kinds of universal entry: 
all worlds enter one point, one point enters all worlds; all beings’ bodies enter one body, one body enters all beings’ bodies; untold eons enter one instant, one instant enters untold eons; all Buddhist principles enter one principle, one principle enters all Buddhist principles; untold places enter one place, one place enters all places; untold faculties enter one faculty, one faculty enters untold faculties; all faculties enter nonfaculty, nonfaculty enters all faculties; all perceptions enter one perception, one perception enters all perceptions; one utterance enters all utterances, all utterances enter one utterance; all pasts, presents, and futures enter one time frame, one time frame enters all pasts, presents, and futures. 
“Once great enlightening beings have contemplated in this way, they abide in ten kinds of sublime mind: 
the sublime mind in which none of the perceptions and thoughts of sentient beings can abide; the sublime mind of the ultimate realm of space; the sublime mind of the boundless cosmos; the sublime mind of all the profound esoteric principles of buddhahood; the sublime mind of the extremely profound state of nondifferentiation; the sublime mind annihilating all doubt and confusion; the sublime mind of the nondifferentiated equality of all worlds; the sublime mind of the equality of all buddhas of past, present, and future; the sublime mind of the infinity of the power of all buddhas. 
“Once great enlightening beings abide in these ten kinds of sublime mind, they acquire ten kinds of technical knowlege of the Buddha teachings: 
technical knowledge comprehending the most profound Buddha teaching; technical knowledge of the production of far-reaching Buddha teachings; technical knowledge of exposition of all kinds of Buddha teachings; technical knowledge of realizing the Buddha teaching of equality; technical knowledge of understanding the Buddha teaching of differentiation; technical knowledge of understanding the Buddha teaching of nondifferentiation; technical knowledge of profound penetration of the Buddha teaching of adornment; technical knowledge of penetrating the Buddha teachings by one means; technical knowledge of penetrating the Buddha teachings by innumerable means; technical knowledge of nondifference of the boundless Buddha teachings; technical knowledge of nonregression in the Buddha teachings by one’s own mind and one’s own power. 
“When great enlightening beings have heard this teaching, they should all be inspired and respectfully accept and hold it. 
Great enlightening beings who hold this teaching quickly attain unexcelled, complete perfect enlightenment with a minimum of effort, and all are enabled to embody all qualities of buddhahood, equal to the qualities of the buddhas of all times.” Then, by the spiritual power of the Buddha as well as by natural law, in each of the ten directions as many worlds as atoms in ten unspeakable numbers of tens of quintillions of buddha-lands all quaked in six ways and rained showers from clouds of all flowers surpassing those of the heavens, as well as clouds of perfumes, incenses, robes, canopies, banners, pennants, jewels, and all kinds of decorations; there rained clouds of music, clouds of enlightening beings, clouds of physical forms of untold buddhas, clouds of infinite praises of the buddhas, clouds of voices of buddhas filling all universes, untold clouds of magically arrayed worlds, untold clouds developing enlightenment, untold clouds of light shining, and untold clouds of mystic manifestations expounding the Teaching. As in this world, at the site of enlightenment, under the tree of enlightenment, in the palace of the enlightening being, the Buddha, the Completely Enlightened One, was seen expounding this teaching, so it was in all worlds in the ten directions. 
Then, owing to the spiritual power of the Buddha as well as by natural law, there came to this land as many great enlightening beings as atoms in ten buddha-lands from each of the ten directions, from beyond as many worlds as atoms in ten infinities of buddha-lands. Filling the ten directions, they spoke these words to Universal Good: 
“It is very good, Offspring of Buddha, that you can explain this profound teaching of the giving of the prophecy of enlightenment, the greatest promise of the buddhas. We are all named Universal Good, the same as you, and each have come to this land from a world called Universal Excellence, from the company of buddhas called Freedom Representative of Universality. All, by the spiritual power of Buddha, expound this teaching, with such assemblies and such utterances, all equal, with neither increase nor decrease. We have all come to this enlightenment site by the Buddha’s spiritual power to be witnesses for you. 
As we innumerable enlightening beings serve as witnesses at this site of enlightenment, the same is so in all worlds in the ten directions.” Then the great enlightening being Universal Good, by the spiritual power of the Buddha and by the power of his own roots of goodness, looked over the ten directions, throughout the cosmos; wishing to elucidate the practice of enlightening beings, to tell of the realm of enlightenment of the buddhas, to explain the realm of great vows, to explain the reckoning of ages of all worlds, to clarify the timely appearance of the buddhas, to explain how the buddhas develop beings according to their faculties, appearing to let them attend them, to make it clear that the effort of the buddhas’ appearance in the world is not wasted, to make it clear that roots of goodness that are planted will surely bear fruit, and to clarify how enlightening beings of great spiritual power manifest forms for all sentient beings to teach and enlighten them, spoke these verses: 
The enlightening beings of the past Were supreme lions of humanity; The practices they carried out I shall tell in order. 
I will also tell the numbers of ages The worlds and acts And the peerless honored ones Who emerged therein. 
As for those past buddhas Who appeared in the world by their vows, How did they destroy afflictions For all sentient beings? 
All the lions of philosophy Continue practice to fulfillment, Attaining the state of equality of buddhas, The realm of omniscience. 
Seeing all the human lions Of past ages Emanating great networks of lights Illumining the worlds of the ten directions, They reflected and made their vows: 
“I should be a lamp for the world Replete with the virtues of buddhahood, Their ten powers, their omniscience. 
All sentient beings Burn with greed, anger, and folly; I should save and free them, Have them extinguish the pains of the states of woe.” They make such vows, Steadfast, unregressing, To cultivate all enlightening practices And gain the unimpeded ten powers. 
Having made such vows, They cultivate practice without shrinking back. 
In one eon of virtue A thousand buddhas emerged in the world: Their universal eyes I will explain in order. 
As in one eon of virtue So too in measureless eons; Those future buddhas’ practices I will explain distinctly. 
As in one type of buddha-land, So in numberless lands; The practices of future buddhas I will now explain. 
Buddhas’ successive emergence in the world, What were their vows, what their names, What were the prophecies they received, What were their life spans, What were the true principles they practiced Solely seeking the unobstructed path, Who were the beings they taught, How long their right teaching remained in the world, What were the buddha-lands they purified, The sentient beings there and the cycles of teaching, Their explanation of proper and improper timing, Progressively purifying beings, What were the actions of the beings, Their patterns and inclinations, High, middling, low, not the same, How they influenced them to practice— Penetrating such knowledge, The future buddhas cultivated the supreme practice, Always doing the work of Universal Good, Widely freeing the living. 
Physical actions unimpeded, Verbal actions all pure, Mental actions also thus, Always like this at all times— Enlightening beings acting thus Consummate the path of Universal Good, Producing the sun of pure knowledge Illuminating the cosmos. 
The lands of future eons Are unspeakably many in number; They know them all in an instant Without discrimination among them. 
Those who practice can enter into Such a supreme state: Of these principles of enlightening beings I shall tell a little. 
Knowledge and wisdom boundless, They realize the scope of buddhahood; Entering completely therein, Their practice does not regress. 
Replete with Universally Good wisdom, They fulfill Universally Good vows And enter the peerless knowledge; I shall tell of their practice. 
In a single atom They see all worlds; If sentient beings should hear of this, They’d go mad in confusion. 
As in one atom, So in all atoms; All worlds enter therein— So inconceivable is it. 
In every single atom Are all things of all places and times; The states and lands, innumerable, The enlightening discern and know. 
In every single atom Are countless kinds of buddha-lands, And each kind is also countless; They know all in one. 
All the various different features That there are in the cosmos, The types of beings, each different, They can discern and know. 
Deeply entering subtle knowledge, They distinguish the worlds; The becoming and decay of all ages They can clearly explain. 
They know the length and brevity of all ages, And that past, present, and future are one moment: The sameness and difference of myriad practices They all distinctly know. 
They penetrate all worlds, Vast and small, One body countless lands, One land, countless bodies. 
The innumerable features Of the worlds of different species In the ten directions They know entirely. 
Those of most profound knowledge Comprehend the becoming and decay Of the numberless lands Of past, present, and future. 
Of the worlds in the ten directions, Some are forming, some decaying: Infinite though they be, The virtuous comprehend them all. 
There are some lands With variously adorned ground, And the beings are also adorned— This is due to purity of action. 
Then again some lands Have countless kinds of pollution; This is due to beings experiencing everything According to their acts. 
Infinite, boundless worlds, The enlightening know are one land; Thus do they enter all lands, Whose number cannot be known. 
All worlds Enter one land: The worlds do not become one, Yet there is no mixup. 
Worlds are inverted and upright, Some high, some low— All are the perceptions of beings: The enlightening discern them all. 
The wide worlds Are infinite, boundless; They know all kinds are one And know that one is various. 
The Universally Good offspring of Buddha Can, by Universally Good knowledge, Know the number of lands, Though the number is boundless. 
They know the projections of worlds, The projections of lands and beings, The projections of teachings and buddhas— All to the ultimate point. 
All worlds, Microand macrocosmic, Various different arrays— All arise from action. 
Infinite enlightening beings Learn to enter the reality realm; Their spiritual powers free, They reach everywhere in the ten directions. 
If the names of those worlds were spoken For eons as many as beings, They still could not be all told— Only Buddha can reveal them. 
The various names Of the worlds and buddhas Could not be fully told Even in countless eons. 
The most excellent wisdom, The teachings of buddhas of all times, Are born from the realm of reality And fill the state of enlightenment. 
With pure, unobstructed mindfulness, Boundless, unimpeded wisdom, They analyze the reality realm To reach the other shore. 
The worlds of the past, Great and small, The arrangements they have developed, Buddhas know in an instant. 
The human lions therein Cultivate the various practices of buddhas, Attain to true awakening, And manifest their freedoms. 
Enlightening beings know all Such buddhas of the future, The most noble of humans In boundless ages to come, All their undertakings, All their various states, How they strive in practice, And therein attain enlightenment. 
They know their congregations, Their life spans, and the beings they teach, By what means they teach, Turning the wheel of truth for the masses. 
Knowing this, enlightening beings Abide in the stage of Universally Good practice, Their knowledge and wisdom, thoroughly clear, Giving birth to all the buddhas. 
They enter deeply Into all the buddha-lands There are in the present And arrive at the reality realm. 
All the present buddhas In all those worlds Are masters of teaching, Unhindered in discourse. 
They also know their congregations, Pure lands, and adaptive powers; For countless million eons They always ponder these things. 
The awesome psychic powers And endless stores of knowledge Of the noble Tamers of the World, The enlightening beings know all. 
Producing unobstructed eyes, Unobstructed ears, noses, bodies, And unobstructed universal tongues, They can gladden sentient beings. 
Their supreme, unobstructed minds Are broad and totally pure; Their knowledge pervading all, They know all things of all times. 
They study all projections, Projections of lands and beings, Of worlds and civilizations, And finally reach the other shore of projections. 
The various distinctions of all worlds All are there due to perceptions and thoughts; Entering buddhas’ knowledge of means, They clearly understand all this. 
For each of untold groups They manifest embodiment Causing all to see the Buddha, And liberating boundless beings. 
The profound knowledge of buddhas Is like the sun coming out in the world, Ever appearing everywhere In all lands. 
They realize all worlds Are provisional names, without reality; Sentient beings and worlds Are like dreams, like shadows. 
They do not produce false discriminatory views About the things of the world: Those free from false discrimination Do not even see false discriminations. 
Measureless, countless eons They understand are one moment; And they know a moment has no moment— Thus do they see the world. 
Innumerable lands They cross over in an instant, Yet through measureless eons They don’t move from their original place. 
Untold eons Are the space of a moment; Not seeing long or short, They find ultimate instantaneousness. 
Mind is in the world, World is in the mind— About this they do not wrongly create Discriminations of duality and nonduality. 
Beings, worlds, ages, Buddhas and Buddha teachings— All are like illusory projections: In the reality realm all is equal. 
Throughout the lands of the ten directions They manifest infinite bodies; Knowing bodies arise from conditions, They have no attachments at all. 
Based on nondual knowledge They manifest the buddhas, Without attachment to nonduality, Knowing there is no duality or nonduality. 
They realize that all worlds Are like flames, like lights, Like echoes, like dreams, Like illusions, like emanations. Thus they accordingly enter The sphere of action of the buddhas And achieve Universally Good knowledge Illumining all the profound realm of truth. 
Attachments to beings and lands They completely give up, Yet rouse minds of great compassion And purify all worlds. 
Enlightening beings always rightly remember The marvelous teachings of the buddhas, Pure and clear as space, Yet producing great expedient means. Seeing the world always deluded, They determine to save and liberate all: Their undertakings are all pure, Extending throughout all universes. 
Buddhas and enlightening beings, Buddhist principles and things of the world— If you see their reality, All are no different from one another. 
Buddhas’ reality-body matrix Is in all worlds, Yet while being in the world Has no attachment to the world. 
Just as in clear water Reflections have no coming or going, The reality-body’s being in the world Is also like this. 
Thus freed from attachment, Body and world are both pure: Clear and still as space, There is no birth at all. 
Knowing the body has no end, No birth and no destruction, Being neither eternal nor impermanent, They show it in all worlds. 
Destroying false views, They point out correct insight: The essence of things has no coming or going, Is uninvolved with self or possession. 
As when a skilled magician Causes various things to appear, Their coming is from nowhere And they go nowhere, The nature of illusions is not finite Nor is it infinite, But in the midst of the crowd He manifests the finite and infinite, Similarly by the mind in silent concentration Cultivating roots of goodness Produces all buddhas, Neither finite nor infinite: 
Finiteness and infinity Are deluded notions— Comprehending all states of being, The enlightening do not cling to finiteness or infinity. 
The buddhas’ most profound truth Is vast, deep, ultimate quiescence; Their profound, measureless knowledge Knows the deepest states. 
Enlightening beings are freed from delusion, Their purity of mind is continuous; By means of spiritual powers They skillfully liberate numberless beings. 
To those not at rest they bring rest, To those at peace they show the site of enlightenment. Thus do they go throughout the cosmos, Their minds without attachment. 
Not dwelling on ultimate reality And not entering nirvana, Thus they go throughout the worlds Enlightening living beings. 
The classes of phenomena and beings They know without being attached; Everywhere showering the rain of truth, They fill and enrich all worlds. 
In all worlds They realize true awakening moment to moment Yet cultivate the practice of enlightening beings Without ever retreating. 
The various bodies in the world They know all completely; Thus knowing physical phenomena They realize the body of buddhas. 
They know all sentient beings, All ages and lands, Throughout the ten directions, boundless, Entering fully into the ocean of knowledge. 
Beings’ forms are infinite; For each the buddhas manifest a body. The buddhas’ bodies are boundless— The wise observe them all. 
What they know in one moment Manifests the buddhas, Impossible to fully tell Even in measureless eons. 
The buddhas can manifest their bodies Passing finally away in any place; In an instant innumerable relics Are individually divided. 
Thus those of certain knowledge Know the infinite will for enlightenment Of the seekers of buddhahood In the ages to come. 
Ability to know in this way All the enlightened ones Of past, present, and future Is called maintaining the practice of Universal Good. 
Thus distinctly knowing Countless stages of practice, Entering the abode of wisdom, The cycle never rolls back. 
Subtle, extensive knowledge Entering deeply into the sphere of buddhahood And having entered, not regressing Is called Universally Good wisdom. 
All the supremely noble ones Enter the realm of buddhahood; Their practice never regressing, They attain unexcelled enlightenment. 
The different individual actions Of infinitely many minds All come from accumulations of conceptions: The equanimous know them all. 
Defiled or undefiled, Learners’ minds, nonlearners’ minds— Untold numbers of minds They know at every moment. 
They know they are not one or two, Not defiled and not pure, And also without mixture— All arise from one’s own notions. 
Thus they clearly see All living beings With minds and thoughts each different Creating various worlds. 
By such means Cultivating supreme practice And being reborn from the Teaching They can be called Universally Good. 
Sentient beings all wrongly produce The conceptions of the good and bad states; Because of this they may be born in heaven Or then again fall into hell. 
Enlightening beings see the worlds As produced by the action of false ideas; Because false ideas are boundless Infinite too are the worlds. 
All lands are manifestations Of the network of conceptions; By the means of the net of illusion One can instantly enter them all. 
Eye, ear, nose, tongue, body, And the intellect too are thus— Conceptions of the world are different; All can be equally contained therein. 
In each object of the eye There are infinite eyes immanent, Their various natures different, Measureless, unspeakable. 
What is seen has no difference And also no mixup; Everyone, according to his own acts, Experiences the resulting consequences. 
The power of Universal Good is infinite, Knowing them all completely; In all objects of eyes There is great knowledge immanent. 
Thus enlightening beings know distinctly Every worldly realm And cultivate all enlightening practices Without ever turning back. Buddhas teach, beings teach, And lands teach too: Everything in all times teaches thus— The enlightening ones know every particular. 
The future is the past, The present is the future, The three times look to each other; The enlightening understand each. 
Thus in infinite ways They awaken the worlds: No boundaries can be found To the means of total knowledge. 
Manifestation of Buddha Now the masses at this enlightenment site were elated, ecstatic; they thought, “How extraordinary! 
Now that the Buddha has radiated great light, surely he will expound a most profound great teaching.” Then the enlightening being Wondrous Qualities of Natural Origination of Buddha, on a lotus blossom seat, bared his right shoulder, knelt on his right knee, joined his palms, turned toward the Buddha with total attention, and spoke these verses: The Truly Awake, the Virtuous, the Great Sage, emerges, Comprehending all objects, reaching the Other Shore, Equal to the buddhas of past, present, and future; Therefore I now pay reverent obeisance. 
Having risen to the shore of the signless realm And appeared in a body magnificently arrayed with wondrous marks, He radiates thousands of undefiled beams of light And destroys the hordes of demons entirely. 
All the worlds in the ten directions He causes to quake without exception, Yet without frightening a single sentient being Such is the spiritual power of the Felicitous One. 
Equal in essence to space and the cosmos, He can remain as stable as they. All the living, without count or measure, He has destroyed evil and removed defilements. 
Working hard at austere practices for countless ages, He fully attained the highest enlightenment, His knowledge unhindered in the midst of all objects, Of the same nature as all the buddhas. 
The Guide radiates these great beams of light, Shaking the worlds in the ten directions; Displaying measureless mystic powers, They have returned and entered my body. 
Well able to learn the definitive teaching, Countless enlightening beings have assembled here And inspired me to ask about the Teaching, Wherefore I now petition the Sovereign Teacher. 
This assembly is now clear and serene, Able to liberate all in the world, Their wisdom boundless, without attachments— Such eminent sages have all gathered here. 
The benefactor of the world, the noble guide, With wisdom and energy beyond measure Now illumines the crowd with great light Causing me to ask about the unexcelled Teaching. 
Who can truly expound in full The profound realm of the great wizard? 
Then the Buddha emitted a great beam of light, called unimpeded confidence, from his mouth, accompanied by countless trillions of light beams, illumining all worlds in the cosmos, circling ten times to the right, showing the various controlling powers of the Buddha, awakening innumerable enlightening beings, shaking all the worlds of the ten directions, extinguishing the pains of all states of misery, eclipsing all abodes of demons, and showing all the buddhas on the seat of enlightenment attaining true awakening, as well as the assemblies at all those sites of enlightenment. 
Having done all this, the lights came back, circled the assembly of enlightening beings, and entered the mouth of the enlightening being Universally Good, after which the body and lion throne of Universally Good surpassed their former condition, and that of the other enlightening beings a hundredfold, surpassing all except the lion throne of the Buddha. 
Then the enlightening being Wondrous Qualities of Natural Origination of Buddha asked the great enlightening being Universally Good, “This vast miraculous display manifested by the Buddha, causing all the enlightening beings joy, is inconceivable, incomprehensible to the world—what is this auspicious sign?” Universally Good replied, “In the past when I saw buddhas show such tremendous mystic displays, they expounded the teaching of the manifestation of Buddha. 
I think that now since he has displayed this sign, he is going to expound this teaching. 
When this teaching is expounded, the whole earth quakes and immeasurable lights asking about the teaching are produced.” Then the enlightening being Wondrous Qualities of Natural Origination of Buddha asked the enlightening being Universally Good, “How should great enlightening beings know the principle of the manifestation of the buddhas, those who realize Thusness, those who are truly awake? 
Please tell us; these countless trillions of enlightening beings have all cultivated purifying practice for a long time, their recollection and precise awareness is fully developed, they embody the dignity of all buddhas, they have reached the consummation of ultimate great adornment, they correctly remember all buddhas without forgetting, they observe all sentient beings with great compassion, they know with certainty the spheres of spiritual powers of great enlightening beings, they have already received the support of the spiritual power of buddhas, they are able to receive the sublime teachings of all buddhas: 
imbued with immeasurable such virtues, they have all come and gathered here. 
You have already attended and served countless quintillions of buddhas, accomplished the supreme practice of enlightening beings, have attained mastery of all modes of concentration, have penetrated the esoteric secrets of all buddhas, know all ways of enlightenment, have put an end to all doubt, are supported by the spiritual power of the buddhas, know the faculties of sentient beings and explain ways of genuine liberation to them according to their inclinations, follow the knowledge of Buddha, expound the Buddha teachings, and have reached the Other Shore. 
You have infinite such virtues, worthy of praise. 
Please tell us about all these things.” Then the enlightening being Wondrous Qualities of Natural Origin of Buddha, desiring to reiterate his point, spoke these verses to the enlightening being Universally Good: Excellent sage of unimpeded wisdom, You are well aware of the boundless realm of equality. 
Please explain the practices of infinite buddhas; The enlightening beings will be happy to hear them. 
What are their spheres of body, speech, and mind? 
Tell us this, and their spheres of action too. 
How do buddhas attain true enlightenment? 
How do buddhas turn the wheel of the Teaching? 
How do the Blissful Ones pass away? The masses will be happy to hear. 
Of those who see the buddhas, great spiritual sovereigns, Attend them and develop roots of goodness, Please tell us the stores of virtue And what the beings who see them attain. 
If any hear of buddhas’ names, Whether present in the world or extinct, And deeply believe in their treasury of merit, Tell us how they will benefit. 
These enlightening beings, all in an attitude of respect, Are gazing at the Buddha, and at you and me; Please tell them of the ocean of virtues Which purifies living beings. 
Please explain the meanings in the wondrous teaching With stories and examples; When beings hear, they will be greatly inspired, Their doubts will end and their knowledge will be clear as space. 
Like the glorified bodies manifested By buddhas throughout all lands, By marvelous speech, stories, and examples Please show the enlightenment of buddhas like them. 
In millions of buddha-lands in the ten directions, In countless billions of eons, It is hard to see such enlightening beings As have gathered here now. 
These enlightening beings are all reverent, Eager for the subtle doctrine; Please expound with pure mind The great phenomena of Buddha’s manifestation. 
Then the enlightening being Universally Good said to the great congregation of enlightening beings, “This matter is inconceivable. 
The Buddha, the one who realizes Thusness, the worthy, the truly awake, becomes manifest by means of infinite phenomena. 
It is not by one condition, by one phenomenon, that the manifestation of Buddha can be accomplished. 
It is accomplished by ten infinities of things. 
What are the ten? 
It is accomplished by the mind of enlightenment that took care of infinite sentient beings in the past. 
It is accomplished by the infinite supreme aspirations of the past. 
It is accomplished by great benevolence and compassion, which infinitely saved all sentient beings in the past. 
It is accomplished by infinite continuous commitments of the past. 
It is accomplished by infinite cultivation of virtues and knowledge tirelessly in the past. 
It is accomplished by infinite service of buddhas and education of sentient beings in the past. 
It is accomplished by infinite pure paths of wisdom and means in the past. 
It is accomplished by infinite pure virtues of the past. 
It is accomplished by infinite ways of adornment in the past. 
It is accomplished by infinite comprehensions of principles and meanings in the past. 
When these infinite, incalculable aspects of the Teaching are fulfilled, one becomes a buddha. 
“It is as a billion-world universe is not formed just by one condition, not by one phenomenon—it can be formed only by innumerable conditions, innumerable things. That is to say, the rising and spreading of great clouds and showering of great rain produce four kinds of atmosphere, continuously making a basis. What are those four? 
One is called the holder, because it can hold the great waters. 
Second is called the evaporator, because it can evaporate the great waters. 
Third is called structure, because it sets up all places. 
Fourth is called arrangement, because the arrangement and distribution are all functional. 
These are all produced by the joint actions of sentient beings and by the roots of goodness of enlightening beings, enabling all sentient beings to get the use of what they need. 
Innumerable such causes and conditions form the universe. It is such by the nature of things—there is no producer or maker, no knower or creator, yet the worlds come to be. “The manifestation of Buddha is also like this—it does not come about through just one condition or thing, but by innumerable causes and conditions, innumerable phenomena. 
That is, having heard, received, and held the clouds and rain of the great Teaching from past buddhas, by this can be produced the four kinds of atmosphere of great knowledge of the enlightened. What are these four? 
One is the atmosphere of great knowledge of mental command able to retain memory without forgetting, being able to hold the great clouds and rain of teachings of all buddhas. 
Second is the atmosphere of great knowledge producing tranquillity and insight, being able to evaporate all afflictions. 
Third is the atmosphere of great knowledge of skillful dedication, being able to perfect all roots of goodness. 
Fourth is the atmosphere of great knowledge producing undefiled, variegated, magnificent arrays of adornments, causing the roots of goodness of all beings taught in the past to be purified, and consummating the power of the untainted roots of goodness of the enlightened. The buddhas’ attainment of enlightenment in this way is thus by the nature of things—without production or creation, it nevertheless takes place. 
This is the first characteristic of the manifestation of the completely enlightened, the truly awake. Great enlightening beings should know it as such. 
“Furthermore, just as when a billion-world universe is about to form, the rain falling from the great clouds, called ‘the deluge,’ cannot be absorbed or held by any place except the universe when it is about to form, in the same way when the Buddha rouses the clouds of the great Teaching and showers the rain of the great Teaching, those of the two lesser vehicles, whose minds and wills are narrow and weak, cannot absorb or hold it—this is possible only for the great enlightening beings with the power of mental continuity. 
This is the second characteristic of the manifestation of Buddha—great enlightening beings should know it as such. 
“Furthermore, just as sentient beings, by the force of their acts, shower rain from great clouds, which do not come from anywhere or go anywhere, in the same way great enlightening beings, by the power of their roots of goodness, rouse the clouds of the great Teaching and shower the rain of the great Teaching, yet it comes from nowhere and goes nowhere. 
This is the third characteristic of the manifestation of Buddha—great enlightening beings should know it as such. 
“Furthermore, just as no beings in the universe can count the drops of rain pouring from great clouds, and would go crazy if they tried, for only the overlord god of the universe, by the power of roots of goodness cultivated in the past, is aware of every single drop, in the same way the Buddha produces great clouds of teachings and showers great rain of teachings that all sentient beings, seekers of personal salvation, and self-enlightened ones cannot know, and they would surely go mad if they tried to assess them in thought; only the great enlightening beings, lords of all worlds, by the power of awareness and intellect cultivated in the past, comprehend every single expression and phrase, and how they enter beings’ minds. 
This is the fourth characteristic of the manifestation of Buddha—great enlightening beings should know it as such. 
“Furthermore, it is as when great clouds shower rain, there is a great cloud raining called the extinguisher, because it can extinguish fires, there is a great cloud raining called producer, because it can produce floods; there is a great cloud raining called stopper, because it can stop floods; there is a great cloud raining called maker, because it can make all kinds of jewels; there is a great cloud raining called distinguisher, because it can distinguish the billion worlds of the universe. 
The Buddha manifesting is also like this, producing great clouds of teaching, showering great rains of teaching: 
there is a great rain of teaching called extinguisher because it can extinguish all sentient beings’ afflictions; there is a great rain of teaching called producer because it can produce all sentient beings’ roots of goodness; there is a great rain of teaching called stopper because it can stop all sentient beings’ delusions of views; there is a great rain of teaching called maker because it can make all jewels of wisdom; there is a great rain of teaching called distinguisher because it distinguishes the inclinations of all sentient beings. 
This is the fifth characteristic of the manifestation of Buddha—great enlightening beings should know it as such. 
“Furthermore, just as the great clouds rain water of one flavor, yet there are innumerable differences according to where it rains, in the same way Buddha appearing in the world rains water of teaching of one flavor of great compassion, yet his sermons according to the needs of the situation are infinitely variegated. 
This is the sixth characteristic of the manifestation of Buddha—great enlightening beings should know it as such. 
“Furthermore, as when a billion-world universe first forms, the abodes of the heavens in the realm of form are made first, then the abodes of the heavens in the realm of desire, and then the abodes of human and other beings, similarly Buddha appearing in the world first produces the knowledge of practices of enlightening beings, then the knowledge of practices of individual illuminates, then the knowledge of practices of listeners, then the knowledge of practices of the conditional roots of goodness of other sentient beings. 
Just as the great clouds rain water of one flavor while the abodes created are variously dissimilar according to the differences in roots of goodness of the sentient beings, Buddha’s spiritual rain of the one flavor of compassion has differences according to the vessels, or capacitites of sentient beings. 
This is the seventh characteristic of the manifestation of Buddha—great enlightening beings should know it as such. 
“Furthermore, when the worlds are beginning, there is a great flood filling the billion-world universe, producing enormous lotus flowers, called array of jewels of virtues of the manifestation of Buddha, which cover the surface of the waters, their radiance illumining all worlds in the ten directions. 
Then the overlord god, the gods of the pure abodes, and so on, seeing these flowers, know for certain that in this eon there will be that many buddhas appearing in the world. 
At that time there arises an atmosphere called highly purified light which makes the mansions of the heavens of the realm of form. 
There arises an atmosphere called array of pure lights which makes the mansions of the heavens of the world of desire. 
There arises an atmosphere called firm, dense, and indestructible, which makes the great and small peripheral mountains and the iron mountains. 
There arises an atmosphere called supremely high which makes the polar mountains. 
There arises an atmosphere called immovable which makes the ten great mountains. 
There arises an atmosphere called stabilization which makes the earth. 
There arises an atmosphere called adornment which makes the palaces of the earth and sky, of the water and sound spirits. 
There arises an atmosphere called inexhaustible treasury which makes all the oceans of the billion worlds. 
There arises an atmosphere called treasury of universal light which makes all the jewels of the billion worlds. 
There arises an atmosphere called steadfast root which makes all the wish-fulfilling trees of the billion worlds. 
The one-flavored water rained by the great clouds has no distinctions, but because the roots of goodness of sentient beings are not the same, the atmospheres are not the same, and because of the differences of the atmospheres, the worlds are different. 
The manifestation of Buddha is also like this, replete with the virtues of all roots of goodness, emitting the light of unexcelled great knowledge, called inconceivable knowledge perpetuating the lineage of buddhas, illumining all worlds in the ten directions, giving the enlightening beings the prediction that they will be coronated by all buddhas, attain true enlightenment, and appear in the world. 
The Buddha manifesting has another light of unexcelled great knowledge, called pure and undefiled, which makes the untainted inexhaustible knowledge of the enlightened. 
There is another light of unexcelled great knowledge, called universal illumination, which makes the Buddha’s inconceivable knowledge universally penetrate the realm of reality. 
There is another light of unexcelled great knowledge, called sustaining the nature of buddhahood, which makes the insuperable power of Buddha. 
There is another light of unexcelled great knowledge, called outstanding and incorruptible, which makes Buddha’s fearless and incorruptible knowledge. 
There is another light of unexcelled great knowledge, called all spiritual powers, which makes Buddha’s unique qualities and omniscience. 
There is another light of unexcelled great knowledge, called producing mystic transformation, which makes Buddha’s knowledge of how to cause the roots of goodness produced by seeing, hearing, and attending Buddha to not be lost or decay. 
There is another light of unexcelled great knowledge, called universal accord, which makes Buddha’s body of endless virtue and knowledge, doing what is beneficial for all beings. 
There is another light of unexcelled great knowledge, called inexhaustible, which makes Buddha’s extremely profound, subtle knowledge causing the lineage of the three treasures not to die out, according to those who are enlightened by it. 
There is another light of unexcelled great knowledge, called various adornments, which makes the glorified body of Buddha, gladdening all sentient beings. 
There is another light of unexcelled great knowledge, called indestructible, which makes the inexhaustible, supreme life span of Buddha equal to the cosmos and the realm of space. 
Buddha’s water of the one flavor of compassion has no distinction, but because sentient beings’ inclinations are not the same and their faculties and characters are different, it produces various atmospheres of great knowledge, enabling the sentient beings to accomplish the actual manifestation of buddhahood. 
All buddhas are one and the same in essence; from the sphere of great knowledge they produce various kinds of lights of knowledge. You should know that Buddha, from the single flavor of liberation, produces infinite, inconceivable qualities of various kinds, which sentient beings think are products of the Buddha’s supernormal powers, but which actually are not created by the supernormal powers of Buddha. 
There is not a single enlightening being who can ever attain even a little bit of the knowledge and wisdom of buddhas without having planted roots of goodness in the company of buddhas. It is just that by the spiritual power of the buddhas sentient beings are enabled to embody the qualities of buddhahood; yet the buddhas have no discrimination. There is no creation, no destruction, no creator, and nothing created. 
This is the eighth characteristic of the manifestation of Buddha—great enlightening beings should know it as such. 
“Furthermore, it is like the arising of four atmospheres in space that can sustain the sphere of water. 
Of these four, one is called stability, the second permanence, the third ultimacy, and the fourth firmness. 
These four atmospheres can sustain the sphere of water; the sphere of water can sustain the earth and prevent it from falling apart—therefore it is said that the sphere of earth rests on the sphere of water, the sphere of water rests on the atmosphere, the atmosphere rests on space, and space does not rest on anything; but though space does not rest on anything, it enables the universe to abide. 
The manifestation of Buddha is also like this, producing Buddha’s four kinds of atmosphere of great knowledge based on the unimpeded light of wisdom, able to sustain the roots of goodness of all sentient beings. 
What are those four? 
The atmosphere of great knowledge taking care of all sentient beings and inspiring joy in them; the atmosphere of great knowledge setting up right teaching and causing sentient beings to take to it; the atmosphere of great knowledge preserving all sentient beings’ roots of goodness; the atmosphere of great knowledge containing all appropriate means, arriving at the realm where there are no taints or contaminations. 
The buddhas benevolently rescue all living beings, compassionately liberate all living beings, their great benevolence and compassion universally aiding all: however, great benevolence and great compassion rest on great skill in means; great skill in means rests on the manifestation of Buddha; the manifestation of Buddha rests on the light of unimpeded wisdom; the light of unimpeded wisdom does not rest on anything. 
This is the ninth characteristic of the manifestation of Buddha—great enlightening beings should know it as such. 
“Furthermore, once the billion-world universe has formed, it benefits countless various sentient beings—the water creatures receive the benefits of the water, the land creatures receive the benefit of the land, the sky creatures receive the benefit of the sky. 
In the same way the manifestation of Buddha variously benefits all kinds of beings—those who become joyful on seeing Buddha gain the benefit of joy, those who abide by the pure precepts gain the benefit of pure conduct, those who abide in the meditations, concentrations, and immeasurable minds gain the benefit of transmundane spiritual powers of saints, those who abide in the lights of the ways of entry into the Teaching gain the benefit of the nondissolution of cause and effect, those who abide in the light of nonexistence gain the benefit of nondissolution of all truths. Therefore we say the manifestation of Buddha benefits all sentient beings. 
This is the tenth characteristic of the manifestation of Buddha—great enlightening beings should know it as such. 
“When great enlightening beings know the manifestation of Buddha, they know it is infinite because they know it consummates infinite practices; then they know it is immensely vast because they know it pervades the ten directions; then they know it has no coming or going because they know it is apart from birth, subsistence, and extinction, then they know it has no action and nothing acted upon because they know it is beyond mind, intellect, and consciousness; then they know it is impartial because they know all sentient beings have no self; then they know it is endless because they know it pervades all lands without end, then they know it is unreceding because they know it will never be stopped in the future; then they know it has no decay because the Buddha’s knowledge has no counterpart; then they know it is nondual because they know Buddha equally observes the conditional and the unconditional; then they know all sentient beings gain benefit because the dedication of Buddha’s original vows are freely fulfilled.” Then the great enlightening being Universally Good, wishing to restate his point, spoke these verses: 
The Ten-Powered Great Hero is supreme, Incomparable as space, With a sphere so vast it cannot be measured, Virtues most eminent, beyond the world. 
The virtues of the ten powers are boundless, Unreachable by thought: 
A single teaching of the human lion No sentient beings can know in a hundred million eons. 
If the lands of the ten directions were reduced to dust, Those motes of dust might be counted, But the virtues in a single hair of Buddha Could not be told in a trillion eons. 
If someone took a ruler to measure space And someone followed to keep the account, The bounds of space could not be found— So it is with the realm of Buddha. 
If someone could know in an instant The minds of the beings of all times, Even over eons as many as beings, Such a one could know the essence of one thought of Buddha. 
Just as the reality realm pervades all Yet cannot be perceived as being all, So also is the realm of the Ten-Powered: It pervades all yet is not all. 
True Thusness, free of falsehood, is ever silent; Birthless, deathless, it is all-pervasive. The realm of the buddhas is also thus; Essentially equal, not increasing or decreasing. 
Just as ultimate reality has no limit. Is in all times yet is not therein, So is the realm of the Guide, Pervading all times without obstruction. 
The nature of things is uncreate, unchanging, Fundamentally pure, like space: 
So also is the purity of nature of buddhas— Their fundamental nature is not a nature, is beyond being and nonbeing. 
The nature of things is not in discussion, It is speechless, beyond speech, eternally quiescent. 
The nature of the realm of the Ten-Powered is also thus; No words can explain it. 
Buddha knows the nature of things is null, Like birds flying through the sky without a trace; By the power of past vows he manifests a body, Showing the great spiritual transfiguration of Buddha. 
Any who wish to know the realm of Buddha Should make their minds clean as space, Getting rid of false notions and graspings, Making the mind unhindered wherever it turns. 
Therefore offspring of Buddha should listen well As I illustrate the realm of Buddha with a few examples; The virtues of the Ten-Powered cannot be measured, But to enlighten all beings I summarize them. 
The vistas exposed by the Guide In acts of body, speech, and mind, Their teaching and final extinction, All roots of goodness I now will tell. 
Just as the establishment of worlds Cannot be achieved by one cause or condition, And countless appropriate causes and conditions Form this billion-world universe, The manifestation of Buddha is also like this, Only accomplished through infinite virtues; The atoms of lands and thoughts of minds may be known, But the productive causes of the Ten-Powered none can measure. 
Just as clouds pour rain at the start of one eon And create four great atmospheres, And the roots of goodness of sentient beings and the power of enlightening beings Establish the billion worlds securely, So do the clouds of teaching of the Ten-Powered Produce atmospheres of knowledge, pure minds, Guiding beings to which they were previously dedicated To fulfillment of the highest reward. 
Just as there is a great deluge Which no place can contain Except the great wind force in pure space At the beginning of the universe, So also is the Buddha’s manifestation, Showering rain of truths filling the cosmos Which the weak-minded cannot bear, Only those of pure and broad minds. 
Just as the downpour of rain in the sky Comes from nowhere and goes nowhere, With no producer or receiver, Naturally filling all with moisture thus, The rain of teaching of Buddha is also thus, Without coming or going, uncreate; Based on past practice, with the power of enlightening beings, All the great-minded hear and accept it. 
As the clouds in the sky shower rain, And no one can count the drops, Except the lord of the universe Whose power is able to comprehend them, So also is the rain of teaching of the Felicitous; No sentient beings can measure it, Except people who are free in the world, Who see it as clearly as a jewel in the hand. 
Just as the rain pouring from the clouds in the sky Can extinguish, can produce, and can stop, Can make all jewels And distinguish all in the universe, The rain of Buddha’s teaching is also thus, Extinguishing delusion, producing good, stopping views, Making all jewels of knowledge, Distinguishing beings’ inclinations. 
The one flavor of the rain in the sky Is different according to the places it rains— It is not that the rain has any distinction, But it is naturally thus according to the differences in things. 
The rain of teaching of Buddha is not one or varied: Impartial, quiescent, it is free from discrimination, Yet according to the various differences of those taught It naturally has unlimited aspects. 
When the world is first formed, First are formed the palaces of the form-realm heavens, Then the desire heavens, then human abodes, And last the gandharva palaces; The manifestation of Buddha is also like this, First producing boundless enlightening beings’ practices, Then teaching those aware of conditioning, who like tranquillity, Then the listeners, then finally sentient beings. 
When the gods first see the lotus blossom open They know buddhas will appear and are glad; Water, based on the power of wind, produces the world, Dwellings, mountains, and rivers are all set up. The great light of the developed goodness of Buddha Skillfully distinguishes enlightening beings and gives them predictions; The spheres of knowledge, all pure, Can each reveal the ways to buddhahood. 
The forest exists dependent on the earth, The earth remains solid based on water, Water depends on wind, wind on space, While space does not depend on anything. 
All Buddha teachings depend on compassion, And compassion is established depending on means; Means depend on knowledge, knowledge on wisdom, While the body of unimpeded wisdom does not depend on anything. 
Once the world comes to be, All beings receive its benefits— Living on the earth, in the water, in the sky, Two-legged, four-legged, all receive benefit. 
The manifestation of the spiritual sovereign is also thus— All beings gain its benefits; If any see, hear, or associate with Buddha, It will cause all confusions and afflictions to be removed. 
The elements of Buddha’s manifestation are boundless; The deluded of the world cannot know them. 
Out of desire to enlighten all conscious beings Similes are told where there is no comparison. “How should great enlightening beings see the body of Buddha? 
They should see the body of Buddha in infinite places. 
They should not see Buddha in just one thing, one phenomenon, one body, one land, one being—they should see Buddha everywhere. 
Just as space is omnipresent, in all places, material or immaterial, yet without either arriving or not arriving there, because space is incorporeal, in the same way Buddha is omnipresent, in all places, in all beings, in all things, in all lands, yet neither arriving nor not arriving there, because Buddha’s body is incorporeal, manifesting a body for the sake of sentient beings. 
This is the first characteristic of the body of Buddha; great enlightening beings should see it thus. 
“Furthermore, just as space is wide open, is not a form yet can reveal all forms, yet space is without discrimination or false description, so also is the body of Buddha like this, causing all beings’ mundane and transmundane good works to be accomplished by illumining all with the light of knowledge, yet without discrimination or false descriptions, having originally terminated all attachments and false descriptions. 
This is the second characteristic of the body of Buddha—great enlightening beings should see it this way. 
“When the sun comes out, infinite living beings all receive its benefits—it disperses the darkness and gives light, dries up moisture, causes plants and trees to grow, matures crops, permeates the sky, causes lotuses to bloom, allows travelers to see the road, allows people to do their work—because the orb of the sun radiates infinite beams of light everywhere. 
The sun of knowledge of Buddha is also like this, benefiting sentient beings everywhere by infinite works—destroying evil and producing good, breaking down ignorance and creating knowledge, benevolently saving, compassionately liberating, causing growth of faculties, powers, and elements of enlightenment, causing beings to develop profound faith, enabling them to see inevitable cause and effect, fostering in them the celestial eye to see where beings die and are born, causing their minds to be unimpeded and not destroy roots of goodness, causing them to cultivate illumination by knowledge and open the flower of awakening, causing them to determine to fulfill their fundamental task. 
Because Buddha’s immense sun-body of knowledge and wisdom radiates infinite light, illumining everywhere. 
This is the third characteristic of the body of Buddha; great enlightening beings should see it thus. 
“When the sun rises, first it lights up the highest mountains, then the lower mountains, then the high plateaus, and finally the whole land; but the sun does not think, ‘First I will illumine here, afterward I will illumine there’—it is just because of difference in height of the mountains and land that there is a succession in illumination. 
The Buddha, similarly, having developed the boundless orb of knowledge of the realm of reality, always radiating the light of unimpeded knowledge, first of all illumines the high mountains, which are the great enlightening beings, then illumines those who are awakened by understanding of conditioning, then illumines those who listen to the message, then illumines sentient beings whose foundations of goodness are sure and stable, revealing vast knowledge according to beings’ mental capacities, finally illumining all sentient beings, even reaching those who are fixated on error, to be a beneficial cause for the future, that they may develop to maturity. 
But the light of the sun of great knowledge of Buddha does not think, ‘I will first illumine the great deeds of enlightening beings and at the very last shine on the sentient beings who are fixated on error’—it just radiates the light, shining equally on all, without obstruction or impediment, without discrimination. 
Just as the sun and moon appear in their time and impersonally shine on the mountains and valleys, so also does the knowledge of Buddha shine on all without discrimination, while the light of knowledge has various differences according to the differences in faculties and inclinations of sentient beings. 
This is the fourth characteristic of the body of Buddha; great enlightening beings should see it thus. 
“When the sun comes out, those born blind cannot see it, because they have no faculty of vision; yet even though they do not see it, they are benefited by the light of the sun. 
By this it is possible to know the times of day and night and to have access to food and clothing to comfort the body and free it from distress. 
The sun of knowledge of Buddha is also like this; the blind without faith or understanding, immoral and heedless, sustaining themselves by wrong means of livelihood, do not see the orb of the sun of knowledge of the Buddhas because they have no eye of faith, but even though they do not see it, they are still benefited by the sun of knowledge. 
Because by the power of Buddha it makes the causes of future suffering of those beings—physical pains and psychological afflictions—all vanish. 
“Buddha has a light called accumulating all virtues, a light called total universal illumination, a light called pure, free illumination, a light called producing great wondrous sound, a light called understanding all languages and gladdening others, a light called the realm of freedom showing the eternal cancellation of all doubts, a light called independent universal illumination of nondwelling knowledge, a light called free knowledge forever terminating all false descriptions, a light called producing marvelous sayings according to need, a light called producing free utterances adorning lands and maturing sentient beings. 
Each pore of the Buddha emits a thousand kinds of light like these: 
five hundred lights beam downward, five hundred lights beam upward, illumining the congregations of enlightening beings at the various places of the buddhas in the various lands; when the enlightening beings see these lights, all at once they realize the realm of buddhahood, with ten heads, ten eyes, ten ears, ten noses, ten tongues, ten bodies, ten hands, ten feet, ten stages, and ten knowledges, all thoroughly pure. The states and stages previously accomplished by those enlightening beings become more pure upon seeing these lights; their roots of goodness mature, and they proceed toward omniscience. 
Some other beings, who are blind, their bodies blissful, also become purified in mind, gentle and docile, able to cultivate mindfulness and knowledge. 
The sentient beings in the realms of hells, hungry ghosts, and animals all become blissful and are freed from pains, and when their lives end are reborn in heaven or the human world. 
Those sentient beings are not aware, do not know by what cause, by what spiritual power, they came to be born there. 
Those blind ones think, ‘We are Brahma gods, we are emanations of Brahma.’ Then Buddha, in the concentration of universal freedom, says to them, ‘You are not Brahma gods, not emanations of Brahma, nor were you created by the king-god Indra or the world-guardian gods: 
all this is the spiritual power of Buddha.’ Having heard this, those sentient beings, by the spiritual power of Buddha, all know their past life and become very happy. 
Because their hearts are joyful, they naturally produce clouds of udumbara flowers, clouds of fragrances, music, cloth, parasols, banners, pennants, aromatic powders, jewels, towers adorned with lion banners and crescents, clouds of songs of praise, clouds of all kinds of adornments, and respectfully offer them to the Buddha. 
Because these sentient beings have gained clear eyes, and therefore the Buddha gives them the prophecy of unexcelled, complete perfect enlightenment. 
In this way Buddha’s sun of knowledge benefits sentient beings born blind, fostering the full development of basic goodness. 
This is the fifth characteristic of the body of Buddha; great enlightening beings should see it this way. 
“Furthermore, it is like the moon, with four special extraordinary qualities: 
first, it outshines all the stars; second, as time passes it shows waning and waxing; third, its reflection appears in all clear waters; fourth, all who see it see it right before them, yet the moon has no discrimination and no arbitrary conceptions. 
The moon of the body of Buddha similarly has four special extraordinary qualities: 
it outshines all hearers and individual illuminates, whether they are in the stage of learning or beyond learning; according to the needs of the situation, it manifests different life spans, yet without increase or decrease in the Buddha-body; its reflection appears in all vessels of enlightenment, sentient beings with pure minds, in all worlds; all sentient beings who behold it think the Buddha is in their presence alone. 
According to their inclinations, Buddha teaches them, liberating them according to their states, causing them to perceive the Buddha-body according to their needs and potentials for edification, yet the Buddha-body has no discrimination, no arbitrary conceptions; all benefits it renders reach the ultimate end. 
This is the sixth characteristic of the body of Buddha; great enlightening beings should see it thus. 
“Furthermore, just as the supreme Brahma god of a billion-world universe simply manifests its body in the billion worlds, and all beings see Brahma before them, yet Brahma does not divide its body and does not have multiple bodies, in the same way the buddhas have no discrimination, no false representations, and do not divide their bodies or have multiple bodies, yet they manifest their bodies in accord with the inclinations of all sentient beings, without thinking that they manifest so many bodies. 
This is the seventh characteristic of the body of Buddha; great enlightening beings should see it this way. 
“A master physician is well versed in all medications and the science of hypnosis, fully uses all the medicines in the land, and, also because of the power of the physician’s past roots of goodness, and because of using hypnotic spells as an expedient, all those who see the physician recover from illness. 
That master physician, sensing impending death, thinks, ‘After I die, sentient beings will have no one to rely on; I should manifest an expedient for them.’ Then the master physician compounds drugs, which he smears on his body, and supports his body by spell power, so that it will not decay or shrivel after death, so its bearing, seeing, and hearing will be no different from before, and all cures will be effected. 
The Buddha, the Truly Enlightened One, the unexcelled master physician, is also like this, having developed and perfected the medicines of the Teaching over countless eons, having cultivated and learned all skills in application of means and fully consummated the power of illuminating spells, is able to quell all sentient beings’ afflictions. 
Buddha’s life spans measureless eons, the body pure, without any cogitation, without activity, never ceasing the works of buddhas; the afflictions of all sentient beings who see Buddha dissolve away. 
This is the eighth characteristic of the body of Buddha; great enlightening beings should see it in this way. 
“In the ocean there is a great jewel called radiant repository, in which are assembled all lights: if any sentient beings touch its light, they become assimilated to its color; if any see it, their eyes are purified; whenever the light shines it rains jewels called felicity that soothe and comfort beings. The body of Buddha is also like this, being a treasury of knowledge in which are collected all virtues: 
if any sentient beings come in contact with the light of precious knowledge of the body of Buddha, they become the same as Buddha in appearance; if any see it their eye of reality is purified; wherever that light shines, it frees sentient beings from the miseries of poverty and ultimately imbues them with the bliss of enlightenment. 
The body of Buddha has no discrimination and no false conceptions, but can perform great buddha-works for all sentient beings. 
This is the ninth characteristic of the body of Buddha; great enlightening beings should see it in this way. 
“In the ocean is a great wish-fulfilling jewel called treasury of adornments of all worlds, fully endowed with a million qualities, eliminating calamities and fulfilling wishes of beings wherever it is. However, this jewel cannot be seen by beings of little merit. 
The supreme wish-fulfilling jewel of the body of Buddha is also like this; called able to gladden all beings, if any sentient beings see the body of Buddha, hear the name, and praise the virtues, they will all be enabled to escape forever the pains and ills of birth and death. 
Even if all beings in all worlds focus their minds all at once on the desire to see Buddha, they will all be enabled to see and their wish will be fulfilled. 
The Buddha-body cannot be seen by sentient beings of little merit unless they can be tamed by the spiritual power of Buddha; if sentient beings, because of seeing the body of Buddha, plant roots of goodness and develop them, they are enabled to see the body of Buddha for their development. 
This is the tenth characteristic of the body of Buddha; great enlightening beings should see it thus, because their minds are measureless, pervading the ten directions, because their actions are as unhindered as space, because they penetrate everywhere in the realm of reality, because they abide in absolute truth, because they have no birth or death, because they remain equal throughout past, present, and future, because they are forever rid of all false discriminations, because they continue their eternal vows, because they purify all worlds, because they adorn each buddha-body.” Then the great enlightening being Universally Good, in order to again clarify what he meant, said in verse, Just as space pervades the ten directions, Like form but not a form, existent but not existent, Omnipresent, without bounds, In beings’ bodies and lands, in all times, So does the true body of buddhas Pervade all phenomena, Invisible, ungraspable, Yet manifesting bodies to teach beings. 
Just as space cannot be grasped Yet lets all beings do their work Without thinking what it does, How it does it, or for whom, The physical action of buddhas is also thus, Causing beings to practice good ways, Yet the buddha never has any notion Of acting on them variously. 
When the sun comes up over the land It completely removes the darkness. 
Mountains, trees, lakes, flowers, earth, and all beings, All the various species receive benefit. 
The sun of Buddha emerging too is thus, Causing human and celestial good actions to grow, Obliterating the darkness of ignorance so they gain the light of knowledge And always experience all glorious bliss. 
When the sun first comes up It shines first on the high mountains, then the others, Then shines on the high plains, then the whole land, Yet the sun never has any discrimination. 
The light of Buddha is also thus, First illumining the enlightening beings, then the self-enlightened, Then last the listeners and all sentient beings, Yet the Buddha basically has no stirring thoughts. 
Just as the blind cannot see the sun, Yet sunlight still benefits them, Enabling them to know time and season and receive food and drink, To be freed from troubles and gain physical ease, In the same way faithless beings do not see Buddha, Yet Buddha benefits them as well; By hearing Buddha’s name or being touched by Buddha’s light They can even reach enlightenment. Just as the moon in the sky Outshines the stars and appears to wax and wane, Shows its reflection in all waters, And appears face to face with those who behold it, The clear moon of Buddha is also thus, Outshining other vehicles, showing length and brevity, Appearing in the clear mind-water of humans and gods, Seeming to be present to everyone. 
Just as the god Brahma, while in its own palace, Appears in all the Brahma abodes in the universe So all humans and celestials can see it, Yet does not actually divide its body to go to them, Likewise does the Buddha’s manifestation of bodies Pervade everywhere in the ten directions, Those bodies countless, incalculable in number, Yet without dividing bodies, without discrimination. 
Like a physician skilled in his arts, Seeing whom all are cured, And though his life is ended he embalms his body So that it will work as before, So also does the Supreme Healer Have all knowledge of techniques, Manifesting embodiment as Buddha by excellent practices of yore, So the afflictions of all who see are destroyed. 
In the ocean is a superb jewel Which radiates countless beams of light; Those who come in contact with it become the same color, And the eyes of those who see it are purified: 
The Supreme Jewel is also thus; Those whom its light touches become the same in appearance, In those who get to see it the five eyes open; They break through the darkness of the senses and dwell in buddhahood. 
The wish-fulfilling jewel Satisfies all desires; Those of little virtue cannot see it, Though this is not by the jewel’s discrimination: 
The jewel of Buddha is also thus, Fulfilling all desires; Faithless beings cannot see it, But not because Buddha abandons them. 
“How should great enlightening beings know the voice of Buddha? 
They should know Buddha’s voice is omnipresent, because it pervades all sounds. They should know Buddha’s voice pleases all according to their mentalities, because its explanation of truth is clear and comprehensive. 
They should know Buddha’s voice teaches without error in timing, because all who need and are able to hear it do. 
They should know Buddha’s voice has no birth or death, because it is like the echo of a call. 
They should know Buddha’s voice has no owner, because it is produced by cultivation of all appropriate practices. 
They should know Buddha’s voice is extremely profound, because it cannot be measured. 
They should know Buddha’s voice has no falsehood or deviousness, because it is born of the realm of truth. 
They should know Buddha’s voice has no end, because it permeates the cosmos. 
They should know Buddha’s voice has no change, because it reaches the ultimate. 
“Great enlightening beings should know that Buddha’s voice is neither quantified nor unquantified, neither has a master nor lacks a master, neither communicates nor does not communicate. 
It is as when the world is about to disintegrate, there is no master, no maker, yet it spontaneously emits four voices. 
One says, ‘You all should know that the well-being of the first meditation stage, free from the ills of desire, surpasses the realm of desire.’ The sentient beings hearing this are naturally able to accomplish the first meditation stage, relinquish the body of the realm of desire and be born in Brahma heaven. 
The second voice says, ‘You should know that the well-being of the second meditation stage, without reflection and rumination, surpasses the Brahma heaven.’ The sentient beings hearing this naturally manage to accomplish the second meditation stage, relinquish the body of Brahma heaven, and are born in the light-sound heaven. 
The third voice says, ‘You should know that the well-being of the third meditation stage has no flaws and surpasses the light-sound heaven.’ Hearing this, the sentient beings are naturally able to achieve the third meditation stage, relinquish the body of the light-sound heaven, and are born in the heaven of universal purity. 
The fourth voice says, ‘You should know that the tranquillity of the fourth meditation stage surpasses the heaven of universal purity.’ Hearing this, the sentient beings are naturally able to achieve the fourth meditation stage, relinquish the body of the heaven of universal purity, and are born in the heaven of vast results. 
These voices have no master or maker—they are just produced by the power of good practices of sentient beings. “The voice of Buddha is also like this, without master or maker, without discrimination, not entering, not emerging, yet producing four great voices from the power of the virtuous qualities of Buddha. 
One voice says, ‘You all should know that all conditioned states are miserable. There is the misery of hells, the misery of animality, the misery of hungry ghosthood, the misery of lack of virtue, the misery of clinging to self and possessions, the misery of evildoing. If you want to be born human or divine, you should plant roots of goodness. 
Born in the human world or in a heaven, you will leave all situations in which enlightenment is difficult.’ Sentient beings, having heard this, give up error and perversity, practice good actions, leave all difficulties behind, and are born in the human world or in heaven. 
The second voice says, ‘You should know that the myriad pains of all conditioned states are as searing as balls of hot iron. Conditioned states are impermanent and pass away. 
Nirvana is tranquil, unfabricated well-being, beyond all burning, extinguishing all inflaming afflictions.’ Having heard this, sentient beings diligently practice good principles, and in the vehicle of listeners to Buddha’s voice attain the tolerance of conformity to the message. 
The third voice says, ‘You should know that those in the vehicle of listeners follow the words of another to understand; their knowledge and wisdom is narrow and inferior. There is a higher vehicle called the vehicle of the individually awakened, whose enlightenment does not depend on a teacher. 
You should learn it.’ Those inclined to a superior path, having heard this voice, give up the path of listeners and cultivate the vehicle of the individually awakened. 
The fourth voice says, ‘You should know that there is an even higher path beyond the ranks of these two vehicles, which is called the great vehicle, practiced by enlightening beings, following the six transcendent ways, not stopping enlightening practice, not relinquishing the determination for enlightenment, being in the midst of infinite birth and death without getting sick of it. 
Going beyond the two vehicles of individual liberation, it is called the Great Vehicle, the foremost vehicle, the preeminent vehicle, the supreme vehicle, the highest vehicle, the unexcelled vehicle, the vehicle of benefiting all sentient beings.’ If there are any sentient beings whose resolve is very great, whose faculties are strong and keen, who have planted roots of goodness in the past, who are spiritually empowered by the buddhas, who have superior inclinations and seek buddhahood, once they have heard this voice they arouse the determination for enlightenment. 
Buddha’s voice does not come from the body or from the mind, yet it can benefit infinite sentient beings. 
This is the first characteristic of Buddha’s voice; great enlightening beings should know it thus. 
“Furthermore, just as an echo arises due to mountains, valley, and sound, and has no form, cannot be seen, and though it has no discrimination can follow all words, so also is the voice of Buddha—it has no form, cannot be seen, has no direction or location yet is not without direction and location; it just emerges according to the conditions of sentient beings’ inclinations and understandings. 
This is the second characteristic of the voice of Buddha; great enlightening beings should know it thus. “Furthermore, it is like the heavens’ great drum of law, called awakener: 
when the celestials act without restraint, the drum produces a voice in the sky saying, ‘You should know that all pleasures are impermanent, unreal, illusory, changing and disintegrating in a moment. They only fool the ignorant, causing attachment. Don’t be indulgent, for the unrestrained fall into bad ways, and it is of no use to regret afterward.’ The indulgent celestials, having heard this voice, are greatly distressed and frightened; they leave the pleasures in their own abodes, go to the king of gods, seek the truth and practice the way. 
The sound of that drum has no master, no maker, no origin, no destruction, yet it can benefit infinite sentient beings. 
Know that Buddha likewise utters the voice of infinite sublime truths in order to awaken indulgent beings: 
the voice of non-attachment, the voice of nonindulgence, the voice of impermanence, the voice of suffering, the voice of selflessness, the voice of impurity, the voice of annulment, the voice of nirvana, the voice of measureless spontaneous knowledge, the voice of incorruptible enlightening practices, the voice of all-pervasive effortless knowledge of buddhas. 
These voices pervade the cosmos, awakening the beings therein; countless sentient beings, having heard them, all become joyful and diligently cultivate good ways, each seeking emancipation by their respective vehicles of emancipation—that is, some practice the vehicle of listeners, some practice the vehicle of individual awakening, and some practice the unsurpassed Great Vehicle of enlightening beings. 
Yet the voice of Buddha does not remain in any place; it has no speech. 
This is the third characteristic of the voice of Buddha; great enlightening beings should know it thus. 
“Again, it is like the case of the celestial concubine of the great lord god, named Beautiful Mouth, whose voice corresponds to a hundred thousand kinds of music, within each of which are also a hundred thousand different tones. 
Just as that goddess Beautiful Mouth produces countless sounds in one utterance, in the same way Buddha produces innumerable voices in one utterance, according to the differences in mentalities of sentient beings, reaching them all and enabling them to gain understanding. 
This is the fourth characteristic of the voice of Buddha; great enlightening beings should know it thus. 
“Also it is like the case of the great god Brahma, abiding in the Brahma palace, uttering the voice of Brahma, which all the Brahma masses hear, while the sound of the voice does not go outside that group; the Brahma divinities all think Brahma is speaking to them alone. 
The sublime voice of Buddha is also like this; all in the congregation at the site of enlightenment hear it, while the sound does not go outside that group. Because those whose faculties are not yet mature cannot hear it. Those who hear the voice each think Buddha is talking to them alone. The voice of Buddha neither emerges nor remains, yet can accomplish all works. 
This is the fifth characteristic of the voice of Buddha; great enlightening beings should know it thus. 
“Also, just as waters are all of one flavor, but according to the difference of the vessel water has distinctions, yet the water has no thought or discrimination, similarly the speech of Buddha is of one flavor only, the flavor of liberation, but has innumerable distinctions according to the differences in mental vessels of sentient beings, yet without thought or discrimination. 
This is the sixth characteristic of the voice of Buddha; great enlightening beings should know it thus. 
“Also, it is like the case of the water spirit Heatless producing great dense clouds covering the continent, showering sweet rain all over, so all the crops can grow and all the rivers, streams, springs, and lakes are full; this great rainwater does not come from the water spirit’s body or mind, yet can benefit sentient beings in various ways. 
Similarly, Buddha produces the cloud of great compassion covering all worlds in the ten directions, showering the rain of immortal truth, causing all sentient beings to become joyful, increase in goodness, and fulfill all vehicles of liberation. 
The voice of Buddha does not come from without and does not emerge from within, yet can benefit all sentient beings. 
This is the seventh characteristic of the voice of Buddha; great enlightening beings should know it thus. 
“Also it is like when the water spirit Thoughtful is going to shower rain, it does not do so immediately but first produces great clouds covering the sky, remaining still for seven days waiting for people to finish their work, because that water spirit is benevolent and compassionate and does not want to trouble them; after seven days it showers a fine rain, moistening the earth. 
Similarly, when Buddha is going to shower the rain of truth, he does not do so at once, but first produces great clouds of teaching in order to mature sentient beings so they will not be startled or frightened; after they are mature he showers on all the rain of immortal truth, expounding the most profound, subtle good teaching, gradually filling them with the flavor of the unexcelled teaching of omniscience of buddhas. 
This is the eighth characteristic of the voice of Buddha; great enlightening beings should know it thus. 
“In the ocean is a great water spirit called Magnificent Array; when it showers rain on the ocean, it may shower rain in ten kinds of arrays, or a hundred, or a thousand, or rain in a hundred thousand kinds of arrays. 
The water has no discrimination; it is just the inconceivable power of the water spirit that causes its arrays to be infinitely different. 
Similarly, when Buddha teaches truth, it may be expressed in ten different tones, or a hundred, or a thousand, or a hundred thousand, or eighty-four thousand tones explaining eighty-four thousand practices, up to countless hundreds of thousands of millions of tones, each explaining the truth in particular ways to gladden all who hear. 
The voice of Buddha makes no discrimination; it is just that buddhas, complete and pure in the profound realm of truth, are able to make various utterances in accord with the needs of sentient beings, making them happy. 
This is the ninth characteristic of the voice of Buddha; great enlightening beings should know it thus. 
“When the water spirit Ocean wants to manifest the controlling power of the water spirit for the benefit of sentient beings to make them happy, it raises a great network of clouds from the earth to the heaven of control of others’ emanations, covering all over: those clouds are of infinite different colors—some are the color of golden light, some are the color of lapis lazuli light, some are the color of silver light, some are the color of crystal light, some are the color of emerald light, some are the color of agate light, some are the color of red pearl light, some are the color of light of infinite fragrances, some are the color of light of spotless cloth, some are the color of light of pure water, some are the color of light of various ornaments. 
This network of clouds, having spread all over, emits lightning of various colors: the golden clouds emit lapis lazuli lightning; the lapis lazuli clouds emit golden lightning; the silver clouds emit crystal lightning; the crystal clouds emit silver lightning; the emerald clouds emit agate lightning; the agate clouds emit emerald lightning; the infinite-fragrance-colored clouds emit spotless-cloth-colored lightning; the spotless-cloth-colored clouds emit infinite-fragrance-colored lightning; the pure-water-colored clouds emit various-ornament-colored lightning; the various-ornament-colored clouds emit pure-water-colored lightning; multicolored clouds emit one-colored lightning; one-colored clouds emit multicolored lightning. 
There also issue from the clouds various sounds of thunder, according to the minds of sentient beings, making them all happy—sounds like goddesses singing, like celestial musicians playing, like water nymphs singing, like gandharva girls singing, like kinnara girls singing, like earthquakes, like the waves and tide of the ocean, like the king of beasts howling, like beautiful birds calling, as well as innumerable other kinds of sounds. When the thunder has sounded, there arises a cool breeze, delighting the mind of sentient beings. Finally it rains, various kinds of rain, benefiting and comforting infinite beings. In all places from the heavens to earth the rain is different: 
on the ocean it rains clear, cool water called endless; in the heaven of control of others’ emanations it rains various music such as pipes and flutes, named beautiful; in the heaven of enjoyment of emanation it rains jewels called radiating great light; in the heaven of happiness it rains great ornaments, called hanging crests; in the heaven of timely portion it rains large, beautiful flowers, called various adornments; in the thirty-three-fold heaven it rains many sublime fragrances, called pleasing; in the heaven of the four world guardians it rains precious celestial robes, called covering; in the palace of water spirits it rains red pearls, called flowing light; in the palace of the titans it rains weapons, called conquering enemies; in the northern region of earth it rains various flowers, called blooming; in the other regions of earth it also rains differently according to the place. 
Though the mind of the water spirit is impartial, without discrimination, simply because the roots of goodness of sentient beings are different, the rain has distinctions. 
Similarly, when Buddha, the truly enlightened, the supreme spiritual sovereign, wants to edify sentient beings with right teaching, first he spreads clouds of embodiments over the cosmos, appearing differently according to inclinations of beings. 
For some beings he manifests clouds of mortal bodies; for some, clouds of emanated bodies; for some, clouds of power-bodies; for some, clouds of form-bodies; for some, clouds of glorified bodies; for some, clouds of virtue-bodies; for some, clouds of knowledge-bodies; for some, clouds of bodies whose powers do not deteriorate; for some, clouds of bodies of fearlessness; for some, clouds of cosmic bodies. 
Buddha covers all worlds with infinite such body-clouds and manifests various kinds of lightning in accord with the individual differences in inclinations of sentient beings: 
for some beings he manifests lightning called reaching everywhere; for some, lightning called boundless light; for some, lightning called penetrating the secret teaching of Buddha; for some, lightning called reflected light; for some, lightning called illumination; for some, lightning called entering the door of endless mental command; for some, lightning called right mindfulness undisturbed; for some, lightning called ultimately incorruptible; for some, lightning called adaptively entering all states of being; for some, lightning called fulfilling all wishes and making everyone happy. 
Having manifested lightnings of infinite such lights, Buddha then produces infinite thunders of concentration, according to the inclinations of sentient beings: 
the thunder of the concentration of well-aware knowledge; the thunder of the concentration of the refulgent, undefiled ocean; the thunder of the concentration of mastery of all the teachings; the thunder of the adamantine wheel concentration; the thunder of the concentration symbolized by the polar mountain; the thunder of the ocean-seal concentration; the thunder of the solar lamp concentration; the thunder of the inexhaustible treasury concentration; the thunder of the concentration of the indestructible power of liberation. 
After the thunder of infinite different concentrations such as these have emerged from the clouds of embodiments of Buddha, when about to shower the rain of truth, first he manifests an auspicious sign to awaken sentient beings: 
from the mind of unhindered compassion he manifests the atmosphere of great knowledge of Buddha, called able to cause all sentient beings to develop inconceivable happiness and well-being. Once this sign has appeared, the bodies and minds of all enlightening beings and sentient beings become clear and cool. 
After that, from the cloud of the great reality-body of Buddha, the cloud of great compassion, the cloud of great inconceivability, showers the inconceivable, far-flung rain of teaching, causing all beings’ bodies and minds to be pure: 
for enlightening beings sitting at the site of enlightenment there showers a great rain of teaching called nondifferentiation of the realm of reality; for enlightening beings in their final embodiment there showers a great rain of teaching called enlightening beings’ easy mastery of the esoteric teaching of Buddha; for enlightening beings to become fully enlightened in the next life there showers a great rain of teaching called pure universal light; for coronated enlightening beings there showers a great rain of teaching called adornment by the embellishments of buddhahood; for enlightening beings who have attained tolerance there showers a great rain of teaching called flowers of knowledge with jewels of virtue blooming, not ceasing the compassionate practices of enlightening beings; for enlightening beings in progress there showers a great rain of teaching called entering the profound method of manifestation of occult transformations and carrying on enlightening practice without stopping or wearying; for newly inspired enlightening beings there showers a great rain of teaching called producing the practice of great love and compassion of buddhas to save sentient beings; for those who seek the vehicle of individual enlightenment there showers a great rain of teaching called deeply knowing the principles of conditional origination, avoiding extremes, and attaining the nondecaying fruit of liberation; for those who seek the vehicle of listeners there showers a great rain of teaching called cutting down all obstructing afflictions with the sword of great knowledge and wisdom; for stabilized and unstabilized sentient beings who accumulate roots of goodness there showers a great rain of teaching called facilitating the accomplishment of various ways into the teaching, producing great happiness. 
The Buddha showers great rains of teaching like these in accordance with the mentalities of sentient beings, filling all worlds. 
A buddha, perfectly enlightened, is impartial in mind and does not begrudge the teaching; simply because the faculties and inclinations of sentient beings are not the same, the rains of teaching appear differently. 
This is the tenth characteristic of the voice of Buddha; great enlightening beings should know it thus. 
“The voice of Buddha has ten kinds of infinity: 
it is as infinite as the realm of space because it extends to all places; it is as infinite as the cosmos because it pervades everywhere; it is as infinite as the realm of sentient beings because it gladdens all hearts; it is as infinite as all acts because it explains their results and consequences; it is as infinite as afflictions because it removes them all; it is as infinite as the speech of sentient beings because it enables them to hear according to their understanding; it is as infinite as the inclinations and understandings of sentient beings because it observes them all to rescue and liberate them; it is as infinite as past, present, and future because it has no boundaries; it is as infinite as knowledge because it distinguishes everything; it is as infinite as the realm of buddhahood because it enters the cosmos of reality of buddhahood. 
The voice of Buddha, the completely enlightened, comprises incalculable infinities such as these; great enlightening beings should know it thus.” Then the enlightening being Universally Good, to again clarify what he meant, spoke these verses: 
When a billion-world universe is about to dissolve, The power of beings’ virtue announces that The four meditations are peaceful and painless, Causing them to leave desire when they have heard. 
Ten-Powered Buddha, also like this, Produces a sublime voice pervading the cosmos, Explaining that conditioned states are painful and impermanent, So beings may cross for good the sea of birth and death. 
Just as a canyon deep in the mountains Echoes any sound, And though it accords with others’ voices The echo has no discrimination, So also is the speech of Buddha Revealed according to the maturity of faculties, Causing them to be controlled and happy, Yet without self-consciousness of preaching. 
As the celestial drum called awakener Vibrates with the sound of the law in the sky, Admonishing the self-indulgent celestials, Causing them to give up attachments when they hear, So too is the drum of Buddha’s teaching like this, Producing various wonderful sounds, Awakening all living beings So they all realize enlightenment. 
The lord god has a precious concubine Who voices all kinds of music Producing a hundred thousand sounds in one voice With a hundred thousand tones in each sound. 
The voice of Buddha is also like this, Producing all tones in one voice, Different according to beings’ characters and inclinations, Causing each to end afflictions when they hear. 
Just as king Brahma utters a sound Which makes all Brahmas happy, The voice reaching only Brahmas, no one else, Each thinking he alone hears it, So also does the Buddha utter a word Which fills the cosmos, Yet only reaches the faithful Because the faithless cannot receive it. 
Just as all waters are of one and the same essence, With no difference in flavor, But the land they are on and the vessels they are in are not the same, So that causes them to be variously different, The voice of Omniscience is similar to this; The essence of truth has one flavor, undifferentiated, Yet according to beings’ actions, which are not the same, It causes them to hear in various different ways. 
When the water spirit Heatless Showers rain to moisten the land Causing plants and trees to grow, The rain does not come from its body or mind. 
Likewise the wondrous voice of buddhas Rains throughout the cosmos, filling all, Fostering good and extinguishing evil, But not coming from inside or outside. 
Just as the water spirit Thoughtful Raises clouds for seven days before raining, Waiting for all people to finish their work And then showering rain for their benefit, The teaching of Buddha is likewise, First civilizing beings and developing them, And afterward expounding the profound truth, So the hearers will not be frightened. 
The water spirit Great Adornment in the ocean Showers ten arrays of rain, Or a hundred, a thousand, a hundred thousand; Though the water is one flavor, the arrays are different. 
The ultimate teacher likewise Explains ten or twenty teachings, Or a hundred, a thousand, up to infinity, Without any notion of difference. 
The supreme water spirit Ocean Covers the earth with clouds; The rain in each place is different, But the spirit has no thought of distinction. 
Likewise Buddha, sovereign of truth, Extends clouds of great compassion in all directions, Raining differently for each practitioner, Yet without discriminating among them. 
“How should great enlightening beings know the mind of Buddha, the truly awake? The mind, intellect, and consciousness of Buddha are ungraspable. 
One can know the mind of Buddha only in terms of the infinity of knowledge. 
Just as space is the resting place of all things, while space has no resting place, so also is the knowledge of Buddha the resting place of all mundane and transcendental knowledge, while the knowledge of Buddha has no resting place. 
This is the first characteristic of the mind of Buddha; great enlightening beings should know it thus. 
“Just as the realm of truth always produces the liberations of Buddhist followers, individual illuminates, and enlightening beings, while the realm of truth has no increase or decrease, in the same way the knowledge of Buddha always produces all kinds of worldly and transmundane knowledge without itself increasing or decreasing. 
This is the second characteristic of the mind of Buddha; great enlightening beings should know it thus. 
“Just as the ocean water flows under the continents and islands, so that all who drill for water find it, yet the ocean does not form any notion of itself giving out water, in the same way the water of the ocean of knowledge of Buddha flows into the minds of all sentient beings, so that if they examine things and practice ways of entering truth they will find knowledge, pure and clear, with lucid understanding—yet the knowledge of Buddha is equal, nondual, without discrimination; but according to the differences in sentient beings’ mental patterns, the knowledge they obtain is not the same. 
This is the third characteristic of the mind of Buddha; great enlightening beings should know it thus, “In the ocean there are four jewels imbued with infinite qualities that produce all the precious jewels in the ocean; if these jewels were not in the ocean, it would be impossible to find even one jewel. 
What are these four? 
One is called accumulation of treasures; another is called inexhaustible treasury; another is called removal of burning heat; the other is called replete with adornments. 
These jewels cannot be seen by any ordinary people or sea creatures. 
The king water spirit Ocean, because the jewels are magnificent with perfect lines and proportions, keeps them in a deeply hidden place within the palace. 
“The great ocean of knowledge of Buddha similarly has four great jewels of knowledge, with infinite qualities of knowledge and virtue, whereby are produced all the jewels of knowledge of the stages of learning and beyond learning of ordinary people, Buddhist followers, and individual illuminates, and of enlightening beings. 
What are the four? 
They are the jewel of great knowledge of unattached skill in means; the jewel of great knowledge of skillfully distinguishing the conditioned and the unconditioned; the jewel of great knowledge analytically explaining countless things without violating the essential nature of things; and the jewel of great knowledge knowing appropriate and inappropriate timing without ever a miss. If these four jewels were not in the Buddha’s ocean of knowledge, not a single being would ever be able to enter the Great Vehicle of liberation. 
These four jewels of knowledge cannot be seen by unworthy beings. 
Because they are kept in the deeply secret treasury of Buddha. These four jewels of knowledge are even, symmetrical, straight and true, immaculately beautiful, and able to universally benefit all enlightening beings, enabling them to attain the light of knowledge. 
This is the fourth characteristic of the mind of Buddha; great enlightening beings should know it thus. 
“Also, the ocean has four jewels of blazing light spread on its floor, which by nature are extremely, fiercely hot; they are able to drink up and shrink the immeasurable quantities of water poured in by all the rivers, so that the ocean neither increases nor decreases. 
What are these four? 
One is called solar matrix; the second is called removing moisture; the third is called flame light, the fourth is called thorough exhaustion. 
If these four jewels were not in the ocean, the whole world, up to the highest heaven of material existence, would all be flooded. 
The light of this great jewel solar matrix, when it shines on seawater, turns it to milk; the light of the great jewel removing moisture, when it shines on the milk, turns it to cream; the light of the great jewel flame light, when it shines on the cream, turns it to butter; the light of the great jewel thorough exhaustion, when it shines on the butter, turns it to ghee, blazing like fire, consuming it without remainder. 
“Buddha’s ocean of great knowledge similarly has four kinds of jewels of great knowledge, with light of immeasurable power; when the light of these jewels of knowledge touches enlightening beings, it ultimately causes them to attain the great knowledge of Buddha. 
What are the four? 
They are the jewel of great knowledge stopping all the waves of scattered goodness; the jewel of great knowledge eliminating all emotional attachment to the teachings; the jewel of great knowledge of the universal illumination of the light of intelligence; the jewel of great knowledge of boundless effortlessness equal to Buddha. 
“When enlightening beings practice the methods of fostering enlightenment, they rouse innumerable waves of scattered goodness, which all worldly beings, celestials, humans, or titans cannot destroy; when Buddha touches those enlightening beings with the light of the jewel of great knowledge of stopping all the waves of scattered good, it causes them to leave behind the waves of scattered good, keep their minds on one point, and dwell in concentration. 
Then, touching the enlightening beings with the light of the jewel of great knowledge, removing all emotional attachment to the teachings, causes them to give up clinging to the taste of concentration and awaken great spiritual powers. 
Then, touching the enlightening beings with the light of the jewel of great knowledge of the universal intelligence causes them to relinquish the occult powers they exercise and to engage in the active employment of great science. 
Without the contact of the great light of these four jewels of knowledge of Buddha it would be impossible for a single enlightening being to attain buddhahood. 
This is the fifth characteristic of the mind of Buddha; great enlightening beings should know it thus. 
“The million lands from the sphere of water up to the heaven of neither perception nor nonperception, the abodes of sentient beings in the realm of desire, the realm of form, and the formless realm, all arise from space and rest in space. Because space is everywhere. 
But though space contains all the realms of desire, form, and formlessness, yet it has no discrimination. 
The knowledge of Buddha is also like this: the knowledge of listeners, the knowledge of individual illuminates, the knowledge of enlightening beings, the knowledge of formulated practices, and the knowledge of unformulated practices, all arise from the knowledge of Buddha and rest in the knowledge of Buddha, because the knowledge of Buddha pervades all; though it contains innumerable knowledges, it has no discrimination. 
This is the sixth characteristic of the knowledge of Buddha; great enlightening beings should know it thus. 
“Atop the Snowy mountains there is an excellent medicinal tree called inexhaustible roots; the roots of that medicinal tree grow from 168,000 leagues, all the way down to the adamantine ground and the sphere of water. 
When that medicinal tree grows roots, it causes the roots of all trees on the continent to grow; when the medicinal tree grows a stem, it causes the stems of all trees on the continent to grow. The same is true of the branches, leaves, flowers, and fruits. 
The roots of the medicinal tree can grow stems, and the stems can grow roots the roots are inexhaustible, so it is called inexhaustible roots. 
That medicinal tree can foster growth everywhere, except for two places where it cannot perform the beneficial action of promotion of growth—that is, in the pits of hells and in the sphere of water; yet it has no aversion to them. 
The great tree of the supreme medicine of the knowledge of Buddha, likewise, by past development, fully perfects all good qualities of knowledge, shades all realms of sentient beings, and destroys all the miseries of bad states. 
Universal compassion and commitment form its roots; it is born from the seed of true knowledge of all buddhas. It is steadfast and immovable; skill in means is its trunk, the transcendent perfections of cosmic knowledge are its branches; meditations, liberations, and the great concentrations are its leaves; mental command, intellectual skills, and the elements of enlightenment are its flowers, and the ultimate unchanging liberation of buddhas is its fruit. 
Why may the medicinal tree of knowledge of Buddha be called ‘inexhaustible roots’? 
Because of ultimately never ceasing, because of not stopping enlightening activity. The practice of enlightening beings is the nature of Buddha, the nature of Buddha is the practice of enlightening beings. Therefore it can be called inexhaustible roots. 
When the roots of the medicinal tree of buddha-knowledge grow, it causes enlightening beings to grow the root of great love and compassion, which does not abandon sentient beings. 
When its trunk grows, it causes all sentient beings to grow the trunk of profound determination with steadfast vigor. 
When its branches grow, it causes all enlightening beings to grow the branches of all transcendent ways. 
When its leaves grow, it causes enlightening beings to grow the leaves of pure conduct, austerity, virtue, paucity of desire, and contentment. 
When its flowers grow, it causes all enlightening beings to be replete with the flowers of magnificent arrays of the marks and embellishments of virtues. 
When its fruit grows, it causes all enlightening beings to gain the fruits of acceptance of nonorigination up to acceptance of coronation by all buddhas. 
